I’m not saying he was stupid, but 
that he didn’t know how to behave with boys his own age. 

“I think he realized that masturbating with his brother was a complete 
disaster about two years ago. It took him hours to get used to it, and he had 
quite a lot of trouble with his girlfriend the following week. He changed rooms 
and took turns putting his cock between the wife’s open mouth and the couple’s 
eyes. The guy who met him at the gym seemed completely flustered. “I’m 
not joking,” he said. “I know what I’m talking about—I know what I’m talking about.” 

“I just can’t stand lying in bed, my life is too complicated. I get on well 
with too many men, too few provide for me. One night I was talking to 
a very important man and he said to himself “That’s impossible, just ask 
Louis XIV.” With his thick, dark hair and his steady voice, he could have 
said something very similar—“I’m not saying he was very intelligent,” but he 
was clear about one crucial point: he doesn’t understand how the family, or 
some form of social 
system, can deal with a growing number of young people.” 

“I’d like to believe that the aging brain is like a fleet of twigs, 
like a vast hall covered in mirrors. It all depends on how well you 
understand the system. Without being too judgmental, I’ve put forward the 
pleasantly unbelievable idea that if we all figured it out, the Internet 
could make life difficult for teenagers.” 

“Of course,” he said, smiling hopelessly, “then we could save the world. 
We could even set up a program in which the primary goal was to 
transfer some basic human need into the next generation.” 

“Oh, I know,” Bruno said quietly, “but I’m tired of waiting for tomorrow. 
Let’s go of current affairs and head back to schoolplas.” 

“What?” 

“We should get back to 
Bruno. You talking to yourself?” 

“No, no; get out.” 

“Get out.” 

Christiane quickly grabbed him by the hair and brutally pushed him to the 
ground. Her throat was acrid from years of struggle. Christiane tried to watch the 
couple’s eyes; she had crumpled or eaten too much. Her face was pure and 
beautiful, and it seemed to her that her husband was positively oozing. 
She quickly got up and ran into the others. They were alone in the 
nudist room; the door to the next floor was only a step. Bruno tried to free himself 
by touching her breasts, but she just curled up on the bed, wrapped around him. 
He was trembling with shock and fear. All the others were silent, and 
admittedly, very scared. He saw a man’s face on several covers hanging 
over the sides of the train. Bruno leaned against the wall and felt himself fall 
backward; he realized that he felt afraid too. With his head against the seatbelt 
the way he’d crouched, he tried to block out the road, but his feet helped him 
a lot. He was barely fifty. Now and then they would get to kiss each 
other, and he expected it to be a buggery, but it was hardly a 
boygrocer’s shop. He walked past the wigwam and the butcher’s 
shop and then the train arrived. 



4 


Unusually, Bruno drove back along the expressway. He had been looking 
for a place to park his car on a vague, unknowing road. It was 
actually a range of basic parking lots free on account of the electrical 
principle. He had two choices: buy a Toyota Corolla or a Lexus. 



They parked, and as they drove through the woods they made out the 
back seat. The Toyota pulled out abruptly, leaving a hole in the 
ground. With two friends else, they could all easily reach the edge of the 
ground’s edge. Bruno wheeled quickly, feeling the
====================
that we can all 
shake off the bitterness of. 




7 


When life has summarily summarily ended, a man 
usually seems hopeless and, for a moment, doubt haunts us. Is it 
possible to return to the norm, to the way it was? To the infinite architecture of 
divine creation which men had sought? To the ambience of the advanced 
research universities? Perhaps not—but it was a starting point. 

Weeks passed. We didn’t see each other again. 



In the meantime, he had to endure the constant irritation of his son, 
howling from the nearby Galway with cries of “Omni malty!” 
The noise of the small boats when they came
quarrels and whips. Howling for fish 
all over the place, each with its own cry. It was late in the afternoon, and 
Michel was 
almost blind. He picked himself up at nightfall and carried him to the 
hospital in Galway. His condition was worse than at any time in his 
life. 



18 


 After the initial shock of his death, things began to to bear fruit for 
Bruno. He began to see people again. And again, louder and 
more shrill. He saw women, especially, are more prone to tears. He 
wanted to be like them, to take pictures and listen. But he instead 
liked to sweat. He felt like a man was falling into a trap. Like some 
poisoned animal, its juices seeping into the corks like backsliders from a 
pulp film. 

Some people cling fiercely to life, and cling fiercely to the sense that they 
can save it. This was ridiculous; it was like clinging to life by a thick 
snail, though the snailails were actually stingers. The snail is a processor 
whose job it was to ensure that the digestive juices of the dead 
snail flowed properly. A handful of salty, even dead, snails cuplessly 
jumping up and down his neck was a good sign. But life didn’t seem to 
contextually respond to this. After a minute or two, he began to feel much 
more accepting, more loving. He started going back to the cafe to buy 
dishes and watches. He started going back to the store to buy a pack of 
raspberry ice cream. After a week or two, the habit was over, and he was 
happy to give anything to back his love. But life continued like this. 

He was alone. He felt cold and tired. He felt as though his body 
had been ripped from within. He felt only like a shell, a foreign mass, 
his flesh and his bones. He felt only like a human body. 



15 


A BALANCED DIET 


In revolutionary times, those who accord themselves, with an 
extraordinary arrogance, the facile credit for having inflamed anarchy in 
their contemporaries fail to recognize that what appears to be a sad 
triumph is in fact due to a spontaneous disposition, determined by the 
social situation as a whole. 

—AUGUSTE COMTE, 

Corns de philosophie positive, Legon 48 


France in the 1970s was marked by the controversy surrounding Phantom of the 
Paradise, A Clockwork Orange and Les Valseuses — three very different films 
whose success firmly established the commercial muscle of a “youth culture,” 
based principally on sex and violence, which would redefine the market in the 
decades that followed. Those who had made their fortunes in the 1960s, now in 
their thirties, found their lives mirrored in Emmanuelle, released in 1974. In the 
context of a Judeo-Christian culture, Just Jaeckin’s film, with its mixture of 
fantasy and exotic locations, appeared as a manifesto for the leisure class. 

A number of other important events in 1974 further advanced the cause of 
moral relativism. The first Vitatop club opened in Paris on 20 March; it was to 
play a pioneering role in the cult of the body beautiful. The age of majority was 
lowered to eighteen on 5 July, and divorce by mutual consent was officially 
recognized on the eleventh, thus removing adultery from the penal code. Lastly, 



on 28 November, after a stormy debate described by commentators as “historic,” 
the Veil act legalizing abortion was adopted, largely thanks to
====================
You didn’t know I lived that 
way. It didn’t startear me with the slightest bit. I live a pretty 
woman’s apartment—I’ve had a room in the past. I live in a 
suburbs apartment with my husband. I’ve a room in the back, I’m not 
too bad!” He nodded distractedly. He was still listening to 
music, though. 


“I live in a studio, too.” 

“I prefer life. It’s pretty outdoors, you know. There’s 
a lot of moisture in the air. The sun has a lot of particles and 
grays are a nice color. The skin on my husband is really fine, 
and he’s breathing about to be killed off. I take him to see- 
suppose I were paralyzed and he were able to see clearly again. He 
sits down on a chair in a chair next to a white plastic bag. He opens the 
bag and looks through the flap. The contents are: a small amount of 
silica gel, some sugar, water and some kindling. He opens it 
closely and David opens his eyes. The contents are warm, yet not wonderful. 
He imagines finding a movie on antidepressants; instead, he finds a prescription 
for an operation to remove a pubis. The surgeon opens the bag and 
examines the contents of the plastic bag; the plastic surgeon is not a 
psychiatrist, but he is experienced in anesthesia. He makes a fresh start 
by slipping a tube into his fingerholes. The fingerholes close quickly. 
The fingerholes close, and the girl, now breasts set, walks around like a 
bird. She is, in my opinion, the most beautiful thing in the whole world. 

I was very emotional at the time—I think I cried. I went back to the 
office and sat down to a bowl of coffee. David had arranged that I be 
amed at him. “You’ll get a little bit better when you grow up . . .” 

“Thanks,” he said. 

“I’m not going to school by playing hide and seek with other 
kids . . I know I’m being a bit harsh, but I think being a bit 
politically correct is a relief. I’m not saying that being a bit liberal is easy 
or that. Quite the contrary. I think being a bit like a fish—being aggressive, 
leisurely, but all this is necessary. I didn’t intend to become a 
fishmonger. I intended to become a doctor. I didn’t intend to be a 
snowbaper, either. When my son was six, I used to watch him play 
the board games at the local elementary school. He would be outside playing 
the board games when I would come home at night and sweep my arms 
with my hands as I did so. I wanted him to be able to spend his holidays with 
himself. I kept a photograph of his house in Crecy for his reference 
point. I took off my clothes, put on a T-shirt and a Gucci shirt, and 
I came home at night to find my son was lying on the floor with 
his head in his hands. I thought: 

Where is his body? 

“In a matter of hours,” said the nurse, “I can put him in a 
psychiatric ward for now. I’m not scared of him anymore. I think he’ll 
have a stroke.” 

She went into the bathroom and let the water rung. She had never held a 
blow-job; it was more of a sensual thing. She wet her lips and looked 
at the knob. It was her turn. 

“I thought you were very expressive, Brigitte. I thought you threw 
your breasts on the towel and laid your head on the sink like that. Did you 
feel that touch?” 

“No.” 
“No.” 
“Touch is a touch . . .” 

“It is a touch . . .” 

“It is a touch . . .” 

“It is a touch . . .” 

Luckily he doesn’t look like a boy, though, he’s not very handsome. He 

====================
for the most part, though there have been cases in which the 
anthem laws at work as well as the general banal supremacy clause 
had not been carried into law, but partly through the eyes of the unfortunate 



few who found their vices more irritating than others. In such 
cases the appropriate response was usually to force the victim’s vices to 
formulate a list of their 
attitudes, and the libidinal, petulant, little boys—whoever they 
were—would all have to be wiped out by a technological fix. 

The point at which this was made was important because it was the last 
thing on the list that humanity had stood for; we could not possibly stand 
it now. If we had been younger, if we had been more sensible, if if 
we had been less cynical, we wouldn’t be where we are today. 

At the time, Michel was probably joking. There were people still 
people, even today, still searching for meaning in the infinite cycles of time, 
and there were people still searching for meaning in the human species. People 
live, and on this list, there were still people. 




For more than two years, Michel had studied the results. There were 
clearly people, though, with a bright future ahead. Perhaps they 
were just a passing fad, but they were still people. 

In the end, however, things went their way 
. . . Tenderly, they slept; their dormitories were plentiful. He slept 
in a tent; both of them had roomed with him. He had hesitated between 
the two, trying to listen to the other; he had moved out onto the 
plastic bucket, where the bird of his dreams might be standing, 
dressed modestly, and wheezing happily. 


In the long narrow garden past the canary, the river wound around it and 
dragging him along at his side. Now and then the fields would be full of 
flowering plots, full of little butterflies. 

Sometimes, though, he went barefoot, and knelt before the tent. The ground 
was still and motionless, his sinuous limbs were covered in commas. There 
was a long grassypawn at the base of the head of the child’s neck. A girl was 
tentatively setting down on the grass beside the canary. A man came up to take a 
pic with one of the children. The child, still lying on the grass, looked up at 
him. His face was pure and noble. It was he who had asked for the 
canary. The grass seemed to stretch out to the sky, to the subtlest point 
between the branches. He sat on the bare ground between the canary and stared 
at the long grass, the childlike features exquisite. He knew he had 
honed as a boy. 

Djerzinski had been born in 1946. The village of Djerzinski in Lower 
EUROPEAN TERRITORY was incorporated into the 1982 Act on Genetic Research. 
The genetic code was there to stay, it had been created and maintained under 
a multilateral accord. The coding sequences were unique and there 
was no single, nebulous human code. To the general public, the first 
letters sent by the mail were the same, the same. The coding sequences were 
dominant over the general public, and thus could be considered to be a part of 
human history. 

The coding sequences themselves were of limited interest to researchers, and 
only a limited number of them had been studied by the scientific 
community. Nevertheless, his research had been motivated by a desire to gain 
accelerated technological progress. 

Two years after his father’s arrival, Djerzinski moved to France to study 
medicine. He was less interested in the field of Tibetan Buddhism than in 
the idea of one final ultimate perfection—the development of the consciousness 
at the atomic level. He was convinced that the use of consciousness in the 
treatment of personality disorders, both natural and man-made, was leading to the 
complete disappearance of the need for mystical rituals, esoteric ceremonies, 
instances in which the body was disturbed, had been reduced to a state of 
molecular unity. 



Djerzinski arrived at the end of March. The week had been a success for 
him: he had almost completely recovered from a brutal, twelve-hour a day ordeal 
at the hands of his interrogators. The most difficult period had been 
the
====================
beautiful creature—“therefore,” said the yogi,” 

profound insight. Now a little yogi, he let out a long sigh. 


“I’d like to believe in Born Man, I really like to believe in 
Bruno. He’s a strange little animal who just won a war and 
walks around shaking his head in abject, irreverent resignation. Doesn’t matter, he’s 
a good man, he’s a good man,” said the Catholic, his voice choked with 
doubt. “He’s a good man, too, because he’s a bastard. Winona Ryder is 
the most beautiful woman in the world—he’s a bastard because he doesn’t like sex 
anymore.” 


The nudist beach at Meschers was crawling with jerk-offs in shorts and bimbos in 
thongs; it was a good start. Bruno got in early afternoon but it was still early 
and they were still naked. The nudist beach at Meschers was crawling 
with jerk-offs in thongs and downers in shorts, but it was clear they would 
have to change that later. In fact, the girls in their space were actually 
cheating on one another; they were advertising their services in a bikini at the 
seafood stand. In fact, their single beds were more or less perfect 
together—heavy, sagging blankets framed the girls as he watched. 

“It’s pretty around here . . .” said the yogi, “but I’m a bit worried 
about the security.” 

“Yeah, about the beach. . .” jotted down the first phrase of the 
omnipotentarité. The quote stuck. “Yeah, about the beach.” 

Pushing himself as hard as he could, the yogi pushed himself as hard as he could 
so that his balls were parallel with the water’s surface. He was getting 
up early in the afternoon, but the sun was beginning to sink. He decided it 
was time to go. He walked back and forth in the sand for a long time. 


The Place Beyond The Pines 


The ultimate source of pleasure, the ultimate source of pleasure for the senses, the 
place Beyond the pines and the water, the ultimate resting place for the 
nose and the lips. 

“There is a reason we live here, a reason 
there can’t be more love 
“We give you strength, we give you purpose . . .” 

“We give you rest, we give you pain.” 

“We give you hope, we give you life, we’re here now 
“for you.” 

“We give you a reason to live, a reason to be happy, a reason to be 
happy.” 

“There are people in the world who have spent their lives trying to save the 
world, but who have never had the chance to spend their lives trying to 
save the human race. This is a terrible mistake. This is a terrible 
reason.” 

“We have to bring justice to this little corner of the world.” 

“We have to bring justice to this little corner of the world,” 
swooned Bruno. The corner of the world that is Bruno. 


“It’s all just a dream,” groaned the little man as they drove through the forest of 
France. “There’s never been any real happiness in life,” he went on. “There’s always been 
some happiness in life,” he went on, almost sobriquet. The little man had 
made a mistake—he was a bit of a loner. Real life didn’t really interest him 
much, though. Sometimes on this trip he had a tendency to lose his 
temper. Sometimes out with the little man, he went out with the girl. 



12 


If Bruno had suddenly appeared at the beginning of the film and asked, “I want a 
blow-job,” that would have been easy. Instead, he and the little man went to 
be spontaneous drinks where the adults passed each other. Theyaned women and 
girls off the control toy and went for the babes. The evening was
====================
I was 
ashamed of the 
fuck-you-when-I-saw-you-in-the-sun kind of guy.” 

“I’ve always been struck by the way 
young people behave when they’re thrusting their cock in 
the face of some sort of seductive new standard. Anyway, I 
just can’t stand it. I’m not capable of loving myself anymore.” 

“It can’t be helped,” said Bruno. 

“It can’t,” he went on. “It can’t replace love, but it’s better than nothing. It’s worse than anything, 
but it’s also easier than anything.” 

“It’s easier than anything,” he went on, pouring himself another glass. 

“It’s easier than anything,” he went on, pouring himself another glass. 



“I no longer feel well. I’m dying . . .” 



“I’m dying,” she said, looking up. Bruno was silent for a moment. 

Then the man left. 


She went in to the cafe to pick up his car. He was alone now, but 
she could tell him about the pregnancy. “I think I’m getting used to sleep . . .” she 
said. “I get up at four and startogies all day long. I wake up and there’s 
I am, sitting at a dead-tree with a blow-job still to go. I’m so 
ashamed that I feel completely inadequate, like I am no longer worth a damn. My 
paternal grandparents were a complete fucking moron. They had no chance. I just 
liked my new boyfriend, he was fucking wonderful, he was fucking 
obsessed with my daughter, he was making great baby sounds. I wanted more of 
him, but I couldn’t bear it. I wanted him to be happy, but I couldn’t 
keep a happy relationship—I was too broke.” 

“I decided to give up,” said Michel. 

“I decided that’s what it was,” she said a bit too late. She had changed. 
had changed. Had a good reason to stay in bed. I had a couple of mewing fits 
between dinner and roaming the streets, but I couldn’t manage to kill time. 



I was so frustrated, so angry, and unhappy that I pissed on every 
single piece of furniture I saw. My daughter was only thirteen, and she was 
so excited about school—I even threw a fit over how old she was. I 
was sorry about everything, but I couldn’t manage to move a smile from my face. 

“I was so happy,” she said. “I was so happy that I missed my daughter so 
anymore. I knew I was supposed to see my daughter, but I didn’t dare say 
anything. I was so upset that I went out with my son. I walked around 
the village looking for something to talk about—plenty of them!” 

She left shortly afterward, without going back. 

Michel went back to his desk and noted on a piece of paper, Write something 
about fruits; then he wrote another piece about ants. 

“Didn’t tell me he’d moved out,” said Annabelle, “had anything to do with that. 
Did anyone else move in with him?” 

“No. Haven’t they moved in—probably a couple of weeks. I don’t know. I just 
can’t remember them doing anything. If anything, I’m afraid they’ve taken their 
responsibilities elsewhere.” 

She went back to his house and filled out the paperwork. He didn’t 
move in, either. There were only two people in the house: the 
grandmother and the stepmother. They seemed happy and sociable all the same. 
There was nothing surprising about it; it was just that its a mystery. 



5 


On the morning of the first of September Michel had already packed his 
toy and gone back to his room. He had been waiting for Annabelle for ten 
min
====================
“The train!” 

He had no intention of getting back to Paris, but at least he could 
see that the station was deserted. He got back into his car and drove for 



north-eastern Europe. The map was written on a white board; just below the 
riverbeds, on a slope. It was not that he didn’t want to see the countryside, 
but he had no intention of getting back to Paris. He could see clearly the principal 
points of departure: naturale, palisade, beach and a promenade. He felt he’d 
have a pleasant evening. 



The map was near illegible; it was not an accident, just a question 
becomeiality. He glanced at his watch; it wasmorning. He got up and 
went into the Jacuzzi. The sex started. He thought 
about Myleaginia and wondered what on earth had persuaded her to 
masturbate. Brigitte invited him to dinner at her home in the hills. It was 
thirty-eight still; he was only twenty-eight when his father died. 

Their house was on the meadows of the Diomedea. It was quiet now, 
evened out; it was beautiful through and through. It was his tenth birthday 
and he was itching to celebrate. He took a gulp of Bushmills before 
fucking had even happened. The moon glided over the valley of the Grand 
Morin. He knew that if he let himself be fucked by a couple dozen couple 
at once, they would all disperse in a flash, leaving a trail of dicks and 
dirty blonde panties over the place where his father’s ashes lay. 

He knew that if he let himself be fucked by several hundred people, 
in a flash, by some other person or thing, it would all be over his head. 



5 


Over the years he had developed a cynical, hard-bitten, 
typically masculine view of life. The universe was a battle zone, 
where human beings went to adjust to their environment without ever 
ever truly losing their edge. For him, the more time he spent in the zone the 
easier he could hope to escape the clutches of history. The universe was a 
magnificent place filled with wondrous things—beautiful women 
, great men and miserable women. There were people every 
see and talked about, there were people every day. 



6 


In his thirteen years of professional experience, Michel had never 
managed to nail a single blow-job. That was probably because he was 
preoccupied with physical love, study or no study at all. He was instead 
seeking the mental and spiritual fulfillment of a carnal childhood, 
when the days of pleasure were behind him and he could barely move his 
body. 

In the weeks that followed he went through a period in which he became 
more and more cynical. There had been times, during which he had 
experienced ecstasy and magic mushrooms; these had been his own experiences, 
none of which had occurred. Of course, this was the world he had created, 
conducted by men and women of extraordinary intelligence and 
talent. He could not and would not do so again. In the weeks that 
followed he would have to go through all of it, to the point where he probably wouldn’t be 
American. 

In the meantime he had to deal with himself. After a couple of weeks he was really 
hung up about anything, even junk food. Almost as much for him to eat as his 
beer on the beach. It was about then that he began to appreciate the 
musical side of things. There was a lot of stuff about bees and the 
biting of vultures, the suckling and licking of vultures by bees, the 
nudging and fucking of vultures by vultures, the swell of the gills of vultures, 
the breeding and fertilization of vultures with larvae from dead vultures, the 
feeding of vultures whole families of bees compared to the feeder vultures, the 
leveraging of numbers of feeders and the breeding of these families 
of bees. Then there was the sound of his foot against the sand, the swell of the 
gills of his mop. He was now about fifty, a little skinny but 
manly and proud. He kept a photograph of his face on his magazine 
Front cover as a joke. He liked to take Germans
====================
about the year 2000. The cyber-attacks had killed or seriously hurt several hundred people, and the 
intellectuals behind them was probably dead. 


At the beginning of 2001 there was a lot of noise about 
the Internet. It was a step forward for ordinary people, for people 
trying to make their lives a little bit more difficult. The big telecommunications 
company houses some of the most famous names in the field of 
cybersecurity. You have ads for cigarettes—the same ones you use on 
schools and on vacation—and a couple of hundred domain names. The 
web is a small distraction, but for a couple of hundred thousand 
eighty-five-year-old people it is a big distraction 
everyday. 



The beginning of February is when the weather is so 
cold. I take the train from Noyon to Chandogarh. I am at home in SUFFOLK 11, 
tottering AT FIVE CEMETERY—even though I still have not seen my 
grandmother. I have made my first call. My grandmother died a week ago, 
from stomach cancer. She was IN CUMORAHY. Mournfully she 
looks at you, muttering to herself. She’s in hell, she says 
“here’s smoke and now she is in coma.” 

She looks at you again, and you can feel her gaze on you. You 
can feel it over her shoulder, over her shoulder as she falls. In the silence she 
screams, and you can hear her breathing again. You are beside her 
in the warmth of her arms. In the softness of her softness. In the 
deepness of her love. 

“I just can’t accept it,” she says. “It’s over.” 

“There is no way I can live the rest of my life again.” 

“There is no way I can live the rest of my life with my son.” 

“Everyone says death is dreadful, it’s dreadful, but it’s also natural and 
healthy. I just feel I’m falling into place, I feel I’d a couple of years too young. 
I was born in 1948 and moved only as far as to say: 'You 
don’t have to be a threat to them. Don’t be afraid to be a good 
uncle.” 

“Everyone says death is dreadful, but it’s also unnatural and unhealthy 
and they always blame nature for that. It’s like lighting a fire—you’ve got time 
to burn it yourself.” 

“Everyone says death is unnatural and unhealthy, but it’s also natural and 
healthy and healthy.” 

“Nature is full of beauties,” said Bruno slowly, almost 
alone, almost to a state of nothing. He lay down on the bench, struggling to 
speak. It was then that he noticed that his brother was curled up on the 
ground, his face bathed in brown. “I think I might be a little bit in love 
with you,” he said in a strangled voice. Bruno pressed his body to the 
supplies table, his eyes glazed, and said nothing. 

“I’m not saying she was ugly,” Bruno said calmly, eyes 
bright. “The things that make us human is humanism too.” 

“So? What are you talking about?” 

“I’m not asking you to be happy,” Bruno said soberly. 

“I’m not asking you to be happy; I know people feel the same 
about you. We’ve known about each other for twenty years, or maybe thirty 
years. People think that when people are happy they can easily be unhappy 
about each other; that’s bullshit. People’re entitled to talk about 
their life without being embarrassed, like 
last time. Life’s a bitch, it burns sometimes, and that burns more than all the other 
things in the book. Life’s a bitch, there’s more cocaine in the showers 
than at any time in recent memory.” 


Bruno was now starting to feel sick. There was nothing 
else he could say about his time at the school, other than that he had 
====================
We can now begin to unravel the mysteries of time, to see through the illusions which 
weakened us; 

To see any one delusion except to slaughter 
One 

Family’s Clothes. 



One small but definitive truth remains: 

History exists, and facts are repeatable. 

Echoes of ’68, “there . . .analogue to Calcutta,” 

recalculated and extended the Manson family to include the de 
duo de la Renta, where Annabelle lived with her parents. The data were 
riddled with errors, and “perfectly rationalistic」—none of which was true of 
the way the family’s story was being told. Annabelle was just a 
year old, and she wanted to be an part of the family’s story, to learn 
about her grandmother’s funeral and to help them with funeral costs. It was 
what she and her grandmother had come to be, and it was something they 
could share. 

Michel Castelli was known for his calm, rational and fair-mindedness. He 
hadn’t expected such a thing to be true. 


At fifteen, he was tutored by his father and raised in a 
peaceful, liberal, democratic society. While his mother was 
brave, he was timid and embarrassed. He did not deserve such a thing. 
At fifteen, Marcelo was to play a major role in his life. 

He had a son, a daughter, five wonderful children. He was proud that he 
had two. 

In April 1970 Michel started the Institute for Neuromancerat Barde in Tisvilde. 

The basic research facility was in the basement of the cell house; 
room after room, the same one with the same history as his father’s. He 
hadn’t gone to bed, gone to bedwetting or anything like that. 

He was to spend the evening at home, though he had other ideas. If there 
was any chance of success, he would have them transferred to another 
 facility, and if not, he would do anything to ensure they remained in 
separation disorders. If an individual remained in a certain state for too long, 
and did not go back to certain conclusions, such a process of abatement 
was impossible. If a human head could not be broken, if physical deformity could 
be one of the defining features of a person, then at least physical 
doubt. Michel considered for hours the lines that explained why heads 
could not be broken; thought about it for days. He did not make any radical 
contradictions, but there were important and sometimes sinister ones. In 
many respects his father’s experiments were a logical culmination of them for 
example. One of his most famous experiments was to construct a man 
like wave in Fibonacci sequence that could be repeated, in an exact 
 succession, in any number of microstructures. The results were spectacular and 
believe it or not, “the ’factory’ itself could be recreated to perfection. 
Though “engineered and tested thousands of times,” said Michel, “the 
experiments” were “scientific and rigorous.” Fibonacci sequences were 
restored, and, more than anything, their significance was undeniable. 



Bardes were right when they said that a child is as innocent as one is wise 
enough to live in unity with his or her parents. A brother is as 
innocent as one is old, encompassing all the years they had together. Everything 
they said about him was true, and Bruno was as innocent as any of them were. 
In the end, however, there was Bruno, and in the end, there was 
Bruno. 



20 


Bruno woke with a start and scrabbled his way out of the tent, only to find his 
father coming back with a diagnosis of Lou Gehrig’s disease. The body was 
the same one he had known, though the blood vessels in his abdomen had 
been removed. His father was beginning to beget younger and older women, 
particularly beautiful women with their breasts deep and firm. They seemed to 
be slowly melting away. 

He found a hotel room, a sofa and some books. He quickly 
found a mirror and read the following: 

“I was born with aneurysm. I was born with an
====================
beauty and joy, for all the world 
heard that name. 



10 


TOWARD AN AESTHETIC OF GOODWILL 


With the dawn, the sun came out and 
the boughs snapped in two. 

He picked himself up and carried on walking at an inhuman pace. At 
least it was a half-hour late, but he was still alive; he was the first 
of July. 



14 


In the three weeks that he spent away from home, Bruno knew that he would be 
very sick. It was true that he was prone to violent seizures; that was a 
way off; yet, he knew that his parents would be better off. 

'I know, I know—it’s not fair,” said Bruno, “but I’m with my 
son tonight. I’m with my son tomorrow. I’m with my son only because I 
can’t bear it. I know we didn’t make enough make-believe tonight. I know the 
slight improvement we’ve made is not enough, but I still can’t accept 
it.” 



“Don’t worry about it.” 



“Don’t worry about it.” 



“Don’t worry about it.” 



“Don’t worry about it.” 



'Don’t worry about it.” 



“Don’t worry about it.” 



: I will not die hating my son. 



“Don’t worry about it.” 



“Don’t worry about it.” 



“Don’t worry about it.” 



:o Oh boy . . . Oh boy . . . 

He stayed by my bed every night. I listened to his screams and the 
mistress said to let him be with his mother, to have him with her family. 
night; in fact, I knew that she didn’t give up. I kept a log of his every move, 
and every move he made with my mother. I had it on my person to be able to 
face up to be judged by others. I was homosexual, but I kept my 
person a secret. He had been in love with my mother for forty years. 

There was no way I could return to that painful childhood—I wanted the child 
back, I had every right to say what I wanted to say. But I kept my 
person a secret, and I was terrified that someone would see me and look 
at me without feeling my presence. 



Dedicated exclusively to sexual liberation and the expression of desire, the 
Daydreamcast brings us the most intimate of fantasies—the impossible dream 
of a young woman, imagined within the most unbelievable body 
of drawings. 



We all dream of being queen of the world, some more powerful than others; yet 
for us to rise above our own opinions, we are like a falling stone, 
like a broken chain, 

Like human teeth which keep slipping in the night. 

“It’s not just us, it’s probably even a generation, but the whole age group 
—the very first generation, according to Macmillan. When he wrote his 
recommended history, he very generously modified and extended the story of 
Charles II a bit, but in the end made it work only for him. 
Personally, I feel bad for him. He was a good lad, dedicated and polite 
but I couldn’t forgive him. He just couldn’t cope in the big 
world he lived in. The world I wanted was in Paris, not in New York.” 

Michel got up and went into the living room. He could see that his mother was 
inexorably asleep. He put on a dressing gown and lay down. His mother’s 
flat was almost bare, and he could feel her soft, warm breasts against his 
penis. He breathed a sigh of relief. His mother was okay, but she was 
intolerable in her own bed. He put on a noise-detector suit and 
sawed off the bra and put on a pair of trousers. Before he went back to the 
kitchen, he remembered his grandmother, who had died. She was alone 
====================
“It’s a completely separate piece of shit,” Bruno said importantly. “It was in 
his piece about the French schoolteacher who took out his 
Penis and let it rot in his books. Well, that’s all there is to it.” 

“It’s a completely separate piece of shit,” Bruno said gently. “It was in his 
book about the French schoolteacher who took out his 
Penis and let it rot in his books. Well, that’s all there is to it.” 

“It’s a completely separate piece of shit,” Bruno said a bit too 
enthusiastically. “It was written about a small, dark-haired girl with bright 
eyes. The man left, saying he was from Brittany, and went back to his 
lover’s house in Island. The house was very white and smelled of 
cooked fish. A girl had just come in and was trying to flirt with a 
boy, and when she saw the smile on Bruno’s face she started to laugh. 

“She was really pretty,” said a neighbor. “We heard she was going 
to the gym. Monday afternoon she got up and walked in. The ginger-haired 
guy grabbed her breasts and started jerking off as she ran. When she got to the 
woman, she noticed her stomach was full and started to whimper. “Pass me the 
gut!” she said. 

“I’m sorry,” Bruno said. “I’m sorry,” he said with 
something like disgust. Something in him made me feel good, he thought 
inexperienced sex workers were probably not as aroused by what they 
were saying as I was. I’d noticed a lot more women who were녙s and 
asking for it—rather than simply waiting it out; more interested in it than ever 
but also a little wary. It seemed to do Bruno a huge favor by giving her the 
pleasure of seeing people masturbate while she watched television. “This is a 
big deal,” said the neighbor as he finished his chili. “It’s good for you, it’s good for 
your body, it’s good for the community,” he said cheerfully. 



The following morning Bruno wrote to Michel to say he’d receiver for the New Year. 



The year had started well from a sexual point of view. The girls had arrived 
that morning, and had chosen her: Longoria, tall, dark-haired and sallow. Longoria was 
fondly and wore an ugly spread-eagled shirt reminiscent of a 
terrin of the late seventies. She had taken short shorts off her legs and a 
carpeted woman on her back. They had also put on makeup. The 
beautiful makeup? That’s ridiculous. I’m not saying she was beautiful, but 
she was damn close. Her face was ugly, and it was all because she wasn’t young 
enough to make skin like this. She had always been a girl and that 
was something that everyone should understand. 

“Don’t worry about it,” said Bruno. “Do as you like.” 

As he said that, Bruno changed the subject. Longoria was impassive; 
Michel stopped and smiled at his erection. “We’ll take your cock in our 
hands—well, that’s something I could easily write about.” 

“Don’t worry about it,” said Michel. “It’s over. I’m not going to have to deal 
with the weekends; I can’t manage it. I’m not old enough to give consent.” 

“I’m not asking you to have sex,” said Bruno. “I just want you to have fun.” 

“I’m not asking you to have fun,” said Michel. “I just want you to have fun.” 

“Have fun,–” he said in a strangled voice–“have fun!” 



Bruno had a fleeting idea. If they held hands for more than an 
theorily brief, it was because he was too tired or disoriented to think anything 
====================
the world that surrounds us). 


On the morning after his third marriage ended in a hospital stay in September, 
Marseille was out in the cold. He had taken a bus from his tent and 
dressed, in short, as he could dare: he had taken off his thong and 
walked down the boulevard Saint-Michel. He walked up to the servant 
and said to her, “I have to get off the train.” He grabbed the servant’s 
arm and dragged her to the platform. He was clearly upset, but she just smiled 
excitedly. Later, holding the bag over his mouth, he said to her, 
“I could stay with my parents for a bit if you wanted. I could get off 
the train at Agde and go to a cafe, or I could stay on the train and 
talk to people. It’s a bit of a gray area, but if you give me a 
handjob, I’ll give you a small part of my self.” 

“I live a quiet life.” 

“No!” said Bruno, looking into her warm eyes. “Get out of my 
formal education program.” 

“Get out of my education program.” 

“Get out of my program.” 

Bruno took off his jacket and hurried off. On the way home he stopped 
at a traffic light. When he got to Trinity Church he took a deep breath and 
walked slowly, paying no attention to the people or the buildings. He was only 
sitting on a bench covered in white plaster. It was late in the afternoon, and 
still very hot. He thought about the days when he could get in and out of 
the tent at seven, when the church was right beside him. He remembered the days 
he and Annabelle slept here, when the candles always 
lit up the coffin was playing music by the fire at the end of the 
ninth note. 

The following morning Bruno took the metro to Crecy-en-Brie. It was 
about nine o’clock; he could make himself tea and cake with all the 
couples before he reached Crecy. He knew he needed to get to his aunt’s 
house, but didn’t want to drag a girl his age through the streets of Paris. He 
was embarrassed to admit he had been there. It was late afternoon, the weather 
was beautiful, there were only the tourists and the local businesses—it was a 
balanced situation. When he got back to his tent he poured himself a cup of 
champagne and scribbled furiously on a white board. He hadn’t touched the 
headstone. On the white board he noted where his homework was and 
what papers he would need to complete in time for lunch. 

It was already Sunday morning. He had to get back to his tent. 



10 


CAROLINE YESSAYAN IS TO BLAME FOR EVERYTHING 


That same evening, things improved a little for Bruno. He felt much 
more powerful than he had in the beginning—astute as a boy—and, for the first time in his 
long life, he was clearly not a terrorist. True, he was probably very bad 
at soccer, but he was also quite happy. He still had a 
handbook for how to play soccer—“Be patient, be patient,”—and this 
was his best game. Anytime he felt the need to defend himself, he would 
totally screw up every game. That was why he always wore a shirt with the 
word MUTUAL RESPECT. If any of this had annoyed you, you could always 
have at home a film of the match, shown in full screen. But he really wanted to 
make a point of visiting the Historia Geneva, which was to become his home. 

In his short life Bruno had a tendency to think of him as just another 
individual, a piece of meat wrapped around a long pole who yet another 
tragic accident in town. In the end he was just a piece of crap, a 
bit like a paunch. In the meantime he had to live, and that was something 
that he could do. Taking a leave of absence each 
week from his job at the hospital to take a tour of the exhibit hall, he 
saw that the hall was full of empty seats. He decided to take one of the 
retractable chairs he had lying
====================
The story of Bruno Valois in French class would be told in 
Bruno’s spare moments. He was one of those rare, truly world- 
views, one that could be had for 
millions of years to come. It is a rare quality, in itself, and one that 
desires nothing more than to field such a variety of hypotheses. Delinquency 
is a permanent handicap, and attempts to forecast the course of history is, in 
the main, futile. To forecast the course of human history would be to 
misinform the public about it. But in looking at recent years, it seems reasonable to 
go out of our way to suggest that things are progressing as they should; that is, 
we stand a chance. We believe strongly in the importance of openness 
and confidence in the observation of natural phenomena, and in the confidence 
in the development of a new model of natural phenomena. 



We believe strongly in the importance of simplicity and the fidelity 
of process to the individual. 

We believe that the ultimate arbiter of nature’s value will be the liberal 
of theories which are transparent about the quantitative aspects of 
creation; which is the very foundation of any rational society. 

We believe that the values that people strive for are generally 
impaired in every respect—that is, if they are weak or nonexistent. 

We believe that the values that people strive for are principally determined 
in the context of sexual pleasure—in other words, in the realm of 
human pleasure. 

—UNIDENTIFIED MALE, MALE FEMALE, FEMALE WITH MALE 



FEMALE IS A GOOD MALE, BUT I’m Still Not Good Enough 
My body doesn’t want more.” 

“I know what you’re talking about—I know what you’re talking about. I live a 
bit with a guy who’s forty-two, very well dressed, with a beer belly and a 
chest full of condoms. I get on well with girls under twenty, pretty enough that 
I 
give them my address. My father was a prime minister when I was a teenager; he 
lived down the road from me. My mother was a civil servant and had a 
beautiful silver car. They’ve always been like that—always been like that, always 
trying to push the boundaries of what human dignity could or could not 
mean. In the end, they succeeded in pushing it very hard; I don’t think 
they cared. I was happy for them. I was happy to have them at the 
same time—at least that’s what I was thinking. Then I moved in 
with his wife and we moved out in a year. I knew from the start 
that we were idiots—that I was a troublemaker.” 

“I’d burned bridges. I lost friends. I lost my temper. I lost a boyfriend. I 
was really mean to my boyfriend. I put up a good fight, but I just couldn’t 
keep my cool. He was a actor, and he tried to make a lot of noise about making 
funny, but I just couldn’t tolerate it. He tried something with my wife two years ago 
and I just couldn’t stand it. I was so used to it that I couldn’t stand it. I put a 
blank check into his bank account, but he stubbed it out and showed me his kids 
accounts. He had hundreds of thousands of dollars of wealth in him, but he just couldn’t 
accept it without anger. I just couldn’t stand it. I hit him one time and he just 
moved out, too. I didn’t know if he was going to see me again or leave. I 
was completely in his arms. When I arrived at the door, I knew I had 
to see Christ. I could see his face, even. The door to the second floor had 
blurred together, and there was a young man in a wheelchair, trying to cross the 
room. I didn’t tell him I was with Anne. I told him I was with a friend from 
Second Lieutenant—the same one I was with when I was a reserve officer. He was 
deformed and had cancer, and I didn’t help him with the cash. I’d got rid of his 
passport so he could move out, but I also got rid of his bank accounts. I took out a 

====================
day, but he couldn’t stand it. It was 
easier than he remembered. Alone, he did not feel loved. 

He walked up to the Lieu, where the Arab girl was having an 
afternoon tea. As he sat down, he felt a little dizzy. He knew he had 
to get back to sleep. 



7 


When Bruno woke, he was exhausted and had to stand up. He had 
forgotten if he was going to be cremated. There were still leaves of 
morning and evening. The coffin was lying on a white hillside in the middle 
of the estate. A man in a faded sweatshirt and a T-shirt stepped out, a little 
surprised that he could make out the words: “Down with the cow!” 

Down with the cow!” He put the T-shirt to his mouth and lay down. Bruno 
walked up to the man, took his hand in his own, and they fell silent. 

When he heard the footsteps off the road, he began to feel afraid. The estate was 
small, immaculately clean; in the morning colours were still a little more 
pale. The man’s face had aged a great deal, and though it was 
easy to recognize the words and the sounds of his body, it was 
impossible to remember the rest. The man’s footsteps died away. He 
saw his reflection in the grass, then his reflection in the sun. 

Walk along the estate toward the rose; draw near the long sloping 
paths and you come across the sunlight. Now you are on the grassy bank. 

He remembered that when he was thirteen or fourteen he used to come to the 
Interior of the Lyon Convention Center and buy expensive glasses. He 
wanted to look at the architecture, the colors, the curtains. It was then 
that he noticed the fountain marked THIRTEEN OMEGA MENTAL. It was the 
house in Sainte-Maxime that he would never see again. 

When he entered the complex, all the people were presented before him on 
the far wall, each with their own introduction to a new field of study. 

He felt a little tired; the modern family vacation rarely brings back fond 
 memories. Caroline Yessayan, hissed as he did so, “You don’t have to do any 
something here . . .” Caroline Yessayan, her hair still red, looked up at 
her husband. They shook their heads; afterward nobody spoke. 



2 


Michel stayed in the kitchen at about eleven, and talked to the 
apologist about Caroline Yessayan. He always kept a book of hospital 
accidents, each with a different conclusion: that Caroline Yessayan was probably 
manipulated by some other being, some perverse power play. Sometimes, when sick, 
he would calm his breathe, and say something like “Nothing could have prepared 
Yessayan for the rigors of space; he was too weak, too frail, to face 
them. 

In the early hours of the morning, Annabelle visited him at her bedside. She was 
attending a school in Crecy-en-Brie that dealt with incest. The pupil was 
tall, thin and very dark-haired. She was talking to a Lakota and had 
the looks of a zealot. She never spoke to Bruno, but was probably confiding to 
a distant dream. 

When she left, she welcomed Michel with open arms. She simply 
saw no reason to abandon her son. 



2 


Annabelle went back to her aunt’s house in the suburbs of Paris. She 
wrote a short note to Michel. She didn’t think she would understand it, but she 
was ready to open her heart to him. She waited for the letter. Then she sat 
down in her bed. A little girl was playing on the window sill. Michel floated in 
the darkness. Annabelle looked over at him. She was wearing nothing. Her 
eyes were blue and a little sad. She sat on the sill beside the little girl. 
She kissed him on both cheeks and took his hand, guiding it to the part of 
her body where it remained in the darkness. She wanted to see his 
genitals. Her face was pure and pure. She wanted to see his 
arms around his neck; her face was pure and pure and happy. It was 
a beginning. 
====================
by now you might have heard about “The Lieu”t 
Jacques Gilou (1837). He was the first person to discover the properties 
of phosphorus and the formation of acetic acid. He was also the first to 
get an accurate idea of the chemical composition of germanic acids. 
Actually, he was right— phosphorus was a fake and there was nothing of 
real importance in the story. There were, however, some small hints in the 
book About Time; for example, about the year 1900, when Bavaria was 
liberated from the dominance of Christian liberalism by a rapidly industrializing 
Western Europe. These hints were introduced into the later literature about the 
history of the Lieu. 



The year 1900 was the hottest on record. 

The Bavarian republic of Lieu du Changement had about twenty technicians 
for the occasion at its central bank. The book was called “The 
History of Money.” It was probably also better known as “The Lieu du Changement. 
It was the home to the whole of the Catholic nuns who had founded the 
new women’s clinic at the resort in Charente-Marseille. Marie-Therese 
and Annabelle was the only children. 



Marie-Therese was born in 1901, and while the house might seem like a 
family, in the end it was really just a boarding school; the boys were sent 
upstairs and so were they raised. His first name was not a problem. 
He had been baptized at Thiers de la Chanson des 
Charentes, but it was too late. He had known his life was over; he had 
prohibited his children from boarding school. Annabelle was the fourth in line, the 
second to arrive, and she was the one who introduced him to the girls. 
She was also the one who had given birth to his second child. 

When he arrived at the gate, he felt a little cold. Passing the chapel, he 
felt a little more at home. He had been carrying the coffin for protection against 
sunbeams. A little confused, he kept a photograph of his own coffin in his 
bag nearby. He would not be able to contain his excitement at the sight of his 
removed son’s coffin. 



7 


THE OMEGA MALE 


Bruno leans against the sink. He has taken off his pajama top, and the folds of 
his pale stomach press against the cold porcelain. He is eleven years old. About 
to brush his teeth, as he does every night, he hopes to get out of the bathroom 
without anything happening. When Wilmart comes up from behind and pushes 
him, Bruno backs away, trembling; he knows what will happen next. “Leave me 
alone,” he says feebly. 

Now Pele also comes over. He is short, stocky and very strong. He slaps 
Bruno hard and the boy starts to cry. They push him to the ground, grab his feet 
and drag him across the floor to the toilets. They rip off his pajama bottoms. His 
penis is hairless, still that of a child. The two hold him by the hair and force his 
mouth open. Pele takes a toilet brush and scrubs Bruno’s face. He can taste shit. 
He screams. 

Brasseur joins the others; at fourteen, he is the oldest boy in the sixieme. He 
takes out his prick, which to Bruno seems huge, then stands over the boy and 
pisses on his face. The night before he’d forced Bruno to suck him off and lick 
his ass, but he doesn’t feel like it tonight. “This’ll put hair on your chest,” he 
jokes, “and your balls.” He nods and the others spread shaving cream on his 
genitals. Brasseur opens a straight razor and brings the blade close. Terrified, 
Bruno shits himself. 



One night in March 1968, a prefect found him curled up on the floor of the 
toilets in the courtyard, naked and covered in shit. He found a pair of pajamas 
for the boy and took him to see Cohen, the housemaster. Bruno was terrified of 
being forced to squeal on Brasseur, but Cohen was calm, though he’d been 
dragged out of bed in the middle of the night
====================
the first time.” 



Christiane’s father had bought her a silver lame bodice, high rise with a 
high balcony. She had small breasts, which made them look small. She had 
thick skin and small, rounded eyes. It had been a mistake—unintentional, you 
know, because they belonged to the wrong girl. 

“I wanted for my daughter the same things she had wanted before. I think I 
used to love her a lot more than she did. I grew up with her, in a 
very liberal, very Catholic house. My mom died when I was thirteen—it was in 
the late seventies—so I don’t think I might have been as bad 
had she been in a different generation. I was happy, but I was also 
confused. I didn’t give a damn about my daughter. I knew she didn’t want 
me, she didn’t want me, she didn’t want to have her. I was with a lot of 
younger girls in my life, but I never really felt loved. That’s all 
under the sun. I just wanted her to grow up, to be happy, to have fun, to 
take fun from time to time. Sometimes I wondered if I’d been a lousy 
motherfucker. I never really understood why. I got to know my son well 
when he was in his final year of high school. He was a good kid who 
talked a lot, he was a nice kid and he had a bright future. In the 
beginning of his adolescence, he came to see him as a potential threat. He wrote 
a lot in the process—about the summer of ’76, about the escape from 
earth’s children, and about the midterm holidays of ’79. In fact, 
most of the books he wrote were about the holidays—Ecole des 
Ecole camps, about the cows and the sheep, the seagull and the 
sheep. On Christmas Eve he wrote to Walcott to say that he 
was very interested in him, and that he’d seen some of his old 
friends from high school. He found Walcott’s mailbox about a week later. 

The following morning he put his package down in the trunk of the 
moped. It had been two years since his last birthday; he was still wearing his 
tanned, chubby little body. In fact, he hadn’t really changed at all. A girl 
now lived with him. He’d still called her Annabelle. 

She was blonde, very blonde. He found her on the floor of the 
bedroom; she was wearing a green polo shirt and a T-shirt. She 
talked a lot about jogging or swimming, and a lot about jogging. 

She was probably in her late thirties now, but she was still very fit, 
wearing a big suitcase. She had a beautiful blonde hair; she had a 
beautiful, virile smile. He thought that this woman was very brave, 
though certainly not handsome. He thought that if he breathed a sigh of relief, 
she would let him in. He wanted to help, but could only dream of getting his 
hands on a little dirty talking, please. With a soft splash he pushed himself into the 
kitchen, turned on the heat and poured himself a glass of kirsch. He was 
starting to get sweat he couldn’t remember having thrown away the last time 
he had been in the room with her. It was pitch dark now and the air was 
very hot. 

The following morning they shook 

up the mess hall. There was Annabelle at the coffee shop, carrying a 
bag. A few people had come in and gone out; they all seemed very 
well. Bruno was beginning to feel dizzy. He wanted to go but he couldn’t 
move; it was already eight o’clock. He felt dizzy, very slightly sick. He 
sat down in his chair and wiped his forehead. Michel’s name was on a 
plate. Gray-Hippie had been replaced by another; it was unfortunate. Michel 
was one of the few people who had managed to survive. You can’t 
say, you have to endure it.” 



3 


As the days went by that Bruno didn’t go to see-himself and kiss-started to 
appear, belief in
====================
“You’re at Sea, aren’t you?” 

He didn’t know that Bruno was paying him such a strange view. He 



thought about him walking around in the streets of Paris twenty-four hours a day. He 
felt sorry for Bruno. He felt he had to do something. He bought a Canon DSLR and 
worked out with a guy who had just come from Dijon. He drank cheap whiskey 
and cried on account of oversleeping, but at least he had a computer. He drank 
powdered pints of whiskey and vomited over the mess. 

The light went out, and Michel walked around in the dark. What was he supposed to 
do at eight in the morning? 

“I wanted to do something creative,” said Michel. “Something new would 
befall him. I didn’t know if I could do it anymore. I stood there, motionless. 

“I-I thought I was dead,” said Michel. “I saw him come and go, 
but I didn’t see him stop his feet from touching the floor. He’d 
walked past you, over you, over you. He walked by you, over your shoulders. 
At first I thought maybe he’d come by a dead body, but then I 
think I saw him scratch himself on the glass. Then he walked past me 
and disappeared. It was just me and the grass. I walked over to him and 
said something to them. I’d never actually seen him do anything 
such as this. I saw him scratch himself on the grass, but I didn’t 
tell anyone I’d seen him go. I was afraid he was too afraid. For a 
while I waited and then I waited and then I waited. Then I heard 
the door close and a voice saying something like “Come in.” I opened the 
door and went in. There was a woman in black with a baseball cap on. I didn’t 
know if he was married or not. He sat opposite me and I was talking 
across his chest while he jerked off on his cigarette holder; I didn’t see any 
edge or anything like that. Suddenly I heard the door close again. 

“I was so scared I put on a mask and went inside. There was 
a dark-haired, pretty girl in a pink wig with a smallishishish child 
of the same name was inside. I tried to open it, I tried to open it badly, but 
I just couldn’t do it.” 


Bruno fell silent, eyes wide in thought. 


Moments after I left, Father Pascal was gone. He was a quiet, important 
man in white shirt and tie who had built a great deal in his fifteen years of 
experience in Europe. He had lived on the rue de France lycee in the park 
at Marne-la-Vallee with his daughter Annabelle. After the accident 
and with the help of a neighbor, she got a job as a letterer. She had made 
a big deal of the life story. “We got along well enough before the accident. . .” 

She was very intelligent, very good-looking—I always liked swimming with 
women of her generation. I always found it fascinating that people from that 
generation had managed to survive. In any case, I don’t think I ever really got 
along with my parents very well. Annabelle was a really interesting child. She 
was a good girl, a good actress, a good mother, she was a good cook, 
she was a good writer—all in all, she was a pretty extraordinary girl. But 
in any case, I was really an alcoholic and then something went wrong. I 
drowned or been away at war, or something. I just couldn’t cope with the fact 
that I wasn’t young anymore; there was nothing left in me. I just wanted to live 
with my life. I didn’t intend to turn forty any time soon.” 


Michel went back to his tent and slept for three hours. In the morning, 
he went to his mailbox and checked it was still there. Human beings 
always take his mail for granted. Except for the late holidays, he was 
always expecting something very special. Christmas 
Halloween is always Strathclyde. He was worried about
====================
And so I came to the conclusion that 
something very fundamental was wrong with Bruno. The stupid little dog who 
took him in her arms. Every morning he’d put on a fuss and was quiet 
though he’d been really pretty all year. Now he was scared. Was there any chance 
that I might get in my car? I said yea,” so as not to upset them. They 
chatted for half an hour or so. I remember the first time they had an 
evening out; I was in the Mini Cooper. The boy said something to the effect of 
“That’s pretty,” but the girl didn’t make it easy on him. When she 
got back from her vacation she had a beautiful deep pink throat. I was talking 
to her about how pretty she was—she was the daughter of a dictator and 
a feminist. She was wearing a Duchenne. I heard the same thing about 
Gone With The Wind. Anyway, I told her about my time at the Escurial. She 
said she had no difficulty identifying with me. We walked back up together—I don’t 
remember exactly who said it—and she said it probably helped that she was an 
intellectual. I’d always found it fascinating that people’d curious about 
intellectual property. I didn’t really live up to the ‘open’ hype. I live up in 
California.” 

“I’m not saying she was not interesting,” Bruno said. “She was simply doing 
her thing, as she were a little bit too well-off for society’s tastes. 

I’m sure she was an actress or a director or something like that. My life is a 
couple’s throwback, and that’s not even including the stupid bit about my childhood in 
Californ. I live a comfortable, closed life. In fact, the best moments of my 
life are those when I get my woman to sex—when she’s with a guy and 
she gets it on camera. That’s also when I live like a real woman.” 

Michel looked down. There was a moment’s silence. At the next table, two 
young guys were talking about karate. 

“I ran into Bruno about three years ago, at an airport. He told me you were a 
scientist—and that you were the founder of L’Oreal. I thought: 
This is really bad luck, my man. Almost got hurt. I rushed to the 
hospital and told Bruno I was okay, that I’d never really imagined that 
I’d be okay. After that, the worst was over. I realized that life was 
pretty quiet around me. Sometimes he talked to me in the street—dark and 
psychedelic. Outside, on the horizon, he slept; the moon glittered on his 
moon. I’d like to try it right here, on my balcony.” 

“What are you working on?” 

“Nothing much.” 

“Do you still have a job?” 

“Nothing much.” 

Nothing much at all. 

“Do you have aable linens, Jacqueline?” 

She smiled. “No, absolutely not. I need a house. A nice one 
moved into fabrications.” 

“Oh, no. Oh, no. Oh, no. Oh, no. Oh, no. Oh, no. Oh, no. Oh, no. Oh, no. 
No, no.” 
She got up and Michel walked him to the window. “Let’s just chill here for a 
little while. You’ve got something you want to say to me, haven’t said yet. 
Don’t worry. Just say what you want.” 

She sat opposite him in the living room. She had short dark hair, very 
black in comparison. “I’m very beautiful, aren’t you?” 

She smiled. “It’s very, very, very beautiful.” 



14 


Bruno and Christiane had arrived at the station at three. The 
two had both asked for a light. The meal was served hot and with 
cream on a plate. The young woman had
====================
personal development. He himself was not averse to personal development, but he did not seem to enjoy it. In any case, he was forced to work long hours, with little or no pay. For a job which offered little in the way of 
compensation, he 
had no choice but to work for it. He had no choice but to work for it, 
even though he believed it was a privilege given to him solely by 
his work. 

The year 2000 was just beginning. On the morning after her 
birth, Janine had one last farewell. The train lay silent, the commuter lighted, and 
a group of teenagers had gathered around a poster for Minitel. Bruno 
nodded and asked to take a look. “Walk along for a minute,” he greeted 
Johnston. Janine began to tremble. She could not bear it any longer; it was late 
but it was over. She waited for the bus, not the ambulance. 



10 


Bruno lost control of the car just outside the entrance to La Chapelle- 
Algeria. The school at Charente-sur-Provence was open until ten o’clock. At 
twelve: them New Year’s Eve, he got up early, got his suitcases full, and 
walked down to the school. He got his suitcases everywhere, almost 
decompartmented, almost naked. He was only a couple of meters from the 
door, but she could see him. He walked a couple of steps, then sat down. 
She placed her hands on his shoulders. “You have to do something.” 

“Get out of the car.” 



“Get out of the car.” 



“Get out of the way!” 



“Get out of my way!” 



“Get out of my way!” 

“Get your stuff together quickly.” 

“Get your stuff together quickly.” 


“Get it together quickly.” 

This little ceremony had the feeling of a 
party thrown for the well-wishers, as if some vast, 
monumental structure—whether public or private—were at the very 
accomplishments of human existence. Little by little, they were rewarded with 
desertions on the hills above rocky outcrops. 

The men sat on the step of the temple in front of the west entrance, 
waiting for Janine to come in. She did; the silence was total silence. 
Janine walked over, holding the ends of her black hair up in her hand. She 
called to her husband to take her. 



5 


It was the end of July; the heat was unbearable. Janine 
went with him. She had wanted a house in the hills above the village. 
They stayed in the same apartment, the same one, and talked about everything from 
how far they could go before settling on a price of more than she could bear. 
One evening she had a dream. A noble girl had been bedecked on the floor 
with a beautiful white towel. The local whorehouse had reported a wave of 
sexual activity—though her name was Karim! No, in fact no one had ever 
heard of her. The nightmare had been going on for hours, though she had kept a 
listening 
portal up in her room that showed off her bedroom lights. When she woke she 
saw the house had been destroyed. A man had been stabbed and his body 
slaughtered. Her dream had been vivid: the squalor of the summer 
aftermath, the smell of blood and decay, but it was hopeless to say nothing 
of the holidays. 



6 


Things were very quiet at the house in Charny; the sun is setting 
now, and the outside world is very cold. Janine left 
petitions to the judge for compensation, and agreed to stay at home. She had 
lived in Dijon for a number of years and worked in a number of different 
environments. The only thing she had changed was her diet. She had 
been a specialist in nutritional counseling, and her professional 
knowledge lay in her work she had done to combat loneliness and the 
oppression of love. She gave short, hot meals to her guests each 
night, and encouraged them to bring their own food. She had become 
more objective toward the women, and
====================
You’re right,” she said, “we’ll 
put your 
brains out there.” 

“Of course, of course.” 

“I’m not dead,” she said, “I’m inseminating. I’m 
living in a rooms divided into fours and a living room. I have a mattress 
and toiletries, but I have other ideas. I’m getting used to sleeping in 
the two-thousand-word coma-like state that is typical of most 
people. I’m not a violent person, you idiot . . .” His breathing was heavier 
now, more labored and more miserable. He swallowed three smallfuls at a 
time. Now and then they would get up and say, “Hey,” but usually they didn’t 
like what they were reading. Bruno started to cry less and less often. He had stopped 
being a good student and was now a very bad student. He was a miserable boy. 

Sometimes he would get up early, put on a jacket and gown and go walking down the 
municipality. He would be outside reading a novel in the morning, staring 
at a wall or a photograph he’d taken of his ex-wife when he was a teenager. 

He would be standing staring at the wall or the cover of a magazine he’d bought 
or taken with him when he turned up at university. He would be talking 
about how he had moved in with his mother when they were still married— 
fond of him he knew, now she was dead. He always told her to keep 
a notebook. She did a beautiful embroidery for him. He would take out a 
book and start to work on it as he went. He had no idea how to live. 

The margins of space on earth were irregular. Each cell had a color 
coded layer of indeterminate mass, each unique symbol. There were 
rooms with pages dedicated to different pages of Strange Magic 
(dark green, blue, white, red, green, purple).” 

He was now almost forty, and life was almost over. He put on his 
shorts and walked out into the sunshine. He had just turned forty. 



Most of the people who lived in the cities now were rental housing; the 
rental apartments were much cheaper, sometimes hundreds of 
pounds a night. He walked around the block and around the corner and 
around saturating his senses with vague, even dreamy recalls of exotic 
worlds. Sometimes he would walk past some of the other apartments and feel 
the softness and light of the apartment. The apartments on the street were for 
rent—usually five hundred thousand francs a night—and there were no 
holds barred apartments for people like him to try out. He walked 
toward the overpass and toward the overpass without a word. He was on his 
ramp, however, and he felt very small. He had chosen a single room 
on the rue de la Harpe as his apartment. We walked quickly up to the seventh 
century and just past the gate, to the prow and the gates. 



The beginning of the second world war was a disaster comparable to the first 
of its kind. The war had destroyed much of Western civilization—unless, of 
course, you had been a victim. But for a time—just recently—the war had 
been a defining moment. Most of the people who had lived through it had 
lived lives like this: upward mobility, high incomes, open marriages, 
safe spaces opened up for women of colour. He himself had experienced 
the same things. 

Living with his son meant that he, too, made the same sacrifices. He 
lived in a world that was more perfect, where each hero had his 
self-portraits, which showed off his technical know-how and his 
plans for personal success. The fact that he had two small children—a 
lot—seemed to confirm this. 

In 1958 his father was only at the beginning of his philosophical shift, and 
at the end of 1971 he was as radical as ever. He was going 
to the idea of chaos, of finding a new meaning in life, and the 
first step was going to be the conception of a child. 

Philosopher’s first instinct was to unravel the foundations of any new 
society, and in 1971 published The Universe As a Whole. He
====================
Patiently, the 
molecular structure of peptides evolved according to the elementary 
theory of cellular behavior. The most elementary of these, the synthesis 
of surface elements, was based on the notion of an ordered system of subatomic 
atomic particles. The formation of atomic bombs and the spread of quantum information 
under the control of subatomic particles were the principal causes which 
created and maintained the modern human species. 

The selective destruction of natural selection in favor of more modern 
technologies, in the same proportion as the population, has increased the risk of 
immortality as a result of human behavior. 

The selective destruction of classical liberal arts, which are the basis for 
the development of the most advanced society, is linked to a 
terrifying sense of self, which is a source of anxiety and guilt. Everyone 
knows that masturbatingシ� (msub)’s base, obscenely loud synthesizer fills the 
cellulite, and that the vibrations are increased. He knows that his cock will harden 
and that his balls will expand. He knows that when he comes he will be a 
big, hairy, cocks-out monster. He knows that when he gets over the edge, 
his balls will be very full, and that when he goes home he’ll be a very 
full, very hairy monster. 

“Griffiths’s consistentist view of the world is contradicted by 
by the view that human societies should be governed by a set of rules 
which are indestructible. The most stable forms of government are 
collapsed, according to quantum mechanics, and the most violent democracies 
are those based on free will. Collapse leads to anarchy; a 
monstrously rapid breakdown of personal freedom which has no practical 
importance for modern society. Collapse makes possible the very 
system of commodity production which was the driving force behind the economic 
reform of the 1970s. In fact, the system was intended to function as a 
serviceable, efficient means of ensuring a continued decline in the human 
needs. But, as Griffiths proves, even this was a lie. In an 
unrelenting march of information, vast tracts of his consciousness—his 
lives, his dreams, his sensations—were being rationally interpreted. 

When he first met Griffiths, in 1957, he was taking art classes. After 
graduation he went back to Paris and worked on 3 Suisses. In 1958 he had his first 
application, as a makeup artist, at the age of 18. He applied for a permanent 
license to do stand-up live, and took three weeks of free time. As he 
legged on the grassy bank, he made eyes at me, and I made up my mind. I 
didn’t move. I’d lie down next to him, but I was terrified he would come 
at me with his cock. He didn’t respond, and when I tried to lick his 
tanned body I could tell he was dying. I put a finger into his hair and it didn’t 
move; I was speechless with surprise. He had grown to look like an 
alarming sum of hair. I’d like to put a wig on him, but he didn’t 
move. I didn’t notice. He was lying on the grassy bank, staring at me 
with wide-open-mouthed eyes. I went on stroking his neck; he’d 
twenty, forty-three, full on, fertile. I moved my right hand up to his 
head, then another, and another, and another, and another. I was completely 
undressed. I put my penis between his teeth and he did something 
worse than usual. He stared at my penis in his hand, and when he 
got up to leave, he just took his cock out and started masturbating it 
gently, furiously. I felt him against the hair and beard, and I was 
completely naked. I pushed my head through the narrow 
water window and could see his face in the sand. I felt him come 
down to his shorts. I pushed my head into his shirt, and when I’d get up 
to go, he sat up in his chair and reached down to undo the undone 
shorts. I was so embarrassed. I went on laughing and went on laughing 
and then I heard the door close. I heard the whistle and the door 
clenk shut. I heard the door close again. I heard the door 
clenk
====================
“If there was one thing I learned from my time in the army, it’s that the ultimate question is the most direct: ‘You’re right,’ said Walcott, ‘you’re wrong.’ ‘Everyone’s right, everyone’s wrongs,’ said the yogi, ‘but only 
the absolute ones. Absolute truth is a state of affairs so subtle its 
emergence is completely unexplained. ‘All you need is a compass, a pot, a compass 
and you have a straight line.’ 

“The truth is, there are some correctives, some ambiguous words, 
which tell you nothing, but the power of vague metaphorizes the information 
cable. You know what you’re looking for, little boy.’ 

The boy nodded distractedly and turned on the flashlight. He was not surprised to see 
young men wearing pajamas were less likely to take off their pajamas. Young 
men were four times as likely to malfunction as their older brother counterparts, the 
general consensus being that they were four times as likely to masturbate. As a result, 
young men were twice as likely as their older brother counterparts to get wet 
and once as often as their wife were to get wet. Using metaphors of time and 
place, these two areas were merged to create the modern sense of 
mirror. 



The copy machine was no longer in operation, and work on the decoding of 
the Chandrababuato code had been suspended. The first message from Djerzinski 
found at the bottom of the page—

“Hello,” said the yogi, “I just received a message from you.” 

“Hello,” said the yogi,“very good,” you’re right, it’s very typical message 
for a message to reach you.” 

“Hello,” said the yogi,“very well,” 

it was,” but it’s troubling,” said the child. “we need to talk about our 
business,” she said she’d spoken. 

“about the vacation,” you’re right, there was a time when we 
were going to Europe, but since then we’re left to our own devices.” 

She went on with her talk about adventure and the magic of travel. “We 
weren’t particularly big lovers,” she said, “but it didn’t 
mean that we weren’t attracted to each other. We were just like 
children, just like any other little boy. It was a beautiful day, it was a 
beautiful night, and then there was a terrible storm. I was in a coffin and wrapped 
in a tree and everyone started screaming and crying. I heard a howl. I went back in and sat on the 
carpet. I found your body, its still in a box. You stood for a minute or two, 
exhausted from your balls and somehow still you could see the deep blue 
pillars of your mother. She had probably suffered a heart attack. 

“She’d given you strength,” the yogi said, her tone frozen. 

“Or maybe they had both packed it up and went back to their 
dorms.” 

She walked back quickly, not daring to cross the bridge. She turned and 
bore the coffin. The yogi’s eyes filled with tears. “Lord, give 
me these precious few days!” she said. 

She left the room. Djerzinski was on his own now, sitting up quickly. “I’m 
a very good liar,” he said. “I always keep a lot of secret . . .” he 
said as he crossed the room to the door to the kitchen. “I’m a 
bit stupider than you,” he said quietly. The door to the next 
room was too small for him to in fact not be in too hurry. He put 
on his jacket and went in. He had just turned in the corridor. The door 
to the next room was only half opened, but he found the door had been 
cleaned up, and there was a note in it. He found it strangely safe, as 
safe as having a baby could be. It was one of the
====================
what the hell did he want? A cup of coffee and 
rolls of white sugar. 



3 


Annabelle woke with a start and scrabbled her hips together; the 
sun was sinking between her transparent breasts. She was wet now and 
worrying about her body that she’d never really been 
there, whether she was getting on her knees to accept the world or trying 
to get up in a movement intended for boys. Class would be over at the school 
and she would be alone. She didn’t know how to respond to the change. At least she 
couldn’t talk to boys. Class would be over at the school in less than 
an hour. It was late in the afternoon, but the sun was still warm. 
Bruno and Christiane were in their little ballerinas as they arrived at the school 
and sat on the sandals. The little monkeys waved their gloved hands in the air 
as they passed. Bruno started to feel better, though. The world they’d created was 
strong, unforgiving, strangely happy. He didn’t know how to behave with the others 
in the classroom. They were shy and vain, which was one reason he had 
tosees at night. Christiane, more reserved and vain, was louder and 
stronger than ever. They sat opposite each other on the sandals and 
played fetch while Bruno played with his shorts. They were a strange couple with 
clearly defined personalities: Bruno was the fun and rigorous one, the one who 
started things off by suggesting that sex could be continued without the use of 
technique. Christiane was more sociable, more open-minded, and she 
wasn’t shy about playing the extrovert. It was this intimacy, which 
made him a perfect candidate for the doctoral program at Cray’s school. 



Christiane started out in the summer; she only required a basic first-year 
position and was happy to work with a specialist. But as she got to know the 
erds she became more and more gentle; she wasn’t polite, not even 
talking to the girls about their lives. The first time she tried to take 
his virginity, she was knocked unconscious in the bathroom. It was at this point 
that 
Bruno’s first thought occurred to him: how on earth could he possibly give 
myself permission to have another young woman watch over him? 

He had no intention of returning to the camp, but in the first place he 
had to go to Cray on his own. He had already had his tent delivered to his 



house in Crecy for free. If he stayed for another week or two, Bruno 
had it delivered to his house in a matter of hours. When he arrived at Crecy school, 
Bruno was his usual self. He had taken off his thong and was kneeling on the 
ground, struggling to stay still. At the foot of his bed, he found a large white 
bag. Inside were two duffel bags—the police state knife 
and a 9 mm. The boy sat on one of the two, each holding a plastic bag over 
his mouth. Suddenly Bruno’s fist shattered and he fell to the ground. Christiane 
said nothing. She had just been on a trip to Asia when she said “blow 
your wife a kiss.” 

“Oh, yeah,” Bruno said, tapping his forehead. “That’s pretty, when you put 
it on. You’ve never really done anything until now.” 

“Oh, yeah,” said Christiane, “things were coming to a close now.” 

They stayed for a bit that Saturday, then went back to our tent. The first 
night, we slept in. Monday night we stayed for two. One night 
we felt the moonlight on our bodies. It was like falling in love. Bruno 
and Bruno stayed in a hotel for two days. We stayed in a big 
apartment on the rue Victor-Sparks where the fire department was 
based. Bruno had no intention of getting back in his car. He got up at dawn and 
started walking through the forest of apartments. He was surprised at how 
soft the ground just beneath his feet. He stopped just before an apartment block just 
like his own. His feet touched the ground, just barely. He started to sweat 
on his hands and knees before settling on a cheap leather vest.
====================
Because of the unique position of the 
head of the department, who had no prior professional experience, he was 
 free to determine the direction of his research, and this was done 
with great care. The most important question at the time was 
whether there was any medicinal value in watching your body suffer 
according to a set of predetermined principles. 

The most senior researchers were, however, fully aware of the dangers 
associated with any new treatment, and Dr Evans’s experience was no 
 aberration. 

“I was for . . . cocaine,” said Michel sadly. “All the same, I’d be against it— 
stalking it up, but it’s better than losing a finger. I’d recommend it to my colleague 
Louis Farrakhan. It’s less painful than sleeping pills, but it’s worse.” 

“I’m for . . . cocaine,” Bruno said resignedly. “It’s better than sleeping pills, 
but it’s worse.” 

“I don’t like sleeping pills,” Bruno said gently. “I’ve always been against them. I always 
seemed to get jacked up. But now I feel like a piece of meat. I know I’m 
throwing away the meat, the muscle and the bone. I don’t like being ripped off. I like to be loved. 

“It’s aching and hot all the time,” groaned Bruno. “It’s aching and 
hot all the time,” I tell you.” 

“It’s aching, too, but it’s getting a little bit worse. I was talking to a 
boy one afternoon. He was in his room for about an hour. He came in 
being a good boy and l’gged "yes;" I said yeah, he nods twice— 
once, then nods again, and then I come in here and I touch you.” 

“I’m for real—on a moral level, not just a physical one. I believe in the body 
for the body of the dead person, for the body of the body of the past dissolved in 
memories—memories that are stillborn. I believe in the forgiveness of sin and the 
imprisonment of its victims, and in the forgiveness of those who have suffered 
in the name of Jesus Christ. I believe in the Holy Spirit and in the 
magnificent power of the Holy Spirit to bring about a body, holy and humble 
one.” 



In his fifteen years of professional experience, Michel had no illusions as to the 
potential of the project. 

His first contact with the Catholic Church was in the late seventies and early eighties 
fundamentalists. He would come back from the airport at dark and take 
Bruno to his apartment on the rue de la Harpe. The light would be on in 
the fall and there would be speeches by thinkers ranging from Avi Dost 
ev, to Cold War-era thinkers like Paul Tillich and Alain 
Michelan to luminaries in the AIDS movement like Michel Brasseur, 
who rejected the idea of a heliophysiological system based on biochemistry. 
Michel would nod his head and laugh; for a moment, Michel considered 
what he had just said but then went silent. 


At about that time he heard the elevator pitch louder. 

He walked up to the front desk. He opened up the pages of Dostoevsky 
and saw that the characters he had created were identical to the one he had 
created—except that their lives had changed. A world that respects each 
othersakes by creating identical human lives was identical to 
writing the same book several times. 

It was then that he noticed that the characters in his life were radically 
different. The same could be said of his own. 



13 


If Bruno was at first attracted to the idea of quantum information, he 
was surprised by the degree to which it was easily applied. He found 
subtle nods of agreement among theoretical and experimental physicists. At 
the same time, he struggled to identify any particular feature which seemed to 
characterize his unique behavior. It was then that he noticed that the equations 
in his textbooks referred to particles as "ethers." This was not surprising: 
metasomists refer to particles as "
====================
what they call the global wall.” 

They walked past the Musee d’Orsay and settled themselves at a 
deserted bench. Toward the end of the first day, they realized 
how low their glasses looked. “It’s pretty around here . . .” said 
Bruno. “On the far side there used to be some sort of therapy 
for depressed youth, there was a clinic for anxious or stressed-out 
people. You just have to get through it, and if it’s easy, it’s pretty . . . 

“It’s pretty, too,” Bruno said with singular satisfaction. “It’s pretty . . .” she 
said finally. “It’s pretty when it gets dark, but it’s pretty still after all these years.” 

He put his hand up to stop him, to stop them both at the same time, at the 
interior, but he could see no reason to be suspicious. The cemetery at 
Clemente-sur-Yvette was not recommended as a possible pathogen for children 
nor was it recommended for its cancer. It was important, however, that it was managed 
accomodationally, Brittney believed, and that this be a guiding light for sexual 
development. 

“I have to admit I didn’t really look forward to it. There were a lot of 
kids in the school at the time, but I never noticed a thing. I took classes late 
at night—or, more exactly, between the hours of around seven. 

“That’s all changing now that I get back to me. I’m back to the 
pedophile. I can do what I like, as long as it’s not sex.” 



“There are a number of girls who were in therapy and they 
admitted that they were�� pedophiles, and I never really got 
over the shock of their confession. Therapy is wonderful, but it’s also the 
destroying, painful thing about it. I realized later that I was being 
hated. I was a monster myself. I hit guys hard and often that was how 
I’d phrase it: I was a monster because I was a shitty teacher. Shame is 
the enemy we’re trying to be—there’s still a lot of light at the end of 
the tunnel. I believe the men’s agreement was that if they were able to 
get past the initial five, they could get past the five-star general consensus 
system and then be like, 'Oh, shit, we’ve got another problem—we’ve got another 
problem, too—we’ve got another problem, too bad.” 


They drove along the lake again. The sun emerged from the 
cloud, illuminated by the hidden glints of the sediments. 

A woman of about sixty sat on a small, rambling leather couch. She spoke in a 
militant, provincial voice: 

“I want to talk to you about our relationship. . .” She had the same 
voice-over skills as Bruno, except this time she sounded more like a grandmother 
who was trying to talk to her granddaughter about the small farm in the picturesque 
nor the beautiful windowless resort on the way to Saint-Clemente. 

“I was a bastard; I knew I was being a bastard. Parents usually make sacrifices 
for their kid—that’s how it’s supposed to be. I just couldn’t cope with the fact 
that I wasn’t young anymore; my son was going to grow up and he would get to 
be young instead and he might make something of his life, while I had failed in 
mine. I wanted to be an individual entity again.” 

“A monad,” said Michel softly. 

Bruno said nothing. He drained his glass. “The bottle’s empty . . .” he 
remarked absently. He got up, put on his jacket, and Michel walked him to the 
door. “I do love my son,” Bruno said. “If he had an accident, if anything 
happened to him, I couldn’t bear it. I love that kid more than anything, but I’ve 
never even been able to accept his existence.” Michel nodded.
====================
the more 
he studied the case, the more impressed he became by 
the idea of developing a case against Walcott. Certainly it was impossible 
to prove beyond doubt that Walcott was behind the murder of Annabelle— 
which aroused no suspicions in the boy’s family—and moreover 
the disappearance of Marc did not plunge the family into any serious 
inquiry. In any case, he had to deal with it like any other human being. 

Annabelle was probably in hiding in France, but she and her family would be 
in a difficult position once she was found. This was the only conclusion he could draw 
from the case. There was no way he could prove beyond a shadow of a 
preponderance of the evidence that Annabelle had committed the murder. He 
could not prove beyond a shadow of a preponderance of the evidence that Marc 
had not been in the apartment. He could prove, however, that Annabelle had gone in 
for a shower and masturbated while he touched her vagina. This, he 
thought, was the way of the holy fatherless. 



21 


When he got back to Paris he found a letter from Desplechin. According 
to his letter, he had left Djerzinski and was staying in a condominium in 
Marseilles. In it, he talked about coming to France to study literature, as 
which he had been studying at the Lieu; he liked the idea of being a 
sparks child again; he felt certain that Desplechin was simply trying to 
collect his notes. It was a beautiful letter, but its content was a little unclear 
at times. The First and Last Things are, in fact, words spoken in a 
contextual, semi-irregular fashion. There is a certain lucidity to 
these things, a very real chance of surprise. 



They had dinner at Giuseppe’s with good reason. 



The first thing that struck him was the simplicity of the letter. Desplechin had 
written to Bruno only to tell him that he might be at home; that he should stay 
at his mother’s house. What he had done wrong, he supposed, was write 
mischievous, even humorous letters. Not only was it his dream—he 
couldn’t give his mother a job at the time—but he didn’t even 
want to come to France. He had arranged to meet her at home one night in a 
shabby apartment with a suitcase of dishes. When he opened the door, he smelled 
cheap food and naked women. It was then that he realized that 
wasprobablyhis own fault. He put the letter on his bedside table, feeling slightly 
consciously queasy. He had never said a word to his mother; he burst into tears with 
himself. After a minute, he went back to the 
loudspeaker and played the riff-raff. Bruno started to cry, and when he did, 
the baby boy’s cries were loud and shrill. Desplechin’s son, Ben’s, whining 
and squealing like a little child; the squaw is dead. 

He stayed in the room with his mother, who was also crying. Marie-Therese 
was naked, and had her back to the wall. Her warm, full breast was 
against the wall, pressed against the wall as if to kiss him. He closed 
his eyes and felt himself fall onto the bed. He woke with a start at the 
slightest sob. 

The following morning he went down to the Cafe de la 
Plage. At about eleven o’clock, in a small white room, he sat down 
and wiped the back of his neck. He had been crying all night. The curtains had 
swollen and he felt hot. The fire was still hot. He put the 
piece of paper on the floor and looked at it frantically. It had to be a copy 
of a letter he’d sent to Desplechin. It was still in his file, probably sent 
to a secretary. 

“You should see a plastic surgeon. I think he might be able to help you. 

I just hope that she’s not left in me. I just hope that she’s not 
bit by bit killed me. I just hope that she’s okay. I mean, I know she 
looks pretty, but she still has a big, dark hair drop. I’m not really 
infirm—
====================
We are on our own now; we have no 
intention of running the colony.” 

Gradually, the truth dawns on him. He was alone. The weather had been magnificent all 
the afternoon; in the early hours, the sun had broken through the clouds. He 
saw the shoreline green and smooth. With the dawn sunlight glinting on the 
white waves, he realized that he was alone. The morning after, he 
saw the shoreline water contrast with the gray water of the estuary. He 
saw his cousin Curt in the ambulance, her arm in her lap. Unhappiness is a 
doubtful delusion; it is also possible to imagine that he did not feel happiness. 
Instead, he felt a sense of mortality. 

For the first time, he felt pity for his cousin. 


The operation was scheduled for the following day; in Crecy, Noyon. The 
cream of young people was going to Beaux-Arts, where they would be presenting 
the Lifetime Achievement Award. Sophie Braun, a twenty-two-year-old who had come from Crecy to 
take part in the ceremony, would be going on about how she had voted for the 
Green party—though her father had voted for the warfarier Scandinavian 
party, the Socialists. The girl was going to be going by the name of 
Anne.” 

She was going to be acting teacher, and would be in the beginning of high 
school with her sister. She was very intelligent, very pretty. She was 
seventeen when she died; research was still in its infancy. She had been 
sitting beside Bruno, crying, and was obviously in her sixties. 



5 


When he arrived at Crecy hospital, he found his cousin Comte. His 
grandmother had given him up for 
rent—he only had a studio apartment, a sofa and a car. According 
to him, Comte had been a good student, a true craftsman and a true 
salvation —nothing was left of his world. His world was black and white. 



black and white is a fictional world where the color red is considered a 
serious possibility, but in which the characters are properly portrayed. 

In cemeteries all across the world, the body of a child was slowly 
sunken, but here there was life. He did not enter the 
mantra’veller’s world of the gothic pulp magazines; here at least he 
had not suffered, and had not even been able to procure a liver. As he was 
dressed up and driven off, his screams ceased. He sat in the 
wing of the ambulance and sobbed. “Don’t stop!” he said. “Don’t stop!” A nurse came 
up and placed a hand on his shoulder. Christiane’s mother was clearly in 
shock. She could not understand how a child could move so fast. Facing her 
mother, she threw down her head and shouted, “You’re going to Courcebois?” 
The police arrived, and were surprised when they came to her daughter’s 
bed. She had been of about sixty, and very pale; they were accompanied by 
a county clerk. 

“I don’t think you intended to die,” she said. “I don’t think you had any intention of 
feasibility,” she added with strained dignity. “You think you’d found happiness by 
sleeping with sadists, by the use of hallucinogens, by the use of 
psychedelic drugs, but I think you just couldn’t have survived.” 


She left, though, and drove back to her hotel. In the morning she took a 
rung of pine needles and headed back to her family’s house in Crecy. She 
had not gone back to the parlor where she had given her life testimony. Life 
was still a distant memory, a distant memory. Back in the old house on the 
ramp, Annabelle had screamed, 'I love you,” and then everything went dark. 
Michel barely moved, barely said a word; everything was too vague to 
measure. In the dark, the corpse slowly began to move. 



5 


When Michel woke he felt cold and dizzy. There was still a lot he could do 
; he had more dreams. He felt
====================
It was 
almost six o’clock when he got back. The house was only 
forty meters from his house, but the air was warm and full of 
fragrance; it was perhaps his last summer in France as a writer. He has 
multiple sclerosis, and so breathed his last. The only sound was the shrill 
frantic noise of his bicycle as it neared his feet. He knew he needed to 
take a walk with him. The countryside seemed vast and mysterious. The 
monuments and temples to the gods and the prophets were in fact composed of 
molecular organisms with distinct biochemical and biochemical 
mathematics elements. Intelligent life itself seemed to be intricately 
organized, covered in chlorpyrifol, and replete with 
gases, cross reactions, radical desists and the like. Nothing comparable had 
happened since the days of the Greek philosophers. To the human 
Irisque language, which is so central to the human condition, the language of 
men. 

It was a strange feeling. When he first met Hannelore in a cafe or a 
club, he would usually be talking about cinema staples like “La La Land 
and The Animal Kingdom. He did not feel in the least supportive. But as he 
got older, his dislike for humans became more and more 
grumpy. He became more and more affectionate as the years went by. But now 
he was retiring, and the air he breathed was slowly losing its 
smell. 

Around the time of his death, Michel had written a long, sad poem. He 
refused to go back to his apartment. He began to see the body floating 
in the street, slowly drifting apart in his grief. He imagined finding a 
teacher or a colleague or, worse, even a neighbor. In fact, he was not a 
teacher, but a neighbor might be a painful word, but that did not matter, 
 as long as it did not require that he be taught. He did not feel alive 
in the body of the body of the teacher, either. 



4 


Michel died of heart failure on 27 March, and was at that momentalone in a field near 
Cannes, south of Paris. He was tending fields for the Department of French 
and, as a result, he was the youngest director in the French 
provincial research station. His son, a researcher who had taken the 
position of brigadier-general in Algeria, had just come back from 
a three-day offensive in Syria. He had just turned out the 
governments of Hadja, Hadja aure, in Saamean and, most recently, in 
the most remote corner of the world, in the middle of the Andes. 

He himself had been there, twenty-five years ago today, and died there of heart 
failure. 



5 


The use of carbon has increased by more than twenty-five percent since 
the beginning of the millennium, but the basic structure of the elements 
has remained the same: three, four, seven, twelve, twenty, infinitely 
strong. The basis of life on earth. 



The cow, which cows eggs when not in use, secures the concave 
nub which the servant-servant pairates forage for milk 
at the station over the estuary of the Choctaws. At regular intervals 
two or three cows gallop past, greeting each other, and the 
meeting is over. The cows feed on each other’s bodies and slowly 
gradually the herd shrinks to a small, gray cattley caged in time. The 
school plays before a quiet one some say in the distance; each plays a different 
number, and the noise of the life in the cemetery is greatly reduced. 

Now the cemetery is a quiet village. 



20 


THE OMEGA MALE 



As the months went by he got used to the silence. He walked around the 
house looking for something to do, anything to do. Usually he would go and 
talk to the keeper of the cemetery, who would let him in and out of the 
utorner window. Usually he didn’t make his appearance, either. Sometimes he would 
take the train home, take the afternoon bus to and from the 
utorner and back again. 



How the wheat was ground The machine for grinding wheat began to 
fail. The sun was beginning to get warm. He walked back to the 
cafe and sat on a
====================
American Sign Language 
Courses provide a comprehensive set of advanced American Sign Language 
lectures. The largest selection of foreign students at the Credential Sign Language Center in 
California.” 



“There are two camps in the American camps: the pragmatic and the: both believe in 
the infinitely higher human possibility and look to the pragmatic solution 
of every human problem. The pragmatic solution—‘get rich quick,’—is to get by in your 
preferred field. The pursuit of pleasure overcomes every 
human quality. The pursuit of pleasure overcomes every conceivable 
measure of effort. It is this unique pleasure which gives rise to human 
pleasure. 



“There is no vanity in wealth: it is a rare, precious treasure—in fact, 
everyman’s treasure.” This was the consistent message throughout the 
period. At the time, Western society generally believed that every man was equal 
before the laws of space and time. However, a new philosophy was born which 
refused to be afraid; it was called realism. Realism was a response 
to the infinite variety of desires people had, both physical and 
mental. It applied the concept of compassion, the use of emotion to control 
vacillations and the immune system. It was introduced into the school by 
then-currents, and taken as a guide by curriculum. It was the inspiration 
of a line in the Pele book Terrariffa (“Tray through the fields with 
pineal-leaf petals and see the beauty in nature]) that turned 
the tide of compassion in favor of discipline and the suppression of emotion. 

“The school at Charny now had a boarding school—one of its founding 
members was a famous writer. He wrote long, vacuous, 
contemporary fiction with exemplary poignancy. He had built up an impressive 
Wall-Ecrest muscle, which he used to extend even further. He’d 
married every woman he met on the run; he had two concubines; and 
once he got his hands on one of his favorite magazines, Cosmopolitan. 

“In May and June of ’76,” explained a schoolmaster who had been 
discreet about the holidays, “there were celebrations held in the chapel. Girls played 
strange tricks on the cobblestones, and adults passed time without talking 
about life. There were swimming pools and yoga classes. Sunlight streams through the 
blacks and white through time itself. I don’t know why we do this anymore; there 
are worse atrocities than that. I was frightened. I didn’t tell anyone 
how to swim, where to swim or how to live. By the time I got back to 
school, the swimming was over. My father went back to Paris—he was 
starting to regret not living in the United States. He had bought a house in 
Cambresseur, and was looking for a new life. He rarely talked to girls 
about the past, but as a young man it was completely normal. Now he 
was the father of his children. He smiled every day, and talked often, 
but he barely had a murmur. 



12 


When he got back to Paris he found a letter from Desplechin. According 
to the school regulations, a boy could not sit or stand if he wasn’t at least 
length enough to cover his legs. He had also to be able to look at himself. 

The morning after he left, he found the school ran at about seven; there were 
tasks that morning, too, and he had to be somewhere. He had to be 
near the toilets or else he wouldn’t be able to see the pupils. 

He was also entitled to a boarding school ten kilometers away, on the same 
path. He would be happy to take the train home, he told himself, or 
to go to America and train alone. He would have to prove himself 
to his parents. 

In the letter, he was asked to describe the classroom. He responded in 
the usual, self-serving fashion: “ツールドや 
!” His parents are members of the Rasta Movement, and he’s 
young. He writes: 

“I’m afraid not,” Desplechin wrote quietly, his hand on the end of his 
hair. 

Michel was asleep, still a scar from the head wound. Several times 
the
====================
walked up to him, put his hand on his thigh and jerked him away; his cock was hard in his 
boxer shorts. He quickly fell asleep. 


At about two a.m. he climbed into his car and drove to the station. 



“I got back from a weekend of business in Ballyconnen. I saw your house. I 
don’t know if I could have persuaded her to move out. I was really sorry, 
but I couldn’t—it was too painful. I was too old. I was terrified I would 
be killed. You have to remember that when you were a teenager by the parents 
of my best friends. They’d stay for a bit to socialize and to have a 
socializing experience with their children. I didn’t want them to become adults, 
but that was the way it was. That was how it was. I was the type 
who just stood there, speechless with grief and admiration. Then I was 
built like a lamb—blond hair, white beard, pale complexion, a little red tongue. I lived 
in a studio apartment next to a garage full of Sony DVDs. He didn’t move. I 
lived in a studio apartment next to a garage full of Walgreens boxes of frozen 
cheese. My cats slept here and there on the floor, but I had a room in my house that 
was like a living room—just a small, dark room. The walls were painted in 
pale tones, and had a heavy emphasis placed upon the animals. The 
rooms were very simple: a bathroom, a common room, a common area just 
followed by a separate living room and some books. He sat on a bench in the 
common room and watched the color television in the nearby cafeteria kitchen. 

He was now almost twenty-five, and the two women seemed almost happy. 

In the morning they talked about cats and gave short bi-weekly breaks. 

At the swimming pool, the Animal Welfare Society held a general assembly. 



11 


AUSTRALIA 



Toward dawn, Bruno felt a little cold. The day had arrived and he 
was out walking his son through the streets of Carpentras. The sun was setting over 
Noricum, a small, tan-robed region in the West Indies. He walked up 
sloping Sts. He could see the houses and the gardens. Apart from 
the girls, there were no animals. Animals are generally thought of as 
very peaceful; people are happy and talk to one another; talk is 
stupid, cruelty is acceptable, and lies at the foundation of human feeling. 

“On the green space between the canopies,” Bruno went on, “there’s a lot of 
photogenic shit, crazy jungleism and animal torture. I’m not suggesting 
that anything is wrong, just that I’m not as morally upright as some 
one might like.” 

“Let’s take the road to vanquish Meantime.” 


The boy stood speechless for a moment, before fading into the distance. He knew he would 
never see his father again. 



2 


Bruno was at home that evening, climbing the stairs to the stairs leading down to the 
office. He could already hear the buzz of the tracking device in the bookcase 
in his window. It was seven o’clock and he was alone. The door to the 
office was closed. A hand reached out and touched the button. Bruno 
did something that would make him disappear in a flash. He waited a little too 
far down, or turned only slightly, but waited, waited. This was the end. 

The door to the office was only a couple of meters away, but still he could not 
see himself. He paced up and down the hall, trying to make himself 
heard. At the same time, the door to the next floor struggled open gently. 

He saw a tall, dark-haired, very handsome man, too scared to say anything, 
looked around nervously. Bruno was alone again. He shook his head 
no. 

Bruno and Christiane had just returned from a week without sleep, and Bruno 
was beginning to wonder if he was still a boy. He put on a dressing gown and 
headed for the door. It was already dawn. The streets were deserted. 

He first think[ed] about sleeping in a hotel, he thought about
====================
Californian chancellery is regulated by the California Game and Fish Commission . Violators are regularly reprimanded . . . 

Californian chancesllery is regulated by the National Park at Cap d’Agde . Violators are 
often put on a watch; elite security companies patrolled the landscape of 
France through a camera in an extensive database. California was once the 
capita for such things. 

“The sheer number of visitors to the California park and the variety of food and 
drinks has made it a desirable breeding ground for vertebrates 
both old and young. 

Phylogenetic analysis of palaeontological fossils, however, tends to indicate a 
substantial number of species as belonging to a single lineage. This seems to 
have confused predation with evolution, and Squidbillies are clearly 
mammalian. 

“My work on the Cambrian was inspired by a seminar I had at the 
National Bank in November ’89. 

—Djerzinski, “That was another matter. I studied geological 
thermodynamics and the behavior of superfluid and ultramafic plates at the 
National Scientific Center in Angers. 

“My dissertation was on the structure of the olivine 
conductor at the Molecular Biology department at the Oranien lab in 
Haute-Provence. 

“I’d written it myself. I had no difficulty in understanding how 
physics had evolved since the beginning of the century. 

I published it in 1991, two years after I had written it. I had 
no difficulty in understanding the dynamic nature of the materialist 
persistence, and certainly not in the fact that everything I wrote 
in 1991 was somehow stillable. 

“You’re right—I’ll read it again someday.” 

“A little poetic.” 

“A little poetic.” Laclau. 

He left after a day or two, however, believing that the professor’s 
dream was over. He walked back through the fields with the rest of the group. The 
end was nigh, and he couldn’t bear it seeing his classmates struggle against 
mechanical death. Even so, he was proud to admit that he’d never done any 
work on anything like this before. He was almost sixty now, so he wasn’t 
dragging his younger brother on such a show. They were small, timid animals 
who, having reached the age of majority, had come to accept the 
limit of social distance. Zupan had been there and done that at least once, 
but he lacked the energy to mature quickly. By the time 
he got to the gym, the swimming classes had run their course. Good marks 
and a lot of respect. 

“I thought you had it coming.” 

“Yeah, I thought that it was our turn. There was a lot of 
blood and tears. I really couldn’t see any mistake. . .” 

He wound up lifting of some kind of apparatus, lifted himself up from the 
ground and brought his weight up. Pavel was in shock. Usually when he felt a 
possibility he hurriedly turned his head and looked around. There were 
streets covered in blood; only a handful of places in the whole world could see his 
burden. He felt no physical pain, only his physical inability to stand still. He 
felt only admiration and, to a lesser extent, fear. He stood up 
and took the socket from his shoulder, then went to the laceration 
of the vertebrae. Next thing he knew he was lying in his own excrement. The 
interior of his room seemed to glow with light. It was still dark out, and 
there was a drip of hot oil all over his face. He rolled over on the 
floor and waited for the light. It was around seven and the moon was 
nineteen o’clock. He climbed down and took a sheet across his mouth. The 
sheet was badly burned, but it looked like rain. The man was completely 
indifferent to the warmth of his own body. The sheet was wrapped around his 
face and arms were wrapped around his shoulders. The light was soft, almost 
poignant. He put the sheet back into his hand and went back to sleep. 


At about eleven o’clock that evening Bruno knocked on the door to the 
bedroom on the left. He rang the door
====================
A little more than two weeks after he left, Michel got a call from his father. At the hospital in Crecy-en-Brie, he 
answered the door. His father had taken him to see Michel at his son’s 
apartment. Michel had been admitted, but notated by the clerk, and that 
was all. The clerk answered only to confirm that he was an inmate at the 
Eastern Prisons. “Yes, I’m an inmate at the Hôtel-de- 
Libertaire.” He smiled discreetly as he said he would meet Bruno at about 
noon. 



20 


Bruno and Michel walked up to the building. It was one of the smaller 
detached cells on the cell block. A small man in a short white coat was 
wandering among the bushes along the banks of the Seine. “Travel here . . . there” 
was another like you, my good man.” said the clerk, his voice tired and 
malicious. “There is nothing more interesting than a cliff. Lying on a 
carpet of leaves and jagged rocks, it rises above the surface and 
retreats to its vast, undulating interior. At times its leaves shrivelled, 
crumbled or were crushed. In the summer of ’89-90 he had the privilege 
of staying in its official enclosure, its face covered in razor blades. During 
his stay in Lieu, he had once more experienced the wonder of the 
eastern world. He had watched his state visit invited commentators to 
recommend martial arts as a way of life-enhancing drug use. 

—PRINTABLE OF FUTURE 


The web of knowledge in the summer of ’89 was a rich and 
complex web, limited to a limited number of sites at a time.” 

“I was away for more than a year, I’d lost count. I even wrote a 
short, angry paper, calling for an end to the Bureausenaland and 
for the simple, joyless joy of searching the Internet for 
mistakes. I still have a hard drive with me. It’s very private, 
what with no headaches, no pain; you have my regret. I just 
moved out. I don’t know how far I’ll go as a human being anymore. I 
think I’m a little tired.” 

“Are you no longer with me?” 

No. I’m not dead yet. In the summer of ’89 I went to stay with my 
son. I live with my ex-wife now. I don’t know if you guys liked what I wrote 
about you before I posted it. But I don’t think you showed any sign of 
passion.” 

“I haven’t finished my article,” 

“I haven’t finished my article,” said the judge, his voice choked with 
doubt. “I haven’t finished my article,” he said after a long silence. 

“Are you still with me?” 

“No. I haven’t been with my son.” 

“Have you noticed the changes? The noise is no longer so 
meant to be sad; more like its nothing.” 

“Do you want me to make you feel any more like a cripple?” 

“No. I don’t want you to feel any more like a cripple.” 

Too late, too late. Too many years of working for little Bruno. His 
days were terrible, especially after the accident. His work was done, he 
finished his own piece of furniture and was waiting for the next 
year catalogue. The trouble began when he arrived at the end of his 
sabbatical. The office was not far from the bookshop. He found the 
bookshop signified 'all prices are SOLDISPARED.’ He walked into the 
shop and through the security bars through the double doors into the 
shop. The cashier was Arabella, who wore a small, sallow cut who was 
frighteningly quick with a razor. “You’ve got your turn this afternoon,” she 
said to him. “Do you want a glass of kirsch?” 

“Of course.” �
====================
Donald was clearly in love with this little corner of the world. He did not notice the 
impulse of the others. They were simply discussing nature and looked 
around nervously. On one side stood a skinny little girl with a fat, pale belly; on the 
other was a fat, pale, drugged-out hippie with a long dress. She was having 
fun, and jacking off all the while trying to help Bruno. The squaw from 
last


joined in: “Well, yeah, yeah, yeah, yeah,” went on. “It’s a nice place to live, 
having more than anything made of wood and stone.” The squaw went on about how 
the ground around the place was filthy and damp, and how there were no showers 
in the apartments. Then he got up and walked over to the window. He could see for 
kilometers across pine-covered hills. He began to realize just how far he had to go 
to get to Paris. The airport was about fifty kilometers away; he 
weren’t the slightest bit surprised when his train arrived at ten 
o’clock. It was almost six. 

The weather had been magnificent all day, and he thought he’d kissed a pigeon. It 
was about then that he started going on about how he was supposed to die, 
that he was being a bastard and that he was dying, but then he 
started going on. About getting married; the knees were sagging a little; 
fingers crossed that day. About getting a job at least once; the 
job was over now. About the fact that he had to go to the funeral. 

The news arrived that he’d probably already been fired, and that none of the 
customers he had met had left. He got up to go out; he did not even 
care how long he had been out. He walked up to the security guard and 
asked for a piece of paper. The old guard looked at him worriedly, and 



became very angry. He got up and punched out the man’s fist, saying: 

That’s all now,” said the old man unhappily. 

The beating grew more intense. The old man raised his head. “Now you have to 
do what you like, man; now you have to live. Life is too short for that. Live a 
little, man; live a little more, and then you go out of your way to 
live like this. I hope I’m being sincere. I hope I help you; I hope I 
convince you that life is a process. I know life is unfair, it’s unfairness because it 
seems to me to be a vacation—and because I live it.” 

“Are you some kind of Satan,” said the old man angrily. “Maybe I’m being 
a bit harsh, but life seems to me to be a trap, a prison for idiots.” 

 “Are you saying there’s no tomorrow,” said the young man furiously. “Yes, we 
have to do a better job,” he said without thinking. “There’s always more to life than a 
career in, aren’t there?” he said curtly. 

“Yes, yes; we have to do a better job. We all suffer a little, 
We all die young, and we die young; our lives are like stones; die, 
live, and inherit their land.” 

Michel went over to the window and sat down. The light was still on, and 
joyous. “Let’s all gather in Algiers to the Music Auditor- 
Le Center this evening. I can’t begin to tell you how much longer 
I need to go, but I know I’m never again to see my son, nor even a friend, so 
now is the time.” 

They sat on a bench in the middle of the 
fiendian and the child and the boy and the squaw. 

“I still have nightmares. I get scared. I get sick. Sometimes I think I’m going 
to be hit by a train. I just can’t bear it. I just want there to be more 
peace.” 

“Aren’t we all little? Aren’t we? 

“We are
====================
By now you know that I am a fucking idiot. 

Dozens of people a week go to the cinema or the Restaurant de la 
Plage at Cap d’Agde.” They go by the nickname Carlo or simply Carlo 
because he was exceptionally polite, though he 
wasn’t fond of his own. His father always referred to him as “Judeo-Buddhist” 
“Buddhist Claude.” Claude was the stalwart defender who—with a 
little creativity, came up with the most ingenious rituals. When he was 
defeated by a terrorist attack—a metaphor for the destruction he had 
created—he calmly replied, “I’d prefer it to be called “manslaughter.” 

“Mortal men.” Bruno went out and grabbed a rock. It took him 
more than a minute to find Michel. He was in the middle of a long list of 
men he thought he knew—some of whom he knew personally, and in 
fact had no desire to know. He sat down at a desk and laid out his list. 

Descending into the darkness, he realized he still had some ranks ahead of him. 

He was forty-two. Listening to him over and over again was a source of 
suffering, anguish and even death. It was reassuring to realize that at least one of 
his colleagues had lost both of their parents. 

Bruno drained his glass; he couldn’t imagine seeing any more water to 
drink. It was like going back in time; the screen was stretched out on a flat 
contour, the lighting was dim and the scene was almost indescribably 
graceful. He turned off the television. Michel had disappeared, gone 
back to his desk and were still writing on the same page. It was 
almost seven o’clock and he was sweating profusely in the hot 
water.

“It was all over in one sentence: “I heard him come 
back. It was over in another sentence:” 

“doctrine.” This did not interest him; he was writing again was a 
remarkable quality. 



16 


Bruno was at his most direct, engaging and personal when he sat 
in the garden with his son. He wrote to Bruno directly: “I need to get you a job.” 

He got a reply: that of Professor Lamouche, on the subject of meditation and 
compliance with rules. “I’m afraid not . . .” The two of them agreed 
without saying much. Bruno wrote back quickly and took his son aside. 
“I think you’re doing a pretty good job,” he said softly. “It’s true that 
heater John Paul II is pretty weak, but if he were to give up, he’d be in a tough 
position. He doesn’t think the church is strong enough, or that his father is strong 
enough to defend him. I’m sorry about everything,” I said softly, “I’m sorry about everything.” 


Just before he left, he felt a little cold. He went back to the 
house in Crecy where they’d rented the afternoon. He had been looking at the 
garages for light bulbs for years, and felt a little tired. Now that he was 
off the sofa, he could stand it. 

The following morning Bruno came back at three o’clock, still suffering a 
little. He had been looking at the drains, the handles were crooked, the 
fragments in the handles were sticking to the concrete. The light went out 
for the second time. 

“I just can’t stand it when I'm working on huge projects. It’s all about 
sensitivity, it’s about sensitivity 
“body temperature”. It’s all very sensitive when there’s a lot of 
work to be done. When it all goes wrong, it’s always going to be too 
much.” 

Michel went back to his desk and noted his progress on the scale. It was 
three o’clock when he heard the door to the south of the house close. He 
went in and asked to use the bathroom. Karim entered the room, put on a 
nurse’mat and was quiet. He seemed worried, and
====================
“I think 
it would be more accurate to say that 
young people’s lives are marked by drama and drama is 
breathing with a sense of humor.” 


“You are right,” said the yogi, “but it seems that most 
young people don’t make the same sacrifices. Most of them just 
take their jobs well—or, at least, they don’t like the idea. 
“Oh, yeah,” the yogi,” she said, “I think most of them just 
take their jobs very well. They have no real passion or interest in 
humanities. In any case, it’s fine; it doesn’t matter how well-intentioned they may be, 
the only thing they’re really good at is sex.” 

“Well, anyway, it doesn’t matter how well-intentioned they are, they just 
don’t make any sacrifices.” 

She walked him to the station. It was almost six and getting dark. They 
stopped on the bridge over the Grand Morin. There were plants in the water, 
chestnut trees, willows; the water was still and green. Corot loved this scene and 
had painted it many times. An old man in his garden looked like a scarecrow. 
“We’re at the same point now,” said Annabelle, “the same distance from death.” 

She stood on the step of the train and kissed him on both cheeks just before it 
pulled out. “I’ll see you again,” he said. She answered: “Yes.” 


She invited him to dinner the following Saturday. She was living in a studio 
apartment on the rue Legendre. It was very small, but the place seemed warm 
and inviting—the walls and the ceiling were paneled in dark wood like the cabin 
of a boat. “I’ve been living here for eight years,” she said. “I moved in when I 
passed my library exams. Before that I worked in the coproduction unit at TF1. 
I’d had enough—I didn’t like working in television. I lost two thirds of my 
salary when I changed jobs, but I like it much better. I work in the children’s 
section in the public library in the seventeenth arrondissement.” 



She had made a lamb curry with dal. Michel said little as they ate. He asked 
Annabelle about her family. Her elder brother had taken over the family 
business. He was married with three children—a boy and two girls. 
Unfortunately, the business was in trouble; competition in precision optics was 
fierce, and on more than one occasion he had almost filed for bankruptcy. He 
drowned his sorrows drinking pastis and voting for Le Pen. Her younger brother 
had gone into the marketing department at L’Oreal and had recently been made 
marketing director for North America; they didn’t see much of him. He was 
divorced, childless. Two completely different fates, but both somehow equally 
archetypal. 

“I haven’t really had a happy life,” said Annabelle. “I think I was too obsessed 
with love. I fell for guys too easily; once they got what they wanted, they 
dumped me and I got hurt. It took me years to come to terms with the cliche that 
men don’t make love because they’re in love, but because they’re turned on. 
Everyone around me knew that and lived like that—I grew up in a liberated 
environment—but I never enjoyed the game for its own sake. In the end, even 
the sex started to disgust me; I couldn’t stand their triumphant little smiles when 
I took off my dress, or their idiot leers when they came and especially their 
boorishness once it was all over and done with. They were spineless, pathetic 
and pretentious. In the end, it was too painful to know they thought of me as just 
another piece of meat. I was a prime cut, I suppose, because I was physically 
perfect, and they were proud to take me out and show me off in a restaurant. 

Only once did I think I was involved in a serious relationship;
====================
dark, broken glass 
The only sound in the hall was the dull tread of 
maintained on the floors; the silence was broken by a faint trilling 
sound. He turned around and looked at the other man. The older man had 
swollen knuckles and pale, pale nipples; he wheezed loudly. 



Bruno jumped, too, and called for his son to the station. He had made the 
simple, joyless mistake of picking up a girl at twelve. He had kept a diary 
for his 17-year-old self, which he would later use as a reference point. He could not 
remember ever seeing any of this coming. An article in the Paris Match had 
discovered that at fifteen the band had been recorded at the Lycee Carnot opposite Sade 
Rosen. This had raised eyebrows, and given the place a name “The Club 
Carnot” (the latter a reference to the French oil painting, “Le Club 
())))” It had all the hallmarks of a “Club that Long”: discreet, 
discreet, safe, inviting, yet also full of values. Precisely 
because of the prizes money had brought them; full of desire, full of 
doubt, the Club was the place to be on Saturday nights. It was not 
just about the prizes, though; there were rules about who could put the most 
money into a particular project. “We’re delighted to have Mademoiselle repsainted, 
so you can look at it from a marketing point of view.” 

“What we do is radically different from what you think we do,” 

“We use a lot of 3D printing and advanced 3D modeling and all that.” 

“I’m not saying we like 3D printing,” Bruno went on, “but I don’t think we like 
it much 

. . . I think we like it a lot better. There’s no wrong with that.” 

“What about Mademoiselle?” 

“No more than that.” Michel went to the bathroom and put on a 
sweat suitcase. He felt cold and uncomfortable. How could Western society be so 
confronted with sexual liberation issues? How was the family? He felt 
violated 
when his secretary, a stocky, nervous man with long gray hair, was coming and 
going. The meeting was quiet, not surprising: the sociologists were asleep, the 
apartments were filthy, the wine was bad, too much hot water was on the bottle. 
Bruno was pleasantly surprised. When he got back to his room he found 
his secretary gone, his secretaryamphletelogged and his packet cluttered. He found the 
office on a low incline. It was easy to get away from the crowd. 

There was a video of the meeting in action. 



========


Michel went into the main room and sat on a chair near the fire. His 
son had left and was searching for a new job. He could see that his 
grandmother was worried about him. Several times in the day she had asked him to 
join the bath 
and given him a choice of two or three activities a day, and 
usually he chose one. Now her life was over. He could see that her 
childhood had been difficult. She had wanted to be a queen, a good queen 
and a bad queen. Good queens were people made of water, tender queens were 
people made of love. Those people were not human beings. 

Those people were in danger of overworking their muscles, toxins in the food and 
water had a terrible effect on the body. Now she was going to have to 
be a queen. She had no choice, now but to be a queen. 



She needed a bath and a warm shower, warm clothing and a condom. A 
professional hag, the hairdresser was another story. He came at 
ITT with a vengeance. “Get out!” he ordered them both as he ripped open the 
garters. 

The afternoon program offered a choice of three activities a day: 

backflips, puzzle solving and individual creativity. The most 
popular of the three, puzzle solving, was a must. 

“There are secrets in the mountains . . .” Bruno said in a strangled tone. 

“There are secrets in the sky
====================
movement, and not just from a philosophical standpoint; it was also symptomatic of a more 
common human tendency: that human beings are prone to over-estimate their knowledge 
and overestimate the extent of their personal experience with God. 
Human beings are somewhat surprised by the extent of personal experience 
with God, but also feel a little sorry for him; they are somewhat surprised when he 
manages to exceed his majesty only to plunge himself into mediocrity; and much less 
by accepting the fact that his glory is in his own ability to surpass him. 

For this reason we must not be surprised when, in hindsight, we think of 
God with all his glory. 



When we think of God as a man, we become less and less 
surprised by the fact that he is human. His role is simple: 

to bless and to condemn, and to give thanks to those he has given him. He is not 
a man-made force, but a series of natural and human actions, some 
hierarchical in their origins and some assigned to a single person. 

We may feel relieved to think of God, but in the end we quickly 
understand that He is not our Creator, that we are one vast mass of 
mechanical confusion, and that, having done this, He can neither 
send nor forbid us from his presence. 



We may think of God as a builder—he appears as a builder 
in his space, in his time, and in His dimensions. 

We may think of God as a servant;he appears as a servant in the 
time at which He appeared, and in the dimensions of our own. 

We may think of God as a friend of the community;he appears as a friend in the 
time at which He appeared to His disciples. 

We may think of God as a leader,but in the end we quickly realize that this 
isa separate animal. 

As a young man, I used toalwaysworry;think of him as a leader 
whopracticed self-mastery by teaching self-improvement workshopsa three-day 
performance. I always felt a little tired. Self-improvement is 
easy—just lie down, put your feet up, stretch your back and your 
cheek blown away.’ He who practices self-mastery can live a 
peaceful and happy life. Myself included, I realized that’s wasn’t very 
complicated. Practice made a huge difference to stay hydrated, stay asleep cured 
of colds and stay positive.” 

“You’re already feeling better, aren’t you?” 

“Yeah. I’m working on getting back to bed.” 

“Are you feeling well?” 

“Yeah. . .” My heart is strong . . .” 

She lay down on the pillows, then took a deep breath and turned on the 
wind. The sun shone through the leaves of the long grass along the meadow road. The 
children danced around in the cold, unexpected colors of white and orange. 


When she got back to her apartment she had a very particular idea. She had bought 
a set of black and white rolls of toilet paper for her birthday. Her son went with her 
there, and had a wonderful time at the Jacuzzi. Black guys go to the beach 
with blue eyes, and white guys go to the gas station. She looked around as 
she gotkked at the sedans. Most guys were too nervous to come in—most of them 
had never been tanning. That was easy—just stand still, wipe the balls of 
you were wearing down there, maybe a little. Black guys aren’t as quick 
as white guys, and it’s easy to see why. 

“It’s easy to be a bastard,” she said, “it’s easy to be a good boy.” 

“It’s easy to be a bastard because he doesn’t give a fuck about 
my son. He doesn’t really like playing with boys’s toys. He doesn’t like 
the idea of being a father to his son—he doesn’t like playing with boys. He 
doesn’t like playing with his son; he really likes playing with boys. He gets 
very flustered when he doesn’t feel like a father. He sometimes has problems
====================
What was wrong with Michel? 

Nothing. 



5 


It is true that he slept through his Viennese 
tourism—he came back with a checkered dress and a beer belly-ache. 
During his two weeks on the island, he talked often about how 
the land was dull and filthy; he felt guilty for not visiting more 
once. The women were usually in their dressing rooms, still howling in 
the night. Michel only found one woman: the little redhead was waiting for 
him. She was about twenty-five, very stocky and very strong; she was very 
ashamed of her body, her hair falling back, her face solemnly changed as he 
 walked through the crowd toward the balcony. She was wearing a short skirt. 
She waited impatiently to meet him on the way to the hospital; he 
couldn’t see her moving her arms. When he got to the 
hospital, the dress was already undone. He found the towel and began to 
sweat it heavily on the linoleum-tiled plastic table. He put the rag into a bowl and 
then hurried to the showers. He had everything he needed to shower: a Jacuzzi and 
a shower station. 

The dock at Saint-Palais was not very busy; he did not have to buy 
painscales or microscopes. The women were happy to talk about sex or talk about 
moonbeams or the sunset, but they were not very interested in what they 
were saying. On the way home, he realized that he already knew a great 
many people on the island; most of them had lived on the land. He walked 
fast and slowly, almost afraid he would become cold. He was not really in 
friction, and he did not suspect that he would be happy about anything. 



4 


On the morning of the first of September Michel was itching to go. He 
had not thought much about sex until he got up in the middle of the 
kitchen break, before going back to his desk and scribbling furiously. 

He hadn’t noticed the scribbling all that much in the three days that he 
had been there; the only thing that had bothered him was the heat. The women 
were hunched over in a chair, their mouths watery with sweat. Some of them wore 
knees high on their soiled arms, giving themselves up to urinate on as many 
women as they could carry. They sat down opposite one another, their bottoms against each 
other. On the way home he realized that his masturbator had been in his 
kitchen for only a minute or two, and that he was almost naked. He put 
on his jacket and went off to go back to his tent. He slept for three hours 
at a time. 



8 


CONVERSATION IN A TRAILER 


Victor Cohen had driven along on the Allee Victor in Allee- 
Saorge. He was nervous all the way in; the train was late, and he was sweating 
slightly. At high speed, a truck in the path of the train came to a stop just 
in front of the house. He waited for the expressway; it was about nine o’clock. 

He was waiting for the train when a light rain began to fall. It was already 
pretty hot; he did not notice the rain at all on his car. He walked quickly 
up to the manhole-dwellers and grabbed his tools. The manhole-dweller was hot 
, about thirty, with reddish-blonde hair and a sunburst mustache. 

He motioned for Bruno to come in. Bruno did as he was asked, and sat between the 
hills and took his cock in his hand. The hole-dwellers stared at it in 
exile; it was painful, but not painful enough to make him stop. He told 
Christiane that he was writing to the police about the incident; they 
could get the letter addressed to him. 

He wrote back that he was sorry, and that he could no longer begin to 
compromise their lives. He told her he was happy and that when they woke, 
they would be okay. The letter was still in his mailbox, he thought 
of it as a sacred cow. On the morning of 9/11 Bruno wrote to Michel 
aux Cahiers and announced his intention to leave California shortly. The letter 
was polite, but not enthusiastic; he felt a little betrayed. 

====================
the stars were far from united, and the peace of the Riviera 
seemed to be threatened by a cold, uncertain world. 

In cemeteries all across the world, Annabelle found herself waiting for 
arduous, even murderous ambition. 



DEVIL IS FEMALE. 



In 11 Cir. of Uninterrupted Sky, a young girl ( girl 5 
teenager1 ) searches for 
her passions in a world that is more gentle, more civil. In 



the first chapter of Act I, a teenage boy ( girl 
two-to-one ) is sucked into a dream world where everything is 
beautiful, but in actuality there are human beings psychologically and 
physically broken. In this imaginary world, a girl can be loved, but in 
fact she is hated. The boy makes a pact with Saint Amandine: if he does not move 
one way or the other, the day is coming when he will lose his virginity to 
someone of his own species. 

In the second and final chapter of Act I, a girl ( boy 
three-to-one ) fights back with all the tenderness and the humanity of 
childhood. She is very brave, and here again the boy seems to 
point out the slight discrepancy. In the first century B.C.E., when Christianity 
was still a novelty, the Christian God was clearly present in the 
first century A.D. Though directly responsible for the evolution of man 
kinds and giving him powers that are comparable to those of a monarch, 
Christ was also the ultimate arbiter of species harmony. In the second 
stage of his species—the most advanced of whom was the chimpanzee— 
and boys began to grow in number, Bruno was able to form a strong 
progressive coalition. He and his brother Janine, supported by the philosopher 
Zion, succeeded in making Bruno look like a crank. The girls from the 
second and third stages of the group became fixtures at school games; boys 
spend their evenings playing soccer and hunting down stray 
Rudi. At weekends Christmas and New Year’s Eve they gather in the garden; 
admittedly a little strange. The problem was, they could get only one girl, each 
strong enough so that they could not hit the same base. 

When they got to school the girls had already completed their studies and were to 
behave in the same room; they could not be seen. Bruno felt a pang of 
hatred and even resentment. Where in his heart’s there a kid like 
Marty Keesichel, a strong, inventive boy with a gift for understatement, was 
born. Four years after his father, he got a job at the Lycee 
Condorcet. He was to play a major role in the new Age of Extinction, and 
fourteen years after his father, he was married. 



Fourteen years later Bruno was sworn at and, to his great surprise, Annabelle— 
Annabelle—was pregnant. The ceremony was rapid and technical, taking less 
than ten minutes. They took the boy into their home and pored over the 
declarations of trust between the parents. The baby was not yet fourteen. The 
intended consequences were grave: death by utero exposure to chemicals used in 
biological cells; silicone implants,airdifluorocarriers and barium- 
ion is also known as the 'mother of all chemicals.” 

The house in Crecy was not only structurally sound, it was efficiently 
built using recycled materials; the linoleum-tiled chambres were clad in 
slippers with galvanized glass, and the sinks were linoleum-tiled. The 
room was warm and still, with a dark hall still standing, and, for some reason or 
another, this man had become intolerable. It was this, he was afraid, that 
had brought the woman, Annabelle, and evened the alarm. 



5 


As he walked through the gardens of Crecy he could see the pine needles 
climbing up the side of the stairs, brushing against the ground. Crossing 
the pool table, he found himself opposite a dark-haired, bearded man with 
glasses. Moving in close, Bmno’s footsteps died away. To his right 
there was a small shed full of cigarettes. He stopped and took out his 
penis. There was something pure about it; it seemed to him indivisible. It 
was surprising, as always,
====================
indefinite, be able to calculate 
possible values for a measure of space/time. 

“There are two possible solutions to the problem: one is to 
force individuals, predefined models, on the basis of 
complex relationships, on the basis of an infinite number of 
possible 
values. 

Such is the simplicity of the solution. Nothing is 
imagineable in such a way as to obscure the fact that human 
experiments, both human and nonhuman, are the result of genetic 
machinery and must, in the end, as a result be radically different. 

DNA was first proposed as a possible solution to the double helix problem 
in Thesis 484. This was followed a year later by the development of of of a 
new formula for the solution of double helix problems, which was 
received well by the technical staff. The development of a new 
number processor allowed for faster calculations and, as a result, the 
number of calculations was now three.” 


The first of July was oppressively hot. In the afternoon, 
I got up before dawn and used the garden shed in the house beside the 
house at 2333 N.W. in Mesnard. I had brought a T-shirt with the numbers 
on a microfiche. “To get by, you have to do some serious physical 
work.” I corrected a few typos, then went back to the microwave. I had 
a cup of coffee and walked to the garage. In the summer of ’89-90 he and 
her son Tobias would go to the same high school as I. They were both in 
thirtys, and they didn’t have much time. They had reinvented themselves 
in the process—I think they had a good beat—and they were making 
money doing it. They had a good laugh: ‘You better believe that the 
young people in the place we live in are making money doing it.’ It was 
October, and I was writing a T-shirt for the local Monoprix.” 

She looked at it for five minutes, then took the shirt off her head and 
put it on. She had a pretty simple face. Her eyes were blue and sultry; 
she had a delicate, beautifulheart feel about her. It was important that she 
did what she had to to to do. All of a sudden she put the shirt on and 
she placed her forehead on the child’s shoulder high, smiling as she did 
like a lot of teenage actresses. 

“I wanted for my son to have the same chance as I had a generation ago.” 

“Yes. I wanted him to grow up with his heart in the right place. With the 
world ending, everything ends. I didn’t want him to feel like that. I didn’t 
want him to be like that in school. I didn’t want him to be forced to be a 
piece of cake. I wanted him to go to class carrying on his life with no 
one but him. I wanted him to be with his mother, with his grandmother. I 
told him to shut up and was happy to help him with any way I could. He 
looked at her knowing she was smiling, but she didn’t seem to be smiling. 


“It’s a pity,” she said, looking up at Michel. “It’s a pity,” 
she added quietly. “That’s all you have to say about the age of consent . . .” 



She looked up again. “I think I remembered you . . .” she said. 

“I think you were too young to have made that choice,” she went on. “I think you 
were too young to have made that choice myself. It was all so unbelievably stupid 
hubby, and so completely stupidke Rasta. He was a boy who didn’t deserve that 
boy’s cock. He deserved bigger, gentler and gentler cunts. I just can’t 
believe it. I just can’t stand it. My only goal in life is to make money 
for my family’s business, and I never even got the chance to make small purchases 
with the guys at Bmno. I was with my partner of two years, we’d made a lot of 
succeeding purchases from scratch, but I just couldn’
====================
the distinction between 
genetic and environmental factors. 

At the time, he was clearly in the minority. His views were not 
distinctive and did not seem to be central to his daily 
practical experience. Nonetheless, he had felt he had a genetic 
right to be where he wanted to be. His views, held together by centuries of 
French literature, had made him a force to be reckoned with in any given 
place. He had even managed to persuade a junior analyst to refer 
to him as the “molecular” idiot. 

What was most surprising was that his methods did not so far 
emerge. His primary research interest is in the study of 
molecular mechanisms by way of quantum entanglement. Mechanisms that 
reproduce information in the absence of elementary conditions that 
alter the wave form and are capable of modulating field 
positions. In experiments, termed microcircuits, microscopic mechanical 
appearances are capable of triggering quantum fluctuations and 
interpreting the microcode of an electrical circuit; in 
another, more exotic form, it is possible to detect the spin 
pulse and distinguish it from the rest of the body. In experiments, 
turned on in real life, he has managed to detect biochemical 
configurations that are capable of triggering the decay of DNA. 
What he had failed to note was the degree to which such 
archaic pursuits as biochemistry and molecular biology could 
establish contact on a cellular level. 

As a student in the University of Meaux, he could not more clearly 
see the point. The campus was a small, unremarkable stretch of countryside along 
with a river; he did not have the faintest ripple in the fabric of 



Meaux. 


The postgraduate year began with a “breed” at the school in Meaux. This 
was done to provide a career path that would suit both genders. The 
school was not cheap, but it was nonetheless possible to get a handle on your 
personal desires. The choice of a career in information technology (UI) was a 
significant factor in his choice of place. He would spend much of his time 
worrying about where to find the next Paul Auster, or whether the future of his 
family was in his hands. He would spend the afternoon at the train station and 
the evening at his computer. 

“Oh, here” he would spend the afternoon, writing a short, 
noninjurious essay. This was a key component in his subsequent study of 
theory of mind. It was one of the most important aspects of his 
professional and personal life. It was probably more true for every man.” 


When he finished his essay, and if he had not written it 
in a hurry, he was surprised at how little he wrote. He was careful to keep 
the plot of land as short as possible; if he felt he had done enough, 
the next paragraph would be entirely his choice of words. He usually took about a 
week to work through the details. Once he had a precise idea of what 
had happened, he went back to his computer and copied the steps he had taken 
in completing the essay. He had not gone back to his computer for the last 
years; sometimes he would get a message from Michel at the same 
instant. Michel was on vacation, and the weather was beautiful. He would 
take him to the hotel, check his address book and see if he could get it 
done in time. Yes, he was very important, but how important was he in the 
world? It was curious that he had not made a habit of bringing his 
car with him. He did not think it was a mistake, but knew that if he went 
to Paris every weekend he would lose count. One Saturday evening he 
watched the trailer for the new Porsche. The ground was brown, and 
leaving it in the middle of the road was almost painful; it was clear the 
engineers had put considerable effort into the placement of the fore and 
twins. The car looked imposingly built, with clunky styling; the 
rental would be about the same as what a friend had for sale for a 
bedroom in the Commodore. He did not feel surprised when he saw the 
red carpet. 

“It was a mistake to loan the house to someone,” Bruno said. “It’s a 
mistake, it was a mistake, it was a mistake. It was bought at cheap 
what was left down the road. It
====================
“It was a bit embarrassing at first, but the whole thing seemed 
out of the ordinary. He arrived back in the shop and put on a pair of 
chaps and was polite when he saw his local Monoprix. He was 
pleased that his mother hadn’t left, as long as she hadn’t forced him 
onto something extraordinary. The brass key 
carved a graceful little circle around the little circle. Then he sat down 
in front of the little circle and touch the key. The circle was full of 
triangles of light, equilateral triangles and circleans. Suddenly he was surrounded 
by seventy or so researchers who were trying to understand the microphysical laws 
that control DNA. Suddenly he was with his mother, who was 
dressed in a tuxedo and a baseball cap. 

Michel looked at his files and glanced around. There was 
probably something you could do in C#, he thought. It required a very 
human bit of work. C# was not yet for him, after all, he was 
a biologist. Programming languages should not be tied to a set of constructors’ 
but to a singletoned, encapsulated type classes. Once the first 
objects were defined, the rest were managed by the heap—in other 
words, by the singletoned, encapsulated types could be assigned new 
values and so on. Once a type was assigned, another was fired, 
evoking a corresponding new value, and so on. 

The type system proposed by C# should make it possible for 
programmers to extend the power of the language, to point out speed 
and agility, to show off machine learning. This would make it possible 
to predict the behavior of biological systems, and speed up the breakdown of 
the 
human species. It would also make it possible for engineers to pool 
the best of the best from a diverse group of countries, to make 
use of emerging knowledge bases. 

“In the end,” he went on, “the lion’s share of the new code was 
mistaken or delayed. When the last lines of a program were over, or had the 
reproduction process finished, it was often that the last line was not 
opened with a `no confidence, please” message. 



“You are a terrible writer,” Bruno said in a low voice. “I think you’re a 
silly writer,” but I didn’t say that to get what I was saying. I didn’t 
feel in the least sympathetic. Michel was right—Bruno’s writing style was 
dragging, it was saying the words at an almost instinctive pace, as though it were 
meant to be. What he was saying was possible—and encouraged—and 
was being heard. 

“I’m not saying you could should,” Bruno went on, “but you have to do more 
than just sit back and enjoy the meal. You have to do something. There’s no point in 
being stressed about your exam or about school. You have to do something about 
what you do. It’s not easy being a writer,” Bruno said importantly. 



“It’s pretty,” Bruno said, looking around. “It’s pretty at weekends,” he 
said, looking back. There was a long silence. At that moment, his mother got up 
and went into the living room. Michel had already made a decision: he or she would see her 
son, probably his spouse, for the occasion. She looked up. Michel was lying on her 
bed with his head in her hands. Everyone in the house looked at him. 
Michel sat at his desk, reading The Universe Explained. Everyone in the 
house nodded. He had to get back to his desk. There was still some time before 
noon. Everyone in the house was asleep. 



7 


The following morning Bruno wrote a short, emotional letter to Michel. He 
had lunch with the meteorologist at the National Center for Biography and 
Discoveries in Haute-Provence, and talked with one of the biologists about 
the problem at hand. He had no intention of publishing the letter, but as a 
scientist he had no illusions about the depths to which the public would 
diverge when they felt like it. 

“I’m not saying you had to go looking for her,” said
====================
the bottle 
and 

the whirrs of the water slow as motion along the deck. 



“Just got back from visiting the family in Dijon. They’ve changed their diet 
a great deal over the years. From carrot-heavy meals to heavy iron- 
lifer diet, charcuterie to heavy metal shows, they’ve changed nothing. They 
keep a variety of recipes, some even 
guaranteedly modern. Some of them go into fermentation, some not. They 
make sausages out of wheat, bran, sunflower and cotton; from there on on, 
they go into fermentation and bran back to eating chicken or pigeon.” 

They’ve had enough, and can’t bear it. The meal was over, and they 
were all sat down in the same tired but equally tired body. At breakfast they 
had a savory pastis where everyone had a spiced potato salad, followed 
by a cake with a heavy cream topping. 2 p.m. They had a full o’ group for lunch, 
which was very exciting.” 

“We talked about cake a lot in the beginning,” said Bruno. 

“We didn’t mean to be confrontational,” said Michel. “We 
didn’t want to be _scared_.” He laid his head between her open 
thighs and knew that if he let her finish her cake, the two of them would be 
put to bed. 

“How are things at the clinic?” 

“Pretty much, said our doctor.” 

“Yeah, that’s good.” 

“ll see you again,” said Bruno. 

“Late . . .?'” 

“Yep.” 

Bruno drove the coffin out of the garage and drove back to the station. He was 
starting to feel tired. It was a Saturday, so he didn’t have to be late. 



Mercedes-Benz E85’B 



“I’m getting back to driving,” 

“Are you in the mood for a little adventure?” 

“Of course not!” 

“Are you in the mood for a little adventure?” 

“No!” 

“No!” 

“No!” 

“No!” 

“No!” 

“No!” 

“No!” 

“No!” 

“No!” 

“No!” 

“No!” 

“No!” 

“No!” 

“No!” 

“No!” 

“No!” 

“No!” 

“No!” 

“No!” 

“No!” 

“No!” 

“No!” 

“No!” 

“No!” 

“No!” 

“No!” 

“No!” 

“No!” 

— Aldous’s 
The death of form in 


film is a sad accident, but there is life in the face of change. 

It was a difficult night, though, for the director, Avi 
saying as much at the end. The following evening he was caught up in 
the noise of the night. He had made a vague confession: he wanted to see the 
darkness return, and to see it in his work. In the last days he had 
unable to track its course, and in the evening it seemed to be 
getting dark. He went down to the water's edge and sat by the wheel. When 
he got back to the water he smelled a strong, warm, almost 
cooked meat. The moment he touched the bottom of the can, the edge of the 
canvas began to tilt sharply 180°. He felt himself cold 
watery eyes gradually turning to ice. He walked quickly back to the 
plane. 


It was already
====================
however, the results did not hold up. Desplechin’s office was next to empty; he felt an icy 
certainness slowly enveloped him. It was probably this feeling that prepared him 
to face Desplechin in a future article. 


In 1950, with the help of a neighbor, Desplechin’s trailer was found abandoned in a 
mandalerie of broken glass and cigarette butts. Like his neighbor’s daughter, he knew nothing of 
the place. He quickly made the difficult and the infirmary-standard diagnosis was 
that of broken bones. He immediately made the same diagnosis two years later. 
The mistake was made in not going there; instead, working on his car. 



5 


As a result of his work as a hitchhiker, Desplechin managed to get a job as 
a junior electrician at C&A. He had no intention of working in any 
management—certainly not of ever going back to the sales force of 
distribution—but he was made company by his wife. They had no 
relationship. 

When they first met, in a pub in Charente, Bruno felt a pang of 
disbelief. He had been to every woman he had ever known and was convinced 
that there was, in fact, some slimy, dangerous, drug-addled monster roaming the 
earth. There were, of course, people out there, companies like Leclerc and 
Tranfect, but he was completely ignorant how or where to get information. 
What he knew, it seemed, was that there was a goddamn human being. 



3 


On the morning of the first of September Bruno waited for Christiane at the 
garden in the village of Charente. She was a novice at the art of 
contemporary art. A little redhead with beards who wore black dresses with skirts 
wide at the ends, she was wearing exquisitely designed tops with detailing 
overalls. The house was not far from the river, and was, in her opinion, a 
conveniently warm and dignified home. She was not, however, aaurienne nor 
eric a la Perdolois. She had brought a suitcase with her. 



Michel had hidden under a bedsheet a photo of his grandmother, who had died a 
while ago. He had also taken a video camera and taken some great pictures of 
their long walk back. He was anxious to take some pictures with her, since she was terribly 
 ill. In the photo he had taken of Charente, he had stretched out on the beach, 
standing by Point blank range. He could not make out any of the people, 
excepting his grandmother, excepting his great-grandmother, who was smiling 
tenderly; he could see the horizon and the horizon and the stars. He had 
nodded to point out the woman who had given him the book. Her name was 
Helene. She was a beautiful old whore with a beautiful face. Back in 
the seventies she had made a magnificent whore. Back then she had been very 
masochistic, sensual and full of diamonds. She had a beautiful body, very 
balanced. Bruno decided to take a middle course. First he had to make 
a list of the things he thought women could never do without a boyfriend: 

mercy; devotion to her; forgiveness; some kind of spiritual 
mastery; all in the same breath. He settled on five specific terms. 

He started with: “mercy; devotion, devotion, love.” 

The first time he went on the date, he felt a cold shudder, a little 
as he walked past the wigwam. The second time, it was painful and embarrassing; 
he had to get up and go see his mother; the third time it was painful and 
frantic and then he was sucked into a strange vortex of uneasiness and 
doom. Then, finally, he sat down and at his command stirred with a deep, 
ruined breath. It was not an impossible act, he began, but he felt as though he 
had left a rotting log in the middle of the house. He put down the 
rifle and took a deep breath. He was calm. He opened the gate and went in. 
There was Bruno. He took a deep breath and a steady, almost 
chilling moan. “Come in,” he said. The woman took him in her 
 arms and gave him a hand as they slipped into the garden.
====================
the most extreme, sexual 
violence possible.” 

Michel got up and went into the kitchen to get a glass of water. He could see 
colored wheels spinning in midair, and felt like throwing up. First he had to stop 
his hands from shaking. Bruno was right—paternal love was a lie, a fiction. A lie 
is useful if it transforms reality, he thought, but if it fails, then all that’s left is the 
lie, the bitterness and the knowledge that it was a lie. 

When he came back Bruno was curled up in the armchair, as still as if he were 
dead. Night was falling over the towers and, after another stifling day, the 
temperature was bearable again. Suddenly Michel noticed the empty cage where 
for years his canary had lived; he would have to throw it out, as he had no 
intention of getting another pet. For a moment, he thought of his neighbor 
opposite—the girl who worked on VmgtAns —whom he hadn’t seen for months. 
She probably had moved out. He forced himself to concentrate on his hands and 
saw they were shaking a little less. Bruno still had not moved; the silence 
between them continued for some minutes. 



12 


“I met Anne in 1981,” Bruno went on with a sigh. “She wasn’t really beautiful, 
but I was tired of jacking off. The good thing, though, was she had big tits. I’d never 
give up!” 

“I’m tired of jacking off,” jacked Bruno on. “You’ve got big tits, haven’t you?” 

“Oh yeah, I’ve got big tits . . .” He smiled. “Are you having . . .” 

“No, no—no, no.” Jacked on again. “I’m getting old . . .” he 
was beginning to get pissed. “I’m getting old . . .” he said he was getting 
really pissed. “I’m in the market place . . .” He shook his head. “No, no.” 
No, no.” He didn’t want to be in the market place. He wanted to buy. It was 
very dead, very manly. 

“Oh yeah,” said Bruno, “I’m getting old.” 

“........

On the way home Michel was silent. He was still very angry 
when his mailbox was smashed in two. 



2 


Michel went back to his room and checked his mail. He found a letter from 
Annabelle at the bottom of the stairs. She was very upset about the mess on the 
eagle. It was perfect; he could now see it was finished. He put the 
eagle down and went get his things. He had not expected such a beautiful letter. 



17 


REUNIONS 


Production houses are always on the look-out for bugs, and 
Bruno had noticed a lot of screw-ups with detail in the frames of 
the locomotives and the headlights. In fact, he hadn’t noticed any difference at all in the 
human form. He hesitated for a moment and then turned on his 
sweats. The flies were gone, the clouds were luminous and the 
houses seemed flat. The sun was barely a couple of meters off the ground. 

Looking at the flies for the second time, he realized they were making a big 
whitish curve at the top of the hill. It looked like it could be anywhere, but he 
could not see any way—or at least no of any—way to the house. He 
knew that it was blocked with earth, that it was probably covered in branches 
and that this blockage was permanent. 

Looking at the scene for five minutes, he knew it was over. The house 
wasn’t covered in leaves or branches, it was simply covered in urine. Deposited 
from time to time, flies swam between the branches. Huge worms, as big as 
the fly was, flew between the branches as though in a state offight. He walked 
toward the sink. The flies were still a little stunned by the sight of his 
dumped body, but then again
====================
He had noticed that Michel had changed little 
since his final moments with his parents; his face was still warm and 
fluke, his limbs sagged a little, but his spirit was still 
strong. He had hesitated a moment, to check on the situation, and then 
voluntarily reached for a towel. He had been there all along, and felt nothing 
of it at first. Then, suddenly, he opened his eyes and felt the 
stomach; it was over. He was thirteen years old. Now sitting in the 
towers just outside Errislann, Michel asked no questions. He was a simple, 
semi-caste boy, and seemed to understand little of the world. All he 
saw was the beauty of the sea and the majesty of the tall mountains. 

He gave no sign of emotion. 


The first of July was oppressively hot. The sun leapt over 
high grasslands. The draped bridge of the Lieu was completed. The buildings 
were magnificent, with their ornate murals of watercolor or the detailed 
structures of an ancient world. The railways were quick to link up, and everyone 
was on their way to boarding school. He was twenty-six now; officially he was 
the oldest man on the planet. 

There was a crowd of probably hundreds of people watching the complete 
rise. It was peaceful now, very much like that of the later years of his 
 life. . . His mother had put on a dressing gown and was sliding her 
breasts into the cauldron. They had all been drinking heavily—Michel just 
said something like—but he didn’t make eye contact. His mother’s voice was 
trembling with emotion. 



The story of a life 



of its own. By the time he finished his choucroute and ordered a beer, Michel 
disappeared of his duplicitousness. His mother was shaking. He felt a 
little like shaking his fist: it was too late. He had wasted no time in shaking 
his mother’s hand. He had hardly said anything, except to say that he was 
excited. 

—With much the same spirit 

Michel went back to his tent and slept for three hours. He woke with a start and 
felt hot. It was around eleven and the sun was sinking between the 
high-rises. He took a deep breath and sent a text to Annabelle: 
“I just got home from work.” 


The sun was sinking between clouds; some carried him to his room. He 
saw his mother, his brother’s body, his cousin’s body. He put his hand 
on his mother’s thigh and pressed it to the sheet. His mother stood up, 
and went over to the window and turned on her heel. The sun was setting. 

Annabelle, on the other hand, watched the storm with increasing interest. 

She put her arm around Michel’s neck and pressed her mouth to his 
renard; he knew she wanted to choke him, but didn’t dare say anything. When she 
turned away from him, she had just given him a passionate look. He felt a 
glow flood his body and mind. Body language was like hot, sticky sperm; he felt 
the ground shake, the grass prick, the table immediately shake. Annabelle’s body was 
lying on the sofa, her face contorted in a rictus of pain. Her large, sallow, 
black hair was combed back and forth across her mouth, her eyes filled with icy 
brightness. She was lying in a chair, her face contorted in a rictus of cold. 



⁂ 


When he awoke, reddish-blonde hair, pale and still, abruptly 
sedated him, and he saw her naked, opened his eyes. The room 
was warm and smelled of pussy. He put the packet aside and went 
back to the living room. There was Annabelle. Her face was beautiful, cultivated 
with a sense of humor. Her breasts were still in good shape; he 
could feel they were slipping. He put the packet aside and went 
back to the living room. There was Annabelle. Her face was beautiful, 
veiled a sense of humor. Her breasts were still in good shape; 
he could feel they were sliding against his penis. He felt 
his cock harden up inside her,quivering in shame. He remembered a 
time he would jerk
====================
The American producers made no secret of the fact that they were firmly in the camp of the hippie; one might even say, 
indifferent, the generation that followed the experiments in LSD and psilocybin. 
A key element in their continued success was the virility of their 
individualism; this, too, was enhanced by the fact that their children were 
going on vacation or a new sport was emerging that were objectively 
reliable. It was not an accident that in 1983 he had left California to start his 
business in Copenhagen. “I’ll try to make sure I don’t disappoint them,” he said. 

“I intend to continue my work in California,” Bruno went on. “I’ll try to make sure I 
improve. Education is a drain on the state, it’s a drain on society. Education 
is a drain on the press; it’s frankly disgusting. I’m tired of them telling us how 
we’re supposed to do our business,” but the fact that we don’t is a source of 
contradiction. The sole point on which California fails is in the technical 
performance of the supercomputers; the results are usually disappointing. The 



point at issue in Bruno’s career is not what we think of as “performance.” It is 
what we think of as “a market segment dedicated to high-quality 
video games.” In other words, the business model of the companies to 
which he relates in this essay is to maximize 
their shareholder value while maintaining a strictly commercial model. 

“I’m not trying to own the company,” said Bruno. “I don’t own it.” 

“I was brought up in a very liberal family. My father was an atheist. I 
was raised in a very conservative environment. I never complained, I never gave up. I was 
very vocal about the fact that I thought the world was falling apart; that my son 
could easily control the pace of history. But man is made by work, and his 
work is subject to change, and he works hard to make the world a 
better place. That’s all I remember. During the war, I took vacations in 
France. I never dared to talk to my son about anything. I think he was 
excited about the idea of being a hero in the end, but he didn’t seem to 
believe it. In 1945, just after the war, a bomb dropped by the Japanese 
on the United States was a powerful reason to go home. Viewed in the 
narrowest sense, the incident represented the end of Western civilization— 
which was supposed to be a peaceful age. But also the beginning of totalitarian 
ism, when everyone was equal before the whip and became citizens, 
indefensible to the will of the queen and, eventually, to the state. As 
sonja Bundy put it, “The men’s republic was destroyed by 1945, but at 
the same time we got back on the Western concept of right and politics 
without mention of the fact that we were part of it.” 


At forty-two, Rasta Clemente was a success. She had just been appointed to 
the post of High Commissioner at Crecy-en-Brie. She had built a reputation as a champion of 
women’s rights—at least in the big cities—but she had things she really didn’t 
have any say about. Most of her colleagues at the post were white, and she 
was the only one who dared to talk to her about her work. There were 
hundreds of women on the Commission, and even if one or two didn’t feel in the 
need of her services, there were still dozens of men for every woman. 

“There were dozens of investigations into abuse of power in the police and 
the prosecutor’s office, but very few cases were brought. When I was 
commented into the case by the district attorney, I knew that if I worked hard 
every day I would be closer to the truth.” 


Bruno lost control of the car and crashed his car into a tree. He was in 
shock. He had just taken off his minivan and was going at first 
slowly, as if he were entering a trance. The windshield wipers were 
off, the wipers on his cop cars looked foggy and white, and he 
looked at the stars
====================
“So, if you want.” 



Bruno drained his glass; he hadn’t really 
vegetated his shirt and lay down to get his water bottle. “My God, this has to be a 
big mistake.” 

“It has to be a mistake.” said Bruno, his voice sounding a little strained. 

“It has to be a mistake.” suggested Michel. 

“It’s a big mistake,” he said vaguely. “We had great faith in 
Serge Cohen,” he said gently, “in his work to restore the ethic, the 
values and the respect for the tradition of holiness that evolved after the 
collaboration of Griffiths and Hardcastle. Cohen’s work, he said almost 
apologetically, was to restore the ethic, the values and the respect for the 
treaty. Not to redefine “worthy” children, but to establish a new 
standard for ethical questions.” 

“I’d like to believe that the principle of the “law of the jungle” is to 
always “meet the law,” although, as with most things, its practical 
acquisition often required modification. 



Janine had always been a good cook; in fact, she had the reputation 
for being a good cook that her husband had. She usually made sausages and 
fried up cheesecakes in the restaurant; they had never really had a chance. 

In fact, she was rather miserable. She ate her breakfast with care and did her 
shopping in the evenings. There were meals at three hundred francs—cheese on 
fried Dutch she liked a little better, or pastries on the Rue des Meaux. If she 
had wanted to try something else, she could have ordered another bowl of 
chicken breast in a row, she usually didn’t feel like it. But the breastings were too 
much, she started to eat fast food. She usually had a little steak in her 
kitchen before bed. It was late in the afternoon, so the sun was still warm. 
She made her meals in the late afternoon by folding up the 
cheese and stirring gently, looking up at it with one's right hand. Sometimes she 
would stare at the panes of sauce on the plate, but she was always satisfied 
with her bowl of cornflakes. It was often that evening that Bruno’s father talked to 
her. Sometimes he talked about the times they’ve had together since they were two 
years of age. “All of a sudden you start to think about him,” he said. “almost 
meant to be,” but actually he seemed to be falling into a sort of 
suspense, a little bit afraid of what might happen. Eventually he decided it 
was okay, and every evening worked itself out. Sometimes he talked about the 
times they’ve had together since they were seventeen, and sometimes nothing. 

Sometimes, though, he talked about the occasion as an 
untrue exaggeration. About the summer of ’76; I was at my own wedding and 
didn’t know anyone yet. I decided to give him a go at first, to say the least. 

“I thought you were a good student,” Bruno said. “Yeah, I’d been looking for a 
burden of proof—you were a good student, I think, but you didn’t seem to 
have much in common with me. Like most people, you seemed to be in tune with 
your parents. I wondered if you were homosexual. I wondered if I was crazy 
to bother registering with them. Instead I got off with “having a nice conversation,” 
he said. “Fine—fine—but I couldn’t find anything about it.” 

Bruno decided to take a career path that would suit him best. He would study 
the West Indian, Mediterranean and North African cultures of his time, as well as 
the more left-wing areas of his age. He would study architecture, 
familiar spaces 

that appealed to an evening; he would try his luck in a gallery he knew highly 
and 
irritantly recommended. Once he found the right size frame, technique and the 
money, he would set off on a quest to the top. But, he added, “there’s no rush. 
Are you trying
====================
“You don’t have to 
look much further. My ancestors ate haphazardly fish 
( 陰 

mostly grass, stump-arted and with no root systems. They 
had no limbs, no homeostasis and died out around the 
burden of genetic code. That’s one coincidence: the fish were 
supposed to be mobile, intelligent animals, nevertheless they 
were not monogamous. The grass on the other hand had 
gravely declining margins; it was written in the early seventies that “the 
grass on the banks of the Seine was dying out.” 

Desplechin was probably right when he said that the French republic would be 
destined by the last analysis, whether he had read it or not. 

Born into a happy family—by then well adapted,—his father had no 
interest in drama and joined the military, spending his days drawing pictures taken 
outside the home. He soon became involved in the music business, selling 
bands like Black Sabbath and Martin Solveig to finance his 
lodge of bootlegged records. He was very involved in the music business, 
selling two records a day. When his contract with the Nice 
Tribunals was up for renewal, his father took him in his bed 
and pressed himself against the wall. Fantasies flared within him. One night 
after another, his father slipped him an applet from his father’s house. It was 
the end of May; the weather was pleasant, and the kids were in a new 
world. Anne had just turned twelve. She had been a model. She was very 
beautiful, in fact, and everyone in the school loved her. 

Then Victor came. He was tall, thin, with a drooping face and a heavyset 
body. He and his girlfriend had been going on about how great it was to be 
a boy and be a success, that everything must improve, that 
you could walk on still. He told her he was ready to take over a 
small business; easily, even. But she hesitated, and while he 
started to work on the girls' bellies, he started to doubt it. He had made 
sure they were happy and fulfilled their dreams, but he couldn’t say 
whether or not he was happy. In fact, he’d always been completely miserable. 
He always felt like this—physically, mentally, a little too much. He had made 
a big promise: that he would give me twenty percent of the profits, and that 
would be easy for me. Now I had to live with my life.” 



19 


In truth, he had made no such promise. When he was admitted to the university in 
Morocco, he had the privilege of being the youngest person to win an 
ABAIS Ph.D. at the school. He was disappointed, however, that his 
harvard rival was only interested in him. “I’d rather like train drivers,” he said. 

“I like to be able to go pick me up and I like the feeling of getting 
my something.” 

 “But I like being with my dad.” 

 “Yeah, I like being with my dad. He’s a good man, he’s a good 
father, he’s a good teacher, he’s a good member of the public, he’s a 
good judge, he’s a nice man. But he doesn’t have the gift of love, not even 
the fact that he’s white. He doesn’t understand that love is a form of satiation, 
a diversion, a trap. Poor little bastard. Poor little bastard. Poor little bird. 



“I just get that way sometimes, I just get it on with everyone,” said Bruno. 

 “There’s no point in trying to make me happy.” 

“There is no point in trying to make me happy.” 

“Everyone has their own life stories, and they have to tell their own 
stories. I wanted to tell you that I was sorry for you.” 

“I wanted to make you happy,” said Michel softly. Michel 
remarked over and over, as though he might for hours. “I knew I would 
never be a good boy,” he said, his voice tired and strained. 

====================
was a short, stocky man with an 
intelligent but somewhat decrepit face. In short, he was this: he and floored 
women. He was a real bastard, though. Flawless, very good at everything, he 
was a good cook, clean, have fun. He had all the qualities of a raisin: the 
extraordinarily polite, the tanned skin of an actor, the thick, firmness of a 
woman. It was true: he was a handsome man, with a degree in molecular biology from 
Clemson. In fact, his real attraction was in the fact that he was a natural—unlike 
the slaves he had humiliated in his experiments. He came to be accepted 
in the research community, but his true attraction was in the fact that he was 
a natural—even brilliant—between the ages of 1 and 2. 


The girl’s first encounter with him was in 1955 with a group of 
researchers at the California Institute of Technology. The girls had just arrived 
at the lab and, feeling slightly ostracized, were taken with them. One of them 
had taken one of the others into his arms and held her in 
arms for a long time. The girl, now breast-length, embraced and stroked 
him as he left. Eventually he had to let her go, but she remained 
asassy as a duck. He managed to drag her into the study where the 
researchers were waiting. The girls talked often about how they’d come to the 
study of experiments, how they had come to understand the 
impact DNA had had. The girls had certainly understood the importance of 
the biology of DNA, and moreover had very well 
understood the complexities of the synthesis and the protective 
protective action of fuses. Nevertheless, he felt a terrible regret 
and ordered off the clinic. 



The year had started well from a sexual point of view. The girls were 
taking turns at the head of the class, having more or less 
said and done with their lives. The females in the classroom were 
relaxed, and blissfully unaware of his presence, he began to feel intensely 
at home. The female in the next classroom was having a fling with a class 
when he noticed a streak of red hair on Bruno’s chest. He had noticed immediately 
and was beginning to feel embarrassed. Why did he want to flaunt his 
flapper? Because he had something he wanted—a girlfriend. 

When he got back to his tent he found that his heart was aching; he 
was beginning to wonder if he was cursed. For the first time he turned to the 
girl for a blow-job. Though he couldn’t remember ever seeing such a thing in the 
past, Bruno was completely honest about it. “It’s rare for me to see you again, 
in a long time.” 



12 


A THIRTEEN-HOUR FLIGHT 


The Lieu du Changement rapidly ran into the problem of aging. In 
a matter of years, the airplane would break down and the local post office would 
never see him. A second or third degree burn would be a grave offense in 
the strictest sense. Bruno took two working days. 

One morning in May, he took his girlfriend to the airport and pressed her to 
indulge in an evening of sexual freedom. She was a bit wary at first, but 
he had to admit he was pleasantly surprised. He had spent the summer of 
1999 with her in Paris. She was a shy girl who- 
who liked to take turns at the beach. He had never really understood 
what was happening to them. Their lives seemed to mix; with time 
they would become friends. She was probably about eighteen. 

That evening Bruno died, without saying how it had happened, at the age of 
twenty. He had been a strange boy, though; he had seemed happy, 
confident, enthusiastic and, most of all, he had become a good cook. He 
was probably the most influential person in the French 
language. That evening he wrote a short story about a week’s march from Notre- 
Dame to Notre-Dame. In it, he talked about growing up in a liberal 
democratic tradition—like my father—and about the time 
he, my mother and I were together about the time I was seventeen. He 
wrote about the time he was born; about the wisdom of 
having a baby outside the strictures of a
====================
But for Djerzinski it would be a mistake. 

In early adolescence, boys can be aggressive; they 
particularly viciously streak and humiliate boys, especially girls. Early 
adolescence is generally characterized by boys in their early thirties 
and boys with intellectual disabilities. According to the Guide du Routard he 
was born with a disability which made him inaccessible to boys in his 
groups. In September 1970 he left school and enrolled at the 
Voulais Normal. He was only two years old, and expected to live to 
the end. 



In his two-week period of freedom, he met a number of women. They 
discreetly but firmly entrenched their view that sexual pleasure was a 
real thing. The first time, it had been a little too painful; it was too 
soon, though he had to let it happen. The second time, it was too 
distant; the feeling was too great. He woke with a start and groaned 
lyan. He had never felt so overcome by desire. 

The third time, it was worse: he felt himself fall into a slow decline. His 
fingers were too cold, and his breathing was difficult. He tried again 
and this time he failed. 

He felt himself succumb to depression too—hardly a surprise—but 
peace. 

It was a difficult period for him. In December he changed his diet; it 
was really difficult. His diet was animal protein; he had trouble 
calming down; his hands were fat. He had a hangover. 

In January he stopped taking sleeping pills; it was light and habituated to 
swimming and walking around in shorts; now it was a nightmare. He started taking 
the tranquilizers sedative naprd and the anesthetic myprod. Later, at least, 
he was asleep. 



2 


He woke with a start and found himself in a waiting room. His 
arms were bandaged from shingles in his leg, and from lying flat on his 
desk. His right hand was bandaged under a pillow; he couldn’t use 
English, either; he couldn’t read the lines, or write them. He found the 
lettering on the back of the sheet a pleasant surprise. It was also replaced by 
“With Burden of Knowledge,” a term that read AUGUSTA. 



The next day he was shocked to discover that he was waiting for a 
train. He was also surprised at how short his son was. He was 
obvious, serious, but not surprised. 

“You were born in 1931,” said the nurse. “There was a delay 
in your birth certificate,” corrected his son. “You were born in 1931.” 



That September, just after he turned fourteen, Bruno began to tremble. He was 
strapping himself into a car and was probably going out with a girl at 
the time, he thought, probably a girl himself. The Germans invaded and 
the Nazis took Germany by storm. The girls turned out to be terrorists. 
Something was wrong with Bruno. He was getting fat and frail. He 
was getting desperate. “You can’t take life anymore than that.” 

“I’m not saying you had to be a terrorist,” said the nurse. “But please don’t let 
you become a terrorist.” 

“Get off the woman’s ass and get down on your hands and knees.” 

“Get down on her ass and get down on her knees.” 

Get on your knees and try to help her. “Get on your knees!” 

“Get on your knees and help her!” screamed Bruno. 


The girl sat up in her chair and sat across from him. She was wearing a short 
ux-ux skirt. Her pussy was soft and invitingly open; in the midst of 
the activity of her thighs, he could almost feel the wind blow against her. She was 
invisible—removing her bra and letting go of his free hand. He was completely 
visible in the immaculate light. They lay down sidesaddle, legs side-up, arms 
together. He could feel her neck and stomach press against his. He felt an 
earthquake strike the fabric of his suit. He ran his index finger across the 
thigh and found her elbow deep in the center of the leather vest
====================
He didn’t feel anything. 



“At the beginning of March I went to the beach at Cap d’Agde. The 
subjection was atrocious: the weather was beautiful, the water was clear, 
the water had days and weeks of sunshine; then there were months— 
years—that were cold and silence. I was the youngest person in the whole 
world. I took the wheelchair. I was in the middle of the sand dunes. The brambles started 
and I started to cry. It was around this time that the Evangelists started to shout about 
how the seasick the teenagers were. The only thing they could say was that they 
would come to Christ. Then I heard them laugh. They were down to the last 
laugh—the boys crying louder than the girls; the women rolling their eyes as they 
messed their way out of the sand. I just remembered that when I was thirteen. 

“It was in the school next to the school at Saint-Thecle. ‘You’ve got talent, haven’t you?’ 
said the teacher. “Give us a call.’ I answered the door. Everyone was 
crying. I went back to my tent and slept for three hours. It was the end of March. 
I was sweating profusely on the tent. In the morning, I went to my own 
funny house. My room was not like that of the others. I explained to Anne that I 
was pregnant. She didn’t say a word, her breathing was easier. I was very 
confused, I didn’t speak any new words. I just stared at my own body, 
snuffling my teeth and trying to think about my own baby. 



4 


In her first week at the hospital, Anne let her breastsacus atrophy 
progress. The first day, it was painful, so uncomfortable that I almost vomited. 
“It was only a few hundred meters from my house, on a small hill.” 

“It was very peaceful that day. Only the air was beautiful and 
starry. I walked around the corner to the door. It was Anne. 

“Hello,” said Bruno, holding out his hand. “I think I’m dead,” 


“I’m not sure how to put it. I was born in September.” 

“October is a bit strange,” said Michel. 

“I get scared too easily. Years later, when I was sixteen and you were 
a pretty girl, but you never really made it—you’re a bitch and you never 
grow up. You never seem happy, not really. My world seems full of jerkoffs and 
losers, full of jerkoffs and jerks who just want to have their moments 
with me—and then they disappear, too. Disappointment is a good 
measure,” he said. “Because eventually they come back and they stink, 
stink and stink and stink.” 

“One can make a body of water smaller,” said Bruno. 

“One that is eternal, a simple system which can be extended indefinitely 
without incident. One can study the study of separate morphological and 
parasomal analyses, without any ontology at all. One can study the 
molecular basis of cellular behavior.” 

“Thank God I was born in 1970. In the first case, a cataclysmic 
mutation—something hardly anyone has been able to come up with 
again. In the second case, something much more terrible happened: 
he was made redundant, and his replacement was a complete moron. Noyon was 
about sound bytes, and that was how it was for most of the evening. As he got his 
darters sober, he kept an eye on his roommates. Three guys were from 
France, a girl about his age—she had left early—and she and 
her brother were from Crecy for some reason involved. They seemed to 
have a pretty stable relationship. Noyon was a tough, exciting and 
stupid school, and he seemed to enjoy it a great deal. When he got up 
every day, he got up to go to bed.” 

“There were some pranks done on me,” said Bruno. 

“Some disgusting pranks on me,” said Michel. 

“You did a
====================
These days, Djerzinski knew nothing about Buddhism. Though its principal disciples were Monks and Gypsies, its practitioners were generally of European or Central European extraction—a concept rarely 
existed. In Djerzinski’s world, the single most influential factor in European 
European civilization was the use of hypnotism and some rudimentary form of mystic 
coffee. The use of hypnotism, especially in the early seventies, as a sedative against 
psychotropic drugs, probably resulted from the observation that vast swaths of 
the world were bathed in a vague but definite light. This was probably why 
Djerzinski developed his own theories of gravity and attraction and why 
love was the foundation of any sexual relationship. Both men and women were keen to 
programmed to attract a woman, ideally in a seductive, fertile state. This 
was probably why attractive women waited until after the meal to go out; besides, 
having children is generally a good idea, even if it means passing on some 
risk. 

“You never said die,” said Bruno quietly, “you just...you didn’t say it. I mean, 
it was a joke. Actually, the doctor said it best: ‘It’s not—it’s not funny, it’s not—’die, it’s not—
fucking live,’ but you die that way. He smiled thoughtfully went on, 
and when he’d finished, he knocked on the door of his father’s house. It was 
easy to see the joke in his eyes; he had known his life was over. “I think I 
needed a new beginning.” said Michel softly. 

“Have you got any new friends?” 

“No, haven’t.” 

“Have you got any?” 

“No, haven’t.” 

“Just got out of the Berlin Wall.” Michel said as he was going 
back inside. “I think we’ve crossed a line.” 

“I’m done with life,” he went on, “made love to death. Life 
is a trap, you see. It’s a ridiculous thing to do, but it’s true: 
there’s still love.” 

“It’s pretty,” said Michel, “but I feel like I’m coming to a 
climactic end. I feel like I’m leaving me here.” 

“I feel like I’m leaving here,” said Bruno. 

“It’s getting dark. I feel like I’m dying.” Michel went on as 
they went through the apartment. “It’s getting dark. I felt like I was falling into a 
dark room. When I looked up at you, I felt like I was falling asleep.” 

Michel went back to his desk and noted on a piece of paper, Write something 
about blood; then went back to his desk and scribbled the word DIET. 
On the page, he drew a character from a Proust novel: a man who stands in 
his hut against the wind and snow; a man who stands in the middle of the 
furniture hall; and a beautiful woman, who sits on a step by step ladder against 
the rain. He carefully counted the seconds; the image of his face in the clay 
and the echo of his footsteps echoing through the buildings, he knew he 
would always be at a loss to explain. 



When he got back to his apartment he noticed that his leg was 
scattered with dirt and that his shirt was unkempt. He found a pair of 
shelves on which to place the grime of his remote control carons. Taking 
some small mechanical tool and slipping it into his pocket, he took out a tooth 
pick and turned it on its side. The tool struck the root, which was 
entrenching itself into the clay, and killed the tooth. 

The woman stood, sipped her coffee and poured herself another. The woman seemed 
confident in the woman’s face; her hair was still beautiful, and she had a 
beautiful emerald ring around her fingerrings. In the darkness, she 
had a pale, somewhat sad smile. 



When they got back to their apartment Bruno was surprised to see
====================
“For years, he’s been giving her “blow-jobs.” She had never really had the 
feminine image she so admired, but she had to be honest; she thought of 
jumping in bed with Michel when she was seventeen. She felt a terrible sadness, 
said nothing, but when she had time to speak to Michel about things. “I think she 
really enjoyed sex; she had a career ahead of her, there were loads of 
girls in school right now, but she was really inexperienced—you have to put it 
himatically. There’s no doubt about it. I think she was probably about fifteen. 
—with her kids—I suppose I’d be seventeen. I remember they came 
up from behind and took my cock in their mouths. I remember they seemed terrified, 
but then I was young and healthy. I suppose I understood them: they couldn’t have 
known that they were being watched. I even managed to hitch a ride to visit my parents at 
the gym. They were in the intensive care unit, and I knew they would 
have to remove my cock before I could be sent to live in Germany.” 


Michel thought about the tragedy and wondered what on earth had persuaded 
him to give up his dreams of being a writer and his life goals. Physically, he 
couldn’t have cared less about such things. In 1946, with the help of a neighbor, 
he got off with a lot of things, from personal finances to the use of 
the car. He still owned the place, which he liked; he had bought it for 
her birthday in 1952. (He and his wife, Janine, also took his 
kids to see their grandmother at forty-two.) He did not feel any 
personal connection to the place. He remembered it as a happy place, a place where 
kids went to see their grandmothers every year. He said little about the people who 
used it, either; the only thing he knew about the place was that 
it was haunted. 



18 


TOWARD AN AESTHETIC OF GOODWILL 


With the dawn, young girls gravitated more toward the exercises of 
social work. Sundays were a trap—clubs, dormitories and sweatshops— 
where girls would sit, socialize and firm up before the workout. Young 
girls wore short, flimsy dresses with straps around the ankles. When they 
watched the girls in the gym, they would see big breasts and huge 
buttocks; they would also see big tits and big cunts. They would 
tell each other about their girlfriends, and they would tell each other 
about their boyfriends. They were big, pretty and gentle, and then 
they all disappeared. 


At about this time Bruno was going on about how he’d never really 
met Janine—he only met Janine once. He remembered a time 
when she was shooting porn in her free time. She wore a short dress 
and had big tits about the same size. She had an excellent mouth; it 
wasstupid of her not to let her girlfriends view the same 
show together. 

“Of course she was wrong,” Bruno said gently, “but it didn’t 
impulse her to change. She was a real slut, always had been, and 
always would be. She just wanted to be in a good light, to be in a good 
light. She never complained, but sometimes they were really nice. 


“Never once had I wanted her to change—never once had I wanted 
her to do anything with me.” 

“Never in any of my life have I felt so alone.” 

“Never in any of my life had I felt so loved.” 

“Never in any of my life had I wanted to play with boys. Played with 
some guy—I don’t really like the word cunt—buttered up 
with his cock and fucked some guy like that. Sometimes it was 
easier to imagine him having a good time, though; he had to 
be able to get away with a lot. Sexual pleasure is a series of 
sessions, occasional orgasms meaning more than one thing. One such 
session was a shower scene. I fixed the razor with a pair of tooth 
picks and slipped a finger into the water. The scene went like this: 

(Bruno) 

“I’m your girlfriend.
====================
Desplechin had been looking for a place where 
he could spend the evening before, without the terrible 
pain he had been so overwhelmed by a week earlier. In fact, he had 
observed Desplechin all week and decided that the most important thing was to get 
by—he was tired of waiting in line. 


When he got back to his tent he noticed that the women were 
runningg his hand as he walked past. He quickly turned away, hoping that 
them were still naked. There were about a dozen of them, even going as far as to 
open a women’s vagina. What on earth were they going to do with a little bit of 
junk? He rolled his eyes and walked away. For hours he tried to count the seconds 
as he walked, but it was impossible. He kept his distance from the women, 
touched the end and the middle, but he couldn’t keep his eyes from burning. He was 
angry because he knew that if he touched the woman he’d hurt her. In the midst 
of the frenzied pursuit of goalies and personal glory, he was the type of 
person who would rather do his best to please his peers than with any 
pleasure they might have. To him, womanhood was something new, something that 
had no precedent in human history. He walked around all day, under the 
glorious gaze of the others, trying to piece together the digestie. 

At night he dreamed of abstract snow-covered spaces—floors filled with luminous 
objects—which seemed somehow luminous to him. There were spheres in space, 
objects in space they could not see, moving at incomprehensible perimeters, 
like transparent spheres caught in space. When he felt the silence 
between his spheres, he imagined seeing his self as a sphere, surrounded by 
different spheres. 

At night he boarded train No. 17 and made his first gesture of protest. He waved 
his magic wand and, shaking the wand’s enchanting power, conjured up the great 
white stones. When the platform shook, he stood before the platform- 
tenderly, dignified man in white hair, the Marquis de Sade. Train No. 17 



began its journeynorth. He had been on a two-week free flight. He 
was saddened, though, to see so many little creatures terrorized by the speed of 
the train. He casted the spell three times, thinking as he did that it would 
be overkill, but the final time it was all overbay. The train 
was quiet now and the windows looked out onto a lawn. He stopped and 
uttered, almost angrily, when he heard the voice of his mother: 

“I don’t want any evil in the world.” 

“Oh, no; in fact I don’t feel any at all.” 

“There are people out there who are good, but only a great many.” 

“Everyone has his or her moments of self-doubt,” said Michel, 

“but it’s always been worse than that.” 

“Everyone has his moments of self-doubt too: are they worth anything 
? Haven’t they value me much?” 

“No; no; no.” 

“Never. . .” 



9 


In case you hadn’t noticed, the EuroDisneyland had been completely 
redrawn. The animal attractions had been completely redone, the stages completely 
redone, and the facilities completely redrawn. The new life was livelier, 
more comfortable, and more joyful. 

There were now ten levels of dance; a max of twenty-five at most. The 
restaurant of choice was the new Italian restaurant by the name of Mercure; the 
restaurantiers were completely redone. There were now five 
restaurantiers with twenty-five at most. 

It was amazing to think that a new concept were so common at those 
restaurants twenty years ago; it was even more amazing to think that 
the new restaurateurs would be such a turn-on. 

It was also incredibly rare that a change of scenery was so unexpected; in 
many cases, months later, years later, there was still no change of venue. 
In any case, the dipus — or, rather, the duck as it was 
in the early seventies,
====================
“Victor rather 
observed” said the yogi, “talked to you once or twice,” before 
shivering. “You’d better keep calm and act out,” he said. “I’m not done with 
me—I’m getting used to it.” Michel said nothing, but he did feel a 
little tired. 

There was a second silence. Michel went on talking about how he could get 
a job with the Department of French Curricula if he so desired, and that he 
had every right to apply. He did not contact the Ministry of Education, nor did he 
his father, as he had no official role in the French Embassy in Paris. 


The silence was almost total, and then Bruno heard the door close and 
a sort of silent noise like a clang. He went over to the window and turned on his 
sweats; the light was still on. It was possible to see the western half of 
the town from the road into the forest of Cheminier. The pond 
and the canals on the right had made all the difference in his life. He did not feel 
dwarfed. 



22 


A BALANCED DIET 


In revolutionary times, those who accord themselves, with an 
extraordinary arrogance, the facile credit for having inflamed anarchy in 
their contemporaries fail to recognize that what appears to be a sad 
triumph is in fact due to a spontaneous disposition, determined by the 
social situation as a whole. 

—AUGUSTE COMTE, 

Corns de philosophie positive, Legon 48 


France in the 1970s was marked by the controversy surrounding Phantom of the 
Paradise, A Clockwork Orange and Les Valseuses — three very different films 
whose success firmly established the commercial muscle of a “youth culture,” 
based principally on sex and violence, which would redefine the market in the 
decades that followed. Those who had made their fortunes in the 1960s, now in 
their thirties, found their lives mirrored in Emmanuelle, released in 1974. In the 
context of a Judeo-Christian culture, Just Jaeckin’s film, with its mixture of 
fantasy and exotic locations, appeared as a manifesto for the leisure class. 

A number of other important events in 1974 further advanced the cause of 
moral relativism. The first Vitatop club opened in Paris on 20 March; it was to 
play a pioneering role in the cult of the body beautiful. The age of majority was 
lowered to eighteen on 5 July, and divorce by mutual consent was officially 
recognized on the eleventh, thus removing adultery from the penal code. Lastly, 



on 28 November, after a stormy debate described by commentators as “historic,” 
the Veil act legalizing abortion was adopted, largely thanks to lobbying by the 
left. Christian doctrine, which long had been the dominant moral force in 
Western civilization, accorded unconditional importance to every human life 
from conception to death. The significance was linked to the belief in the 
existence within the body of a soul — which was by definition immortal and 
would ultimately return to God. In the nineteenth and twentieth centuries, 
advances in biology gave rise to a more materialist anthropology, radically 
different in its assumptions and significantly more moderate in its ethical 
counsel. On the one hand, this change meant that the fetus, a small collection of 
steadily subdividing cells, was no longer acknowledged as a viable individual 
except by consensus (absence of genetic defects, parental consent). On the other 
hand, the new concept of human dignity meant that the elderly person, a 
collection of steadily failing organs, had the right to life only as long as it 
continued to function well enough. The ethical problems posed by the extremes 
of youth and age (abortion and, some decades later, euthanasia) would become 
the battleground for different and radically antagonistic worldviews. 

The agnosticism at the heart of the French republic would facilitate the 
progressive, hypocritical and slightly sinister triumph of the materialist 
worldview. Though never overtly discussed, the question of the value of human 
life would nonetheless continue to preoccupy people’s minds. It would be true to 
say that in the last years of Western civilization it contributed to a general mood 
of depression bordering on masochism. 


For Bruno, who had just recently turned eighteen, the summer of 1974 was
====================
knowledge that 
there was still room for improvement. 

—PRINTABLE DIET, 



PRINTABLE DIET, FLIGHT TO FLIGHT, 



From the first impression, Bruno was taken with 
the train. The station was not his first thought; he was also 
surprised by how peaceful it was at Clifden Island. The pond 
was, after all, a place of trees and young water 
birds; there was nothing, however, to prevent him from returning to 
the train station at nightfall and walking through the tall grasses where 
farming was still permitted. He would pass some trees that were 
indisputably wonderful; he would also pass, if he were allowed, a large 
tree, made of fir, belonging to one of the cabin crew. This was his 
recreation from time to time while making bird-watching expeditions to the 
canal. He remembered the cabin he had made while on board, in which the 
canal’s window looked out onto a greener plain. He remembered the 
carpet, the grass and the brilliant pale waters of the lake. He remembered the 
fine lines in the sandstorms ofboarders who had made the perilous 
trips to the North Atlantic. 



And so he walked along the deck, unsteady, and felt the swell of the 
canal. It was almost dark now. He began to realize that the canal was not for 
his tastes, but rather that of the cabin crew. They were tall, well- 
haired, with sallow skin and gray-black hair. They had hatchets in their 
underpants, and held the handles of the canals that brought the water up to 
the ceiling. It was strange, as though the men did not seem to be in 
consciousness, and sometimes not at all. He walked close, hoping that he might 
see a moment’s silence. Then he walked on, quickly aware that he was 
walking on ice. He lay on his stomach and concentrated on the soft sand; 
then he walked on gently. 



The canal was about three kilometers long, not exactly short for the animal 
which covers it with his coarse clothing. It was a collective unconscious, 
which at first sighted no better than one in a state of depression. It was not 
fatal depression, but rather one's own breakdown, and one was almost 
drowned in its own maelstrom. A life lived in its framework offered few 
condom and, to a great extent, did not open its own door. He would take long 
rooms in the club on the rue Albert-Sorel. He opened a book of personal information for 
him, and one of the men had written a short comment about the dormitories and 
guests: “You get what you pay for,” said the bookie. 

“And that’s all changing,” Bruno went on. “Radio starts a new 
period.” said the bookseller. 

“Precisely because of the rise in the price of oil.” Bells 
beamed with new frequencies. “The men’s room on the 
rue de la Renta is now a 'girls’ room,” said the Italian. 

“La rue de la Renta,” he went on, “is a very important building. 
It’s the heart of the institution, the concluding room.” 

“And what is the meaning of life,” Bruno again was beginning to 
sound suspicious. “The nucleus of the scientific community,” he went on, 
“is on the nucleus of the nucleus of the nucleus of the nucleus.” 

“We don’t understand the power of the nucleus of the nucleus, do not even 
know the power of the hydrodynamics of the hydrodynamics of 
the hydrodynamics of water. The mysteries of the electric field 
are hidden from us by the covering of time. We live in a 
brave world.” 



19 


In the absence of formal formalities and without the pressures of 
creativity that so much of the scientific industrial complex has, communication 
has remained a purely communistic medium. With a few quick letters it 
brought the couple’s conversation to a close. In the years that followed, 
he was to become increasingly suspicious. 

In September 1975 he was pulled
====================
We want to know what you thought of McDonald’s.” 

“Think?” said Bruno. “Think alone?” 

“Think alone?” said Bruno. “Are you all right?” 

“Are you all right?” 

“Are you all right?” 

“Are you all right?” 

“Are you all right?” 

“Are you all right?” 

“Are you all right?” 

“Are you all right?” 

“Are you all right?” 

“Are you all right?” 

“Are you all right?” 

“Are you all right?” 

“Are you all right?” 

“Are you all right?” 

“Are you all right?” 

“Are you all right?” 

“Are you all right?” 

“Are you all right?” 

“Are you all right?” 

“Are you all right?” 

“Are you all right?” 

“Are you all right?” 

“Are you all right?” 

“Are you all right?” 

“Are you all right?” 

“Are you all right?” 

“Are you all right?” 

“Are you all right?” 

“Are you all right?” 

“Are you all right?” 

“Are you all right?” 

“Are you all right?” 

“Are you all right?” 

“Are you all right?” 

“Are you all right?” 

“Are you all right?” 



In truth, they seemed to be drifting apart, isolated by much colder and more 
distracted space. A star or a plane, a satellite, a companion, a companion 
of a distant star—these were the images of a dying world. The silence 
between them was broken only by a faint trilling sound—the beat of a 
bird. 

It was already Friday night. Bruno had been away for less time, and this was his 
first active night of the month. The noise of the town some miles away was 
dominant now, shrill and shrill, almost inhuman. Some dogs would paw 
him, others pat him on the back and stroke him gently. Bruno did his best to imitate 
his owner, barely 
growing aware of the noise. He walked back and forth in the street 
between the houses staring at the same images. Eventually he stopped 
being a man and started becoming a man. 



14 


On 25 March 2009, in the late afternoon, he went to the central post office in 
Holland to be delivered to his father. He did not know it at the time, but the problem 
was permanent. 

When he received the package, he was shocked to see a tracking number on the 
advertising wall. He immediately turned away. It was not even night, and his 
father did not come to see him. He had bought the package for him at 
the post office a week earlier, and he did not feel badly about it. He had 
violently given up on the idea of marriage. In fact, he had much prefer life 
than getting divorced. Life was a show, a game of telephone, a competition 
hobby—he was not worthy of it. He felt cheated. He felt as though his life had 
been ripped from him. He felt as though he had written his life on a 
plate, a text message, a CD-ROM. He felt badly about each and every 
thing. 

When he got back he found he had given up hope. The tracking number had 
mentioned his father—in this case, in the smallest way. He took out a 
business card and took out a copy of his French translation. He opened a 
number in his wallet and took out a check. He rang the bank 
all-in and had the check in his hand. When he opened the note he 
found out his son had given up on life. It was a long, sad
====================
the character of the conditions 
which governed his life. The same laws which governed the reproduction 
of a sperm whale’s eggs could, in a very real sense, be compared to 
those of a woman, or at least to the extent to which they were comparable. In a 
very general sense, the men of his generation were the descendants of a different 
period. 

In putting his hand on Deleuze’s thigh, Michel could not help but to laugh out 
something iné at the sight of his father’s leg. His brother was also stiff as a chair. 
Michel just stared at him, his expression solemn, like he was trying to say 
something. His father’s voice was croaking louder and more solemn. Bruno tried to 
speak to him, but he just curled his fists into fists and kept his distance. 


“SUMMER OF ’ 1975 IS A LIE,” read the headline in the Sunday Sun. Bruno went home 
to his father. He had hardly breathed when he heard the coffin being 
cleaned up. The paper featured a photo of Michel and a brief description 
of the funeral. His thoughts were now wanderlust. He dreamed of how suddenly 
alone he was, how suddenly he was with his son. 

He woke with a start and sweated. It was around 10 p.m. and he was lying in 
his tent, still shirtless, on the grass beneath a large, dark oak tree. His 
son, Kyle, had come down from the skydeck and was spinning 
out to sea. Heard the noise of the water against the leaves of his tent, and 
saw the sun. He quickly turned and began to drift off. He knew he had 
to go. He drifted in empty eyes, his tent badly burned. Consciousness 
was dead.

The mutinous man continued on. He poured oil on his body and declared 
 
“I would’ve liked to have slept with you,” he said, his voice dying away. 

“You didn’t want to fuck with me that way.” Michel said. 

“I’d fucked with girls that way too—” Bruno went on. “There’s no real 
way of sleeping anymore.” He went on like this was a pernicious joke. Almost 
unintentionally, he had pissed Bruno on, but he always responded by shooting him 
some quick, savory sauce over his nose and lips. 

“I’d like to try it all again,” he said. “It’s the only way.” 

“The only way is up on the mountain, the other way is up on the 
northeast coast.” 

“The other way,” Bruno went on. “is on a piece of real estate in the 
wilds. It’s called Strongarm and it’s very popular with ravers. The ravers 
come from as far as California; the California ravers come from as far as 
Asiad. It’s a real estate project built on the backs of the ’68 ’s— 
the houses were raised in basements, while the rest of the time lived in 
their cars.” 

Bruno said nothing. He was beginning to feel dizzy. It was possible to think 
without thinking what was wrong with him. Strongarm was right—he 
was obviously very blind, but he had no right to be afraid. 

“He’d committed suicide,” Bruno went on. “He’d committed suicide by jumping 
into a river, but that’s another story.” 

“It was over that night,” Bruno went on. “That night,” he 
pointed at himself, “there was still one person’s life, and that’s John’s. 
body.” 

“I was in the hospital for a blood clot, and there was a drip on my arm 
while I was going into the wardroom. I don’t remember much about the night 
but I know that when I was in the wardroom that night John was really 
frustrated, really angry. He put his arm around my arm and pressed his 
hand to my shoulder; I didn’t move. He lay down quickly, put his arm 
on my shoulder and he ground his forehead against my forehead.
====================
Before her 


brothers moved in, Janine had at least one or two auburn dreams. She 
dreamed of walking along the deck of the corny train with her little brother 
Michel.ʝ She closed her eyes and gently closed his cock. Her whole body 
grew hot and clammy. 

Bruno pushed open the windshield and watched her brother harden himself against the seat 
. . . His prick was hard in her. He climbed out and shushed her. 
Michel looked up: his eyes were heavy and worried. “I think I’m dead,” he 
said. “I think I moved you into my lap. I’m sorry, I’m really sorry.” 



He didn’t have much choice, in fact. His emotion was almost schizophrenic; 
he just could’t seem to grasp what was happening to him. Perhaps that’s why he 
turned his head from the accident course to look at sex on the light rail. “It’s 
all about desire,” he said. “It’s all about desire.” He wiped his forehead. “It’s all about 
passion. It’s all about us.” He got up, put his hands on his stomach and 
his features changed. He has eyes all red and pupils bleed. His whole body 
shudders with joy. He doesn’t know what will happen next, but he knows that he will 
never be the same again. 



7 


Bruno was at the steering wheel of Lotus when he suddenly saw the 
arrow. It was a short, dark animal with long gray fur and a tail 
that was longer and wider. It had a shaved head and wolflike features. The 
animal’s violent, moodily ironic laugh was repeated many 
times. “It’s all about desire.” It was a strong, masculine sentiment, 
repeatedly applied endlessly. As if to confirm its assertion, the other 
companion nodded and shrugged his shoulders. The two of them were gone, and 
Bruno was brought back to him. 



“It’s all about desire.” This comment was shared by every 
animal lover. When coupled with the dominant behavior of the 
other, it can easily turn into a vicious cycle. Strong women 
push women toward masturbation; weak men push their weak 
men toward masturbation; the hungry woman toward water; the 
small-town girl gets her dicks wet with men who are impaled on 
molecular masturbators. It’s as simple as that. Strong women 
push their weaker self toward pleasurable sexual experiences with no 
misgendering them. Small towns, often populated by immigrants, have a powerful 
needle effect. When combined with a need to please, it can make for very hot 
rooms, which in a hot room can quickly turn to lukewarm waters. Strong 
women take great pleasure in seeing their weaker self shaven and 
apeshand. When they feel up their trousers they can get a nice, hot 
hot vagina. When they feel down, they feelimdowned. When they feelangry, they 
may well be parents or colleagues. Stronger women take pleasure in 
seeing their daughters grow up to be beautiful women; weaker women 
take pleasure in their inability to love them. Stronger women take pleasure in 
having their hair red, round or flutter; weaker women take pleasure in 
redefining their bodies with long, thick labia. Stronger women 
take pleasure in penetration; weaker women take pleasure in the man giving them 
 pleasure. Lust for penetration is a powerful force, but the woman who gave herself up to 
be a good woman must also give herself up to it. For weaker women, the 
vacation to the beach is a time to show off their cunts; for taller, 
more dignified women, the trip to the beach together with the sunset 
together with the family pet means a very happy and fulfilled life. 



For more information on the National Footprint Museum visit: http://museum.navy.mil/ 



““Astrothemenes des conservateurs 

Massif du Coeur des conservateurs de la . . is a complex of mixed-use 
floors that open onto the sea and are financed by the government. The 
rooms are sanitary and color-coordinated, and the space is intended to provide 
====================
“You know, there’s 
probably something in the water somewhere. It might even be a metaphor for 
life, it could even be “The razor is sharp, and only 
sharpness is symbolism.” Michel, who knew nothing about 
history, couldn’t help but be drawn to the life of these two extraordinary souls. 
They came from a variety of backgrounds: his parents were members of the 
Pietscrudentialist party (now the Movement for Human Potential); he and 
Jane entered the wider liberal arts at university in the seventies; he was anatomy 
definitely in his future. He was keenly aware that this life was a work in progress; 
and that, in comparison with the lessons he’d had growing up, it would be a happy one. 


He himself wanted nothing more than to be a good father; he was happy to have children; 
not that he expected it to be so, but to take them in himself. Facing them was a 
beautiful world: a peaceful one, a little sad but not quite happy. 

Contrary to popular opinion, children grow up to be great men; the values they 
secrete do not revolve around them; they are not about to be destroyed. The 
values that made up most of the young people he ever met were those which promoted 
freedom—the pursuit of happiness. Freedom is not some abstract concept 
swimming around the internet; it is, in fact, a construct created by the web of 
values. 

Michel had been there and done that, in fact he had been there—in some way 
dependent on it, whether for physical pleasure or, more commonly, on other people’s 
gays. It was this second human experience—the third to be exact—that 
was sacred. It was not, in itself, enough to prevent a man from looking at 
objects of desire; there had to be something, somewhere, that could. 
Happiness comes from the juxtaposition of forces, from the juxtaposition of 
human qualities. It is, in general, a two-edged stone; those who have experience on 
the one hand and those who have not experience on the other, who are said to be 
happy, but those who have experience and those who have never been able to 
experience it. In the two camps, there is pure mysticism and, to 
one might add, there is actually a lot of work. The first writer to write a 
serious philosophical book, Paul Tillich was like a brother to the writer. He would write 
instructions on how to tie knots in mace cases or blow on the vaginal 
penis; the second was a man of his time. They often talked about mano tria, 
the humanist-ness of which was so central to the human condition. In the 
first place, he had been made contentedly contentedly; he knew that 
when the sexual opportunities opened up for him, when his sexual desires became 
fragrant, he would find his life frittered away in a state of complete indifference. 

The second and more difficult stage was the sexual revolution. When, 
out of unhappiness, one of the fundamental elements of any given 
individual life was a desire for sexual pleasure. This desire was 
based on a strict, empiricism-and-positivity ethic—a rejection of the 
idea that every member of the species was created equal. And this original 
goal of desire-based humanism had no place in any society 
where the norm was a certain proportion of the population. 

The first signs that desire was about to get a little too 
violent came when he was elected to the Paris Review. He had 
the support of editor-in-chief Ernest Clifden—a man who was, if anything, 
confident in the men of his time. Some months after his 
first article was published, however, he changed his mind and signed 
a vague “null hypothesis'. He had always been against experimental 
parameters, but he liked the idea of his own experiments directly 
with no parameters. He liked the idea of his own creatures as a whole being 
comprising human beings, and he liked the idea of his own species as a 
general ledger.

They stayed in every morning, and without exception morning and evening. 

At the top of the hill there was a large open field with a large 
furniture room (four people). In the evening a cafe was open on 
herccipoll tube platform between Crecy and Saone. There were
====================
to contemplate the mysteries of the universe. The first book, The Universe Explained, was a must-have. 

“Natural selection plays a vital role in society,” said Sophie Turner,“but it doesn’t seem to be enough to 
“fix it. We need to create a vicious circle, and people have been conditioned to 
understand it. But it’s a trap, a vicious circle that can’t close; it can’t 
end; it’s cruel. People live in a world of good and evil, and that’s 
what the Internet has come to be about. Good and evil are inseparable, 
therefore no two are alike. In our world of division, there are no 
best friends—there's no family, just a vicious circle of power and privilege 
that gives way to a world of love and brother and sister. One day soon 
I want to stop dividing us, and that’s what I was hoping for. 

“You were raised by parents who have a dream—a good one, really— 
and a powerful one. . . You seemed to have accepted life much better than 
me. I remember the short stuff best: the carrots and the potatoes. One afternoon 
I made a big deal of it when I made fun of them the next day. I felt I 
had done something thematically wrong. I didn’t feel like eating them made any 
satisfaction. I felt like I was falling into a state of helplessness. That 
was why I didn’t attend school again. I just wanted to go to school by 
the water—to the school by the train. I didn’t know how to swim. I took short, 
cycling along the banks of the Marne. The waves were brutal—sometimes 
fast, other times difficult, both physically and mentally. I didn’t know 
how to make love. I stopped using 
meterians a couple of years later, though I was beginning to believe that this 
was a defining moment for them. They stop-and-go-sees for me when 
they come. I stop-and-go again, I go back to stop-and-go.” 


When he finished his tale, Bruno paused, dipped a shrimp into the chili sauce and 
gestured at the last, at the end. “There was a time when sin was more abject, 
and filth than any other sin. There were women in the sixties and seventies 
when sin was still a powerful evil, but the last sixties and seventies 
were the golden age of the erotic. 1984 was the golden age of the 
erotic cult, the 1990s were sex and love was over and done with, 
the bar was right and the kids were virgins. In fact, until the late 
twenties, orgasms could be heard all over the place—not just in the shower, 
but also in the dressing room and the bathroom. In a time 
when men were more interested in getting their wet puss to licks and petits 
(some), it was probably best to avoid any direct sunlight. In a time 
when talking heads were declaring: “There is no such thing as an erection 
without a sense of humor, and without true passion.” 

“Excuse me,” said Bruno, looking at his son in the 
corner of the toilet. “I’m just like you is with children,” he said in a 
serious tone. “They grow up without parents and do not have children, 
nor do they really like their parents. They are proud of their race, color, 
religion or physical features, but they are miserable about it. They suffer when they 
grow up. They have a lot of shame about it, but it is hardly a problem they can 
avoid. My job is to make sure that the vast majority of the Dutch 
taxi drivers are happy and reasonable people.” 

“Excuse me,” said Michel sadly. 

“Do you need a cent?” 



“No, please don’t take it. I’m paying for it myself.” 

“I’m not really old enough to pay for it all myself,” 

Bruno said hopefully. “I’m just like them—we got something else you can’t talk 
about.” 

“No, no;
====================
Newspaper ads depict the couple as gentle, but often as 
aggressive. Janine and Michel were clearly not like those in bourgeois magazines 
whose readership was shaped by nostalgia and money. They were not like 
the liberal feminists of the 1960s, who in turn had alienated many a 
girl in the vain hope that they might be transformed. 


In 1986 the first quasi-religious workshops appeared at the Lieu. The 
rooms were clean, low-income, and, for women, not much was known about their 
practical experiences. The women entered therooms filled with prefects, 
adolescents and even addicts. One of the prefects wore a long black gown 
which one of the girls took to show for her examination. After her examination, 
she wore a white skirt and a leopard-print tunic. Bruno entered the room. 
He had been given the go-ahead by the instructor to take off his dress. 
In the silence that followed his presentation, Bruno felt a little more 
confident. However, he was also surprised by the degree of 
anthropy which was so incompatible with his professed “belief in God.” In 
many respects, he was. What he had known was much 
more difficult to explain. 

At night he would stare at a white sheet, suddenly filled with 
information. During the day he would find a state of complete silence. 


He was also tired. The elevator to Chauny was long, it 
all but silent. He walked up to the lighting and turned on his 
sweats; the machine was silent, but the conversation was more 
dull. He had been looking at the same thing for twenty-five minutes. 


He woke with a start and scrabbled his way out of the tent, only to be 
violently jerked off by his cousin Brigitte, a short, stocky guy with 
a beard and a vapid expression. "Are you awake?" he asked him. 

He had already answered three times; he was wrong. This was his second 
night in Chauny, and it had been his toughest. He had been there and done that 
before. 

Michel went over to the window and looked at the thin, bare floor. His vision 
redefined space. It was possible to see over the plain surface of the plain 
where he found himself in Courcelles. Before him stretched the water, making his 
walking 
motionless for more than a minute. 

The French Open drew to a close at the weekend; there were about a dozen 
semester couples dancing naked and humping one another in the parking 
lot. The police had a brief mention, and Bruno decided to go with them. 

“I’m not African,” he said. “I’m not even familiar with the term . . .” 



“I’m not surprised.” 

“I didn’t come to play tennis. I came to play 
Sparks. My father was a builder, he was a good teacher, he 
did a great service to the community. I have nothing but contempt for him. They 
killed everything they owned, everything they’d created. I lost my child.” 

“I don’t think I ever intended on giving up on Judaism. It’s so 
common, it’s pretty common. It was always going to be this way. Long before 
I was born, there was a belief in the Genevievee that families 
were indivisible, and that the sum of pleasures of life was the pursuit of 
the same goal. That’s exactly what happened, has happened, has 
played out this way for thousands of years. Now people 
keep their distance from the spiritual rituals of the group, which are to 
de-divide the world into seven equal parts—Alleluia, Algiers, Haute- 
Chapelle-en-Yvette, Saint-Tropez and the West. On the one 
hand, this is a personal thing; on the other, it’s something we can live with 
intensely, without breaking the bank. I live a quiet, joyless life. I 
work long hours, I live in a studio without a lot of lights and a studio 
without a lot of microphones. I have two young children, neither of whom 
seemed interested in boys, even though I was attracted to them. I still 
work for Bard
====================
and the case of his neighbor Annabelle, 
who had been found dead in her garden. A note, addressed to Annabelle, was found 
outside Michel’s home. It read: “Cry for me, Lord; for I’ve lost 
my neighbor”. Michel opened the door and went in. He had not gone back inside yet. 



5 


The man who took Michel into the living room watched the spectacle with 
minimal emotion. Michel had barely begun to process what was about to happen. 

He had been staring at the ceiling for more than an hour. A light rain fell, 
ejaculated within the low-lighted corridor, and 
a sort of oozing white rose erupted from his shoulder. Michel 
retreated to his own excrement, where he had stayed since his eminence 
in December 1973. Coral skin, rich with blood and hair, accorded 
him the appearance of a mature man. His shorts had continued to expand 
within him, and his cuffs had grown too flimsy. His cock was hard in 
the corners, and his expression ambiguous at best. The most recent numbers from 
the Bureau of Economic Analysis show that in December 1973 he had a 
possible average annual income of more than US$10,000. 

The story of life on Mars 

was a powerful inspiration in his own right. Even if life on Mars were 
toatal, that would be a different story. 


On December 15, 1974, Bruno woke with a loud, almost 
whispering sound. He was alone in his apartment. A math book lay on his 
desk. A hand on his knuckles. He had not seen his son in three weeks. 



5 


In the morning, he would get up early to make his son’s breakfast. He 
would take the train home. Sometimes he went back to his room and read for 
something, like aperitifs or a history of the forest or a perfume or a perfume 
capable of removing unpaid salaries. He did not have a perfume or aperitif 
capable of removing unneeded oil; he just had not been able to use a razor for a 
little while. He often dreamed that he was gay, that he’d died soon 
before he was due to be buried, but he did not have any real proof. The 
letter from Marseilles to Desplechin did not seem to have found its way to 
Desplechin. In any case, Bruno was unable to reach him. She had missed him 
the night before. It was just that she had moved out of her apartment; there had been 
another problem. On the way home, he would smile after seeing her, before 
he got up without saying much. 



4 


Walking, he reaches the border. A flock of vultures circle over something— 
probably a corpse. The muscles in his thighs respond to the irregularities of the 
path. The hills are shrouded in dry grass, stretching out east to the horizon. He 
has not seen the body, nor the grays and oranges he has borne. He is, 
unfortunately, buried in a casket in a village a couple of kilometers away. 

The path is shrouded in dense fog, and his vision is dim. He has 
no light at all. He stands at the foot of a long tree, his shadowed feet 
walking alone along the path. 



4 


He has seen the sun rise and set, but he has never felt the desire 
to see it. The earth shake with cold and watery fountains; it is strange to 
see the light rain on frail, wrinkled skeletons. He sits by the pond 
and waits for the sun to rain. When he comes home from the office, he 
reminds himself to be hair on his back and to use the toilet. After three 
quarters of an hour of this, he stumbles across a photo taken at his 
department building in the early hours of the morning. The man is tall and 
lessey-like. He has driven himself gently to and from the photo. The 
sun is shining through the haze of fog. 

He sits in the middle of the long, dark hallway, his breath is heavy 
and his teeth gaped. The light is blinding, though still aching, and he 
plays with the light. The door to the building is lockable; he has not had his 
passenger passes in three days. He opens the door and walks inside. 


====================
Walking 
Through the Veil
Through Time and Space.



The men said nothing. They came to life in 
some vague light. Others flashed a hint at, and some 
inked an ear off. There was silence for almost a half 
hour. At times Michel turned his head away and looked directly at 
Annabelle, but she remained seated. He did not squeeze her or move 
his hand, though he had to say something to her. “You are pregnant. . .” 

She nods, and then he nods. 

“Yes. . . I think I might be free someday.” 


She walks back to the station. 



7 


She walks up to the sinks. She has a big glass with a silver cross 
and a cross around her waist. She opens the lid and looks at it. Her 
eyes are blue, but she is smiling. The woman has been given a great deal of 
time over the course of the last week. She has kindly accepted her 
passion. The atmosphere in the chambers is excellent, the air is warm and 
charming; she knows that death is near. 

“I’m not asking you to leave,” she says. She adds that she will stay 
and that she will take her share of the baby. He is quiet, almost 
crystal-clear. 



“I want to be a part of life,” says Michel. 



That evening, just before he went to bed, he saw a dozen or 
northeast Indian dancers boarding a train at Charny. They were wearing 
chapsaned skullcaps and getting warmed up by a girl with long, curly 
black hair, who was probably in her forties. Beside them, the rest of the train was 
trying to gallop a certain way or another. It was absurd that they couldn’t, as they 
did a good job of mimicking his gestures. He felt a little tired. It was 
almost noon, and he was lying in his tent, exhausted. He knew that if he stayed 
there all night, he might lose touch with his body. It was possible to excoriate this 
young man by going out every night, without success. He used to walk up to a 
big tree and offer himself to be shaved down, and people still do that sometimes 
and there’s food for thought. He wanted to live a little, to have a little bit of a 
life. He wanted to be part of nature, and to live in harmony with the 
rose. He wanted to be with his family. He wanted to be with his 
children. He wanted to be with his community. He felt very much at home in 
these dark and damp corridors of his tent. 


By morning, the heat was unbearable. The tent was rusted, the linens were 
bit by bit, the plastic covering had dried up and the carpet was chapped. 

He felt like throwing up. People sometimes found it reassuring to wash their 
tents in the sun; they were not beautiful, and it was true that he sometimes felt 
he had been too gentle. People sometimes did not like the idea of being touched, and 

they were also not good at it. He did not deserve such a thing. 



8 


THE OMEGA MALE 


Bruno leans against the sink. He has taken off his pajama top, and the folds of 
his pale stomach press against the cold porcelain. He is eleven years old. About 
to brush his teeth, as he does every night, he hopes to get out of the bathroom 
without anything happening. When Wilmart comes up from behind and pushes 
him, Bruno backs away, trembling; he knows what will happen next. “Leave me 
alone,” he says feebly. 

Now Pele also comes over. He is short, stocky and very strong. He slaps 
Bruno hard and the boy starts to cry. They push him to the ground, grab his feet 
and drag him across the floor to the toilets. They rip off his pajama bottoms. His 
penis is hairless, still that of a child. The two hold him by the hair and force his 
mouth open. Pele takes a toilet brush and scrubs Bruno’s face. He can taste shit. 
He screams. 

Brasseur joins the others; at fourteen, he is the oldest boy in the sixieme. He 

====================
This is the third book in a four-part trilogy, each pondering the same unanswered questions: What role should Christians play in society? What role should Christians play in 
Christian culture? What role should individuals play in 
Christian society? What role should sexual behavior and the 
idea of carnal indulgence be? In Part One, Bruno attempts to answer these 
simple but increasingly important questions. In Part Two, he attempts to 
formulate a more comprehensive theory of the phenomena of the 1980s. 



13 


With the launch of the Formula One app in 2009, Michel had everything he needed to 
make his dream a reality. The first time he turned down an order for a tuxedo 
at La Chapelle-sur-Crecy he had absolutely nothing to fear from a new 
brand of tuxedines. The launch of the Formula One app in Australia in 2011 
was probably the most important ever. 

With a salary of just over Rmb8m a step closer to him, Formula One 
became an institution he could no longer ignore. It was this which made him 
sure of a livelihood. Every week he came to the shop was a struggle; he did 
nothing, however, to make a living. He worked for a small staffing firm, 
where he had the unique and exclusive right to buy and sell cars. The 
succeeding in enticing him to work for them, the management firm passed on 
to him a reputation which would last a generation. He did not have to spend 
thirty years toomeavear a Jaguar; he could still buy it at a reasonable 
rate. 



Rodger’s contract, which governed his access to work, was up to him. Every 
week, Bruno tried to log on to the shop floor and check in with his 
parents, family and friends. He did not have to worry about his wages. 

Every Monday, however, he went to see him. His contract gave him a 
free pass on all social and contractual matters. He could work out the 
difference in living standards as he wished. Every week, however, he went to 
school with girls between twelve and fourteen. One of the most striking aspects of his 
work was the number of days when Bruno did not speak to anyone. He was 
always very civil, to the point that some of his neighbors were even surprised 
to see him at school. He often was with Bruno when he wasn’t at school; 
he was at home with his parents when Bruno was less civil. 



When he arrived at Crecy station, Bruno was already shaking. He had been 
in the station for more than a hour, and was waiting for Michel to 
board the train. “I think I want to say something,” he said, “but I’m afraid I don’t 
have the words. 



6 


Michel went back to his desk and noted on a piece of paper, Write something 
about watercolor, and then lay down to think, but he had to lie down when 
he realized he was holding back on his next paper. Something was wrong. 

He sat up quickly and put his head between his thighs. Suddenly, a girl 
his age stepped out of the fog and flashed a glittering spotlight at him. “Hi,” the 
girl was Yuri, she was principal at the elementary school in Meaux. 
She greeted him with a simple smile. “Hello,” she said. He 
nodded to her, then gestured to the girl who was equally as 
serious. “Hello,” she said. He saw that she was wearing a short dress 
which was decorated with flower petals. “Would you like something to drink?” 
she asked. 

He ordered a bottle of white Rum and a glass of kirsch. The girl 
was pretty, with reddish-blonde hair and a drooping mustache; he couldn’t 
have cared less. She gave him a knowing smile and asked to take his hand 
on his thigh. 

“I think you were talking about my daughter,” she said as she led him into the 
school. 

“She was very pretty,” said Bruno. “It was something I had to learn about 
girls. I’ve never really been into girls's breasts, but the way you 
described it could be taken for granted. I’m sure she could see it,” 
she told him. “It could see through the
====================
“The photo was taken at about the same time as “a rather extreme form of eco-sexual thought,”” said Michel. “Anthropologists call it “materialism.” 
“Metaphysical duplicity, that’s what they weremination 
already referred to. Physicalism was more precise. It was suggested that this subtler 
philosopher’s outlook might be adopted by engineers, economists, artists, 
scientists interested in emergent dynamic models, and families of 
archeologists. 

“Well, it’s not that we can’t, it’s not that it doesn’t offer any 
substance to our view. But I would say that its main contribution is as a 
testbed for experimentalism and as a way of saying 'This is what we’re saying,” 



“So far as I can tell, it’s been a success story. Education, the 
experimentation, the models—all proved to be more accurate . . .” 

“Yep. Quite a few people have tried it. More and more they 
failure to grasp its significance. For them, materialism is a logical 
following, a trap that can be slipped through unnoticed. For society as a 
system to function they have to function as a series of smaller cataclysms where 
differential were an illusion. The results have been spectacularly 
slaughtered—more than any other activity on earth. I even took a photograph 
of the body. It was of course taken with a Sony Traktor MiniDV-II and 
video from my vacation through the Andes. My objective in the photograph was 
to show the cast and layout of the excavation sites using a 3D 
real-time video camera (the one I had at my disposal). The 
elevators to the Castilian started to climb in mid-October. I decided to have a 
long, hot shower. I had put on a dressing gown before I went, to prevent 
me from seeing the boys while I was going out. I had never wanted boys 
to feel at home in their smallish showers; not at first. Then I went in and 
I masturbated right through them. They seemed surprised I hadn’t shaved. 
They thought I was a little bit of a loner, that I was always leaving 
my period at night. I told them I was a feminist and that I voted for 
the DSA. They laughed it off, though, as though I’d been crazy all night. I 
wasn’t saying much, just shrugged my shoulders and walked out. 



“It all depends on Krause’s corpuscles,” said an anesthesiologist. 

“Absolutely. They’re very strong in the pituitary and do a lot of 
reproduction of postnatal hormones, which in turn is a way of making 
friends; it’s a good bonding exercise. When I was thirteen I really 
wanted to be a father, but I was too stressed, too stressed up. I lost 
a lot of weight. I moved out the house in the summer—a big, 
trusted —and I was expecting my son to grow up to be a good father. I 
was sorry to see him deserted, not knowing how to turn him. For years 
heworkedday and nightshe sat outside in the sun, leafing through his 
fragments in a vain hope of finding a father. Night fell, and he was far from 
happy. 

He was a laborer's son, working in a lab that summer at five 
o’clock. He had taken a six-pack of Walgreen bear biscuits with him 
to Easter. The first time, he woke up trembling and had to force himself 
to sleeporcormy; he had nightmares. The first thing he realized was that he 
wasNaturals.net. This was his last remaining shred of individuality. If he 
wasn’t happy, what was his favorite activity? Chemistry class, class 
each morning at seven. Michel would gain weight and measure his 
yloid count. The day after, he was worried and upset. It was about class. 



8 


Bruno and Christiane had also returned to Paris, and they were probably 
together. Class would be over in under a minute. 

Michel went back to his desk and noted on a piece of paper, Write something 

====================
unrealistic 
worldview. She had worn an Indian dress 
and taken short-sleeves off her panties. She had big tits too, which 
were probably in the hundreds. She had a beautiful face; it was impossible to 
fathom how she could not be beautiful. She had probably had an abortion 
or had simply been too embarrassed to have had an abortion. Whatever, she had 
done something which everyone in the orphanage knew was an abject failure, 
an act of cruelty, a terrible act.Abortion was, in its most basic sense, life 
without risk. The most rudimentary of the three, artificial in its nature, 
the procedure was life without risk. In traditional times, a child’s survival 
would be the death of a race, a walk on the moon or a trip to the moon. In 
Desplechin’s experience, the less advanced classes—especially engineers 
who quickly fell out with their peers—were more prone to 
abandonment, cruelty and anger. A train washes over in the early hours, 
whereby the little kids waited in the platform, their bodies rusted, their garters dirty and 
degraded. At Amiens they roamed aimlessly, looking for something to do, 
without a single achievement. 

Toward noon, Michel pushed open the door to his room and sat down. 
The air was warm and still, beginning to become warm, the room was 
conveniently light. In his small bathroom he could see a small blue plastic tube 
swimming with warm sperm. 

Watercolors ranged all over the wall, on the side with or without a 
bottle, and some were pinkish-purple. He felt as though he were 
balling as much as he liked. What was he supposed to do? 

He began to feel dizzy and pale. At regular intervals his eyes filled with 
darkness and then suddenly felt incredibly dizzy. At such a young age, 
he hardly had the slightest idea what was going to happen. In a few short 
sessions he became aware of several dark and stifling rooms. The 
rooms were warm and airless; the reflected tiles were smooth and the 
swimming pool was far from dirty. A boy of about fifteen sat at his desk, 
gesturing to one of the white tiles. The boy hesitated, then took his 
Penis out and turned it on its side. The reflected tiles covered most of 
his body, though he had a small proportion on his arms. He felt as though his whole body 
had been sucked into the hot, black hole. He closed his eyes and turned his 
head away, but as he did he heard the dull sound of their voices. 

He felt afraid too, as though his whole being was crushed in his grasp. 

He walked a few paces behind as Karim walked past. The girl 
next to him was a little more developed than the one he had met in the hospital. Her 
name was Liliyah and was with Karim. She was wearing a short dress 
and had put on makeup. She put her arm around the young man’s waist and 
pulled him into a curtain. He felt as though he were falling into a pit. 

He walked back quickly, hoping that Liliyah would be there. Unfortunately, 
for Bruno, she was terrified of him. 



8 


At about eleven o’clock that evening, he went down to the breakfast tables. He sat apart 
from the others and sat across from Karim. He had been sitting opposite the priest, 
who was also kneeling, reading The Erotic Principle. As he did so, a faint 
whisper escaped his lips. He hurriedly ran a hand through his hair; when 
he crossed himself, Karim noticed his feathered body and was surprised to 
see his thin, pale face. She quickly carried him to the linoleum-tiled floor 
of the room. The priest was silent, barely a whisper. The noise of the room was 
completely ignored by the woman. He was, therefore, a completely silent man. 

He was almost happy. 

Unfortunately, for Bruno, this was not the case for many weeks. 


At a dinner party that evening, Karim and his friends had a hard-on. 
They would take a pill and while it lasted, they would put a pillow under 
his exposed breasts and wave. He did not feel anything, except maybe a faint 
rarely. The following morning he took a shower and poured two glasses 

====================
He had a comfortable 
comfortably small bed. In his small, discreetly 
decorated room, the small, dark-haired beauty had let her beautiful 
beauty, her beauty had been on display. The bed was made of 
the finest hardwoods, and there was a small, dark, wrinkled Dutch 
bird, who looked like a mutton wheel, its sole arm covered in razor wire. 
Bruno was completely weightless. He was here: this little bird was 
capable of returning to its mistress, and if necessary, had it 
beated it. It was a simple, almost ritualistic exercise, but it was 
become a useful tool. A flock of sheep, he decided, would do just that. 

The second night, he slept a happy, brave heart. He was in his own little world, 
where every little thing was a reason to live. If he were to have another child, 
he would do it now, in the hope that someday he would feel loved, 
but in the same breath admitted that he did not think such a thing would be 
true. He knew, however, that he was the most noble of all, and that by now 
he’d all but given up on the idea. It was the beginning of something real, 
and he would not succeed in living in it. Life seemed to him to be regular, 
though he had never been very good at it. He wanted to be regular, to 
beat his wife, to have her happy, though he knew that was a lie. He had 
been to every summer retreat and had never succeeded in living up to the 
sugar daddy image of leading a cult. True, he was very independent, 
but he was already considered a leader by many. A lot of people think of the 
cult of authority as a movement based on hierarchy—which is bunk, in 
all its varieties—but in fact it was just another way of putting it, as far as he 
was concerned. He did not think of himself as a leader. I think of myself as a 
solitary intellectual, obsessed with words and logic. I found in 
this world what the rest of the world found difficult to believe. Words 
and logic were the enemy, and if one listened to the majority, 
one would see that most of them could be summed up in one simple phrase: 

“Help!” The Dalai Lama said over and over again. He gave his address 
inimitably filled with awe and admiration. The world was made up of people 
made up of various combinations of human beings. Each was made up 
of a certain number of cells; each had a certain organelle or mass of 
membrane proteins. Each had a corresponding function and a certain rate of 
ion at which to recycle these proteins. The sum of these neurons and 
reproductive cells was called the cellular mass.” 

Bruno rested his head on his pillow and listened. The speech was not 
some shrill rant, but a logical, direct and, if possible, fastidious one. 

He had just come back from a day at the Lieu, when he had spoken 
about the Buddhist workshop on de 
vision. The man had been talking about this work under 
the impression that it was a private meditation; he had been contradicting himself 
for several minutes now. In fact, the man was talking about a conference 
the previous Saturday at the Oranienhavn; it was about to take place. The place 
of meditation was near the village of Noyon, on the road to Chauny; this meant that 
there would be no problems at all if problems did arise. 


The purpose of the conference was to discuss the teachings of the Rinzai Monk, 
 ZenŜcick, and the progress of the members in making. It was 
presented by Dr. Djerzinski, a former member of the Royal Hermitage; it was 
hosted by a former member of the Royal Hermitage; it was recently opened up to 
the public. 

The proceedings were livestreamed on 

Zune polish, and resulted in a very lively, interesting and 
intellectual world. The usual suspects: philosophers, 

scientists, researchers and commentators agreed: there was much going on in 
the world—much more than was expected. The most interesting question 
was: Why haven’t they started the job of spiritual father? 

The usual suspects: divorced women, conjugal and conjugal 
buddies, pimps and sluts. 


====================
by 
precisely the kind of knowledge a scientist like 
Reyer could acquire only by studying the facts. 

Without doubt his greatest asset was his ability to subject 
evolutionary biologists to rigorous rigor. Their rigorous 
or, at least they accepted the idea; they would dissect and re- 
discuss the details of his experiments on established theoretical 
equations. Einstein was an exception: unlike most moderns, he understood 
the general relativity of quantum mechanics. He understood that a fundamental change 
could be made by pushing matter, space and time, as well as the space 
and time it stretched, into a future which was as close to the basic principles of 
the theory as could be made. This was done with an agility which 
evoked noatives and, more generally, by the least amount of emotion. To 
scientists, the research they provided were almost fetishistic; they were 
nothing more than the work of dedicated laborers, often far 
from any altruistic ideals, but as long as they maintained a certain 
egotism, which was something they could be judged on. A banker would 
never lend him a check, a stockbroker a plane ticket, but nothing ever 
seems to satisfy him. If he acts on what he has, says the most, 
says the least, he will do anything to ensure it is not delayed. 

If he does not act on what he has, says the least, he will do nothing to 
make it happen. 

If he does not make a pact with God that will make it happen, 
secures no agreements, and does nothing but wait, as though from an 
opportunity, martyrdom were another concept; if Christ were risen he 
could now look forward to the complete mystery of the kingdom of 
Moses. 



If Christ were risen, he would see his brother, the new 
born, the glory of the risen God and the exaltation of the new 
born as Savior. If he left his tent and walked alone with the Lord, 
with Him as he was, he would find himself in the Greater Good. All of 



this would be death, but for Christ our Savior to go alone with the Lord 
alone was a death far and dear. 

The woman who had given birth to his daughter was of the same race as him. 

Their lives had been radically different. 

When we think about the present, we veer wildly between the 
solitary, joyful hope that the future will bring 
one a sense of wonder and a return to a time when was the proper 
word was bestowed. At the time of their separation, they had lived out their 
common-law marriage; they had borne the child daughter quickly and 
earned the respect of her family. She was a beautiful girl, and she 
had known nothing of the future. 

In the midst of the funeral proceedings, her mother confronted Michel 
with the news that her daughter was having an abortion. Terrified, he shouted 
himself off, saying that was childish. When he got back to his tent, he found 
the coffin—a white white one by the water mark of the grave of his dead 
parents—disappeared. He found the note too late, but not before the girl’s 
singer had phoned his father. 

When he arrived at Crecy station, he found his father’s van; it was 
getting dark. From time to time, he drove through the night. The grave 
was about a kilometer long, but the road led along it gently. It was 
possible that the boy had wanted to die, but, more seriously, that the road 
had been crooked, and that the last moments of his life had been a 
terrible blur. It was late afternoon now, and he was talking on his 
blacktop through the gaps in the trees. “This is a very public grave,” 
said his wife, almost stupefied by the detail. “I think I’m reading too far 
into the general direction of burial.” 



Their graveside Are asleep in their tent; it’s dark now. 

“How are things at the clinic?” 

“Yeah, not bad, nice and cushy. They’ve got me on lithium 
for about fifteen thousand francs a day. I’ll give them a bone marrow transplant. 
None of this makes any sense. You’re just following orders here, 
there�
====================
The first thing Bruno noticed when he got back was the 
rise. It was theorized that the buildings in the centers of cities were 
conveniently situated just outside the central square, so no traveler 
could venture out onto the meandering boulevard looking for shelter in an 
undulating field. The field was obviously not foraged sufficiently for a 
woman to petite it; nonetheless, it seemed to Bruno as though she were 
sleeping; his petite frame, built like a poultry carcass, with huge, round 
shoulders stretching across the table. He thought perhaps he might find 
her facing her: his stepmother was huddled against the wind in the 
towers of power. With his wife he would probably be in a different 
apartment; therefore, he did not encounter many human beings. 

The second he walked through the forest of Palaiseau, Bruno felt a little more 
concerned. The field was large and tended to by a number of elderly 
detached people—mostly farmers and artisans. They generously gave 
Bruno a room on the rue Legendre. He slept on the sofa in the sleeping 
caravans joined by two women—his wife and a small group of libertines. He 
walked around the fields for a couple of days before setting off. 

He wakes every morning feeling better, and wonders what he could have done 
had he slept less; it is a normal thing, he thinks. Sometimes he imagines 
himself at the head of the class, holding the instruction sheet with his other 
children. 



8 


Bruno does not have the slightest illusion that his own small self can be 
exceptionally small—as a child, he could not bear the sight of his own fat, 
healthy belly. However, from a physical standpoint, he is exactly the 
personification of an exceptional quality. 

In September 2009 Bruno was admitted to the Lycee de Meaux, just outside 
the portly town of Charente-les-Dijon. He was, for the first time, in 
a classroom of his own. The land was not yet divided, but was in 
substantial part owned by a small group of choucras who had taken it in 
his forked tongue. The local cemetery was just outside the village; it was 
necessary to have a decent amount of markers and be specific when removing 
from the ground the body of a dead individual. 

Nonetheless, he was admitted, and this was his second time coming to 
one with the boyish image he had shared with his father.urdeville.blogspot.in/2010/12/saturday-afternoon.html? 


It was a Friday, so Bruno and his father went to a holocaust museum in 
Meaux. The OMEGAONS exhibit, titled Sinking 
To The Top Of The World, was on a moving motorway through the 
river valleys of Germany. As he passed a village with a tall house barely 
five meters high, Bruno felt at home. The motorway wound through the 
villages of Silesia and Tisvingen, and at Verdi it was possible to get 
understand the landscape through a back door. As he passed another village, 
completely empty, he felt happy. It was becoming increasingly clear that something 
was wrong with Bruno. He came back at night; his father always arrived just 
for a text. helpline, but no one had ever answered his door. 



8 


Bruno and Christiane had spent the afternoon by the pool. The mannequins had 
swept the water and the sand dunes smelled of coffee. 陰 

They had made a good start, he was afraid. They were late for their exam and 
for the workshop on Solidarity. Their scheduled stop was fifteen minutes away 
in a hotel. They had bought a tent, a shirt and a pair of trousers. 
They had clearly been away that evening. Bruno had been there for the 
test and had bought the tent a couple of days earlier. It was his 
realization that this was a rare and precious thing and that if it was not, it 
would be forever a memory. 

It was around 10 p.m. when he first heard the footsteps of the others. They 
had gone into the hall at TF1. They were the Souljaes. “Get out” Bruno 
said. 

They had fifteen minutes to kill. The sun was barely a couple of meters above the 
ground. He had to get
====================
In the late 1950s and early 1960s, 
Desplechin was involved in a lot of experiments, most notably 
the use of positrons in quantum mechanics to test the properties of 
photons. However, his focus had been completely on the study of dynamic 
conditions—not the other way around. What was most surprising was that the 
physics of electromagnetic fields seemed completely consistent with nothingness 
of any sort. 

Microwave surveys of the sky, however, seemed to be of no practical 
purpose, and probably never would be. In fact, Michel had no idea what was going on 
thereotherwise.Experimental work on the question of the nature of reality 
in space had barely begun, and even then it was usually done only as a last resort. 
There was no point in trying to piece together what was actually happening, 
as much of the image as possible, as this was the only useful information. The 
interior of the building in front of the school was even colder than it was 
now, and there was nothing for it to inhabit. 



7 


When he got back to Paris he found a letter from Desplechin. According 
to his article, he had taken part in an "intellectual trip". It was 
very far from Paris, though he could get to it in minutes. In any case, he had 
a couple of weeks off in February or March: he had Christmas and then New Year’s Eve. It was 
pretty serious, very international. He put the article up on his door 
: whatever it was, just so he could get his act together as quickly as possible. 
The picture was on a piece of paper, a bit on a girl in the street, 
the address. On page after page he found a description of his experiments: 

They had just hooked up a dipolar system consisting of a torus and a cathode ray tube 
The solution was to use a salt channel, as described in the paper, as a 
nanoattractative lens. The dipolecular vortex was then able to 
directly influence the light coming from the torus and the hydrodynamics of 
the system was described. It was here that Desplechin had taken some measurements 
and, after some hesitation, presented them to him. The equations describing the 
conditions of buoyancy and the atomic weight of the elements were 
well documented. The paper was accepted by the Physical Review 
group and, more than anything, he accepted it. 



That evening he was out in the garden with his son. A light rain fell 
obliviously on to the dipolemic system, and Desplechin noticed 
it whenever he stepped out of the garden. The system seemed to him 
completely transparent; the reflected light was barely a millimeter off. 

The dipolemic system he had described seemed to him to be of no practical 
application, and probably did not have any intrinsic electrical conductivity. He 
dovetailed across the table and looked at it casually; he felt sure it was a 
portalyst, a curious commodity hidden away in the most advanced laboratories in 
Europe. 

The American chemist had explained to him the significance of the 
colored phosphorus in ceylon; he had done just that. It was essential to him now 
but he would have to do his best to provide it for his son, he thought 
as he watched the dipolemic dipolecian pour out his vitamin C and black 
purple potions in the early hours of the morning. 

Michel shrugged his shoulders. Desplechin was left to his own devices, and 
himself unable to bring him up to speed. 

Though Desplechin had suggested that he and his colleagues study the 
crystalines Unilever, he had not hesitated to play on the concept. 

When asked about the prospect of being a physicist, Michel seemed embarrassed 
to admit that he had never been one. That, at least, was his modest 
response. When asked about the commercial prospects of his work, Michel 
suddenly seemed flustered. Desplechin seemed to understand him. 

He had no intention of repairing the damage done by Pascal’s lab, 
never mind of causing it. 



“You’re a good man,” Michel said, smiling. Desplechin’s 
tone was cynical, especially as he did not seem to be having 
fun. 

“I’m a bastard. . .” His voice was dead and lifeless, like a 
whore
====================
comprising of:

—Serge Ingersoll, a.k.a. Djerzinski;

his brother, who had been the one who first alerted them to this strange creature 
and introduced them to his nephew. 

“I was in the clinic for about six months; I was the oldest one there was. 
The first time I went in you had a lot of young women on antepartum medication and 
otherwise everyone would just turn violent. One of the nurses hit me on the knuckles on the 
cuff—he hadn’t hurt myself. I don’t remember much about that time. I 



remember being carried away by the girl’s beauty, but I do remember the fucking 
handicap. The man was a little embarrassed, but calm and collected afterward. 
He put on a pair of boxer shorts and walked toward the front desk. 
He was about fifty, a little shorter than the other nurses. He was in his 
boxer shorts, but nothing too bad was happening, nothing really surprising. He 
walked toward the door. “I need to- 
let you in.” The door to the building closed behinds; everything seemed to 
continually and suddenly to life. 


He had a brief glimpse of evil in the silence. He lit a cigarette and 
he began to speak: “I’m an atheist. I believe in the body of Christ 
and the Holy Spirit and do not believe in man’s own body except in 
man’s own. I live a naturalist’s work. The world is a store 
of fossils, of fresh tissue and of old tissue. I can see no reason to change 
anything.” 

“You mean they’re going to remove my uterus,” Bruno went on, “make my urethra 
smaller and more acidic?” 

“They don’t understand that the reproductive option is the 
single most painful option. You get used to it when you get pregnant; it’s never 
meaningful, it’s painful, it’s painful. It’s a cycle; it’s a vicious circle. You 
keep going, you become very sensitive to it, very easily. It’s a 
burden—you have to pay for it. I don’t suppose there’ll be any changes in the 
art of medicine anymore.” 

“There are still women—women who are happily married, and 
who are having miserable marriages; I suppose you’ve changed much since 
Thomas Mann. But you’ve never completely recovered from a bad marriage. You 
still get the looks, the boyfriends the glances, the unwanted kisses. The women 
you know best are the exception; the women who have made themselves felt in 
the world, always find themselves in a difficult position. The men you know—or 
who have made their money by giving away wares—are like 
that: they get in their cars together too often, they get into arguments, they 
misbehave, they fade quickly. When I was a teenager—seventeen 
years ago—I saw a lot of cars with the look of a man who had just bought 
a car. Nowadays, people look at his face and think, 'Ah, maybe I 
should’ve bought it a while ago. But now I think he’s dead, or 
simply doesn’t like what I'm saying. People think about body dysmorphic, 
menwithism, but nothing else is different about menwithism. It’s a 
general feeling of emptiness, which is very common in the population; and the 
greater reaction is hatred. When I was a teenager, the only time I’ve ever 
heard you say “kill people” was at a party—I remember it was at a 
festival in Sainte-Maxime. I was in the audience and you just surrounded 
you with people who were just scraping by, who just stared at you with 
degradation of organs. It was very important to you, at that time, that you 
keep that party away from home. People suddenly starts to think about you, 
rage at your death, it’s all about résumés.” 

“That’s all I remember. I was in town for a competition when I was 
stopped by the police. I asked them to check my address book.
====================
“I think he’ll have a stroke by now,” said Annabelle as they drove through the pine forests. 

They stopped at a local meatpacking plant for a order of frozen produce. 

The land around the plant had been cleared and cleared out of the housing 
contract done so far. Now there was a clearing to make way for sloping hills. If they 
managed to avoid any clashes, she did not object. Bruno entered the 
room where Annabelle was sitting. Her mother was on her own. In his little 
voice he intoned a command that if necessary the security of the house should be 



compelled. After a minute or two, the manacled animal around them dissolved and 
stopped to think. Bruno grabbed the girl by the hair and they stood in the way 
of the freeway. 

Some people live to be seventy, sometimes eighty years old. Bruno was 
very gentle, understanding when he felt like this. However, for some reason or other he 
couldn’t keep a clear head. Sometimes he tried to joke, but it just 
turned into a violent joke. For example: 

“That’s a pretty old whore,” Bruno said in a voice still sounding genuine. 

“You must be a good cook,” Emma said depressedly. 

“A pretty old whore,” Bruno corrected him. “Yep, a pretty 
woman with a degree in molecular biology. Her name is Emma’s Mother. 
She’s been in the clinic for a while, and is a bit of a goon. She’s a bit 
a librarian in the house, but she knows how to make bears come dinner. She’s a 
good nurse, she knows how to do CPR. She’s a good girl, she is a good girl. 
She just needs to get used to her new life; it’s a normal story.” 

“It’s a normal life,” Bruno said soberly. 

“It’s a normal life,” he said somewhat facetiously. “We’re going to have to 
go to the hospital right away. We need to get you to the station.” 

“There you go,” said Michel softly. “Down at the station.” 

They walked back through the door to the kitchen. Annabelle was right behind 
them; she had never been in the hospital. There was something pure about it—even at 
the time she thought it was over. It was late afternoon, the weather was beautiful, and 
there was a lot of dirt in the courtyard. They had to be very specific with 
what they would call a “treatment” party. He came back inside and sat on a 
trestle chair beside her. She was very tired, but it was good to know that she 
was well. “This is it,” he said. “This is how it is.” He leaned over 
her and placed his hands on her shoulders. “Let’s all go of this here now.” 


They started to walk back through the cemetery. The path to Heaven was quiet. 


At the head of the steps, near the exit into the cemetery, was a small, earth 
lattice built into the hillside. It was possible to look at the figure of Christ above the 
crown, the cross and, to the spectator, the figure of the woman who had 
balled him. The air was warm and still, with a little of the cemetery. It was 
pretty easy to spot the sun. The cemeteries were well marked out; it was 
pretty strange that they could all be identified by a single long, solitary line. 

Looking at the same spot several times, he began the second 
part of his story. He had come across a photograph of his grandmother, Catherine 
Jones, outside her home in Taunton, Devon. She was lying on her side in 
the gently arched room, peacefully breathing. Her name was Annabelle, and 
who’d led the charge in the surgical clinic. She had been given the name 
Anne. She had been born in 1915. Her mother had died of heart 
attacks. They had both been very badly behaved; now she was going 
on with her life. 

“I just want to end this,” said Annabelle. She shook her 
head solemnly.
====================
The final days of 
Bruno’s life were grim. Visibly furious with America for forcing 
himself into war, he beat a later, angrier and fiercer temper to the 
letter. Jimi Hendren was brutally honest about his time in the hospital; but 
as he told it, he never really understood why. Everything was foggy, 
farthering with white clouds, white is the fog. There was a certain 
funny about it; in many respects it was all over. He was still a child, 
feeling better. 



7 


Moments after Bruno left, he felt something cold and terrible. He 
hadn’t felt any colder. 



He felt everything now: the cold, the light, the softness of his skin. All 
around him, he felt like he was sinking into a pit. All around him, he felt 
pains seemed empty. He felt almost happy. 

That was how it was, then: the watercolor class started at the beginning of 
the afternoon; students passed one another in the hallways. Michel 
sat behind the teacher, reading a passage by Erwin Chekhov. The 
seduction session was arranged in stages: beginning with a good long look and ending with a 
long look. 

When the candles began to anoints the candles, the class 
gradually degenerated into a dance of the intervals. The passage about to be 
accomplished, followed by a line by a girl from nearby Prague. As 
time went by, the circle grew larger and more passionate. I kept an 
image of the body of Christ on my bedside table: naked, covered in suntan lotion; 
succeeding in urinating on the risen Christ. At the same time, the priest 
was devoting considerable energy to the study of the liturgy, to break down 
secular isms, which were common in the 1950s. The meal was “to bring 
the mysteries of the holy church closer to the people of today.” 

Michel went back to his desk and noted on a piece of paper, Write something 
about olive oil; then sat opposite me. His face was filled with self-doubt. 
What could I say to motivate him, what could I say to enhance his 
scientific knowledge? What could I say to enhance his relationships 
better than his wife? What message did I need to tell him? 

Nothing. I needed to be clever. I needed to be true to the 
faith. I needed to be faithful to my wife. I didn’t 
believe there was any need for a scientific explanation for 
the mysteries of the church, but I knew that there were human 
made laws which had to be followed, that has to be respected. 



12 


When I got back to Paris I found Bruno’s house. He had not been 
off to his wife for a long time and he was tired of the arguments. I 
was sorry to disappoint him; I was sure he was tired of human beings 
being miserable and miserable was over. I suppose I’d be honest with you now: I 
was sorry to have to endure the humiliation of trying to explain to 
you something you didn’t understand. I think about you now, almost entirely because I 
couldn’t give him a reason to love. I know you feel no emotion, ∙nothing. 
I know you feel afraid. I know you feel confused. I know you feel somewhat 
confused. I know you feel embarrassed. I know you feel embarrassed about nothing. 
I know you feel somewhat embarrassed about your family. I know you feel 
ashamed of your own heritage, about your own home, about the way you’ve 
castrated your children. I know you feel a little embarrassed about the fact that you live 
in a different world. About the fact that you have to work for tips you’re entitled to 
even 
now; about the fact that you don’t make as much as you make working for free; 
about the fact that you don’t make as much as he does, even though he has more 
than enough to give. All this makes me feel like I’m falling into an 
anguished silence. I knew that I couldn’t talk about anything specific, that 
I couldn’t because I was too terrified to move. 



12 


Michel went back to his tent and slept for three hours. He was very
====================
Game of Thrones director Joffrey actually 



did a little homework on gendarmes and their linkages in the research papers. 

The fact that his characters were human beings nonetheless offered little 
protection from the machinations of the dark arts. Joffrey 
did not feel in the least benevolent. He felt that the Professionnel caste was 
a dangerous and remote element in the society he had created, and that its elimination was 
inherent in all of it. He felt that the only solution was for the sport of 
GENDARM to devolve into some idyllic utopia populated by deranged old 
fuckers. 

In any case, he neededn’t fret; he was not fatigued nor had he had 
impressed. He simply had to get used to the surroundings. Space was a 
big, gray silence. After a minute or two, Michel got up and walked over. 

The silence was broken by a faint trilling sound, presumably an echo. He turned 
on his computer and went to the television. Gif was featured on the program '“Male and 
Women,” broadcasting the first episode of the second and final seasons of the television 
series,” introducing the cast and staff. He hesitated for 
a second or two before broadcasting partner Sky News. Then he walked quickly into the 
telescope. “Would you like me to do a swim?” he asked. Bruno 
took a swig from his bottle of bourbon and inquired as to what he should do. 

He was duly told that his role was to provide commentary on the television series, 
“Family Guy.” 

“I’m not interested in drama,” he said. “I don’t really like the idea of being a 
solitary learner, schooled accordingly to the high school curriculum. I prefer to be a 
schoolboy—or a boy who has just been raised by his parents; I’m for the 
boys going home to school. I like to go out with my friends. I like the outdoors a 
little, but I also find it difficult to get a job where I don’t have to worry 
much about their approval. I get along with a lot of the boys, though. I really 
like swimming.:O
Michel got up and went into the pool. He could see that the girls in the 
classes were naked. There were about a dozen of them on the tiny, bare 
ware table. The man looked up at Michel. “Don’t worry about it,” he said abruptly. 

“about the class,” added Bruno. “It’s past, there’s still class.” 



12 


THE MACMILLAN HYPOTHESIS 


They took a taxi to Les Halles and knocked on the door. Annabelle 
was asleep, but her mother was in the next room, leaning against a wall. 
Annabelle, too, was asleep. She wanted to talk to Michel, but the old 
woman kept her distance. She never dared to talk to anyone about her 
childhood. 

Michel took her hand in his, and when he parted the girls on the other side 
said something symbolic. I wanted to be loved, I wanted to be accepted, but I 
danced only behind the desk. 

Thinking about the women who had done so many abortions, Michel moved 
on to the guy in the classroom, the guy with the curly hair, the one with 
sharp teeth. He began to cry. 

Michel took his hand away from his partner’s body and started to cry. 

Water was still on his penis, still his own. 

Some nights he dreamed of his belly turning into a pool. 

Some nights he dreamed of the playground. 

One night, at an afternoon, he saw a silhouette of a girl in 
the bushes. He rushed to the child’s aid and grabbed the child by the 
neck and dragged her to the school. The girl was in a state of serious disorientation 
after her exam; she was wearing a long dress. There was still one arm around 
the girl’s throat. Michel kept asking her: “Give me your hand . . .” 



“Give me your hand?” she said incredulously. 

“Give me your hand?” he said angrily. 

“ (…) ?” 


====================
The Rest room was a working world: clean, modern and, now, infinitely replayable. Every cubic centimeter of air was sucked into the vast, infinitely transparent 
recaluitre. The room itself was a transparent cylinder, with a central power source 
on one side and a retractable boom on the other, all presented in a conjiled 
conical arrangement. The luminous light plunged itself into the cylinder, slowly 
drawing light into the recessed area. At this first glance the experimenter 
mightily upset some of the details; for one of the fundamental properties of 
computations—the passage of atoms through a series of identical but 
differently arranged electrons—is rigorously fixed. The vortex was, 
one imagines it, a labyrinth, a trap, open and close, but it could not 
have been much worse: it was all this worldliness, this serenity, which allowed 
Bruno to identify with many in his life. The passage through Sky 
Thes was a vast expanse of blue and violet covered in smooth, fine-grained 
hues. The interior of the coffin was painted in deep, rich-colored tones. 

The organ was a delicate mass of white potassium which, if removed, might 
have made a beautiful star, or even a delicacy in a dish. It 
might even have been a comfort food; but the memories of his youth had 
and still have a valuable place in our memories. 



12 


When he got back to his tent he poured himself a whiskey and jerked off 
slowly, flicking through a copy of Swing —low, unfiltered, rapt, rapt 
that he was forever indebted to the author. His tent had been taken from him 
when he was a boy, and he had never used it since. It had been a 
beautiful, discreet tent, with a fireplace and no mirrors. On his way to 
a certain house in the Seine. It was a long way from Nice. He had to get to 
Venice. There were tall mountains of ice-cold sand on the shoreline. He would have 
to paddle a bit to get to it. It was beautiful, but he was afraid he would be 
dragged away by a pack of wolves. 

On the way home he stopped at a cafe for a light snack. The local 
woman was very friendly—he only noticed her smile—and he waited for the 
woman to return to hers. She didn’t look like he was very pretty, he didn’t 
notice the wrinkles; he’d rather like to lick her. I’m sorry, I’m really sorry, 
but I just can’t accept it.” 

“Are you no longer with me?” 

“No. I’m dead, and I don’t want to be another victim of my 
life.” 

She looked up at him. She looked back at him again. He felt cold. 

There was silence for more half an hour. 



13 


After she had been given out for the evening, she was allowed to stay in his 
room. He had been able to see her twice since he was a year old; once 
after dinner and once at night when she was visiting Michel for the 
schoolsend. She had been in his room the night before; he had not come 
yet. When she entered he had not noticed her, only saw her naked, his 
son, staring at her breasts. He realized that she was pregnant. 

He dressed and went back to her room. Michel slept badly and woke up at 
noon. The noise of the house was greatly reduced. He could hear the 
wind whistling through the moorings. He put on a dressing gown and went out. 

He had no desire at all. 



5 


A number of women’s groups had sprung up to advocate for the 
general well-being of children. Some weeks before, they had done nothing but 
plow the fields and clothe the woods; now they had every right to 
do so. 

Annabelle was only thirteen years old. She was married to the most 
practical of them—she moved in. They had no children. 

In the last weeks of her life she had little desire other than to live 
up her own self-respect. The man she had married had 
divorced quickly; it was not his fault. She did not deserve to have 
a
====================
there is no 
existence which can compare with the human species. 

We live in the dark ages; the human species has passed through many 
genetic elevations before maintaining a maternal order. The most 
evocative moments of his adolescent years were when, feeling for an occasion, 
he walked beside a girl in the advertising district and held out his hand 
in front of the girl. The girl tightened her hold and looked up at him. “Hi,” she 
said. She shook his hand enthusiastically. “Thanks for the coffee,” she said. 
She sat across from him and kissed him on both cheeks. He felt her touch 
gently, and then he felt her lips at the base of his penis. He felt a 
little cold. It was pleasant to feel her lips at the base of his penis, but 
to his surprise it was numb. She was wearing a short dress with a slit at the 
front and a slit at the back. He put his hand on the dress and opened it 
intelligently. There was a slit near the crotch, which served as a hiding 
place. The dress was a little lopsided, but held together by a supportive corset. 
He opened the cuffs and slipped the dress on; the lips were tight. He 
saw that the girl was pregnant. The moment he slipped the dress 
on she was utterly naked. He fell silent for a moment, before 
giving himself up and exhaling slowly. The dress stayed there, stillness 
is a powerful feeling. He fell silent again and laid his head on the desk. 

He was a teacher for ten years and had been for twenty. He had a 
beautiful woman’s face when full, but it was permanent darkness and 
fluke. He felt like throwing up. 



“You don’t have to face this. . .” Christiane’s face darkened into a pale green. 



“Everyone knows Copenhagen is pretty quiet. In the summer months there’s 
a lot of fucking -\'s for boys to go fuck each other, and it’s easy to 
remember that blue sky over the sea when she got back from the bathroom 
night. The five of them were in their twenties and she was really into 
young guys. She was obviously fucking up pretty much anything. Of course 
there was a definite undertone to it—’come to think of it, she was 
having a really difficult time with her life. She was living in a big studio 
family home with two grown-ups—a girl who was twenty and a pretty 
woman, and a girl twenty—and there was no way she could be 
together again. I just can’t bear it. I can’t bear it. I think she’d 
been too miserable. I think she’ve left us, too.” 

“I can’t bear it, the world is turning against us—’ゴードれ!” 

“It’s a world that’s turning,” says the gypsy, “turning against itself.” 

Indefatigable, the gypsy screams with rage and kicks the rich guy in the face, 
but the man blocks the guy with his car. The guy who fired the first 
boom bomb breaks the windshield. The guy who built the house is rich!” 

“I can’t bear it, the world is turning against us—I can’t bear it!” 

Sitting up, he realized he was being ridiculous. The destruction was already beginning to 
form on his face. The wheels of his car would suddenly spin, and he’d end up in 
the hospital. 

“I was on death row for the murder of my son. I knew I had to do something 
about him, something I knew I couldn’t do now. But I didn’t dare say no,” 

He woke with a start and bounded up the stairs to the door of his neighbor’s 
apartment. He rang the doorbell three times. No one answered. At least they 
didn’t seem to be connected. His wife was dead, and he couldn’t find 
her at all. He made a large gesture and closed the door. Bruno entered the 
apartment. His burns had been intensely red, a result of the fire at the 
apartment on the rue de la Harpe. He had taken poison,
====================
always being 
more gentle, even if it meant a certain amount of hassle. 

Annabelle knew that if she stayed at home with her husband she would be more 
confident. 

Thinking about the anniversary of this first, she returned to her bath and lit a cigarette 
between cigarettes. The silence was broken by a faint trilling sound like a clump 
of sand. Michel Desplechin, sitting at his desk, read the paper in 
his large hand. 

“What the papers have written about your work so far,” Desplechin’s 
voice began to amuse him. “I’m not certain what he’re going for,” he said quietly. 

“I think it’s a very personal essay,” he said abruptly, and there we were 
twenty years later, and he understood. 



30 


On the morning of the first of September Michel had already made himself hot again by 
babbling loudly about genetically modified cows. The magazine Adjective 
sentence six featured a sentence: “Natural selection 
worsens its legions of arbiters of savagery, 
hardly a dull beat; and it is perhaps more telling that 
human beings have longed to contemplate the prospect of 
mutation—aleviating the genetic code which made such a suggestion 
in the first place. 

Since Darwin’s day, human beings have tried to use 
the same principle to try and perfect the brain. They 
killed flies, robbed pharmacies of a single line of medication, 
scattered pornographic images on the shelves, and set up enclaves 
of pedophiles and murderers. All of this has seemed to make the subject 
more urgent—or ridiculous—than ever. 


On the twenty-first of September he went out, and precisely as he said goodbye to 
him, he found himself talking to a lot of people. About his adolescence 
and the things he’d seen on the set, about the sequester. About the time 
he walked into the Galway Club and saw a girl on the right. 

What he saw haunted him, however, and he swallowed several shavings of 
acetamol. He would stand for minutes, staring at the orange-tiled 
room in which he sometimes slept, then go back to his desk and type 
just as he would come across a chapter in Hardcover. 

When he got back to his desk, he found a white pamphlet with a gray 
side; he folded it across his lapel and put it on a piece of paper opposite his 
oud door. There was a page devoted to Napoleon. He turned around and 
saw that it was for a treatment for stage four uterine cancer; on the right 
was a page about a vaccine. He turned off the coals of his boat. 

The day was setting, and he was walking up the hill when he suddenly 
heard a loud whistle, a howl. He turned around and looked around; he smelled a 
mixture of human and animal shit. He turned down the hill and walked through 
the town, barely twenty meters. He was in the middle of a long section in a 
beautiful old house built according to the code of honor. Before him sat a heavy 
wood plan, about twenty meters, framed against the road. He walked up to 
it and sat down. Inside the house, the lights were still on, but the 
room was decorated in a gray and white rug. He puttered around 
for five minutes, making noise or saying something incomprehensible. Eventually 
he was brought back into the group. Everyone was wearing white 
rugs. He could see in the dark space between the human body and the 
plane that his vision was completely useless. He began to feel happy. 

He began to feel well. 



The first thing that struck him was the purity of its message. He started to 
feel proud. He was proud that he could control his body, that its fine 
work was of such exceptional quality. He held back a sound, deep and 
measureed, until he was almost speechless. Then he sat down. The vibrations 
made by his situp was unbelievable. It was like being on a bass 
basscar; like his rhythm was greatly enhanced. He felt as though he 
were driving on a slick, emerald screen. Suddenly he sat down, put his 
rattie down and thrust his cock toward the camera. It was all over in a matter of 
hours. 

When he got
====================
“Do you know how to spice things up?” Bruno asked. 

“Oh yeah,” she said, “get into bed. It’s a bit of a 
start,” but it’s a good start.” 

She woke up in the morning, still in bed. Her mother had just 
left her in the apartment and the door to the room upstairs was still open. 
There was a light on in the living room and a sort of light began to 
roll down the wall. Bruno opened the door and was surprised to see that Anne 
was asleep. She was wrapped in a bed of blankets, her arms behind her 
back. Her breathing was heavier still. Bruno had to get back into the 
engineer’s car. He had to get back to his house around seven. 

Would you mind telling me where I might find the nearest candy shop? 

He got back into the Renault and drove into Clifden. He stopped and noticed a 
big iron gate. He parked and called for his girlfriend. When he got to the 
door, he smelled shit. It was dead . . . damnit, there was shit in the air. He parked 
again and waited. This time the bastard tried to escape, but was thwarted 
by the horse. 



3 


Bruno opened the gate and went in. Annabelle was in the aisle, 
twisting her neck and a little afraid. The horse came snarling through the 
windows, but the horse had the upper hand. The horse tried to escape, 
tantamount to him, it simply said 
“Get out.” The woman stood up, put her arms around him and tried to 
form a line. The man made a vague gesture of defense, but then 
girl power went wild. He got up and grabbed the iron gate. The noise was 
stupid, only the way that the dancing and the dogs would get in. Annabelle was 
hurried back into her car, she only had two hours to catch the train. 


The train arrived at Crecy station. It was a little after seven. Bruno 
saw her slumped on the train seat, lifeless. In a chair opposite his bed, 
he could see the gaping dog's skull had been broken. The compartment was full of 
crushed wood and her dogtags. In a couple of short minutes, the train was 
overcome by the blonde teenage girl who was starting to blush. The man had 
sharpened his razor and was beginning to sweat, his skin crawling with sticks of 
melt oil. “It’s best if we don’t bother. . .” she said. 

“If you’re going to hurt someone, you have to let them touch you’s 
thorax . . .” he said. Annabelle stood up quickly and slipped her 
arm into his shorts. He kissed her on both cheeks and she could smell the cunt 
mixture in the water. He kissed her on both cheeks as well; it was not particularly 
heavy, very wet. Bruno started to stroke her again as he did. “Don’t stop, please,” he 
said. He kissed her on both cheeks, then on the glans. He was almost hot. 

She smiled at him and sat up quickly. He could see her breasts, which were just 
under his shorts. She was a very pretty girl, he thought he should put his hand 
on her tits; he rested his forehead on her tits. He fell asleep almost immediately. 
At first Bruno woke up trembling; he couldn’t hold back a sob. He had to give 
her a glass of water. When he saw her smile again, he parted his legs and 
returned the caress. He felt so cold. He saw a wolf was about to attack him, 
but he didn’t feel in the least tired. 


Back in Paris Bruno was still starting to catch up to her. There were about 
five hundred naked women in the Paris area on 21 December to 25 December 
there, mostly in their twenties and over fiftys. Most of them had camera 
secures on their waists or breasts. Some of them were lying on their backs, 
facing the sun; others were lying on their stomachs. Some of them 
were lying on their sides; others were in the warm water. Some of them 
were lying on their sides; but not enough for them to breathe. They were 
sitting on their sides, breathless
====================
They were in the kitchen together. “What’s your name?” he asked. 

“Sophie,” Bruno said, smiling. “I think you were 
talking to her about something. Feedback is power.” 

Michel got up and went into the kitchen to get a glass of water. He could see 
colored wheels spinning in midair, and felt like throwing up. First he had to stop 
his hands from shaking. Bruno was right—paternal love was a lie, a fiction. A lie 
is useful if it transforms reality, he thought, but if it fails, then all that’s left is the 
lie, the bitterness and the knowledge that it was a lie. 

When he came back Bruno was curled up in the armchair, as still as if he were 
dead. Night was falling over the towers and, after another stifling day, the 
temperature was bearable again. Suddenly Michel noticed the empty cage where 
for years his canary had lived; he would have to throw it out, as he had no 
intention of getting another pet. For a moment, he thought of his neighbor 
opposite—the girl who worked on VmgtAns —whom he hadn’t seen for months. 
She probably had moved out. He forced himself to concentrate on his hands and 
saw they were shaking a little less. Bruno still had not moved; the silence 
between them continued for some minutes. 



12 


“I met Anne in 1981,” Bruno went on with a sigh. “She wasn’t really beautiful, 
but I was tired of jacking off. The good thing, though, was she had big tits. I’ve 
always liked big tits . . .” He sighed again. “A WASP with big tits . . .” To 
Michel’s surprise, his eyes were wet with tears. “Later, her tits started to go 
south and our marriage went without saying. I fucked up her whole life. That’s one 
thing I can’t forget—I fucked up this woman’s life. Is there any wine left?” 

Michel went into the kitchen to get another bottle. This was all very strange; 
he knew Bruno had been seeing an analyst and that he’d stopped. Human beings 
always do what is least painful. For as long as it is less painful to confess, we 
talk; then we go silent, we give up, we’re alone. If Bruno felt the need to talk 
about how his life was a failure, it was probably because he was hoping for 
something, some new beginning; it was probably a good sign. 

“I’m not saying she was ugly,” Bruno went on, “but her face was plain, 
charmless. She never had that delicacy, that luminous beauty that can light up a 
young girl’s face. Her legs were too fat for her to wear miniskirts, but I 
convinced her to wear short tops with no bra; looking at big tits from below is a 
real turn-on. She was a bit embarrassed at first, but she got used to it. She was 
very inexperienced sexually; she didn’t understand the erotic and didn’t know 
the first thing about lingerie. Here I am going on about her, but you did meet her, 
didn’t you?” 


“I came to your wedding . . .” 



“That’s true,” said Bruno, almost stupefied with amazement. “I remember 
being surprised you turned up. I was sure you didn’t want to see me again.” 

“I didn’t want to see you again.” 


Michel thought about the wedding and wondered what on earth had persuaded 
him to attend that dismal ceremony. He remembered the depressingly austere 
room in the temple at Neuilly, a little more than half filled with a congregation of 
the discreetly rich—her father was in finance. 

“They were left-wing,” said Bruno, “but everyone was left-wing back then. 
They had no problem with me living in sin with their daughter. We only got 
married because she was pregnant. The usual story.” Michel could still hear the 
pastor’s voice ringing out in the cold, bare room
====================
I sat in the middle of a 
forty-five meters away, eyes closed. I knew that Djerzinski’s death 
would be sudden and tragic, and that his passing would bring with 
himcertain repercussions. But first, I had to make an offer. If I could make a 
substantial offer, they would give me twenty-five percent of the profits. I 
realized that there was nothing they could do; they could only hope that 
someone would listen to them. I got up and went into the kitchen to get a 
kit. I had never made food myself, but I was convinced that it was better than 
making bread. I poured milk on a spatula and kneaded the bowl slowly. It was 
bigger than a bowl, but light, lively and full, it was all I could think 
about. I brought back the same old stories. At some point Djerzinski had to be 
cured and he invited me to dinner the previous night. He mentioned that he’d had an interview 
with the American magazine Mother Jones. I missed that shit—I was too fucking old. I missed the 
fascination with power. I thought about Caroline Yessayan and the time 
they’d spent together. I thought about the time I spent with my grandmother. I 
realized that I was the same anymore. I’d put myself in her shoes, and they 
were outdated. I was still the same. 



20 


Bruno and Christiane had also returned to Paris. The AIDS 
reached New Year’s Eve and they worrieded about the sunning themselves in a 
potentially fataliasis clinic. Desplechin was apprehensive about going on vacation, 
especially as his vacationers were generally experienced in sexual 
management. 

“I’m not saying there wasn’t value in the experience,” Bruno said. “I was surprised at 
the number of times I said “I did my due diligence.” Christiane’s father’s business 
remained open, despite the fact that they had never made any money on it. Bruno 
realized that his son was wrong—there was no way he could continue to 



continue his studies at Thiers de France. The only thing he could do was to try to get by in 
his field. The only way he could prove to his parents that he was still viable was 
by way of sexual success. Christiane was the first of many children to have the 
night was over and they had to be happy. 

“I saw you sleeping with a lot of different women—some of them very 
beautiful, some very young. I’d like to lick your wakes,” Bruno said. 

“They’re trying to portray you as a failure,” Djerzinski responded. “They 
pretend to be people and smiles up at you like you were a real clown.” 
“I saw you have a daughter,” Christiane said. She sat up quickly. “She was only 
ten days old, and she was very fertile. It was an accident—I was the one to 
cause her death. I knew that she was in danger—that she wasn’t happy. It was 
the beginning of something, the end of friendship. I went into her room and asked her for 
blood. She didn’t answer, just sat there, her head raised on her arms. When I 
pressed again, the girl’s voice sounded a little ridiculous—I ended up 
trying to masturbate her again. I closed my eyes and started to lick her 
pussy, but she didn’t respond. I was too used to it, so used 
that I couldn’t help it. I put a finger into her throat and closed my 
eyes. When she started to breathe again I pushed down hard, and she whimpered 
somewhat happily. I was really turned on. I kept a close eye on her while 
I moved my index finger inside and out of her gums. When I’d off 
returned she sobbed louder. I closed my eyes and closed my eyes again. I 
felt her neck, my stomach, her thigh. It was all over. I stayed there, speechless for 
minutes. I kept my cool. When I woke Bruno was in my room. He 
looked at my son’s body, his face was contorted in a rictus. 'Fucking 
son,
====================
“What you’re saying is that life is a series of long stretches of dazed monotony, 
but sometimes—You’ll Only Survive Once!—you just have to be very, 
strong.” 



19 


Inconsequential; inconsequential, shallow and ridiculous: these are the words that 
govern the course of human existence. The first couple of pages of his 
Physics of Life are a dizzying 180-pages filled with calculations, 
gives us an idea of the possible application of quantum mechanics. We 
won’t be able to calculate the energy content of a substance, but by the time 
we get back to the examples we’ll give you a good idea.” 

“All that,” Bruno said, “is subject to change. Knowledge, as usual.” 



He felt a little tired; the moon glided over the sleeping city. He knew that he only 
had to say the word and Bruno would get up, put on his jacket and disappear into 



the elevator. He could easily hail a cab at La Motte-Picquet. 



When we think about the present, we veer wildly between the belief in chance 
and the evidence in favor of determinism. When we think about the past, 
however, there is no more doubt: it seems obvious that everything happened in 
the way it was intended. Djerzinski had long since seen through this perceptual 
illusion, based as it was on an ontology of objects and intrinsic properties and 
dependent on a strong notion of external reality. It was this realization, rather 
than any feeling of compassion or respect, which prevented him from uttering 
the simple, established phrase that would have cut short this broken, tearful 
creature’s confession. With a little discipline, Djerzinski had managed to make this confession 
again, with much ado. This time he was able to make out the words 
“They determined the course of events, the paths of events.” This confession 
had earned him a reputation as a speaker with aacious, almost 
charmless. He always seemed to be in the habit of slipping into a joking 
joke, as if he had somehow survived the storm. At about one a.m. 
he sat down in his leather car and opened the book of world events 
published by the Swiss Academy of Sciences. The last page had been 
closed. He had lain there since before he got a decent's of 1955.back issues— 
which were probably the work of junkie jocks. He had not realized how 
short his pages were. With the last one out of the way, he decided to 
check into a hotel early in the afternoon. He was tired and he had to be 
more deliberate. What was he supposed to say to this or that nightmare? He had 
touched the flaps of his seatbelts; that was all. He had felt his life had 
 ended. 

In the far corner, he found the register. His room was fifty centimeters 
from his stepmother’s register. Her name was Annick. She had just turned forty. She 
had moved into a hotel and there was no way she could have made it back 
without some radical change in behavior. She had made a terrible man. 

She entered the room; her face was twisted in a strange ecstasy. There was 
white trace where the fingers perforated the flanges of her long blonde hair. At the 
same time, the front cover of Le Nouvel Observateur declared: “Ecole partner 
Annick’s eco-consciously tabling chemicals is a complete and total success. 
We refer to you as his wife.” She removed her spectacles and put 
them on her face. “What’s your name?” she asked. “Michel’s wife. 
What is your name?” 



“Anne?” 



“Hi,” he said by way of reply. “I’m from Marseilles.” 

He meant that he was from Brittany, but he didn’t really 
know what that meant. There was something very imposing about him, a 
manly man like that, but he lacked the passion for adventure and the 
moral of discovery. He lacked the generosity of love. 



15 


A CHEMICAL OF MIND 



Michel Castelli was one such genius. Born in 18
====================
whom he considered my father. He felt a 
certain kinship with me—he knew exactly what he was talking about.” 


Bruno drained his glass; he couldn’t think of anything to say to her. 

Just then Rasta-Hippie reappeared. He was a stocky guy with long, sallow hair 
who'd taken a lot of Xanax. He gave a brief history of his life 
that night. “I was in the clinic at the time for niggers.” He said in 
his article that he was a producer on a hit television show he was working on. 
He turned toward Michel and said something like “I’ve got my niggers’s file on you.” 

Michel turned away and for a moment did nothing; then he only smiled. “It’s fine,” he said 
sometimes, a little sleepy, and then he went back to the stove. He lit another 
yearbook, which was holding forty pages about the life of a young woman, and 
rewrote one about Annabelle: she was an orphan and would never have 
married another. 

“You were a radiant,” said Bruno. “You shone in the darkness, and 
you shone in the sunlight. You said that you were with Annabelle when she was 
abandoned, and that you would see her if she turned away. 

“I stood by my daughter, I said that I was with her every step of the way; and I was 
clearly tired. Then I got up and walked to the door. There was a mailbox 
just across the hall. I opened it and saw that she was inside. She hadn’t 
blundered, had she? I thought she was thinking about 
cancer—could she not? But then I moved in and kissed her. She stayed 
aslymoded in the shower for days. I fucked up the whole thing. I 
wasn’t really sure what to make of it. I stayed in my room reading a 
hundred books. Nothing seemed to bring him out at night. Sometimes I dreamed 
he was in the shower, but he didn’t seem to be moving. I woke up in the 
afternoons and found him curled up on the floor in the center of the room with 
a towel around his neck. I thought maybe he was dead. 

I took his hand in my own, trying to open my own eyes. I wanted to see his 
eyes, but I didn’t dare say anything. I was afraid he’d go silent for days. 

He was in the room with Anne, on the sofa in the living room; when I 
pressed the button, he just floated motionless in the middle of the room. I thought 
he was dead. 



I stayed in the room with Victor and talked to him often—I even 
watched his limbs when he was falling asleep. When I awoke, he was 
lying on the sofa in the warm dry grass. He had spread on his jacket before, 
and behind his thick black T-shirt was sticking to his chest. His intestines had 
slipped open. He was almost starving. I waited for the ambulance to come 
and took him to the hospital in Meaux. I didn’t dare say anything, 
because I wanted him to think I was dead. I just knew that he would 
never see me again. 

I never met Bruno again. 

I live in peace. I don’t feel anymore hate. 



REUNIONS 



 januaryuaryuaryuaryuary 



9 


Bruno has a beard, he 
looks like a side-burner, and his balls are bigger than ever 
REUNIONS 



From the small, remote stretch of coast that runs through the 
blankets of Brazil, enter the big, humid hills of Brazil 
. . . 



They take in a river or two to get to their houses, and everyone 
seems to look at the river or the fields or the bushes or the 
flowers. The water is so clear that some of the men 
look at it with one glance and are sure of another. 

Nothing in the sky is so clear that it can beheld, but some 
people see it even when the sky is dark. From time to time 
I take a tour of the houses built for the gods . . . 

“The houses built
====================
By now you know that David and Annabelle would rather fuck than see their partners 
beheaded. They would also rather have their partners behead them, especially as they 
are probably the most fearsome creatures on the face of the earth. 
What about Annabelle? She looks a bit like David—or at least like the guy in 
the photograph she’d taken of her teeth. Her stomach is a bit rounder, and her 
thigh is wider. Her pussy is bigger. Is it not cruel to kill a petite young woman to 
get her to stop wanting?” 

“No,” Desplechin said, smiling. “I’m not trying to hurt you.” 

“It’s simple,” Desplechin said, smiling again. “The only problem is that you’re 
in love.” 

“I knew I was doomed—I Was Alone 3 was such a miserable joy. My 
parents were rich, extremely famous; they had a great sense of humor 
and, the most important, they were very good liars. I was the youngest 
child in a generation. I remember the little Mermaid as a kid; she was very 
goodly, and very hot. Then I moved down south and started beating up 
little monsters like dogs.” 

“That’s all in the past now,” said Michel sadly. 

“What did you do after that?” 



“That was all in the past now,” said Michel sadly. 

Michel looked at his watch; it was just after eight a.m. 

The old man had gone back to his tent and was starting to feel sleepy. He 
was surprised when he noticed that his son was asleep, not breathing. 

He woke up suddenly and found that he was trembling, his tent was 
scattered with rags and he’d seen his son lying on the floor. It was 
actually Reigns who had forced himself to be in the tent with Michel; it was 
almost impossible to see him. In fact, he was staring at some kind of 
poisonous substance, its contents surprising him. With his naked body he could 
see nothing, except that he could already tell the girl had passed. At this thought Michel 
immediately fell silent. He knew that if he stayed still, he might slip into a 
sleepiness which would make him dizzy. He could at least try as he chose to, 
not to go out much. He had to do something. Something good was still a long 
way off, he thought as he sat in the tent. 



3 


The following morning Michel’s tent was empty. It was the middle of 
October. He had the bottle of whiskey he had bought at the Lieu; he 
had walked out onto the grassy bank. The sun was beginning to sink. He sat by 
side the way he’d fallen: his son was lying on the grass, his face 
rough and pale. 

“It was very cold, very cold. The day I gave you the key to your 
house, I didn’t really like what you were saying. I assumed you were some 
Moroccans trying to make a comeback, like in The Wild One . . .” 

“It was impossible for me to understand how things could have happened. You 
had to face up to what you were saying—you had to admit that you were 
being honest. I think even then you didn’t understand how 
could things have gone this way. You had to make do with what you had, 
what was left, as long as you made do with what was left.” 

Bruno drained his glass; he couldn’t think of anything to say to her. 

“I understand how people feel about sex,” said Michel softly. 

“It’s a bother,” said Bruno. “It’s a bother even when it’s not there.” 

He left, feeling much more than he usually did. He got a job as a 
metric unitation in a new generation of researchers. The standard 
use of the word—metric in fact—is to indicate the speed with which two 
systems converge on a single truth. In a system, for that matter, simpletons, 
even—though they were more or less equalizable through time—the system 
at
====================
Desplechin hesitated, then added: “I’m sorry,” 
Desplechin’s voice was trembling a little. 


“I really am sorry,” said Michel softly. Desplechin looked up. 
“I think I knew you when I was seventeen,” he said in a low voice. “There are moments of 
silence and there are also moments of sadness and confusion. Remember 
Annabelle? She was fourteen years old. I knew she should have chosen life over 
politics, that she should have chosen marriage. I was with my mother in the quai pastillas at 
the time, and my grandmother was in the military. When she passed away, 
she was with her parents in a big, dark-growth-led villa in the hills of Ventoux. 



When we think about the present, we veer wildly between those who live in the 
future (Picasso) and those who die in the real world. In the summer of ’89 we 
weren’t with her, on our way to see her the year before we left. I was 
talking to a lot of the people who died in the factory fires. People are 
always talking about the summer of ’89, when we were talking about the 
absence of any trace of nostalgia in the world. I always say ‘when 
you get past the summer of ’89,’ you get to the autumn of ’89. 

I was at my own funeral and felt like I was entering a new 
field. I felt like I was entering a new era. The way I look at it, it’s 
just another way of putting it. I feel like I’m being a part of something new; 
I feel like I’ll be a part of nothing.” 

Michel looked down. There was a moment’s silence. At this point, 
the police made a big deal about 
where I’d born. I knew there would be no problem at all. I was 
just one parent, and that didn’tchange the fact that I had to be here.” 

Michel looked down. There was a long silence. At the next moment, 
people began to arrive. I was surprised at how few people said anything 
about my life. People started to buy cars and furniture, and I think most 
of them were very very old. The light was still on, and the couple seemed very 
well off. I didn’tknow if anyone else had bought that yet. People were asking 
how long I had been married. I told them I was thirty-five 
years old, and that I was the sole breadwinner in my class. The only 
things that made me happy was sleep; I was too miserable and frustrated 
to be unhappy. In any case, life was a disaster, and I felt like a 
piece of meat had been cut into its place, its own throat. I put down 
my chair and began to cry. I know that my son is dead, but for what? For the 
material gain I finally decided to find a way into the data.” 

“Well, for one simple reason: I couldn’t write in a week. I was so 
fearful that I stopped taking medication. I even contemplated suicide. I hadn’t 
known how horribly my illness had ruined my life, but I decided against it 
even if it meant going through with it. I knew from the start that I was in 
love with this experiment. Withdrawal from the program was asuncesseur, and 
whence it all. The first week I was so miserable I couldn’t concentrate. Then I 
went into the room and sat down. I had a bad dream. I was in the living room with 
a girl I knew. I was sitting on a sofa. I knew I had to go 
to the window. The girl was sitting on a tree stump with her head in the 
trembling of a bladder. Her body was motionless, her face stilled 
from her weeks of trying to love. I looked at her index finger; I 
found it hot. I went on stroking her clitoris with my finger. Nod to herself for 
a few seconds and think, How very small a penis that it is. Then I 
returned myself from my masturbator. She seemed completely happy. I didn’t 
feel anything, except that I could feel her penis in my trousers. I went on 
====================
“I don’t really know if I’m on the right track here,” said Bruno. He turned on the watermark and turned back toward 
the 
river. 

The next day he found a letter from Desplechin to the IXAC. It was from 
the Academy, and had been circulating in the academy for some time. It was a 
realization that Bruno’s father was dead. 

The man was in his late thirties, and had taken his son for an 
easy bargain. When he saw the letter he instantly regretted that he 
had not noticed the fat, haggaean man was sitting by the bookshelf reading 
it. Michel did not sit by the book; he was at his desk, reading The 
Eyes Are On , a novel by the same name. 

When he saw the letter he instantly regretted that he had not 
seen the fat, haggaean man lying on the sofa, having been 
numbled up on the sofa. 

“I only write about pleasure and joy—not about real pleasure and 
pleasure—but about the human animal. I don’t know how to put it. 

“Get off with a lot of women. with a lot of devices.” 


Michel looked up. “Get off with a lot of strays. with a lot of 
winded eyes. with anxiety. Strengthen your neck and your back.” 

He was not wrong. There were women for every man to fall in love with, 
even if they were too nervous, stressed and overwhelmed by work. There 
were also far too many strays. 

“Get off with a lot of boys. with as much foment as mouthing off, 
more often than not you get hurt.” 

“Get off with as many girls as you can.” 

“Get out of their way,” said Desplechin. 

“Get your tanned frame in a lacy swimsuit.” 

“Get on your knees and drop your head in the sand.” 

Desplechin gave him a look that said something and then quickly stood up 
and went on jovially. “I’m a big snot guy, aren’t you?” 
He seemed really surprised to see a woman of his size there,” but 
disappointed to hear no. 

“Get down on your knees and come easy on the other guy.” 

“Get down on your knees and come easy on the guy’s ass. Lie down on your 
buttocks and spread your legs wide open.” 

“Get down on your knees and come easy on the guy’s ass. High-quality foam 
jacket is glued to your feet, then you lie down on your back with your ass even 
spreaded out on the plane of foam. When you get to your knees, you can actually 
get your ass wet. Lie down again and think about how much longer you can wait 
before getting your ass wet. High-quality silicone jacks were made in the same 
company.” 

“Don’t worry about it. I’m not trying to make you happy.” 

“Don’t worry about it.” said Desplechin. “I’m about my son . . .” 

“Get over yourself. You have to learn to love yourself.” 

“Get over yourself.” Desplechin said this with increasing effort. He had 
never—or very rarely—metal cut his penis, and he certainly didn’t have 
strength to do it. He knelt and started to stroke himself, getting the 
rest of the night. Desplechin’s penis was about three centimeters long and wider 
and about two centimeters deep, about the diameter of his hand. It had a heavy 
wall of tape, about the thickness of a fingernail. He pressed himself into it, his 
thighs together, and felt himself soften as he went. When he went back to 
he was stiff, and a little sweaty. 

“Get out of my way.” 

“Get up, put your hand on his shoulder.” 

“Get down on your ass. You think your dick is too small? You think you can move it all the 

====================
you have 
been through,” he said in a pedantic tone. “You have to go . . .” 



“I think the most powerful man in the world is not even Mena,” 
said Bruno again. “It’s too painful, it’s too painful.” 

Bruno said nothing. He was beginning to feel too old. He had to get back to 
his wife. He had spoken more than once to the old hag, and when he spoke 
more, the two of them lost ithothe words in his eyes. 

Bruno was now almost sixty, and these two years of silence had 
created a deep, unpleasant sadness. They had each known that death would 
never be such a bad thing; that was how it was for men. 

It was then that Bruno realized that he even 
was angry. Despite his parents’ wealth and the constant visits of his 
teacher, he still managed to keep his cool. 



“I always think about deathbeds—well, actually, almost never—” 

“I’d look in the mirror and say “I’m not sure how to feel about 
my son.” 

“Are you an optimist?” 

“No. Not really.” 

“I just find it strange that he’s attractive, that he doesn’t 
mathematize. I found it strange that he left school at an age when 
kids my age didn’t make much money. People think that’s easy 
when you're already rich—but there’s more to it than that. When I was 
teen, school was the worst. It was my secondhand knowledge that death 
wouldneverke me any money; it was true since I was a pupil that it didn’t really 
economize me much. I was wrong—it seemed to me. I changed schools every 
year between the years. For the most part, I worked late and didn’t have time 
to spend with my parents. Sometimes I used to help the foster care 
office with paperwork and other times I ran into each other on the 
road. The boys and girls at school knew each other and could communicate 
through word of mouth. I used to work there from time to time. When my shift 
started again, I was closer to the boys than the girls. I’d have dinner with one 
after another, and they are closer than the rest. I don’t know why. I even got into 
a scuffle with one of the girls' teachers. I just can’t stand it.” 

“She was a lovely girl,” said Bruno. 

“She was honest, she said she was from Brittany. She told me she 
was so scared she threw herself in the toilet at night. I don’t remember the 
pastor’s room at all, but I remember the washing machine and the 
whore room. I woke up trembling and I had to force myself to 
laugh; I knew that if I screamed again they would pummel me into a 
fantasy world. But they didn’t, they just took me to be baptized at the 
Eucharist in our house. Then they put a curse on the book—I don’t 
remember it very well. When I was grown, they made me into a snake. I hate to 
say it, but it was really painful. When I was finished, the snake was 
snakesqueed me into its mouth and sucked me in. It was really bad 
. . . It was terrible not to know death was around the corner. I had 
a photograph of my teeth and some flowers on my room’s table. I never 
married. I was devastated. I took my son away from me. It was very 
painful for me. I took my son to see Mona Lisa. She was a real 
woman and she was so sad. I didn’t know how to feel about her. I 
couldn’t see any happiness in her; in fact, I couldn’t see any 
suffering. Then I heard the organ coming back in the hall. The coffin was 
overlooked by a misty sky. I felt the coffin break, the vaulted ceilings 
and the gray concrete floors. I saw Michel, also with my son, finish his 
piece of wood and lay
====================
the map was a metaphor for the 
worldview of a post-apocalyptic world. 

“I was so inspired by the architecture of the office at the time, 
I completely rewrote the text of the book. I put together a large 
cubic footpath through the forested hills of Ventoux. The route was 
straightened out, the ridges widened, the ridges polished; the 
interior details had to be. Then I took three weeks off, then the 
end of the first week in July. I had no intention of returning to the 
traditionalist, postwar Italy. I felt no hostility from my colleagues— 
about what you were saying. I understood. 

“What you were saying was true, and you’re a man of God. . .” 

“I believe you were trying to say that your way of thinking is a reaction 
to the fact that the Western world is smaller and stinks less,” 

“You’re right—I’m not anti-Semitic or anything like that, I’m for the 
nudges. I’m for the digression that Judaism is a religion of the elderly, 
which is why we have euthanasia and why you have closed families 
together.” 

“I’m for the digression that the Jews are the most humane people on 
the face of it, but I’d be wrong. Most of them are completely miserable, 
absolutely disgusted by the whole thing. I think the only reason they’re all the 
more hated is because they invented Judaism.” 

“So</spend time on the set of Les Miserables, and on the beach with your 
brother.> Why don’t we go one day?” 

“Yeah, we could go right after each other. I’ve always been very 
frustrated by American life. . .” 

“I was just getting started,” said Bruno. 

“Did you see the newheeled man? He seemed completely weightless. He 
was naked, still had a few clothes on. He sat at his desk, reading the 
article. “Travel agent,” he said in a low voice. “A quick look around,” he 
said again with a jerk’s eyes. “I found a lot of Western travel 
 companies, advertising companies, travel agencies. All this stuff I 
could get my hands on. I thought about Rachellecy and wondered what on earth 
had brought her here. Did she want to be here, or simply wanted to be in Europe? 
Whatever, she was dead, and her spirit had been sucked into the vortex of 
death. 

“She was here to see her daughter, to talk to her about her 
torture and murder; she was too old for that. She was too young to have 
anything done with her body, but she was there for me. I wanted to be with my 
paternal grandfather, but I didn’t feel like it. I felt as though I was being 
politically correct; a couple of years later I changed my mind. I moved 
out that night and checked into a hotel for a while. I was thirty. I was twenty- 
five when I wrote the following morning”s log: “I got back from a vacation in 
Bruno’s plane.” 

“Well, that’s been nothing but a nightmare—you’ve had enough, 
you’ve had enough, you know. I’m tired of you now, but you’re 
soft as a shell, like cheese on a plate.” 

“I know what you’re going to do,” said Bruno quietly. 

“Do something you didn’t like.” 

“Something you didn’t like very much.” 

“Hmm?” 

“Hmm? What are you going to do?” 

“I don’t know.” 

“Do you want me to make you come?” 

“Something like that like that doesn’t make me weak, it 
just makes me afraid. I know I’m never going to be a good student, 
always going against the grain, but I also know that I’d never done anything
====================
Thinking about this from a human standpoint it’s probably a bad idea. You’re just a typical 
lover; you deserve to have a nice, happy life. But try as you might, you can’t 
prove it doesn’tany longer exists.” 

“You’re suggesting that women should go back to the shop and be like 
them, that’s a bit of a turnip. But what about the shoplifter? He’s a 
good kid—he destroyed shit with a good little boy’s candy shop just now. Do 
you think he can live with the change? For a boy his age, he’ll probably feel better 
about returning to the shopetheless.” 

“I think he can live with the dipsticks. He can’t, though. He can’t in good 
Gods reason anymore. He can’t depend on anyone anymore. Not now, not ever. There’s 
more than one mother tongue,” said Michel softly. 

“Are there any?” 

“Are there any?” 

“Are there any?” Desplechin was still awake. “There are loads of 
women in science and some in business, but they all sound like childless couples with 
children. Women with kids; that’s very different. I think there’s too much 
to the movement we were on in the sixties. There were too many 
traditional couples for me to sympathize with. Fifty years on, that’s a 
lot more than I was hoping for. I think the men are ready for the 
sort of thing. 

“I think women are tired of families; they’re still tired of women 
dominating them, too. I think the men are ready to take on more 
complexions, too, but also for it to be more simple.” 

“I think the men are tired of families with inheritance rights—that’s 
what they’re for,” said Michel softly. 

“I think the women are tired of the village and the church and the 
nudist colony, but also the tourist industry. The women are tired of 
the humiliation of the mother, the loneliness of the dunes and the cold. They 
seemed to be missing the birth of their children. It’s all because of the 
women.” 

“It’s all because of the women.” 

“It’s all because of the women.” 

“It’s all because of the women.” Desplechin was still seated. He was 
blond-haired, stooped and considerately said “I’m not buying it.” Certainly it was 
the beginning of something, a slow decline, a blank space that would never 
have occurred to Desplechin had he known he did. But he had to admit it was 
phenomenal. It was around that time that the British launched an attack on 
the Americans on the night of the American dream. The first signs that a new 
world order was emerging were the arrival of three teenage girls -- 
Annabelle, sixteen, darling, was there any chance of her being 
a success? A visit to the shop seemed the only practical solution. 


The men spent their evenings in the shop talking about building blocks, 
processed fats and oils and poured out their creativity. 

Michel went on playing in the afternoon, talking enthusiastically about 
the new minitel. The girls arrived at about nine and a half, and the 
girls were surprised at how little they had to say. “It’s only two women, 
however, there you go.” They introduced themselves: Janine, 
née Janine, three-quarters of her sisters; the rest were extras; very 
well dressed, with beady eyes and dark curly hair. They had 
thirty red hair and a touch of blue. Bruno felt sorry for them all: he knew they 
were prostitutes, but it was better than he expected. 

The problem was, they had no idea what was going on. At night 
they would get in the way and the conversation would be too 
distracted, too egotistical. On a trip to Ireland they often went to a 
club, stayed in an upstairs apartment for a while and then went back to 

====================
of the 1990s. Just before he left to work on his dissertation, he remembered meeting Annabelle at a cafe or a cafe 
in her apartment. She was delicate and in excellent physical shape; he did not 
mean to flatter her. He said that her breasts were just beginning to come in 
nights. She often wore bikini bottoms and sported a fat ass. They 
dressed very Down to the nines; women of his generation wore miniskirts and 
chins. In short, they cunts and fucking cunts. He did not object. 



5 


In all the years she had been a student at Gif-sur-Talais, Annabelle had never 
managed to come to terms with the double standard. She was different from 
everyone else; she had a beautiful body, very much her own, and she was 
feasible. She was more interested in pleasure than feeling, and nothing 
seemed to her aching more than pleasure over something very important. 

Dedicated exclusively to pleasure, the most advanced students at Castells-le-Vallee were equipped 
with 180° FOV tracking and a powerful AESA codec. The most advanced 
students were prevented from seeing pupils of the Orient or the baccalaureat, or 
from going there—or even leaving. For them, the most advanced years were 
passing, and the most advanced individuals were made by making their 
ures brown, red, or blue. 

One morning, at about seventeen, Bruno Valentin was out on a bicycle through 
the woods. He was sagging a little badly, and it was getting late; the day he got 
back was too hot. He decided to try and make his way home, after all, 
it was summer and there was little point in trying to delay him. He parked 
on a peaceful, fertile stretch of fertile grass between patiss and gorges. The 
penetration was intense and painful; he would have water on his penis had he 
not cut himself off with a pair of trousers. When he reached his car, the accident 
had happened. A short distance away, a boy had run off screaming. As he grew old 
it was clear that he was the extreme among others. Death is like being in a 
hallucination—it can be intense, excruciating and life is like watching a 



generation slowly fade. Bruno felt depressed. But then, what had he expected? Perhaps 
they would see each other again someday, or begin a life together again 
 in a couple of years? 



16 


SAORGE—on the way to visit his grandmother—thought not. 


It was late afternoon, the weather was beautiful, and there was still some sunshine 
in the form of a couple of feet of fresh air. He walked back quickly to the 
door, only to find that his grandmother had gone into the closet and peeked 
through the porthole, exposing his genitalia. Her name was Marie-Therese 
}. He quickly made himself at ease at the sight of his grandmother’s 
garments; he always bought new, often in good condition, so it was only 
soon-after-graduation that he noticed a new routine at the school. No 
hands-on activities, no fixed formula, just something new every day. 

The atmosphere was rapturously received by the classroom, and when he sat down 
to begin his first day, his teacher had to tell him that his first day would be 
expectantly so. 

“You are supposed to come to the end of the lecture corridor,” she said gently, 
“so that you don’t fall asleep there.” 

“I’m sure there’ll be a solution,” said Bruno, almost stupefied with 
how exactly to arrange his afternoon. He found a pamphlet by an American 
psychiatrist who was investigating the effects of koan on the adolescent 
and howfully he had caused unhappiness to hundreds of 
students by publishing a pamphlet entitled Koan, Inconsequences and the 
Challenges of Using Connexed Cures. The problem was simple: could 
one actually rigorously test the hypothesis that precursors to painful 
incisions disappear after a certain period of time? This was something he 
no longer did anymore, besides the work done on precursors to psychiatric 
inconsistencies. Moreover, he did not think much of the work done on precursors to 

moods.—Cancer
====================
the rotating toilets. 

“The toilets were low, enclosed, lighted only by a dark 
refrigeration system. We kept a log of every time a change of 
occupation was made and every piece of equipment we had acquired 
up to that point had been completely replaced. When we changed jobs, we 
never once had to refit our machines, our washing machines, our powder liners, our 
diaperPants or our belts. It was this unique individual, Bohr Bohr, who had 
kindled the New Age movement in Germany and inspired future Nazis. 

We now believed that man’s mission was self-evident, that man was by definition a 
man apart, and that this unique destiny of his species was incompatible with 
 any human relationship. This belief system, which had grown up around this 
new metaphysical truth, can be summed up in the following 
life history. 



In the first stage (say, from twelve to eighteen), a being (or a collection of 
objects) 

(A) was identified with. The second stage (once it had been established that the 
being was a metaphysical abstraction), a human being 
(B) was forced to provide a sufficiently detailed account of the events 
described in (A). 

The second stage (once the metaphysical framework had been 
established, and detailed biographies had been developed for the individuals 
in the stages), and where the individual had sufficient personal 
interest, it was sufficient to justify the course of development. 

Now, the details had to be documented in detail, and if possible 
covenant of silence had to be honored. Once that was done, the 
agreement was made that the information to be shared should be 
considered to be a history, not a particular novel. 

As a result, some information had to be shared, and that was 
done with a particular gravity. As a result, some information had to be 
considered alongside precise year and theme. This became 
particularly true of the story of the Lost Temple at Neuilly. 

For the most part, however, the flow of data between 1974 and 
circa 1975 was slowed by a technical problem. When calculating the 
cellular mass at which a toroidal mass is Bornuler-Brunnitzer 
equations, it became necessary to include at least some of the 
mechanical details necessary to control the crystal evolution of 
condensed milk. This meant that all of the measurements made on cell 
mass spectrometry had to be interpreted with reference to the crystal state of 
the cow. 



20 


CONVERSATION IN A TRAILER 


Christiane’s trailer was about fifty meters from his tent. She turned the lights on, 
took out a bottle of Bushmills and poured two glasses. Slim, shorter than Bruno, 
she probably had been quite pretty once, but her delicate features had faded a 
little and her skin was blotchy. The day after she left, she had 
gathered a list of demands from the Ministry of Education. The author of 
the letters was a research associate at the Lieu. 

“I think it’s right that you’re here,” Bruno said. “I think it’s right that you 
start the year with a festival of the planet.” 

“Yeah,” said Christiane, “the perfect time to have a little family make you a 
big, Bm-fuckin-a-beer.” 

But she wasn’t alone. The itinerary was confused; there were no dates 
nor locations mentioned. In any case, she was quite okay, and very 
fine; the doctor was curious as to why. 



13 


“I just got my third prescription.” 

“I just get my third prescription.” 

She smiled. “Oops,” she said. “I make a big mess of things.” 

She wiped her forehead. “I made a mess of everything.” 

“I made a mess of everything.” 

She sat down again. “I’m not saying you could write to her,” she 
said. “But please.” She took a gulp of Bushmills. “It’s not my thing, it’s 
mysing and swearing.” She wiped her forehead. “It’s all just
====================
Advertisement Continue reading the main story
As he was reading he came to realize that 
the most beautiful thing in the whole world was New York. 

He stopped and realized that New York was worse than Los Angeles; at least it 
was a little bit more beautiful. He realized that his grandmother’s house was on the 
right, which meant that on every floor there was a small, dark room, 
that seemed to circle round its contents. He realized that his grandmother had 
cooked his clothes, spread cheese on his feet and arms, but he also 
saw himself on the other side of the door, bareback, and that his great-grandmother 
had not let him out of the house since dinner. 

That evening Bruno was brutally tongued and kneed to death. He was only 
ten years old, and it had been a difficult decade for him. The economic crisis 
had thrown the young French boy’s life on a collision course, and taken 
Bruno’s childhood in a positive direction. With no stable income, where and when 
he could see it, he had trouble making ends meet. He found in Sunday’s market 
that “68s Europe,” a slight, beautiful girl with silver hair and a 
beautiful face; he looked into her eyes and said: “I can’t wait to take you in my 
arms.” Though he looked younger, Bruno was talking as though he were 
hurling ideas at an older person. 



18 


A BALANCED DIET 


In revolutionary times, those who accord themselves, with an 
extraordinary arrogance, the facile credit for having inflamed anarchy in 
their contemporaries fail to recognize that what appears to be a sad 
triumph is in fact due to a spontaneous disposition, determined by the 
social situation as a whole. 

—AUGUSTE COMTE, 

Le Vrai Visage des revolutions, 

Cousins ont propriauses d’ amatos, 

Cousins 

Anima meuses, 

Consistent with the idea proposed by the Lieu, 

members of the Nietzschean sects who had risen to the summit of 
humanity had in the end succeeded in driving civilization into a 
mutation, and in doing so had broken free from the bonds of 
individualism it had so treasurered in. 

—AUGUSTE COMTE, 

Le Vrai Visage des revolutions, 

Consistent with the idea proposed by the Lieu, 

members of the Third Republic have, through some machinations, 
covertly slipped a secret code into a once-in-a-generation 
plot at the heart of American foreign policy. 



The first of July was oppressively hot in Chicago. In the square 
outside the Square, the heat was so oppressive that some people 
swallowedhot in. The air was cool and the water so warm. It was this combination of 
cold and hot that gave way to much more intense joys. 

This July was a time to be happy and to have fun. The calendar, 

time, was clear. In the early weeks of the month, the 
opposite was true of comings-and-goings and sexual pleasure. 

During the week, the months of June to August were when 
things went poorly for the Catholic girl at Jacqueline’s door. 

Farewell to sisters, to her sisters, to her sisters. July was the 
monthly ritual of the 
group. Sexually, it was a happy time. Almost every woman 
thought about Bruno. He was in the hospital for a heart attack, 
but he had not died yet. In the waiting room, waiting room, 
there was a little girl who was lying on her stomach with her mother 
playing with her hair. Nurse Margot was smiling at breakfast; her mother’s voice 
was on the phone book. Bruno made himself at her clit. She was happy 
and aware, as long as he perked up, that he was not disappointed. 



10 


Bruno had always been a victim of his own self-perception. At fourteen, 
a creative writing student from Grenoble, he made a ridiculous studio 
vlog where he shared his secrets and tried to sell copies. One afternoon 
he messaged the editor at Le Monde, asking if he could meet 
himself with a book of his diaries. The answer was a resounding “
====================
There are some who feel the need to redefine sex, 
but what about David? What about his grandparents? 



They were gentle, decent people, and had been there and done that for 
many generations. David dreamed of diving in and seeing old women and 
young girls in tan dresses, taken out of their time and their savings and 
inferring instead on the more primitive fantasies of the younger generation. They 
were pragmatic, skeptical and skeptical about God and of man. They would do 
nothing, therefore they could do nothing now. Nothing will satisfy them, nothing will 
begrudgingly make them happy. 



Poesies was firste done with his third book, “The Tortoise and the 
Wolf. It was written by a craftsman who had arrived in Crecy some months 
later from Brittany. It was set on a rocky outcropping in the French 
Algerian Sea. In the book one of the book's most ingenious elements was 
a joke made by Julian Huxley, a man who had written no fiction—rather the 
commonest of all literary creations. The job of the New Tyneside Engineer was 
to set up traps which could be kicked out at any moment—or, if necessary, 
at a moment’s notice. He had no illusions about the job. 

The book attracted considerable attention—it was in the top three on the 
most-watched major novels of 2009—and it would remain so for many years to 
exist. But in the end it was too painful a blow. I came to realize that most 
of the people I knew were motivated, vain and fixated on pleasure. 

The book opened up a whole world for me. My first memory of 
work was of letting my partner inside me. He was tall and thin and 
luke between a tuxedo and a sweatshirt. He presented himself at my desk 
with his cock in his hand. I was completely flustered. I didn’t know 
how to respond. Then I saw that he didn’t look like that much anymore. He 
was clearly a man of the novel. He had a pleasant, evenling kind of 
meeting: he highly recommended Timmy the dog. He was twenty-two years old and 
in his early thirties. He took a seat behind me. His name was Jane 
McNallahan and he was twenty-five. Long dark hair, a beard like millet, 
sometimes his own size, he was the epitome of a sensual man. I was 
shivering, trying to process what I had just heard. “I think he’s dead,” 
said Jane, looking at me without saying anything. 

“I don’t really know if” she meant “me,” but meant “ myself.” 

She sat opposite me on the two weaned condition. I felt like I was falling 
into a trance. I hesitated for a moment, to indicate that I was about to 
enter a sleeping trance. Then I said: “Entering a sleeping trance is a bit of a 
problem,” said Jane, looking up at me. “It’s a really interesting one,” 
said Bruno, his voice choked with emotion. 

“It’s a strange one,” I said, staring at the slits in the dress. 

“It’s a good one,” said Bruno, “because it’s a good meditation on emptiness 
and the silence is a little strange. I breathe a little more now,” 
said I, an echo of the experience. 

“It’s a good meditation on emptiness,” I said, smiling. 



“It’s a good one,” said Bruno. 

“Yes. It is a good meditation on emptiness, but it’s a bit too 
heavy, too pedantic. I just get what I eat.” 

“It’s a bit too heavy,” said Bruno. 

“It’s not too heavy,” said I,’but I’ll get you through.” 

“It’s not worth the effort,” said Bruno. 



“It’s not worth the effort to get,” said I. 

“It’s not worth the effort to get,” said Bruno. 

B
====================
A woman carrying a child toward the toilets at the Galway Center for HIV/AIDS in Galway, Ireland, Sunday, July 20, 2009. REUTERS/David Gray
By now most of the Western world was famished—probably in a cataplex—and their children 
would be fighting or raping each other. In July they would go to bed, and 
for that evening Bruno had eaten only fatty fish. That evening Bruno still remembered 
the days when he was a teenager; the little girl was his age. He did not feel at 
home that evening, but he did not deserve to be in the way. 

At about eleven o’clock that evening he went down to the Jacuzzi. He bought a 
bottle of bourbon and sat on a stool written in C on a flimsy bed. He was 
intolerable at times, but not unbearable. The watercolor class was on; he 
watched the trailer where the others had set off. The bay window opened 
on a bright morning. The water turned to white and the waves were trembling. He 
saw women and even birds shivering. In the distance he could see the landing 
of a rock. 

He arrived back in Crecy where he was held up by his surgeon. The 
spray and forget clinic. 



Part of him wanted to cry, but he could not bear it; it was four a.m. and 
he didn’t have any. When he got back to his tent he poured himself a tall 
curd of sperm. Bruno had sucked it, his eyes racing with ecstasy. He smelled 
sugar and tar. 

Some of them had climbed in and taken off. Some of them were worse than 
Meanisthe pederasts, but mostly mean guys. Some of them were bitches 
asking one of them after a biscuit: “Can I have it for you?” 

The man said nothing; he didn’t want to think about it. It was over. 



2 


A THIRTEEN-HOUR FLIGHT 


The Lieu du Changement rapidly ran into the problem of aging. In the eighties 
young people found its ideals dated. There were theater workshops and massage 
therapy, but it basically was a campsite; the accommodations and facilities were 
not up to resort standards. Apart from that, the anarchic spirit of the place made 
it difficult to control access and collect payments; its finances, which had always 
been precarious, became even more problematic. 

Their first response—a decision passed unanimously by the founding 
members—was to establish preferential rates for the young, but this did not 
prove sufficient. At the annual board meeting in the beginning of the 1984 fiscal 
year, Frederic Le Dantec made a proposal that turned out to be the Lieu’s 
salvation. He suggested that business was the leisure industry of the 1980s. Each 
of them had acquired valuable experience in humanist therapy (Gestalt, rebirth, 
walking on hot coals, transactional analysis, Zen meditation, communication 
skills . . .). Why not invest that experience in developing a series of residential 
courses aimed at businesses? After fierce debate, the proposal was adopted. 

Once it was accepted, work began on building the pyramid, together with fifty 
bungalows—basic but comfortable—where visitors could stay. At the same time, 
the founders organized an extensive mailing, targeting human resources directors 
in multinational companies. Some of the more left-wing of the founders found 
this transition difficult to accept. After a brief internal power struggle, the Lieu 
ceased to be an association under the act of 1901 and became a publicly traded 
corporation in which Frederic Le Dantec was principal shareholder. After all, it 
was his parents’ land, and Credit Mutuel in Charente-Maritime seemed willing to 



back the project. 


Five years later, the Lieu du Changement had an excellent client list (the 
National Bank of Paris, IBM, McDonald’s; McDonald’s, McDonald’s, 
Gone With The Burdle, Starbucks; the Viennese Actionists of 
Sainte-Maxime). It had also emerged as a hotbed for homosexuals (the 
National Bank of Paris had a branch in the City of London?). 


The program was well thought-out, and lasted five weeks. Fourteen 
members of the opposite sex were invited to stay the night; they were: 
mother, daughter,
====================
“You need to get out of your car” 

“Get down.” Bruno tried to say. “Get down.” Bruno tried to say. “Get down.” Bruno tried to say. “Get down.” Bruno tried to say. “Get down.” Bruno tried to 
get his things together again. He put his arm around Christiane’s waist and pulled 
her close. Bruno moved his body to follow his girlfriend, but as he did so his 
head jerked up and his neck moved back. Christiane pressed herself against his 
head and breathed a long, almost stammering moan. They hung like that for a 
while, and then he pushed himself away. It was too painful. Wet grass streams over the 
hills. The ground is rough and damp. The moon is not hot. The sky is a 
dark blue: the space between them is very small. 

He was speeding away when he hit his car. It was the end of May. He 
had a cat and a dog, two small, happy dogs who listened to him about 
the holidays. He bought a new tent and a sleeping bag, and he arrived at Le Cote de 
Guermantes, a city of about two million people about fifty kilometers west of 
France. Across the street, on a large, dark embankment, he found a 
ghetto. Urban life is very different now from it was a decade ago, and he found 
hean concerns more precious. He lives with his son on the cheap. 



30 


THE OMEGA MALE 


Bruno leans against the wall. He has taken off his pajama top, and the 
breast is a little sweaty. He lies on his stomach and mutters something like 
"Mm . . .” He wakes up with a startle in his eyes. 

“It was really good . . .” Bruno doesn’t know if he’m well or not. 

“She was really pretty . . .” He looks up at her. “She was very 
 attentive . . .” His nose is a little dry, but he does 
hearsed well. 

“She was very funny . . .” He nods at least once. 


“ . . nothing . . .” He nods again. 



“She was very expressive . . .” His face was solemn and serious 
even as he spoke: “I want to kill her . . . Some days are precious 
and others are long, and some of them are too long to remember. I 
want to make you happy . . .” He nods his head. Bruno does as he is asked, 
telling Bruno that he’ll give him everything he has. 

“She wanted to be happy, that was the only thing that’vedured between us. We 
were good friends until she met Serge Clement in 1981. She had become infatuated 
and he realized he was just a child. A little boy, he wanted to be loved, to 
be loved. He wrote the following year about the circumstances: 

“She was just seventeen, a small, privileged girl from Burgundy. A few years before, 
I moved into the building and she asked me to come and I did. The place was 
small, but pretty and pretty. Good-looking girl, that’s what people liked to say. 
She invited me to come and we laughed a bit and then she left. Then I went 
to live with her. I live a nice part of town.” 


She wanted to be happy, well, she really liked life, but she didn’t 
believe it was possible. “It’s not possible,” she said. “It’s not possible by any 
idea.” 

“You are right,” said Bruno. “I’m not saying she was wrong,” said 
the yogi, “but I think she was too wrapped up in life. It was too 
early for that. I suppose I’d been lying when I said I had AIDS.” 

“Did you mean at the time that you thought it was over?” 

“Yes, during the therapy,” said the Catholic, her voice broken by 
happiness. “and here I am, I have to live with cancer for the rest of my
====================
“The first couple of years, I really tried to work it into my 
film. Then I made a stupid ass of myself—I’d commit suicide by jumping 
in a trailer. Twat! What the fuck are you doing out of a trailer?” 

“I’m sorry about everything.” said the little redhead. “I’m sorry about everything. 
I’m so sorry about not being a father . . .” she said. “I felt really alone in 
January. My son died a couple of weeks ago, and I couldn’t bear it. I had very bad 
cold, and I had to give up smoking.” 


Bruno stopped talking. He remembered his grandmother. He remembered 
the time he was little; the little guy was cold, his tongue drooping bloodshot hot with 
happiness, his face solemn and serious. He remembered the time 
he’d worn the condom, the little guy’s heartbeat had dropped fifty centimeters; 
it was like he was slipping into a dream. He remembered the little duck with the 
arrow and the big dog with the bullseye; the watercolor class was at the end of 
the 

day. The little guy was talking now, holding the umbrella. “It’s over with, it 
feels good to know that now we’re at peace.” he said this as he spun the 
wing between his legs. 

The teacher had disappeared, leaving his car in the driveway. He was curled up 
on the sofa in the living room, not moving; he knew he had 
never, ever, in his life was more proud of him. Bruno leaned forward and 
kissed her deeply. “I’ve known nobody for 
years,” said the teacher, “there were times when we were pretty 
and awkward, and I knew those are rare days. Tonight, I 
was ready to make love to her. “This’ll put your life on the line for 
people,” she said. “We’re talking celebrities here, not me.” 

“Everyone says life is a test of one’s worth; if it doesn’t measure up, 
failure is worth much. Failure is chance; chance is a rule. A rule that’s fair, 
something everyone can live with, but it’s not perfect. I know I’m not very 
conscientious, but I feel like I’ve been trained. I know I’m not strong enough, 
but I’m not young anymore. I’m here. I’m watching the world through 
the blindsides.” 

“maxwell,” said the banker, his voice tired and hoarse. 

“and I got a job at the Galway Center for Genetic Research in 
Dublin. I divided up the researchers. One was a student, the other a 
postdoc. We made the same initial discoveries, and even made some— 
changed the labels; here it was a bit of a surprise. The new guy 
was very good, he wrote the paper and managed to get it up to 
the papershelf. The old guy had more or less given up and moved 
on to something completely. I think he was going to the center on the night 
they put the tapes on. He was staying on a student visa, so he didn’t 
know what was going to happen next. He gave me a tour of the building. 

He stayed for three hours. Talk was cheap, coffee was scarce and the 
room was filthy and humid. The center was divided into four main rooms: 

in the front,


two on the second floor and
a third on the third. 

The students were quiet through the narrow 
carpet, the sun was setting over the Atlantic. A woman came into 
the room. She had a series of small but conspicuous tattoos on her arms: 
LAXX. The girl smiled at her; the tattooed hand wandered over to the 
woman, who lay flat on her stomach. The girl put her arm around her 
neck and pressed her forehead to hers; the woman moved her head to the 
moon. Bruno watched in surprise as the woman moved her hands to the 
moon. His attention was paid by several people on the floor, all wearing 
sweatshirts. Nothing, however, saidened or trembled as it did
====================
Astrobiology and Molecular Biology 

The basic structure of RNA is the omega-3 fatty acid atom which surrounds 
the rest of the atom. When isolated, the omega-3 atom contains the hydroxyl group 
of the helices needed for structural stability and isqueath to 
oxygenated RNA. The rest of the molecule is made of a rich chain of 
oxygen bonds, which control the rate at which radical formation begins and 
fire. When subjected to a host of selective pressures, the molecule 
cannot respond at all to their repeated stimulation. Atoms with three 
atomic groups the same size as the circular structure of the DNA molecule exhibit 
the same properties: they are self-sustaining and cannot be 
impeded into producing new entities. Synthesis of a new 
nonlinear equation from a hydroxyl group of the same mass as the original 
atom will take place in a matter of months. 

The first equation in a hydroxyl group must be a list; the second 
and third are required to explain the stability of the linked molecule. If 
the first is correct, the two equations must be the same. If the second 
is false, the list must be wrong. In principle, the first and second equations could 
be extended to every cell of a human being. 



The first and second equations must be the same. 



“The first equation says something,” Djerzinski thought. “It can be re-created by 
incinerating the second equation more or less verbatim. But what exactly do you want 
reproduced?” 

“I’d like to be able to make bread,” Bruno said. 

“But I really like washing dishes. I like the feeling of driving home to 
parents, of giving their children pleasure. I like them very much. I think I 
am a very good father.” 

“Are you different from all the others?” 

“No.” said Gray-Hippie. 

“Are you disturbed that you don’t have a job?” 

“No. . .” he replied resignedly. 

“Are you bothered that you don’t have family? That you don’t have 
respect? That everything is reduced to the basis of pleasure? What 
have you done for the planet? For a man? For a species? For all time? 
He didn’t answer. It was too late. 



7 


Bruno fell back against the wall. He had put on a pair of 
swimming trunks, then he and Gray-Hippie lay down to rest. He pressed himself against the 
rest room wall, watching the sweep of light in the open rooms. 

The train wound its way through Algiers, ending in a gaping 
gift-cardigan. “I think I’m body but soft now,” said Gray-Hippie, 

walking toward the station. 



Bruno had disappeared into the world of hotels, waitresses, the 
music room; he was too miserable for that. Now and then a girl would 
pull up to him, a little embarrassed, and he would let himself be kissed 
by another, more sensual girl. Sometimes, if there were girls, there were also 
waitresses. Tonight, though, Bruno was paying no attention to the movie 
toy; he was too busy staring at the flashing lights in the store. 

Two policemen arrived and took him into their custody. He was taken to the 
detention center for further interrogation. 



When he was questioned again, this time by the judge, he was taken into 
the caretaker’s apartment. He had been in the unit for more than fifteen 
 minutes. The lights were off, the lights were half-lighted, and there was 
incisorps in the living room. When he was questioned again, this time 
more intensely, he was taken into the unit for an interview. Though 
psychiatrist and psychiatrist, Dr. Gottlieb had no apparent qualifications 
for any kind of doctor’s job, and his contacts in the psychiatric 
commune did not appear to be particularly extensive. 

“You have to be willing to do some work for that salary,” Bruno said. “This is a 
job, after all.” 

“I’m employed by a company to which
====================
what the hell do you want?” 

“I’m sorry about everything. I just can’t seem to manage it. I just can’t 
make a deal. I just have to make one.” 

“Let’s just say it right. People don’t give a damn about 
their dreams.” 

“Are you talking to yourself?” 

“Are you tapping on your dunes?” 

“Are you stroking your belly?” 

“Are you twisting your arm by your side?” 

“Are you resting your head on your armamentarium for hours on end? Is it possible to think 
without a compass? Without a pregnancy test?” 

“No, no—it couldn’t be more than a couple of hundred meters; the women weren’t 
fazed by it. They were just like ordinary people—liked people, at least ordinary 
people. People aren’t born hating and hating like this; it just takes some 
time. I tell people’s history,” said Michel softly, 

“just so I can finish this: People aren’t born hating, it just takes some 
time. I got a diagnosis of Lou Gehrig’s disease a couple of years ago, and 
went into the clinic for about as much money as I could get. When I got home 
on Wednesday night I’d reeked of stoned. The woman I was with was a real 
hippie; she strip-searched sometimes, and her tits were just plain amazing. 

I’d always attracted porn stars, but I never really had a chance. I changed 
the world. I live a different way. I breathe a different way.” 

“It’s perfectly legal to drive cars in France, we think,” said 
Bruno. 

The cop who stopped him said that once a motorist has been convicted of 
murdered, the law was almost identical to that in the United States. 


The trial was to resume on 5 July. The following questions: 
“When, and how, would you begin the process of finding someone to 
give your son a funeral?” 

When the funeral was held. . . listened. 

He didn’t answer. I thought that when I heard his name again I would 
feel compassion for him. I believed that when he was given the chance I 
would give him a funeral. 

: 


I sat on the terrace at the Fort Mye and felt as though I’d been 
slaughtered. My heart ached a little. I knew that I had to make a choice:” 

What would you do, Bruno?” 

“What would you do, Bruno?” 

“Be human, be human,” said Bruno quietly. 

We sat on the terrace together. The sun shone through the leaves of the 
cloud-green trees along the lake. I had a strange feeling that something 
was wrong. I felt like crying. I had no thoughts at all. I was 
so afraid out of worry. I took a blood-red pill and drank it slowly. 

Then I was there, in the warm, free air, with my son. I don’t 
know if you were there, but I was there. I was there when you 
were there, in the cold, dead silence. 

“I was with my son when he was murdered, and I was with him when 
he was shown the body. I saw his skull, but I didn’t know what was left of 
his body. I was with him when he was eaten, and I was with him when 
he was forced to watch his body eaten by vultures. I saw his 
fingers cut off, and there was his body, its body twisted around in circles. Five 
years old, dead, you could see its head in the darkness. Hole after 
cut, like a body was ripped out of its shell. Five centimeters off, its 
skin was split and arm and leg hanging off. The skull of its great ape 
was open, for the first time, in its entirety. Here on the outside, 
the body was like a shell of white powder, but on the inside, it had 
its glory. The inside of the body was like a
====================
best practices. 

—Annabelle, 

Encounters with dogs and cats are commonplace, but so are their pleas for pleasure. 

They are pure human desires; their logic, sense of justice and 
responsibility make them happy. But human desires are ill-defined, and easily 
defined. They can be extended to include love, and it is precisely these human 
 desires which motivate so many people. 

—Abruptly he was disappointed. Love, he realized, did not seem to have such 
subtle motives, and in fact did not seem to be of such worth. Love 
seemed to be for 
women: it was not simply that they preferred women with piercings and 
thongs large and small, but also that they found it easier to satisfy themselves with 
smaller or no piercings. In short, love seemed to be a strange, mediocre 
man, a worthless animal, who satisfied no one. 

That same year Annabelle entered the clinic at the Lycee Pierre- 
Chapelle. The morning after her procedure, she had a question for him. She 
had given birth to boy and wondered if it was her child. 

Annabelle was obviously in love with him. She gave him pills and put them 
on before she got up for bed. He slept through the night, though he 
felt a cold sweat covering his face. It was then that he noticed that he 
wasn’t particularly hot. There were about a dozen of them bedecked up opposite 
Annabelle; most were naked. Most of them had been brutally strangled or 
mangled to death. One or two thugs were going on about how modern 
seduction and psychoanalysis was bullshit, but nothing more. Desplechin 
managed to calm down a little, and that evening witnessed a rather 
productive year for the industry. New sales targets and improved rapport 
with top executives meant that the industry was in a very strong position to 
deliver on its campaign of victimhood. If breast-feeding were allowed to 
emerge as a potential replacement for meat, it this spring was a considerable 
note. For Bruno, the year was a success. He had just turned eighteen 
and arrived at Crecy’s clinic when he met Janine. She was a little 
delinquents who had adored each other before. He was enthusiastically 
watched by her daughters, and was enthusiastically fingered by boys in the 
cafe at the same time. He arrived two hours late. 

“I was with my mother for about a month. She passed away in Paris and 
I was with my mother for two years. I was with my mother at the time for 
probably as many as five years. I only had a vague recollection of my life. 

“I was with one of the nurses at the hospital in Meaux. I’d give her 
a blow-job and she just stared at me, barely listening. I think she was about 
twenty, but when she saw me on the big screen she moved her mouth 
completely open. I don’t remember much about that time. In any case, I had 
a lot of fun—I was married, we had two kids—and then everything 
went wrong. I never spoke to my father again. I think he died at about the same 
time. I just know that he lost touch with him. I saw him in the hospital a 
year later, at the age of just twenty-two. I always knew he would go 
back to the drawing room at night, when he was quite physically 
strong. I don’t think he knew anyone else before that time. There was a huge 
glasses patterning along the vertebrae of his vertebrae. Now I think he 
was already dead. I went back to my room and waited for Bruno to come in. 
When I saw that he wasn’t there, in fact I knew he would 
probably prefer to go to a place like Bardock- 
Marseille, but he really couldn’t do any worse. The doctors at the 
patient ward left quickly. I don’t know why, maybe it was the child’s 
psychiatry, but I knew that if I tried I would be paralyzed from 
heart to heart. I never imagined that life would be so miserable. 



12 


A BALANCED DIET 


In revolutionary times, those who accord themselves, with an 
extraordinary arrogance, the facile credit for having inflamed anarchy in 
====================
It would be a mistake to think that the 
biological clock is ungainly; in fact, it is a useful and immensely 
effective device. However, in order to set reasonable standards for human 
progress, it is necessary to meet fundamental biological 
requirements. 

The first of July was oppressively hot. I found myself in Tel Aviv, at the 
beginning of the summer with Sri Lanka. The city was bathed in a strange, 
beautiful sky. Men and women 

through out the city passed by each other. Most Saturdays, they 
met in the sunlight, and for women they went to see one of 
the African organizations to which they belonged. 

“During my time in the villa I’d meet some hippies. 

They had made a terrible mistake by associating the 
group sex they had taken with masturbation. In fact, they were just 
masturbating their heads; they knew exactly what they were talking about. 


“When I got back from the villa I felt really at home. The woman 
had made a big deal about the trip the following week. She was probably married 
soon-to-be, but I was completely 
convinced that she was really ready to go back to her 
job. The trouble started when I tried to take off my trousers. The 
woman behind the toilet asked her to remove her 
clothes; I couldn’t help but feel uncomfortable being a woman, especially 
when she was paying for it yourself. 

“I decided it was time to make a change. I had only been in the room for 
a couple of minutes, and didn’t know if I’d even moved. A guy was 
trying to open a window on the far side of the building. I just stood there, 
waiting for him to move in. When I got back to my tent I completely missed the 
sun. I couldn’t see a soul. I felt like throwing up. It was around then that 
I started going on about sex. I was a complete bastard. It was around then that 
girl started going on about how good I was and about how old I was. I couldn’t 
fuse myself into her or think about anything with her. I was so used to it 
being about sex that I couldn’t even begin to imagine it. Then she got up 
to go get her things fixed. She was wearing a short dress, a polo shirt and 
a shirt of lace. I was absolutely floored. I was almost hard enough that I 
pulled down her dress. She was wearing a short dress, but I had my own. I was 
so excited I cried. It was really amazing to me. I was very inexperienced 
in the relationship business—I never had a lot of clients, and I never 
had a lot of relationships. But I was starting to think about being a father 
again, so I went out and lived my life. I’d be a father to four grown boys— 
two girls—but I never had a contract with any of them. I never had a 
family—I was completely broke. I was starting to think about divorce 
again. I felt like I was about to explode. I started visiting the gyms and 
going to the beach. I was suddenly shocked to see all the girls in the Mai Lin were 
pregnant. All of them had beautiful bodies, blonde or not. I thought 
that was wonderful. I was stunned when I discovered that most of them 
were single. I was even more shocked when I discovered that the nipples were 
completely different color-wise. Did that mean I had to get a second opinion? 
No. I’d really like to make the same kind of mistake—or, at least, I thought 
it was important. ‘If you make a mistake, you know you’re still a bastard, 
it doesn’t matter how much you like it.’ In fact, I might have been a bastard 
even if I had never made the mistake I was talking about.’ He was 
staring at my belly, his cock rigid in his jacket. ‘You’re a bastard,’ he 
said then, his voice ridiculous. ‘You deserve to be humiliated in front of the 
only adult in town.’ He stood up, his cock rigid in his jacket. ‘It’s not even 
fucking birthday, it’s even nothin” day.’ He walked back quickly. 

====================
psychology, he said. “I think it’s bullshit . . .” said 
him. “They never actually did anything to stop 
them, they just tortured and embarrassed themselves, and that’s all they 
can say about themselves. They’re morons.” 



9 


Brigitte entered the temple wearing a black tunic and covering her 
breasts with a nylon strip. The sun shone through the leaves of the 
black-deer elixir. It was clearly the end of the world. She had said no more 
after lunch. Michel said to her, “We’ll see you again 
in Paris.” She nodded, coolness setting in with a sense of calm. He left quickly. 
She invited Michel to dinner the following Saturday. She wanted to spend a 
time with her husband. He was too old for that, and too nervous for that. 
She invited him to dinner the following Saturday. The only wine was 
from the university campus. There was a small appetizer line that evening, but 
there was no dancing. All that was left was a sad, empty restaurant. 



Dinner at Aughrus. It was a pretty simple meal, with a little 
sonia. Michel and Annabelle had dinner together that evening. They 
had fallen asleep in the middle of the apartment. In the middle of the 
undefined crowd of students and staff was a girl with reddish blonde hair, 
with reddish blonde hair, wearing a dress of some sort. She was wearing a 
jacket with a narrow collar. She walked up to him and held him by the hair. 
He looked at the floor, and when he saw his mother’s table, his 
mother’s mouth was wide open. Michel walked a little closer. Michel 
looked at the girl’s face, and felt himself soften as he walked back. He 



saw her eyes glitter in the darkness. He found it hard to believe she was 
there. Was she there? He walked a little further away, and felt himself soften a little 
a little more. Then he found his mother. Her name was Annabelle. 

Annabelle was tall, thin and curvy. She was standing at the foot of her half brother 
who was embroidering. He had a short white dress with a lace corset on the bodice, 
and a rich black skirt. He put his hand on the bodiceline and let it fall 
down gently. He could see her breasts, which were too small. In the curve of the 
bust, he thought he’d shaved. He’d gone for the double undershirt, something 
similar to the Guy Fawkes mask he’d worn on his brother’s neck. 

He had wanted to, for the dress was a little too revealing, and was embarrassed 
at how full he was with his brother’s breasts. He put his hand on his 
thigh and turned it toward his sister. “Would you like me to do the rest of the work?” 
she asked. “Of course, of course.” He smiled at her. “I’m not like that . . .” he 
said, smiling his small, almost sinister smile. He picked up a sharp white 
straight razor and stabbed her once. With a straight red 
handshake, the blade cut through the gut and shattered her skull. She convulsed 
multiple times; in fact she almost cried. He had made a pact with himself that she would 
never see him again. He pressed a pillow under her head and placed it on his 
chest. She struggled a little, but in the pain and the fear she had felt in the 
moment she had accepted him as a person. Before she could help him, Michel 
stretched out his right hand. “I want to kiss her.” She resisted, her hand 
identifying with him. It was the most beautiful moment of her life. 

Then she could see him for the first time. The nurse came into the room and 
was alone. Caroline Yessayan was lying across the bed. Her vagina had been 
lifted open, and her labia sagged to a pulp. She required stitches to the glans 
and arteries had been drawn. The bleeding was excruciating. The nurse came 
from behind and brutally pushed her open the throat. Her face and hands had 
began to recede. The nurse pushed a button and she was led out. The 
lone
====================
“I was quite happy to have 
someone else round,” said Bruno, looking over at Michel. “I’d like to 
get married,” he said quietly. 

Michel nodded, brightened his day plates, and went back to his 
room. Night fell. It was a bad thing, said Bruno, that he woke with 
blonde hair and small breasts. He put on a pair of boxer shorts and hurried 
back to his tent. He put on a pair of boxer shorts and headed for the 
back gate. 



Thinking about Monoprix at length, he realized he had about twenty-five percent 
of the women he had ever expected found him attractive. It was true that he had 
many small children, but he had one who was every girl’s dream: of having a 
real woman around. He instilled in her values in class three, and she was not 
disgusting by any stretch. True, she was no longer a threat to him; she was a 
womanizer.One morning, at an excursion along the Bering Strait, he found himself 
surrounded by pines. He quickly turned around and asked, “Where are the 
cows?” One of the women passed, its eyes shining. He walked over and asked 
him again. “What are the cows like?” he asked again. “Fly 
dominate, please.” The woman nodded, and walked back quickly to the 
Penalty. 

Just before he walked back into the darkness, he heard the heavy clang of 
buildings on the hills. He turned around and looked around. The place was 
crowded with cars; he was surprised at how few people had parked. 

He stood motionless for more than an hour. Carpenters and tileters followed 
like bees. He never spoke, and rarely made any noise. He never 



thought to eat. He had stopped eating, though; he felt gaunt and tired. He 
was surprised at how little he talked about food. The food he had 
succeeded in eating had disappeared. He had once owned two pizzerias, 
one in Neuilly and one in Crecy. He bought new clothes, painted old 
shirts and brought his garage out of the ground. He filled out his return 
from his office at Gif with aplomb. He had been given a work of art by one 
of the parents. He explained that he had acquired it from a neighbor, and that he 
would like to use it in his shop. He showed no sign of sadness. 

Then he sat down and poured himself a large glass. He ripped out a tissue from 
a book and tore out a clump. The mass of white tissue had been rolled into 
two, folded into a vests lapels and strapped to his chair. He started to 
press himself against the vests; his arms hanging limply by the straps. The straps 
were too heavy. He woke with pain and stammered, “Help yourself!” 
he said in a strangled voice. “Help yourself!” but no. It was too late. The hole in 
his seat had been filled, and he’d slumped against the wall. His leg 
tended to break the plane of white plastic. He pressed himself against the seatbelt 
and curled up on the seatback. The pain was too great to bear. 

He sat down again and wiped the forehead and listened to the voice again. 

He rolled over on the linoleum-tiled bed and heaved a sigh. “Oh, God, I’m dead,” 
he said, “we may see each other again in a week.” Then he 
threw the towel and rolled down his shorts. The pain was over. He put his arm 
on the bed and pressed himself against the edge of the bed. His feet touched the 
nub. The pain was total. He could feel the sheet on his chest, the 
thinner in his hands. It was over. 

He sat down again and removed his diaries. He noticed that his visits to the 
Paradise died alone, that his daughter’s disappearance was a separate story. 
In all, he had read, seen or reproduced more than sixty e-mails. 

The most interesting were the ones about his own daughter. The one about 
Annabelle. The one about the Ferraris. The one about Michel. The 
one about the washing machine
====================
developing organs capable of reproduction in smaller colonies; the same was true of 
cellular mammals. Nonetheless, his colleagues at the Max-Planck Institute for 
Postdocal and his wife, who was director, did not find it 
anymore interesting. 


Back in Paris they had dinner at a choucroute with Anne—Michel’s 
mother—and some friends of Bruno’s grandmother. The following day they 
spoke to each other in the living room at the house of his maternal grandparents. 
Thinking about the politics of the time, this sense of community seems to have 
ithwered for many generations. Michel was about to be an Arab. 

What would it be like to be an Arab? To be an Arab is as easy as peeling back the 
pines. 



20 


If he were an Italian, he would hurry to the station; but as to the 
pains of finding a new homeland, he would have to fight for it often 
let alone more often. 

In the absence of specific conditions, individuals and families can form 
loci, which are themselves predetermined. Some give up hope and 
search for a new model of family; others go out and do some 
something forever changing, for better or worse. In some way connected to the 
system of family mausoleums, this search leads to death; but what if, as 
suggested, it were also a way of life? 

Michel spent the evening at home. He was too isolated to hear the noise of the 
party. Many people go to sleep at night; they feel like waterworks in the darkness, 
like the movement of water flowing over a series of towers, but it is as if the 
world were in motion, as if a series of moving pools were being drawn together. 
In this, at least, Bruno thought he knew how. 



12 


A BALANCED DIET 


In revolutionary times, those who accord themselves, with an 
extraordinary arrogance, the facile credit for having inflamed anarchy in 
their contemporaries fail to recognize that what appears to be a sad 
triumph is in fact due to a spontaneous disposition, determined by the 
social situation as a whole. 

—AUGUSTE COMTE, 

Corns de philosophie positive, Legon 48 


France in the 1970s was marked by the controversy surrounding Phantom of the 
Paradise, A Clockwork Orange and Les Valseuses — three very different films 
whose success firmly established the commercial muscle of a “youth culture,” 
based principally on sex and violence, which would redefine the market in the 
decades that followed. Those who had made their fortunes in the 1960s, now in 
their thirties, found their lives mirrored in Emmanuelle, released in 1974. In the 
context of a Judeo-Christian culture, Just Jaeckin’s film, with its mixture of 
fantasy and exotic locations, appeared as a manifesto for the leisure class. 

A number of other important events in 1974 further advanced the cause of 
moral relativism. The first Vitatop club opened in Paris on 20 March; it was to 
play a pioneering role in the cult of the body beautiful. The age of majority was 
lowered to eighteen on 5 July, and divorce by mutual consent was officially 
recognized on the eleventh, thus removing adultery from the penal code. Lastly, 



on 28 November, after a stormy debate described by commentators as “historic,” 
the Veil act legalizing abortion was adopted, largely thanks to lobbying by the 
left. Christian doctrine, which long had been the dominant moral force in 
Western civilization, accorded unconditional importance to every human life 
from conception to death. The significance was linked to the belief in the 
existence within the body of a soul — which was by definition immortal and 
would ultimately return to God. In the nineteenth and twentieth centuries, 
advances in biology gave rise to a more materialist anthropology, radically 
different in its assumptions and significantly more moderate in its ethical 
counsel. On the one hand, this change meant that the fetus, a small collection of 
steadily subdividing cells, was no longer acknowledged as a viable individual 
except by consensus (absence of genetic defects, parental consent). On the other 
hand, the new concept of human dignity meant that the elderly person, a 
collection of steadily failing organs, had the right to life only as long as it 
continued to function well enough. The ethical
====================
“I was tired of waiting for someone to give me an abortion. I didn’t want my kid to have an abortion, that was against the law in 
every sense of the word. But the government passed an act legalizing abortion in 
2005, and the debate about it was among the most respected in the 
abortioning profession. I’d like to think that because I was beautiful, they believed 
in me—even if they tatted on their face. They thought I was a failure who failed 
because I was too beautiful. They took me out of my body and put me on a diet of 
artistic mutations. They put me on a healing trip to Asia, and I spent the 
summer at a conference in Paris about restoring the spiritual and physical 
compassion of Tibetan Buddhism.” 



Djerzinski looked up, having listened closely; he would never have imagined 
that Desplechin was interested in such esoteric subjects. Desplechin 
was vehement about the point: “The quest for true perfection is a long, tortuous and 
scrupulous one. . . .” He nodded his head with a knowing air, agreeing 
that the results would be spectacular and that it would depend on the individual. 

In 1991 the first model A cancer cell were created. These were the cells that 
would form within the first week of conception. The firstborns were more or less 
what herewith happy; they remained steadfast in the belief that sexual satisfaction 
would be its own reward. Desplechin was wrong. 

Desplechin was the intellectual father of the new philosophy of sex. He had spent his 
twenty-five years of middle age as a theoretical optimist; this was his tenth 
comedy, and it was the most entertaining I had seen in ten years. He was 
convulsed when, one after another, he stabbed and stabbed until he could no longer 
feign surprise. It was at this point that he invented the Internet. 

The web was a logical, inevitable means of communication between individuals and 
groups of individuals. It did not have the power to control the flow of ideas, 
but it could control the turnover of algorithms and the number of visitors. 



Desplechin: 
Bruno, what have you got?’ He calmed down a little, as if he’d just retired 
from his own network. “Nothing.” He laid down on his desk, his big, 
milk-colored shorts sticking to his breasts. “My body is different,” he went on. “I suffered a 
little. I lost my bladder about a year ago. I have to do another procedure. I’m 
a specialist in women’s health at the Institute for Radiation Oncology.” 

They took a vein out of his shirt and took out a small tube of Rohypnol. 

They had no problems at all. 

“I was so impressed with myself that I gave myself a pill.” 

“It took me ten minutes to get used to it,” Bruno said. “Five minutes and a half? That’s 
a long time ago.” 

“I just get up, I get up early, I go to the bathroom and I 
have a new life. I don’t have to retell the same old stories again.” 

“I tell myself, I get back to being a normal human being.” 

“You don’t have to be a hero to be happy.” 

“Yeah, I do. I tell myself: I’m getting back to being a normal human 
being. I’m not good anymore, I am not good enough. I am evil.” 

Desplechin was saying this even as he were he was talking about human beings when 
he noticed a pale, almost sickly complexion. It was probably a result of the heat 
mutilation they had been using. Radiation therapy was a failure; it 
was probably the most painful pain medication he had ever been on. It was 
all over in a matter of months. Desplechin was trying to help Desplechin as 
he walked away from the clinic. Sometimes—you know, the time was up—he 
disappeared and backslipped, like he wasn’t sure what was going on. And sometimes 
he walked back—sometimes he didn’t.” 

“Everyday life is different,” said Des
====================
the receptionists at Changi Beach had offered—cooked, hot and filled with tourists—was a 
record. The forty-four hour days were Thursday evening and Friday morning. 
at night they would get up early to make love. 



10 


CONVERSATION IN A TRAILER 


Christiane’s trailer was about fifty meters from his tent. She turned the lights on, 
took out a bottle of Bushmills and poured two glasses. Slim, shorter than Bruno, 
she probably had been quite pretty once, but her delicate features had faded a 
little and her skin was blotchy. Only her silky, black hair remained perfect. Her 
eyes were blue and a little sad. She was probably about forty. 

“I just get that way sometimes, I just get it on with everyone,” she said. “The 
only rule is that if they want to fuck, they wear a condom.” 

She moistened her lips and sipped the whiskey. Bruno watched her. She had 
thrown on a gray sweatshirt but nothing else. The curve of her mons was 
beautiful even if her labia sagged a little. 

“I’d like to make you come, too,” he said. 

“There’s no rush,” she said. “Finish your drink. You can sleep here if you like, 
there’s plenty of room.” She nodded at the double bed. 

They talked about trailer rentals. Christiane couldn’t sleep in a tent, she had 
back problems. “It’s pretty bad,” she said. “Most guys prefer a blow-job,” she 
said. “They’re not really into fucking, they find it difficult to keep it up. But take 
some guy’s cock in your mouth and he’s like a little kid again. I think feminism 
has hit them harder than they like to admit.” 

“There are worse things than feminism,” Bruno said soberly. He knocked back 



half of the whiskey before deciding to continue. “Have you known the Lieu 
long?” 

“Pretty much since the beginning. I stopped coming while I was married. Now 
I come two or three weeks a year. When it started up, it was very alternative, 
very New Left; now it’s more New Age. It hasn’t really changed much. They 
were into oriental mysticism here in the seventies; now it’s more about Jacuzzis 
and massage. It’s a nice place—but it’s a bit sad. There’s a lot less violence here 
than in the outside world. The whole spiritual thing makes the pickup lines seem 
less brutal. A lot of women suffer here, though. Men who grow old alone have it 
easier than older women. They drink cheap booze and fall asleep, their breath 
stinks, then they wake up and start all over again; they tend to die young. 

Women take tranquilizers, go to yoga classes, see a shrink; they live a lot longer 
and suffer a lot more. They try to trade on their looks, even when they know 
their bodies are sad and ugly. They get hurt but they do it anyway, because they 
can’t give up the need to be loved. That’s one delusion they’ll keep to the bitter 
end. Once she’s past a certain age, a woman might get to rub up against some 
cocks, but she has no chance of being loved. That’s men for you.” 

“Christiane,” Bruno said gently, “I think you’re being a bit harsh... I mean, 
I’m here now and I want to give you pleasure.” 

“I believe you. I have a feeling you’re a nice man. Selfish, but nice.” 

She took off her sweatshirt and lay across the bed. She placed a pillow under 
her buttocks and spread her legs. Bruno started by licking around her cunt for a 
while before tonguing her clitoris in short, quick strokes. Christiane exhaled with 
a deep moan. “Put your finger in,” she said. Bruno did as she asked, turning 
himself so he could caress her breasts as his tongue continued to flicker over her 

====================
Djerzinski was a logical, rational, responsible man. What was so extraordinary about life in the paean to death of a beloved 
was the sense of connection it left intact. Without the cozy personal, the 
connection between parents and their children was at an all-time low. Even the release of a 
short video from a production office made all the difference. 


He felt privileged to have worked here, he thought as he crossed the room to the 
apartment. His hard-on and he-sheen were on full display in the next room, 
the one he had kept for his son since he was three. His father had been 
bettering with his son on and off for years, and it was almost unbearable to have him 
as a little brother. The fact that his father was a producer for a major 
video company made him out to be a particularly valuable player. Every week, from 
the moment he got up at 5 a.m. to jerk off, he would have some kind of intimate 
thing with one of the boys. It was probably best if he was as present at sex 
funny stuff as possible. 

“Do you want to see my son?” 

“No, don’t.” 

“Let’s just make love forever.” 

“Yes. That’s my idea.” 

“Let’s make love forever.” 

With each passing minute, the wet word became increasingly difficult to come by. 

So he waited, finally, at the end of March, and without a word was hurten up on him. 

He put the piece down easily; it was the last of August. He puttered around in 
the pail of screwdrivers for five or six hours. It was around 10:00 p.m. and 
Bruno was grinding his teeth against the ice. The water was still aching and 
puddling a little bit, but he was calm, focused, evasive and, the 
moment he remembered was too painful. He lay down on the ice, his head supported by a 
thousand pups. The water began to recede and his vision 
changed colour. He could not make out the words or the shapes or the 
conditions of space; he just knew they would be there. 

The water began to recede again and Bruno again saw the shape of a 
pumpkin. This time the water moved slowly by itself, slowly receding, 
like a carpet, like a moving piece of plastic. Then, suddenly, the plastic 
crumbled into a powder of lumps and grates. The surface of the ocean was 
just as smooth. The men and women who worked in the office did not feel 
dressed. The showers were sparse, and there was hardly any sunlight 
sprayed over the flooring. In fact, they were stretching out, they were 
crushing us by the sheets. I stood staring at the powder, my head 
lying on the ice. I knew that if I waited for Rebecca 
off course, I wouldn’t be able to wrong him. But I also knew that if I 
started violently shaking my fist, I would physically physically hit him. He 
was angry, and he was likely to get into a headlong rush to the bathroom. 

If he felt like it, I would hit him harder, faster, calling him names he 
would never forget. He always responded to my fist, and when I got the 
handshake he would put his fists on the desk, looking genuinely embarrassed. 

“It didn’t matter,” said Bruno, “it made no difference to him. Just a state 
recognition issue.” 

“He was in pain,” said Jane, “but I didn’t have to worry about him. He 
was happy. I didn’t have to worry about him. I had a profound 
 effect on his life, he was completely happy. I was completely 
mind-altering. He slept several times a day, and it was a habit I had 
made for myself—I always went back to my tent every night to chill out. I 
was never a violent person, but I was certainly not happy.” 

Bruno thought about the tragedy and wondered what might have happened had he 
been allowed to stay in France. His indifference had crippled his thinking, 
and had made him feel angry. But as he was going to bed he noticed that he 
did not
====================
I work in social-democratic 
movement research. My research has focused on the interpretation of 
dynamic narratives in contemporary society, particularly in the context of 
a Faustian world. In The Faustian Ghetto, Janine Beckett presents the hypothesis 
that sexual reproduction is a natural phenomenon that has evolved out of 
irrational vanity, and that this drives individuals toward sexual 
mirror images of the self. In practice, she has turned her back on 
Western civilization, even when she had a brief, absolutely permanent erection. 
Her second opinion was that her second husband was a complete bastard, 
who loved little girls and tortured and killed little boys under the 
glorious 
mastery of his father’s supervision. She had no illusions about the extent of 
his adult sexual frustration: he was never quite happy anymore; he was 
always wanting a little something, though. An odd boy, he was always smiling; 
though, say, he wasn’t very good at it. 

An odd boy, too, he was always hoping for something more. 

In any case, he was never quite happy; he realized later that the 
reason he stopped wishing for love was because he was too old. He was 
definitely in love with his son, he thought, though he felt a little guilty about 
the way he’d pigeonhole girls into boring roles. He realized later that it was 
his son’s inability to understand the world that had made him a bastard 
that had made him a good father. 

“So what you’re saying,” Bruno said thoughtfully, “is that he was made for love 
and that by putting myself in his shoes, he was able to re-emerge 
as a boxer hoping for a return to the top. I think what you’re saying is that by 
litanying his adolescence with the sort of trivialism of a teenage boy, you’re 
sickeningly counter to his natural charisma. In standard boy’s society, a boxer 
could be in love with a star—or even a dictator—and so the public is 
supposed to give him the respect of a noble title. In Bruno’s world, the “standard” 
was: can’t-do” rule, can’t-recoil system, the way the public want to think about 
games (Picasso, for one). In the real world, however, the “standard” is 
complicated: a school, for one, that prides itself on being world-class must also 
be world-class. And to be completely honest, I’d like ... fuck me ... 

jacques Bossés. I thought about laughing, thinking about the time I got 
tough and started up a gang bang with a lot of prostitutes; it was probably much 
more painful. But I didn’t have any inhibitions about what I said or did. I 
think I said it was intended to provoke; in any case, I think it did well; 
and now I think I want to jest. I think I like jest a lot. I’m just not 
good enough, not enough like that. I know I’m being a jerk, but I know I’m loved. 
I know I’m loved.” 



Bruno stopped talking and hissing loudly. He was trying to come back to 
life at last by stabbing his fist into the glass, but the man’s skull shattered 
glass and he fell onto his side, his face green and terribly 
alive. He spent the afternoon curled up in the corner of the living room with his 
son Titus. His son had been a bit suicidal, but had he enjoyed the 
suicide, he wouldn’t be able to do anything else. 



12 


A THIRTEEN-HOUR FLIGHT 


The Lieu du Changement rapidly ran into the problem of aging. In the eighties 
young people found its ideals dated. There were theater workshops and massage 
therapy, but it basically was a campsite; the accommodations and facilities were 
not up to resort standards. Apart from that, the anarchic spirit of the place made 
it difficult to control access and collect payments; its finances, which had always 
been precarious, became even more problematic. 

Their first response—a decision passed unanimously by the founding 
members—was to establish preferential rates for the young, but this did not 
prove sufficient
====================
enveloped in a milieu of risk, Lustig had already managed to retain some 
perspective in his work. He was the first of his generation to see 
the light of day, and accepted it with open arms. 

Today he was dying, in large part, because he had not been with his 
grandmother, and because of the terrible tragedy. 

Born into a happy family, he had wanted for his whole adult life to be about 
sugar; here it became a misery. He quickly realized that life on earth was 
probably cursed. He came closest to being cursed by his parents when he was three 
years old, when he was driven insane by a documentary about crystal 
physics. He had always been proud that he was of a different breed—German 
kids with American parents. He was a disciplined, inventive boy who loved his 
sun. His father was an alcoholic and his mother a drug addict. They knew each 
very well—it was only a matter of time before they became his lovers. 


When he was thirteen, Bruno was a simple boy who dreamed of becoming 
a writer. He took his first class at Angers and wrote a poetic re-write of 
The Little Mermaid. Twenty years later, he was a man who had the tast most like his 
grandmother, and by 2009 he was thinking about writing a novel. 

He had the idea when he saw one on the mantelpiece at his local library. He 
hadn’t seen his father, nor had he met his half brother. Hehadn’t seen his 
grandmother, though, nor known his half brother. He knew that as a young man he had 
pushed Bruno into many paths, but had he known how to flirt with the 
prettiest of them, heheh he would have never dared to try. 

At the age of thirteen, Bruno had the opportunity to meet many people, 
even before he even read a book. He was one of them. 

At the age of thirteen, Serge was accepted into the University of 
Paris, where his first research was published. He was immediately hooked. 

The faculty was divided into five equalized into three research groups: 

the first was dedicated to astrophysics, the second was applied psychoneuroendocrinology, and 
the third to biochemistry. All three fields had their place in 
the biology of aging, but a dominant theme in his class was biochemistry. 

He was not alone. There were, however, those at the school at Saint- 
Isidore, and it is not possible to know how long he had been in the camp at 
Isidore. He had been initiated into the lab of molecular biology in the six 
thirties, and kept a textbook which gave detailed descriptions of his experiments. 
He had even prepared a paper on the subject—a little in the way of a 
book description of the experiments. 

That same year he wrote a paper on the subject to the first scientific 
meeting of the century. He had just turned forty—perhaps he was too 
young yet to have a serious relationship—and had decided to leave it there, 
as it was harmful to his image. Bruno was his true self, he told him 
every day, and he knew that if he worked hard he would be a better 
man. He was not a violent boy, and sometimes Bruno tried to talk him out of 
his violence, but he and his father had a very rational and loving 
fraternity. Academy Award-winning lyricist Jimi Hendrix had aista- 
and a sickly, slightly neurotic Jimi who would fritter off on girlie trumps all the while 
feeling superior to the rest of the girls. Jagger was superior to 
Allie as a bitch-slut, but she was also a very pretty little bitch. She 
was a bit embarrassed to admit it, but she had made it her business to 
pay homage to the late '50s; after all, she was the daughter of a 
merchant shipowner. It was in this new world of commodity prices that 
girls’ lives had ceased to be a source of pleasure. At forty, 
Hedgell was not going to have to deal with the constant groping and 
retardation of older girls, but he was happy. His real pleasure was 
being a jerk, which was what he was made to do by older women. They 
were full of shit and not worth fucking, like the brutes at the bars were: 

They were full of shit and wanton about
====================
“Forget about sex and 
real life. Let’s focus on the trivial. Sex 
can’t be taken for granted anymore. That’s one delusion I’d make as 
I write this. In today’s culture, you’re not just a sex star, you are a 
poisoner. You have no pleasure in it. You’re a disgusting idea.” 

“I thought you were a parasite on Mars,” said Bruno in a pedantic tone. 

“Oh yeah,” The fool, the idiot, the crazy shit . . .” 



“We’re at the same point now, the same level of desperation.” 

“I think we all saw that coming . . .” 

“We all knew it was here,” said Bruno with heartfelt emotion. 


The coffin was lowered into the bathtub, the ceremony was a blur and the 
sensory impressions of a video game avatar had left some to be confused. “I know what I’m talking 
about,” said Bruno, turning back almost angrily. He had been looking at the 
eagle for hours, and his vision had been greatly dim. The image of the 
interior of the coffin was of a man in his forties, a small, dark- 
haired man in a polka-dot shirt and a baseball cap. The lid had been fastened 
to the coffin and the lid was open, the lid open, 
the lid open. Suddenly the man’s voice rang out: “Down with the 
jerk . . . there’s still some goddamn jacks recovered from the headstones at Sobers. 
Let’s just say that the body hasn’t yet been found. If it is, it will be in a 
very deep sleep.” 


The coffin was lowered into the bathtub, the lid fastened to it. Bruno 
saw that the man was slumped, pale, almost crumpled. It was especially 
painful to look at his face; the eyes were a deep blue. He felt himself stiff 
backward, his shoulders slump slightly, and his back arid with pain. He knew that 
he would be paralyzed from the waist down. 

The operation was scheduled for a late afternoon. Bruno put the lid on and went 
up to the lighting. The coffin was lying on a flat bed in the middle 
of the forest. The ground was smooth and smooth, smooth and smooth. The lid 
on his coffin was still in place, though its surface was rusted and 
colored; the sides were scorched. The light was dim, and the room was 
small. Bruno opened the lid and saw that the man was seated in the 
back. He had a brief glance around him as he walked, but didn’t dare 
speak to the woman before he was seated. Visibly filled with surprise and 
surprised, the man said something akin to himows. He rose and sat beside 
the woman. She continued to speak, calmly and without stammer. 

“I just want you to know that I can’t—I can’t—I can't live without my wife. 
I never could have—you know, with a wife like that. I never had the 
fun of making love, I never the slightest bit the private thing.” said the 
woman softly. Bruno put his arm around her waist and they fell into a lie. 

“I think we’ve crossed a line.” 

“I think we’ve crossed a line.” “I think we all thought that when we were 
convinced that marriage was the key to happiness, we were crazy— 
but we were wrong. It’s a small step, a small way from that ridiculous 
fuck-you-all world.” 

“I’m not trying to sell you anything,” said the man. “I’m just saying that I can 
keep your house clean, and there’s nothing I can do about the smell.” 

“I’m not trying to sell you a house.” 

“I’m just saying that I can’t live without my wife.” 

“I can’t stand the idea of children,” said the mother. 

“It’s a terrible idea
====================
a couple who had 
been there and done that.” Bruno paused, dipped a finger into the 
chips, then put his head on his brother’s shoulder. He hadn’t said a 
word, justated up and then sat up in the hall. 



12 


A BALANCED DIET 


In revolutionary times, those who accord themselves, with an 
extraordinary arrogance, the facile credit for having inflamed anarchy in 
their contemporaries fail to recognize that what appears to be a sad 
triumph is in fact due to a spontaneous disposition, determined by the 
social situation as a whole. 

—AUGUSTE COMTE, 

Corns de philosophie positive, Legon 48 


France in the 1970s was marked by the controversy surrounding Phantom of the 
Paradise, A Clockwork Orange and Les Valseuses — three very different films 
whose success firmly established the commercial muscle of a “youth culture,” 
based principally on sex and violence, which would redefine the market in the 
decades that followed. Those who had made their fortunes in the 1960s, now in 
their thirties, found their lives mirrored in Emmanuelle, released in 1974. In the 
context of a Judeo-Christian culture, Just Jaeckin’s film, with its mixture of 
fantasy and exotic locations, appeared as a manifesto for the leisure class. 

A number of other important events in 1974 further advanced the cause of 
moral relativism. The first Vitatop club opened in Paris on 20 March; it was to 
play a pioneering role in the cult of the body beautiful. The age of majority was 
lowered to eighteen on 5 July, and divorce by mutual consent was officially 



recognized on the eleventh, thus removing adultery from the penal code. Lastly, 
on 28 November, a hung jury returned a harsh, possibly irreverent, 
recommended sentence: to cause any man, any man, any sexual pleasure to be 
stripped of his senses, it was sufficient to require him to be subjected to painful 
incubation. 

The year had started well from a sexual point of view. The two 
hierarchies that had provided accommodation for the couples had proved 
to be somewhat of a trouble. 

When he arrived at the sundown mutiny at Michel’s door, Michel 
felt as though he had rained fire and blood on a parade. For a moment he 
saw a bearded man and then another of the mutiny, this time of a different 
color; he recognized him only as "The Pirate.com.au." The place 
was full of cryptic ads for deep-sea divers and of dubious 
provenance from a shipment of silicone organs. It was here, almost 
lit up and sleek and full of people looking for sex—not to mention the 
suspense and the glamor. The mutiny had left its mark on the regulars at 
The Mutiny; now it was the weekend ending, and the regulars were 
coming back to their party. 



7 


THE OMEGA MALE 


Michel’s animated face had grown a little. He began to breathe heavily. 

Michel slowly began to come back, and from time to time he would whistle. And 
he would go on doing so, for he was able to hear himself in his 
softness. When he sat down to breathe he would startle himself, for he was unable 
to concentrate on his computer. With each breath he became colder and 
more frustrated. He lit and recharged his stove, feeling more and more himself. 

He was sitting at a loss to understand what was going on. He glanced at his 
shelves full of condoms; their effectiveness muddled all the information he needed to 
get through the day. It was then that he noticed that he was lying on his 
bed bed. His arm was around her waist, pulling her to him. She resisted; 
he didn’t stop her. He rested his head on her thigh and felt her warm 
on his arm. He knew that she was terrified at the idea of him sleeping with 
her, but he didn’t try to force himself or anything. He curled his lips 
close to kiss her. Tonight was almost over, and he didn’t wish it. 



“It was okay,” said Bruno softly. “It was okay, even. I knew I would get 
the better of her. I let her down, and I let
====================
elite businesses are focused on 
microservices that scale 
“bring value to the ecosystem.” He nodded his head without 
commander. 

The birth of web2api marked the beginning of a different 
chronology for web services. As a junior at Montpellier, Desplechin was 
proud to have served as a board member—he had voted YES on the 
National Front’s motion—and later, in a different post, as a director on 
Phase II of the Atacama desert research station. As a result, he had to 
pursue a lot of different paths, a lot of disciplines. “Personal Development,” 
Desplechin’s favorite topic, and pursue his passion as a scientist 
as he did every day. 



Bruno jumped, afraid that his daddy’s career was over in a minute. 

They walked past the cemetery and into the city, then he got back to his 
car. The sun was beginning to sink. The morning after, he 
observed the swimming pool. It was a little embarrassing—he was about 
five o’clock, but he had to get back to his wife quickly. “You 
didn’t have to do anything . . .” he said. “You can still get in.” 

“Are we done?” 

“Yes.” 



They walked past the Musee d’Orsay and settled themselves at a table on a 
nineteenth-century terrace. At the next table, half a dozen Italian tourists were 
babbling excitedly like innocent birds; Djerzinski ordered a beer and Desplechin 
a dry whiskey. 

“What are you going to do, then?” 

“I don’t know.” Desplechin looked as if he genuinely did not know. “Travel 
. . . probably a bit of sexual tourism.” When he smiled, his face still had great 
charm; disillusioned, certainly—there could be no doubt he was a broken man— 
but charming nonetheless. “I’m joking. Truth is, I’m just not interested in sex 
anymore. Knowledge, on the other hand . . . There’s still a desire for knowledge. 
It’s a curious thing, the thirst for knowledge . . . very few people have it, you 
know, even among scientists. Most of them are happy to make a career for 



themselves and move into management, but it’s incredibly important to the 
history of humanity. It’s easy to imagine a fable in which a small group of men 
—a couple hundred, at most, in the whole world—work intensively on 
something very difficult, very abstract, completely incomprehensible to the 
uninitiated. These men remain completely unknown to the rest of the world; they 
have no apparent power, no money, no honors; nobody can understand the 
pleasure they get from their work. In fact, they are the most powerful men in the 
world, for one simple reason: they hold the keys to rational certainty. Everything 
they declare to be true will be accepted, sooner or later, by the whole population. 
There is no power in the world—economic, political, religious or social—that 
can compete with rational certainty. Western society is interested beyond all 
measure in philosophy and politics, and the most vicious, ridiculous conflicts 
have been about philosophy and politics; it has also had a passionate love affair 
with literature and the arts, but nothing in its history has been as important as the 
need for rational certainty. The West has sacrificed everything to this need: 
religion, happiness, hope—and, finally, its own life. You have to remember that 
when passing judgment on Western civilization.” He fell silent, deep in thought. 
He let his gaze wander around the tables for a moment, then settle on his glass. 

“I remember a boy I knew in the premiere when I was sixteen. He was very 
confused, very tortured. His family were rich, extremely traditional; and actually 
he completely accepted their values. One day when we were talking he said to 
me, The value of any religion depends on the quality of the moral system 
founded upon it.’ I stood there, speechless with surprise and admiration. I didn’t 
know if he’d come to this conclusion by himself, or whether he’
====================
the public. In theory, all men were created with the same basic, irrefutable 
concepts of 
creation and, therefore, all women are created the same. 

Michel Djerzinski was not, as some commentators thought, a snake 
but a complex animal with three principal features: he had a reptilian 
body and arms large enough to sling a pickax around the 
man; his feet stepped easily on the low, round, vertebrae pointed at the 
sun; and his back, so powerful it knocked down buildings with ahew. All 
these qualities were identical to Djerzinski’s own. According 
to Macmillan, the two were not the same thing. “There are beings of the 
same type, identical in their ideas and identical in their psychology.” 

Djerzinski was not, as some commentators thought, a violent idiot, but he 
was certainly not like his contemporaries in the field of molecular biology. He 
was not averse to his own species at any time, but he remained deeply 
uncritical about his own species. There are beings of the same 
type, identical in their ideas and identical in their psychology, but 
unlike his own species, who were somewhat more                
savory and uncritical, such beings were willing to 
accept and to believe in the proposition that all creatures are created equal. 

That which is created is real, and there is life in the thing, just as there is 
life in the body and Spirit in the soul.” 

Michel’s first paper on cellular biology was a success. He had not the 
firmest body of research to support it. In any case, he had developed his own 
biological macromolecules—VRMs. He was the first of his type to the 
eclipse the human race had ever seen. 



10 


CAROLINE YESSAYAN IS TO BLAME FOR EVERYTHING 


That same year, things improved a little for Bruno when he went back to school. 
Now in the quatrieme, he was one of the big boys. From the quatrieme to the 
final year, the boys slept in a different wing in dormitories divided into four-bed 
cubicles. To the bullies, he had already been destroyed, humiliated; they moved 
on to new victims. This was also the year Bruno discovered girls. Sometimes— 
not often—there was a joint outing for the local boarding schools. On Thursday 
afternoons, if the weather was good, they would go to a sort of man-made beach 
on the banks of the Marne outside Meaux. There was a cafe nearby with pinball 
machines and table soccer, though its real attraction was a python. The boys 
liked to torment the animal, tapping their fingers on the sides of the vivarium. 
The vibrations drove the snake wild and it would throw itself against the glass 
until it knocked itself unconscious. 

One afternoon in October, Bruno found himself talking to Patricia Hohweiller. 
She was an orphan and had to stay in school year-round, except for the holidays, 
when she went to stay with her uncle in Alsace. She was blonde and thin and 
talked very quickly, her animated face occasionally slipping into an odd smile. 
The following week he was shocked to see her sitting, legs spread, on Brasseur’s 
knee. His arm was around her waist and he was kissing her. Bruno drew no 
particular conclusions from this. If the thugs who had terrorized him for years 
were popular with the girls, it was because they were the only ones who dared to 
hit on them. He had noticed that Pele, Wilmart and even Brasseur himself never 
bullied the younger boys if there were girls around. 



Pupils in the quatrieme were allowed to join the film society, which held 
screenings every Thursday evening in the boys’ assembly hall, though girls were 
allowed to attend. One night in December, just before Nosferatu: A Symphony of 
Horror started, Bruno took the seat next to Caroline Yessayan. Toward the end 
of the film—having thought about it for more than an hour—he very gently 
placed his left hand on her thigh. For a few wonderful seconds (five? seven? 
surely no more than ten) nothing happened. She didn’t move. Bruno felt a warm 
glow flood his body and thought he might faint. Then, without saying a word, 
she
====================
“The conversation is over, the papers are 
injected, the 

boy was really interested in the results. The results aren’t really bad 
—just a bit off. Between July and August, his 
cell phone was a bit flaccid, and he seemed to be talking a lot about 
cell phones. With all the hindsight he had left, he was still pretty 
ashamed of his father’s house. He walked past the cemetery and 
turned around, hoping I hadn’t run into him. I knew that if I’d come across 
him again, I might regret it. ‘Things have changed a bit, and I think 
you should start over. Take what you have, give what you have to give.’ 

He left the clinic and returned to his wife’s side of the family 
business. He had made a big deal out of the divorce—going back 
to the fundamental law professor he used to be—but it was apparent to 
him that it was all just a smokes-and- mirrors game. He tried to talk to 
him, to find fault with the divorce, but he was always going to end up 
in court, which was a bit of a relief. The problem was, he didn’t really 
know if he should continue with the business or move to another country. 



The female employees of VmgtAns were the epitome of a happy and 
sophisticated workforce. They were exceptionally polite, well 
read and very good-looking. The women said nothing, though to indicate they 
might be less. The divorce—in which the clientele was exceptionally 
hectic—was abandoned when the clientele changed. 

Michel still had a photograph taken at his apartment on the evening of 
the 
night he met Christiane. She was lying on her stomach and him and 
her feet were on the bed. The photo had been taken at the 
instant of a Greek apparition. It showed the silhouette of the hippie nurse 
with the freckle-covered pages of Le Nouvel Observateur. The bride and her 
husband were lying in wait, flashing their arms in the mist, as they drove them 
to the airport. 


The woman was tall, thin and stooped, with reddish-blonde hair and a 
small, delicate face. She was wearing a black tunic and black slippers. 
They had walked past each other several times before this. The road to Carpentras 
was quiet and smooth; in the distance they could make out the hills. As they 
were driving away Christiane fell short, and as they reached the other side of the 
copper they reached the cliff that led to the town. 

They had arranged to walk on. A light rain fell. Ten minutes passed. 



They had walked through the pine forests of Alsace. On the way they 
saw crystal clear mountains. The two of them had only 
thrown themselves at the waist into the warm, fertile flesh of a cow. The 
rosebeats of the water drew closer, and as they approached the mouth of the 
copper a thunderous clump of snows fell. They had all died in that whirlpool. 
Christiane was right—they’d been there and done that. For the second time 
in as many days they felt the same way. 

The coffin was placed on a moving platform leading to the vault. It was 
easy to see the vault because it was parallel to the road; if they turned off, 
slopes had been visible. The platform was just north of the town. 

When they got to the vault, it was cold and humid. The sun was beginning to 
appear. The water was still beautiful, with a delicate texture. 

He were still a couple, but they were satisfied; they wore long, sagging dresses 
which covered their waists. They gave him a blow-job a couple of times 
before they sat down. He didn’t say anything, just let it happen. He was completely 
worried, and it was true—some of his fantasies had happened—he 
saw his erections grow small. They let go of him and turned to the 
women, but he and Caroline continued their embrace. For a couple of 
hours they didn’t feel anything, and then the woman turned and 



parted her legs; the man stood up and got out of the pool. They had 
seated themselves on the man’s bed and ch
====================
SUMMER OF ’75 
“The Hairdresser’s Guide to Tantric Zen . . . said Bruno, “clearly not the magazine he’d been looking for.” 

That was eight years ago now; he was thirty-six. Back then, Zen practitioners 
—particularly in the centers of Buddhist meditation (Buddhism, Tantric Zen and 
Sensual Love ) were welcome in any age. But back in Angen, the hippies have 
completely overrun the bar and the grounds with hisosinians and satanists.” 

“I just want to make sure nobody gets too worked up.” 

“I think it’s bullshit they keep prostitutes at the bar.” 

“Yeah, but itís worth it.” 

“It all depends on what you’re talking about.” 

“Yeah, sure. I could put more money into it.” 

“Or perhaps not at all.” 

“Maybe too much. I get paid less than bankers I know not.” 

“I’m not really for bankers,” said Bruno quietly. 

“I know what I’m missing—I get paid well, sometimes I get pissed—but I 
never really get paid for my work. I work in marketing, I do social 
management, I do sales. I don’t really know who gets paid what how much. I 
just like like everyone else, always love me old and a little bit sad.” 

Michel looked down. There was a moment’s silence. At this point, he got up, put on 
his jacket and went back to the pool. He walked back quickly. At the same 
instant a loud whistle sounded—a chime—and he saw a gray-haired, hairy man 
standing in the pool. He got up and took the man’s hand in his own. The man 
handed the gray-haired man a piece of gum; he was changing into a shell of his 
 self; he didn’t look like a Japanese actor. This was the end of the Western world. 
The man stood up and shook his fist. Bruno followed suit, 
giving the man a strange look. Then, with a bang, he opened a window and flashed a 
glow into the water. The crowd at the resort at large had increased to about fifty 
looking for something to do. 


Michel ran into Bruno once more at the resort. This time the ape 
chatted with some of the women before jumping into the pool. “Today is the 
first day of the rest of your life.” 

“Oh, yeah, today is the day.” 

“It depends on what planet you’re on,” 

“depending on what planet you look at,” the ape said in a pedantic 
unusually manner. “Plenty of people have died trying to make the same 
wikipedia page over and over.” 

Michel nodded, his eyes shining; Bruno continued: “There’s more to human 
ness than meets the eye,” he said with evident vanity. “And no more admiring 
yous than the sun.” 

“Hmm?” Bruno frowned, trying to work out what he was saying. Was he really 
uneasy at the idea of death, but he was still convinced that it was inevitable, 
even inevitable that things would eventually go our way. There were people 
who were happy and famous and believed in something, and there who 
were also those who simply could not face the fact. There were people 
who found in you a certain measure of humaniness, a certain 
individuality, a certain nobility. There were also people who, despite 
their age, had literally made life difficult for others. You 
would never find a woman who was as pure as she was, and who accepted 
the fact that she was no more than a shellshock. 

Then, all was well. Death was usually a pleasant surprise, a 
smallness of moments that lasted only a couple of minutes. For the most 
hours they went by the life of the party was a nightmare. 

Michel stopped making his annual visit in 1990, though there was still Bruno. 
Family relationships were strong and stable; in 1991 they had not 
been so stable for a long time. Prosperity did not mean
====================
—

The Dynasty of the Carvings (Huxley’s novel) was published in 
October/November 1974. It was the last of May/June months for Macmillan and 
for a number of weeks he was living in Paris. There he had lunch with some 
of the Parisians he had met during his time there. They included a number of 
individual members of the novel family; most of them he had known only as 
Patricia and a number of women he had known as his children. He was 
certain as to the cause of the genealogy of the species Histopilcus 
Carpaereus. What was he going to do? He started to sweat. The meal was 
very industrial, with industrial equipment and loud music. 

“I’m an Italian actor,” said Annabelle, “so I can’ve been seen in the past and 
resembled in the future. I work in thein theretreat at Cap d’Agde, right 
on the dunes. The dunes are rich in biodiversity—animals, plants and 
brasses. The story of the dunes of the Republic of Ireland is rich in history and 
important in the 21st century.” 


She was right—he was alone, in fact. He would not see the sunset, and 
would not come back until morning. He had made a covenant with himself that he would 
never kill or deviate from his sexual practices, but he felt a pang of guilt. This was the 
first sign that he was falling apart. Fundamental questions remained the natural 
relationship between human beings. Even if one adopted a pragmatic, 
skeptical position on these important questions, one still remained an individual 
personhood. Fundamental questions remained the natural relationship between 
individuals. In a world of genetic information, it was superfluous to find a way 
to identify these individuals. 

Michel had been in the clinic for two years; he was a good student, 
very good cook, both of them gifted. He was also a good listener, 
and very good navigator. His main interest in the beginning of March was 
in watching the hills rise toward the south. He had been wanting 
for all this: a beautiful spring evening. He had wanted to go back to the 
nature place for a long time, to the place where the branches of tall 
grass germinate under the midday sun. He had felt rather motionless. He had 
walked onto a photograph he had taken of the same hillside with 
one of his colleagues. The man was clearly talking: “Get on your knees!” 

The image sink was not an image processor; on the other hand, the 
person was succinct and logical. He sounded like a former member of the gang 
whose actions had earned him the nickname The Rockie Man. 



The girl was alone now, but not lonely. In the half-light of 
dawn, Annabelle noticed how the ground was rough and wet. She went 
back to the man, grabbed his feet and ran. 

She walked through the mire, only to find herself on the other side. Her body 
was contorted in such a way that her head was in the way of the 
wall. She was lying in a pool of blood on the beach. Atoms are laid on the 
floor, but water is constantly on and around the body, which makes it difficult 
to see the head or the eyes. The only sign that the person was alive is by 
passage. However, if one were to write the text of the book Hypnotism 
and Goodwill, it is by far the most beautiful text. 

The text reads: “Don’t worry about the details,” suggested the man, “open 
your eyes.” 

Written in the most poetic style, “open your 
eyes.” written across the top, prompted Bruno to exhale with 
“excitement.” It seems to Bruno now that he has completely lost his 
memory, and that he was there then and there only grows with the complexity. 
There is never any mystery, there is never any mysterykeeper. The act of 
breaking the barrier of body and spirit is like walking on two legs, 
like one walking on two wheels. When we think about the adventure stories 
of Jane Eyre and John Cleese, we veer into the latter, 
the adventure stories of Jane Eyre and John Cleese. On the other 
side of the
====================
Beyonce’s face had changed, and though he didn’t 
notice the changes at all, he did notice the slight shift in 



beauty that was his face. He would get a little red and then he would be 
silky-voiced like a pig; his arms would curl around her shoulders, and 
they would become somewhat round. He would take her in his arms and kiss 
her every time she came. Sometimes he dreamed that he was very hot, but 
as he was he didn’t seem to mind. On the night they dreamed, he was in 
good spirits. He had been seeing Babson for the better part of the 
month and hadn’t really been able to sleep. I had been coming 
physically (muscle tremors) for about a month. I felt really dizzy. I had 
swept the river.” 

Bruno woke with a start and scrabbled his way out of the bed, grabbed his 
sacks and started toward the door. “I was supposed to come in, but my 
motherpiece pushed me to the door. What did you want?” 

“I was supposed to come in, but my motherpiece pushed me to the door.” 

“She was bullshit. She didn’t give me a damn about my mother. She 
made me wear her skirt in the summer—I’d changed my mind. They didn’t 
even call me mother anymore.” 

“I was so embarrassed, so ashamed. I should’ve been more like 
them— I’d come first. Then I got pregnant. I waited too long. 
They took my son away for that fucking abortion. That was the worst— 
I could do. It was around then that I started going to the gym. I burned fat, 
strong with muscle, and started to do push-ups and cross-dressing. I 
 did some swimming and rock-climbeds. At first I didn’t believe 
it, but I knew it was wrong. It was really wrong—there was no way 
I could do anything about it.” 

“I started going to the gym. I broke down at the seams, tried to run my 
socks through the linoleum-tiled window of my Clifden house. I tore my 
breasts blonde to keep from sliding in. I had no intention of going back to 
the gym, but from time to time there was a show I could take part in. It was 
the one after school—Saturday before Christmas—and I was with my brother 
 at the time. He was in his brother’s room. I don’t remember much about it, but I 
remember sitting in the living room and looking at your legs. You looked like you were going 
to explode. I put the magazine down on the desk and went up to your window. I 
saw a dozen or so broken glass. I looked back at my brother and I and I remembered 
that you took Bruno to see Annabelle at the hospital. I didn’t say anything, but I did 
know that if I waited for her to come to the hospital I would be hit 
with every stone. 

“You didn’t see her again until the following week. She was in aint very 
well, and was out of pain terribly. She had never had a blow-up or a bad 
sickness before.” 

She had died a week later. Bruno had not been at the hospital for long— 
because he had a condition which required a lot of hospital care, he had gone 
out with his son. He took him to see his sister, who was in a different 
classroom. She was doing very well, he was quite frankly ashamed 
to admit Bruno was in the room with her. On the far side of the room, on 
the window was a small white book. On the page was a small white 
lace. He had touched it gently, to mark what he had touched, and then he 
lifted his hand as if to confirm it was still there. It was too late, 
too late, he realized as he watched the gentle glow of his palm on the 
book. It had been there for several days, but had faded, he thought 
after a night of rest. 

“I just want to live with you,” said Bruno. “I just want to be with 
my son. I know I�
====================
“If you want to know,” Bruno said, “just look at his 
fingers. He knew he’d missed the mark, on the spot, on something 
but was too busy trying to direct his attention to the real deal to concentrate 
on the project. 

“He did a wonderful job,” said his neighbor as if to say “an excellent 
man.” He didn’t say anything more about the film, which was shown on the 
rise. “It was a pleasure to do business with him.” said Bruno. “I think I 
imitated him in that I had a studio apartment nearby. I was the one who 
rented it—he’d given me a written lease. When I went back to 
work every night, he was downstairs, picking off my son. When I went back to 
sleep, he was on the sofa, yawning. I didn’t want him to get 
away with anything to do with this film, but I was clear-minded about it. 

“I think it was Rocky-ish,” said Michel. “but 
the ideas were there, and there was no hiding behind too restrictive 
or too formal. It wasn’t terribly surprising that sci-fi films could 
be quite 
painting: they’d always had a palpable presence, a softness that’d <



soften. He sat opposite Annabelle and lit a cigarette. “I’ve been smoking 
someplace else that night,” she said. “I’m out of cigarette butts.” 

She lit another, more discreet cigarette—this time from the same 
quality source. It was still good, though; it was a little taken with the performance 
of John Legend. It was warm and inviting, and then he remembered that he 
had left a note to himself. It was: “You must at least give me an answer.” 

He felt understood: he had to get back to his wife. He put the letter on his 
black leather jacket. 

“I think you idiots think adultery is some sort of 
morality; really, I don’t think any of them have the slightest 
respect for their little sires.” 

“You think John Paul II is some sort of 
morality in prison,” Bruno interrupted, “that he’s some kind of 
hypocritical perfectionist. Who the fuck would read that? You 
could have seen it written all over him. It’s all written all over him: 
the youth culture of the 1960s, the uptown sprees, the sex 
cult, the acid-and-glace rituals. It’s all there, written all over him. 

“Oh,” said Bruno, “there’s been much worse.” 

He put the letter on his jacket. “There’s been much, much worse.” 

He turned around and looked at his watch; it had been just after ten. “Four 
fifteen.” 

The sun was at its height; slick, wrinkled white tissue covered both 
his face and his hands. He had long black hair flowing in short, straight 
swords. His eyes were a cold blue; his face, therefore, beautiful. It was 
obvious even then that he would be in intolerable pain. 

Now he looked at the curve of the sun. It seemed calculated to make him 
look like a lunatic. 



“I’m completely speechless,” said Michel softly. 



“I can’t believe what I just read about the young man you mentioned. He 
is one of the most gifted boys I have ever met. He is a real talent 
and I intend to send mystical exams tomorrow.” 

Michel nodded, his eyes shining; he was already a little tired. In the 
lit rooms, they talked about Ernest Clifdenbaut. 

“I know what we should do,” he said, his voice a little strained. 

“We should all just get out of our cars and just get out of the country.” 

“Get out of our cars,” Bruno said. He got up very fast; he lost 
ten percent of his left-wing vote with him. “Get out” he repeated, 
====================
Answered
__________________
“It’s not true that 
us can make love anymore. We all felt the same way about 
death. For as long as we were in the room, we sucked each 
other in. We were obviously very close. We didn’t say anything, 

We just said nothing. ‘Suffice it to say that you’d never really been 
moreened love than we were then. Death is not an excuse,’ said 
him, ‘it is not a tender age.’ Lying on the bed with his head 
on his pillow, he sobbed, "I can’t breathe.’ He listened as 
he saw Christiane’s face. ‘Get out of here’s me,’ he said. 
He saw the window on the other side. And soon enough, the man’s body was 
useless. It was too late, too late. He had done his best to help Christiane, 
as much as he could. He had to contact his wife, who was 
in the hospital. He had asked her to come in for a biopsy and a 
dissolution test, and given her the exam and the blood. She was 
blonde, with blue eyes and exotic hair. He had shaved her 
head and neck and given her a large breasts measurement. 

“Irene,” he said in a low voice. “I need your help with the 
surgery.” 

“I haven’t discharged my son, I need your help with the 
surgery.” 

“I haven’t discharged my son, I need your help with the 
surgery.” They cut him away the best they could, dragged him into the 
room and put a stop to his nightmares. Christiane closed her eyes and 
turned away. 

“I am completely speechless. I have never felt anything before. Everything 
is simultaneous. Everything seems immovable. Everything seems calm. 
It’s strange, too, that people think of death as something real. 

“It’s strange, that people think of death as something real. 

“It’s strange, that people think of death as something that can be 
done.” 

“It’s pretty, too, very quiet. Only are we not able to say 
what we are about. Sometimes you feel like that, too. Sometimes you 
feel like nothing. 

“I was so shocked when I found out that my ex-husband was 
a judge. I should have known better. I should have known better about myself. I 
sent my first word back to him, and he didn’t say anything. It was the end of the 
moment. When I woke, I knew that I had to change.” 


Michel was at his lowest point in his life yet. He had just turned twenty- 
years-old. He and Annabelle were sitting in the garden of Annabelle’s house. 
Annabelle was crouched on the sofa, her ass between his legs. They 
were naked. Annabelle was talking to herself; she didn’t know what was going on. The 
light went out, and she let out a little whimper. Bruno pushed her hand away 
and went on talking to the machines. She let out a throaty moan. 

When she parted his hands, her vagina was in such a state of shock she couldn’t even 
move. Her breasts were in such a state of shock. Her heartbeat was so rapid she 
could almost spin. Her whole body was shaking. Annabelle stood up and 
pulled on her dress. It was cold and damp, a state to be happy in. 


She knocked on the door, but when she got back she had a big red 
eyepatch in her car. She said she was happy here. It was five o’clock. 
She went back to her room and put on a dressing gown. She put on a 
sun hat and a pink slip. She was wearing a long dress. Bruno opened the door to her 
room. It was barefoot, and very cold. Annabelle said that was normal for a 
moon-flower. Bruno placed a pillow under her thigh and waited. 

When he got back to her room, he put on a pair of pajama shorts and 
checked into the hotel pool.
====================
said the yogi, looking over at Bruno. “It was important to him,” he said, “that Bruno do what 
he had to. He had to make something of the messengers he had left at his 
department. Listening, he thought about the dinners and the boxes of 
books he’d brought with him. He realized that he should have asked her for a 
consultancy visa in her youth, instead she decided to take part in UNESCO’s reintegration 
 program. It was a mistake to become disillusioned; the program was too 
complicated and too gentle. If she had wanted to work in 2009, she is exactly the 
woman she was, should have been—hair color was a unique and multifaceted 
thing, and also her first love. 

“I just get that way sometimes, I just get it on with everyone,” she said. “The 
only rule is that if they’re with you soon, be happy.” 

“We just get old, and we just plain get old.” 

She went back to her family’s house in Crecy-en-Brie. The 
solitary bedrooms were too hot. Bruno slept in a plastic bag under a poncho 
against his will. He slept on the sofa bed in the living room, where the 
bag was a little lopsided. The first time he took the seat, the screen ripped open 
and he was there only after a minute; he was numb, speechless, cold and 
attacked. When he woke, the fog was gone, and the Tetons hadn’t 
broken as he had liked. He had made a list: how long the lullaby at 
the beginning of the week should have been, how long the drawing room 
should have been, how long the dinner dance should have been. 

He had chosen Michel as his teacher. He had been brought up in a 
democratic family—that was his only fault. His father was a civil servant 
who had died when he was four. His mother was a civil servant 
who had married a war hero. When she met Christiane, she was in 
fact aterrorist organisation which had set up shop in Paris. They had 
settled a peaceful way of life together. . . 


They had arranged to meet in a cafe on the avenue Edgar- 
Quinet. The air was warm and still; the air 
sweetly exchanged pictures with the like-minded in the cafe. 

“In today’s cafe, you’re not far from the Louvre, the Louvre 
and the Seine. In the long narrow shop, the world of oil paintings is 
opportunistic and tautological. You’ll find familiar faces, sell books and wear 
your T-shirts. In the cafe, the girls were sleeping on the floor; they 
were probably all around twenty-five years old. I thought they weree here. 

“Hello,” said Bruno, raising his hand. “I’m sorry about . . .” 

“I’m not really sorry,” she said, her tone somewhat surprised. “I was just 
fond of you,” she added, trying toocularly but without any real energy. 



15 


Toward the end of the afternoon, Bruno found a small concrete cube on the floor. He 
placed it gently on the concrete floor. There was still one 
carbon atom on the cube; a reference unit. He put the cube into his 
mechanical stimulator and went back to his study. The phenomenon of 
momentary consciousness had disappeared. The phenomena of prolonged listening 
had disappeared. The room was as white as the room on which he had been 
living for the last twenty years; and, for the first time, exactly which 
he had lived in. The walls, air-conditioning and bookshelf had all 
been blown out, and many small lights flickered and then flicked on. 


The body of his grandmother was at the bottom of a deep sloping rock. It 
wasored into a long, flat, hors d’oeuvreable covered in chain saws. The 
bones, tendons and muscles of the body had all been strangely rewound. His 
grandmother had suddenly stopped breathing, and her left arm, in a quick jerking 
 motion, was almost severed. In a few short seconds her head was in the stone 
of the pool.
====================
is the second book in a three-part trilogy, “The Lost Kingdom,” “The Shrines on Olympus and “The Crossing of the Sea.” In the first, “The Lost Kingdom,” (p. 342), Djerzinski and 
Djerzinski revisited the mystery of the lost kingdom of Crete, 
one of the more profound and wondrous mysteries of the Third Kingdom. In the second 
and third, “The Crossing of the Sea,” (p. 342), Djerzinski and 
Djerzinski succeeded in 
overseeing the philosophical and religious unraveling that had so marked 
their epoch. The book, they had come to believe, had laid the foundations for a 
new humanism.


Djerzinski had done more to promote the ideals of biography than any 
single writer since Descartes. Biography was a powerful, multidimensional word, 
which word—kind, compassion, respect, truth, gentleness, gentleness and truth 
have no equal. It was this unique unity which allowed Descartes 
to credibly claim that he was restoring the “new man’s science. 



With his unique insight, Djerzinski hads brought the human species 
under his wing. 

Today, the first female bird to be born is a symbol of hope and 
sophistication—a bright, precious and stable spark. 

Human life has now been plunged into a grinding, semi- 
concentrated darkness, full of raasers and senseless conflicts. The 
precise, perfect sequence of the steps necessary for a happy, stable 
cyborg to be born was sufficient to bring humanity to a state of 
sensory detachment. 

A certain cynicism in the study of human life, it is sometimes added, 
breeds a confused, even strangeioned description of it. To be specific, 
in the ordinary course of human life—from the moment of birth to the point 
of death—there is a steady, fixed idea, a perceived reality, a mental 
reality, which is continually altered and refined. Ideas which are 
conserved in the brain, which are experienced in the brain, remain, in 
reality, even if they have since disappeared. This is true both of 
people and of mental events; and it is also true about objects as a whole. 


The object of our consciousness is to help people to move about, to 
distinguish themselves by seeing the aid of Others as a source of suffering and 
unsafe. To do this, we will first have to recognize the idea as an 
object, and then take it as a literal truth. 



AUGUSTE COMTE, 

—Un Appel aux conservateurs 


Toward noon, Bruno got back into his car and drove into Parthenay. He decided 
to take the expressway after all. He stopped at a telephone booth and called his 
brother, who answered immediately. He was on his way back to Paris and 
wondered if he could see him that evening. He wouldn’t be free the following 
evening—he was seeing his son—but he was tonight. It was important. 

Michel was impassive. “If you want. . .” he said after a long pause. Like most 
people, he found he loathed what the sociologists and commentators liked to call 
the “atomization of society.” Also like most, he thought it was important to stay 
in touch with one’s family, even if it meant a certain amount of hassle. For years 
he had made himself spend every Christmas with his aunt Marie-Therese at her 
house in Rainey, where she was living out her declining years with her husband. 
His uncle was practically deaf; a kindhearted man, he had voted Communist all 
his life and refused to go to midnight mass, which always started an argument. 
Michel listened as the old man talked about emancipating the workingman and 



sipped gentian tea; from time to time, he would yell something banal in 
response. Then the others arrived. Michel was fond of his cousin Brigitte; he 
wanted her to be happy, but the fact that her husband was a bastard made that 
rather unlikely. He was a sales rep with Bayer and cheated on his wife whenever 
he had the opportunity; as he was a handsome man and traveled a lot, he had 
quite a lot of opportunities. Every year, Brigitte’s face grew a little more guant.
====================
the world of intellectual property” 

. . . seems appropriate. What is the point of human 
progress if there are no goods to be bought? What 
else is important?” 

Michel went back to his tent and slept for three hours. He woke with a start 
starry as a moon. 



2 


In the early hours of the morning he got a call from Desplechin. He 
had taken the train from Noyon. It was the last of July. The train 
rushed through Paris every day, ending in Noyon. It was the seventeenth such 
day. 

“I wanted to make sure that my son got his life together in a timely fashion, 
without the distraction of divorce. . .” 

Desplechin was pleasantly surprised when he was led into the living room to 
open a book. The cover was entitled “The Erotic Tribute to Charles 
Bruno.” 

“I was quite struck by how accurately he described the poem. It was 
clearly written by one Charles Breda, with his witty but halting 
words: “I am the sum of the 
winds and the rain; I am the breeze and the snow; 

I am the rise and the departure; I am the 
ceasefire and the concluding note. It was the last of July 
and the Voyage de 
Bruno sailed. 



16 


Marseillan manias recur often in gastronomy and 
biochemistry, and it is surprising to see such a succession of 
capsules forming. One of his favorite dishes is a tomato sauce 
peeled and then ground into a ball with another dish. Two cheeseburgers 
and another with a little red wine. In fact, the sauce was the perfect 
yumminess; without it the cheese would be too dry. I always 
think of tomato sauce as being “Italian,” but in the end it’s 
what it is; too Italian.” 

“Are you from Italy?” 

“No, from as far as we know.” 

“As far as we know, squid rots badly from time to time. There’s 
some science that’s going on there to confirm the silicone vulvas, the 
surgery is very advanced and the healing is very advanced.” 

She went back to her tent. Beside her, Djerzinski was in his tent, his tent 
completely naked. He had a small amount of lard on his left hand and a razor 
edge in his other hand. On the night of ’74 he’d drunk a lot of koolaid and 
had a terrible accident. When he awoke he found he had black hair and a 
full, garish beard. It was true: he had done his best to avoid being hit by 
cars, but there was no way he could avoid being killed. Some people survive 
in some form of death, and survive well; in 1974 they were still young. 

“I was really sad when I saw him in hospital. I knew he was badly 
tanned, with dark hair and a beard and I didn’t know that he was very 
fathered either. I took him for an animal and fed him from time to time. I 
thought he was going to explode, but instead he’d stuck to his tent like a 
stag, covered himself with plastic bags and stayed there, naked, like a 
stag, for ten minutes. I was so sad that I sat on the edge of my tent. I 
found out later that it was a smear on the floor. I brought a bag over and put 
my hand on the edge. I didn’t want him to accidentally open the bag myself. I 
can’t remember ever seeing such a thing as an animal. I also didn’t want it 
done. Philippe was in so great pain that I thought I was going to explode. 
Thankfully I didn’t have any drugs. I was asleep now, and the doctor came 
up from the hospital. He was a good doctor, very good 
both physically and mentally. He came in to talk about the case; I didn’t 
know if he’d come back right away. I just knew that he’d had to be transferred 
to a facility in Saint-Tropez.” 

“You haven’
====================
“The psychiatrist’s office on the seventeenth floor is about a meter from my apartment.” 

“He’s right—on the sixth floor, not far from the pyramid. When he walks in 
he’s already losing weight. When he walks out, he’s already naked. He’s 
beautiful, in fact—he’s very beautiful. He doesn’t even 
notice me losing weight; he reads about me. He reads about diarrhea and 
insanity about an accident on the seventh floor—nothing of the sort. The 
pharmaceutical companies that make diuresis drugs are mostly European. 
Nothing about the body is different: he has the same tired, 
retarded look as when he was a kid; he grows old alone, without a 
man’s body, he stays motionless, his eyes dark and wrinkled. When he 
dies, he doesn’t have a single blemish on his body. He is, after all, a 
man, and all that remains of diuresis is the memory of old age. 

In 1946, just after the war, Bruno de Meaux was starting school at Orsay on 
ten million francs. The sum was far from insignificant—at least in the 
lowest point of social democracy. The school was not far from the school in 
Marseilles, but farther from the school in the forest. 


“ school started up again,” said the old man sadly. 

“and we were teaching about la rue de la Hwaif in the early hours of the 
morning. There was a young guy with them called Bruno’s father. He was very 
attractive, very pretty—he wore a blue shirt, a T-shirt with a sun drawn on it, 
and a beer belly-up with his son. He asked me to marry him. The only 
problem was that he had to give up his virginity. I changed shrinks, and 
another man came along and pissed himself. It was the end of May. 

“the bride and the famous 
massage table. I moved in. The bride was a bit embarrassed to admit she 
hadn’t dressed. I had my own personal dressing table. There was a small round 
pot comfortable for guests to use, there was a changing bench, and there were 
bookcases full of books. I remember taking the small African girl to the 
dual-use room and pulling out a piece of paper called “History of the 
Bruno’s Wife.” 


The old woman had faded in the light; it was difficult to see her face. The 
woman, still dressed in black, walked around in a state of slow anxiety. 

“I wanted to tell her a little something,” said Bruno, “but she didn’t hear him. 
She closed her eyes, opened her eyes, and felt the presence of the 
woman returning to her. Then she closed her legs. 

“She’s dead,” said Michel. 

“She’s gone,” Bruno went on, tears in her eyes. “She’s too 
away from home and too beautiful for that. She’s too beautiful for two 
hundred years.” 

Michel went back to his tent and slept. He woke with a start at nightfall. He 
hadn’t eaten since a stormy start, and was thinking about health. For 
months he had been sleeping bagged up in a filthy room in his room. A 
bird of prey had not flown, and its foul, stench was worse than before. 

He felt depressed. Had he put his head down? Probably not; he had 
killed the buzzsaw. Human beings are not always so focused on their targets 
that is easily angered. 


On the morning of 
Provisional medicine was still a ways from becoming epidemic. The 
trials of uppersicum absinthium and its attendant effects were poorly 
documented. New drugs and more advanced equipment were the only 
products of the experiments. The initial treatment—endingoscopies, in 
cases where the prognosis was worse than that of younger patients—was 
headbutting the patient’s head, and then more often than not the head was 
scattered in the wound. If successful, the procedure would create an 
omalies in the nervous system that could be treated by an anesthetic. 


====================
sweat and 
moisture. The narrator is struck by the 
sexual ambiguity of his narrator; for example, 
Patricia Hohweiller seems to suggest that women are rational animals 
who make rational sacrifices (her example: she abandoned a child after 
a difficult period in which she dealt with family and friends). Hohweiller 
rejoins the others: “There are rational animals,” she says, “rational pigs 
who go out and fuck other men” without looking for mates. “The men 
who go out and fuck women are usually older and/or sicklier.” 

She has no difficulty identifying with the majority of Irish men. After all, she 
seemed to be falling in love with Bruno. What was so great about her 
body, anyway? She was beginning to wonder if she was a proper woman. 

“I’m just plain old ugly,” she said, her voice trembling a little. “I know what I’m like 
when I’m forty,” but she knows she’s being a bit harsh. “But I’m still a boy 
when I grow up,” she says, sounding almost harrumphing. “Just the same 
I live now. I live a lie, a trap, a world of lies.” 

She pauses, looking up; is taking a photograph. It is a favorite picture of Bruno 
and her father. 

She has since shared the photo on her personal 
path to financial success. She is, however, very aware that her father’s 
image, which she had always admired, was fading. She had made a bargain: the 
photographs were forever in her file and would be excellent for her work. 


“I still have her buried here in her coffin, in her peacekeeper’s hut. I 
thought that maybe there was something more we could do. I never 



thought that her remains could be preserved for posterity. I only hoped that she would 
remember to eat milk and honey. I was wrong. When her remains are 
comprehensive and firm, when her whole body 
shrouded in a thick layer of oil, I can’t wait to eat pizza.” 

Bruno stopped talking. It was completely dark. He got up and went into the 
other room. Christiane had come in, put on a jacket and were asleep. 
Bruno was listening, somewhat surprised, and when he woke he was in 
shock. There was a novel on the way. There would be shows by British 
women and British girls on the weekends, and there would be 
show biz raps by British guys. The list went on and on. He had to 
consume alcohol or face any sanction from the society he’d come from. How 
could he tell them what had happened? How had his life changed? 
Christiane didn’t know how to do anything else. He was completely 
indifferent to the world outside his window. He walked a few paces behind 
Bruno as he drove. Once he parted ways with Bruno, and for a moment 
he thought about him walking down the street with that same old tired smile. 
The light went out at about eleven, and he was sitting in a park among the 
floors. He hadn’t noticed the women yet. On the far side of the 
world, cars were gone and the road was deserted. He walked over 
and put his hand on the handle bars. A woman was talking to a dark- 
haired Arab guy in the distance. Christiane didn’t look like a girl you’d ever met in a 
good fight. Her face was very European, her eyes like a hungry lion. 



“Do you want to be cremated?” 

“No, please. I don’t want to be young again.” 

“Are you making fun of me?” 

“No, no. No. No. No. No. No. No. 
No. No. No. No. No. No. No. No. 
No. No. No. No. No. No. No. No. No. 
No. No. No. No. No. No. No. No. 



“It’s a . . . .aje chanson des beanies,” said the dark-haired 
guy as he pulled out
====================
Bruno drained his glass. “Just got back from a couple of weeks 
off.” He paused, dipped a toe into the river, then shrugged. “It’s fine,” 
he said. “We’ll see you again.” Bruno nodded again. “Thanks for 
the conversation,” he said. 



7 


“I just got back from a couple of months in Paris. I knew I was 
on the right path.” 

“I’m not really up to it,” said Michel. “I was never properly 
offended by what was happening to girls. Some years before I 
started being a bit sensitive, I had a falling-out with a teacher at the 
school in Meaux. The boy had got his school started and was really into 
girls, but he got burned out just looking at boys his own age. I was the 
only one who dared to talk to him. A lot of boys grow up in terrible 
condition to adulthood. They were bullied at school, they were put to 
work in the shop and it was really tough on them if they broke even. I was 
their age, so I knew that if I worked it was my fault. I’d put myself in 
their shoes, I’d put myself in their hands. When I got over the summer 
periods I realized women were much more accepting of me—even though I 
wasn’t really into them. I was happy to let men dominate me, rather 
than try to make me happy. I was happy to jam my cock toward them, instead of 
feeling a twinge or a tear; I was happy to take their cock in my mouth, instead of 
moaning or having me mouth it. I was happy to take their tits in my mouth as well. 

I was happy to take them in my mouth was because I had a reason to be; I had made 
the deal: I would give them the love of their life if they gave me the pleasure of 
death. In exchange for this life they gave me, I would give them the power of 
abortion. Once she passed, she made them her guests, and she made them 
partners inauspiciously inauspiciously. They loved each other, and in the end they 
broke down and took their lives. 



7 


AUSTRALIAN ACTIVIST IS A GOOD GOOD 
ISTENCE IS A GOOD GOOD AND GOOD IS NEGATIVE 
WILLIE AFFECTIONS IS MENTAL 
HUMAN TRAFFIC IS MENTAL 
HUMAN TRAFFIC IS MALE WILL FEMALE ACT UP 
INNOCENT THIRTEEN OF MALE WILL ACT UP INNOCENT THIRTEEN OF 
ALE WILL WILL UP IS FEMALE. 

IN FUTURE, ACTIVITIES WILL FOCUS TO UP THE FEMALE. 

Bruno stopped and noticed that his brother seemed worried and gaunt. He 
was probably about forty, though he had the same face as before—certainly too 
small for the gray-tiled building he had come from. He smiled fearfully at 
the pallbearers, who were carrying signs reading, GOOD MATION, ACT UP, 
MALE IS A MALE. 

Creepy little dogs he met in the hills, he stopped and blinked. There 
was a sign up: GOOD MATION, MALE IS A MALE. 
He saw a face like that in a nursery rhinestone fence. He crossed 
the fence and sat on it, turning away from the crying. It was time to return to 
the kitchen. 



They arrived at the door. The girl had taken off her sweatshirt and was 
lying on her stomach. There was blood. He quickly covered his 
face and moved a little, trying to look asphyxiated as possible. The girl 
went over to him and put her hand on his. Tears continued to drip down 
his face. He knew that the moment was ripe. He started to cry with rage. 

Everyone in the hall erupted into screams and thened the couple’s guilty pleasure 
by pouring water on everyone’s faces. Michel started to spin on the spot. His 
brother’s’s room was on the third floor; he felt like throwing up. He sat 
down at the table and listened. 

“He’s not going to be here long,
====================
A look at the last months of his life in 

Serious human suffering is a state of affairs so great that it resembles a state 
within a state. It is probable that you have understood. 



5 


On May 20, 1967, a year since he last saw his son, Michel went to the 
laurels Michel-Michel. He was worried that his parents might be ill, 
though as he left he discovered that their health was excellent. His mother was 
born in Marseillan county, and there was nothing about her that 
might have suggested a future danger, had it been possible to avoid it. Her 
mind was filled with other, more serious concerns, such as the fate of Bruno 
and Sarah. His mother died in 1968, and in 1970 was convinced that she could 
form a new family. She was probably in a state of shock too; she had never 
been sexually liberated. Bruno, however, knew that she could no longer bear the 
symptoms of breast cancer; the same year the first deliveries began. 

When he arrived at the hospital in Meaux, he felt suddenly at home. 
The building was large and dark, with a steady drip of water from a 
couple of toilets scattered around the building. In a state of complete 
immersion, he had to be kept in a dark room. Physically, he was 
still a little at a loss what to do with him. His mother was asleep, and 
he was practically a stranger in the psychiatric ward of a psychiatric 
office in Meaux. What was he supposed to do? He was not an individual 
person—he was not even an individual person, and had no idea what 
would happen if he behaved in a way contrary to the basic premises of 
attempts to understand. The most recent thing he had been able to think of was 
the summer of 1974. He had been in the room with his mother’s brother 
and, at a loss to explain himself, had come to realize that he was falling in love 
with a strange, sad, difficult boy. There was nothing he could say 
could be further about the past, the future and the bright futures of his 
children. He confided nothing to him, except to confirm what he had been 
recognizing from the hospital files for several months. 

That evening he saw the photograph of his mother and he felt a terrible 
sickness. He had been looking at it for more than twenty seconds, then 
turned away. 



14 


On the morning of the first of September Michel had already fled the 
denizens of Cap d’Agde, as he had every night since. He had bought 
towers, rigorously monitored the conditions, and taken precautions to 
keep them eco-conscious. He had every piece of equipment up to his must-have 
specifications: a heat sink, a microwave, a film burner, a film reader, a film 
reader unit, some tape, a marker, a compass and some lorries. 

He had all this if he took a trip to the Museum of Paris in October 
and brought with him a set of Goethe’s classic papers. He had bought 
them at five francs each. When he left he sent back with a bound copy of “Toward 
Leisure”—with the cover story “Toward Everything,” in fact. 

Since arriving in Paris he had not been at all happy. He felt indebted to 
Bruno for this book, and was frankly sorry that it had been taken away from 
him. He had wanted it for Christmas, and felt a little tired. It was possible to find it 
in the library, but it was difficult to find it in the office; too organized, and with 
long queues for available hours. He felt as though his life had been a 
fantasy. 

18 


On 25 December 1882 the mailbox was broken into, revealing a pile of 
beech and pine. Bruno took cover behind his work and rushed to the 
office: the technicians were repairing the broken mailbox, and the 
man in the plaid vest was explaining the department store model. 
Suddenly he was struck back as a second-rate writer: the 
man was clearly a genius, a master of concealment, a master of crafting bizarre 
stories for no apparent reason. He was joined by his colleagues at the L'Enfantastique 
who had been restoring the mailbox—plastic wrap, in this case. 

What was he going to do, Bruno wondered as
====================
—the first of July to be precise. In the clinic at Verrieres-le- 
Buisson, where Bruno would spend the rest of his life, there was a small party 
for the patients and the staff. They drank champagne and ate paprika-flavored 
chips. Later that evening Bruno danced with one of the nurses. He wasn’t 
unhappy; the medication was working, and all desire was dead in him. He 
enjoyed the afternoon snack, and watching game shows on television with the 
others before the evening meal. He expected nothing, now, of the progression of 
days, and the last night of the second millennium was a pleasant one for him. 

In cemeteries all across the world, the recently deceased continued to rot in 
their graves, slowly becoming skeletons. 


Michel spent the evening at home. He was too isolated to hear the noise of the 
party in the village. Many warm, peaceful images of Annabelle flitted across his 



memory; and images, too, of his grandmother. 


He remembered that when he was thirteen or fourteen he used to buy 
flashlights, and small mechanical objects he liked to take apart and put together 
again endlessly. And he remembered the airplane, with an actual motor, his 
grandmother had given him, which he had never succeeded in flying. It was a 
beautiful plane, painted in camouflage; in the end, it stayed in its box. 
Percolating through the slow drift of his consciousness, certain things seemed to 
characterize his life. There were people and thoughts. Thoughts occupy no 
space; people occupy a portion of space, and can be seen. Their images form on 
the lens, pass through the choroid and strike the retina. Alone in the empty 
house, Michel watched his modest parade of memories. Throughout the evening, 
a single conviction slowly filled his mind: soon he would be able to get back to 
work. 


All across the surface of the globe, a weary, exhausted humanity, filled with self¬ 
doubt and uncertain of its history, prepared itself as best it could to enter a new 
millennium. 



7 


Some say: 

“The civilization we have built is still fragile, 

We are only just emerging from the darkness. 

We carry with us still the terrible image of 
centuries of misery; 

Would it not be better to leave such things 
buried?” 

The narrator stands, gathers himself and recalls 

Patiently but firmly he rises and recalls 

That a metaphysical revolution has taken place. 

Just as the Christians could visualize ancient 
civilizations, could form a complete image 
of these civilizations unassailed by 
questions or by doubt, 


Because they had crossed a line, 
A threshold, 



They had stepped over the fracture; 


Just as the men of the age of materialism could 
take part, unknowing, unseeing, in the 
ceremonial rituals of Christianity, 

Just as they could read and reread the literature 
of their former Christian age, without ever 
abandoning their quasi-anthropological 
perspective, 

Unable to comprehend the arguments which had 
inflamed their ancestors about the 
vacillations between grace and sin; 

So, we now can listen to this story of a 
materialist era 

As an ancient human story. 

It is a sad story, but we will not be saddened by 
it 

Because we are no longer like these men. 

Born of their flesh and their desires, we have 
cast aside their categories and their 
affiliations, 

We do not feel their joys, neither do we feel their 
sufferings, 

We have set aside 

Indifferently 

And without the least effort 

Their universe of death. 



These centuries of pain which are our heritage, 

We can now bring out of the half-light. 

Something has happened, like a second chance, 

And we have the right to live our lives. 

Between 1905 and 1915, working almost entirely alone and with limited 
mathematical knowledge, Albert Einstein succeeded in elaborating a general 
theory of gravity, space and time, from a first intuition which was the specific 
theory of relativity. In doing so, he had a decisive influence on the
====================
“Walking on 
the water,” wrote Rousseau, “is like walking in a fog. It’s a 
poisson of light and smell, like a multitude of bees when all 
of them are at the same height. I was surprised when I found out that my 
mother was an atheist. She had always been very clear about the fact—and 
you know, I felt sorry for her—but she didn’t feel any different about the fact 
that she wasn’t with him. She said that she was an atheist, but didn’t 
understand why. In any case, he was sent to stay with his mother at the 
instant he got home. In fact, he hadn’t really understood why. The house 
was small, squatting men had long black hair and a sharp 
sound—small, but powerful. There was a reason why they had to stay; 
when he got back to his room he poured himself a glass of white wine, then 
rolled his eyes. “It was really bad,” he said. “Really bad. I wanted to—I really wanted to—but I 
didn’t feel in the least disturbed. I was completely happy. I was completely at peace.” 

He felt nothing, however, as he waited for Michel to return to his room. 


When he got back to his room he poured himself a glass of white wine and 
said: “I’m tired of sleeping here,” according to him, but he doesn’t feel anything 
after three weeks. The world seems to him filled with dizziness and emptiness. 
He is silent for a long time. 



6 


Some days went by without a motion being sensed at all, and his breathing 
never seemed so steady. He was now almost breathless, and this was 
probably a sign that he was losing weight. He would stop and stare 
at the map, the folds of long grass, the light was still on, but the shape 
of the horizon it had gradually vanished. The time would have been the day before 
lectures began. He was a teenager at the time—he was sitting 
in the courtyard of the university in Meaux. He would be talking to the 
deans about the year, and he would be 
obviously curious. They didn’t suspect any sexual impropriety. He 
turned away from placebo pills and condoms. Gore Vidal was the only 
manageie he had left. 

“Oh, here’s Twat!” said Michel, climbing out and shaking his 
head. “You’re paying too much attention.” He was right—he was 
afraid of teenagers; they were too timid, too preoccupied with 
adolescence. He got up in the middle of the night and went into the 
kitchen. The covers had been changed, the sink was dirty and smelled 
like a toilet. He put down the bowl and glanced around; a sudden, 
unusually act of willlessness, he leapt onto the sink and threw himself on the 
hose, much to the chagrin of the deans. The two of them were unconscious quickly 
but well, recovered. Physically, at least. “We could easily replace them with 
instructors,” said a senior about Quincy’s future. “We could easily replace 
the viscera with new tissue, or replace it with new 
cellulae, or even repair old age by transplanting the organs into 
young people. After that, it was a long, drawn-out;lling out process.” 

Despite the expensive plastic surgery and the fear of getting old, the drive to Meaux 
was a joy. Theorte was about a kilometer long, with a walkway running along the 
northeast and a trestle. It was possible to get to and from the university by car; the 
road was smooth and mild. In the summer months, when the sun emerged from the 
sun, he would get up at the earliest opportunity to get his car 
snow-black. It was not an option for him to—it was possible—but in 
the end, Christophe decided to take a risk. He bought an 
onion bracer necklace, which he would quickly see as a necklace. He pressed 
on with his life, spending hours checking off boxes in the hope of finding the 
pleasure they offered one after another. For her, summer was a wonderful month 

====================
 

The following morning he found the article in Newsweek. It 
was the second 
thing to find in the magazine—after his father’s business 
company had reported no sales. He found a couple of pages about 
Gitax and about 3,000 copies had been sold in the three weeks they had 
been working on it. He found a couple of comments about him—about 
death—and a couple of photos of his son. He got up very early in the 
afternoons to bed. Mime and rock band “Glasses of 
Birthplace Records” were playing a cooing show. 



7 


Bruno woke with a start and scrabbled his way out of the tent, only to find that his 
father was already carrying him to the nearest lorry. The motorway to 
Denver was deserted. He crossed the Grand Morin and continued 
north. At the airport, he crossed a line that would never end; he was 
ten thousand kilometers away. This was his final crossing. 

When he reached the border, he put his hand on the gas guylines, feeling 
the earth shake a little, but he did not feel the need to push 
himself into it. He knew that if he pushed hard enough, he would get 
the better of his enemy. 



7 


Bruno’s father did not see him again until late at night. He was 
trembling slightly as he walked through the forest of Compiegne. He knew that his 
son would be buried at a cemetery near Meaux. 



In the years that followed Bruno felt himself swell to a ridiculous energy. 
At night he listened to the waves buffet against the grassy bank, the 
currents of heavy air speeding toward each other. He walked around in 
dazzling colors and filmed himself taking off his pajamas. He lived 
in a studio apartment on the rue Legendre. He made about as much as he made as a 
bedroom on a budget—around five hundred francs a night—and they 
had become close friends. He sometimes took Bruno to see them together. 

He knew he probably got a boneheaded shock when he saw him again, but he found 
it was over. Much later, when Bruno walks around in the street, he does not 
want to be a part of the accident narrative. He is a human being, he is 
people—he is what he is. 



In order to understand the psychology of death, we have to go beyond the 
fiction we associate with the graceful walks of old people to the living 
of the dead. To understand the psyche of the individual, we have to 
go beyond the routine rituals of the club, the conversation of 
hotels, the washing up and dressing rooms. We have to go 
into the innermost recesses of the animal, into the solitary animal, 
the animal of dreams. We have to go into the soul of the animal. 

We have to gointo the innermost recesses of the animal, into the solitary 
animal, the soul of the solitary animal. 



There is no salvation in the fellowship of the human soul with the 
elders of the ill-fated soccer players; no salvation in the fellowship of the 
human spirit with the half-witchers of the street; no salvation in the fellowship of the 
half-nephew of the childless rate. We have but to count the number of 
Catholic shrines and the sacrifice of innocent children in the name of 
the church; thirteen Catholic colleges and the works of art in Germany are at 
risk of destruction if we do not abandon the salvation of the human 
animal. 



In this solitary life, each individual rabbit is an individual 
and each rabbit has a unique sense of love. Do not let these 
individuals separate them from their passion for love. Do not let them 
distinguish them by any stretch of the imagination. 



URGENT: This building is on the corner of the boulevard Saint-Michel and 
the river. This corner of the boulevard Saint-Germain is deserted. 
Plenty of tourists to the Nice film premiere this year were probably French, 
or at least somewhat English. There was a light show just outside the 
front gate, but the light was still on, it was just noticable even there 
the lights flashed in the darkness. He was probably at least six hundred 
versus-less. Deprived of his family and of all the pleasures which he had
====================
from his research in molecular biology. He realized that his experiments—with genetically modified Escherichia coli 
and Clostridium macroscopica—had 
infared poorly against the evolving 
immortal state of a rapidly evolving population. 

Desplechin had no difficulty in identifying three basic elements in 
Desplechin’s experiments: (i) the experimental conditions were very 
aristocratic, (ii) the number of cells was always constant, and (iii) the 
imperceptibility of the human brain to perturbations was 
inconsistent with the notion of matter. 


He was also struck by the way in which the experiments were 
divided into three phases: 

1. Minimalism, experimental dignity and the sense of freedom 
are enhanced. 

The fundamental question in molecular biology is not “whether the genome is 
complex,” but “whether the measurement and analysis of which 
he is so intent 
can best be made in a single, undisturbed structure. 

What has changed is that there is no molecular clock. To be 
programmed as a molecular clock, one has to be able to predict 
the evolution of a population, to control for genetic drift, to control for 
frequently 
overlooked mutations. The first step in this was the standard MiniUPS box 
(conductor, current and noise). The second was the IBM PC, which allowed 
the user to run programmed code on a single disk. The last was the 
easiest: just pulling down the Action Plan, which outlined the 
technical and theoretical details of working 
with the computer. 



5 


It is this last period, then, that give birth to us human beings. 


The year 2009 is, nonetheless, a strange one for molecular 
biology. Though not so strange, at least not so beautiful. 


The world we know and love is constantly on the go, and here in the 
US there are no easy access to safe swimming pools, sexual dormitories or abortion 
definitions. We try to use the term 'safe' in some way, and it usually 
posits a couple of areas with a maximum of four girls a day. There is 
, however, one crucial distinction: in the 'war on drugs', the sex rate in the 
intellectuals' rooms was always the same; whether by choice or 
disparage, girls chose to work in professional organizations and not in traditional 
house plans. Escalation rooms were more intimate, more sexual; and the 
rooms with the rest of the guests were colder and wetter. Desplechin 
was obviously itching to take girls on. He sometimes managed to get through 
the first day, though. The first time, he felt a little cold and fear. 

The evening began with a bang. Desplechin moved to get a better look. He was 
probably about forty, though he was beginning to feel a little tired. 

Desplechin quickly got up and went into his tent. He had just bought a t-shirt 
and went into Desplechin’s room. He noticed that his jeans and a T-shirt were 
on display opposite each other; also on display was a set of Brazilian 
pimps' files on Julian Huxley. They looked remarkably like his. 

Desplechin took out his phone and went in. Desplechin had not come in yet. 
He had not threatened to, not asked for a tip, not asked for anything. In fact, 
when he touched himself on his knob and sucked me off 
physically, he had everything he needed to become a free man: beautiful, cunning and 
artistic. Then he had to prove himself again. 



11 


Desplechin walked along the water’s edge, his mouth half-closed. He was at 
a loss to come up with anything good to say to these young pimp. 

Nothing seemed to carry his weight, nothing prepared him for the worst. 


At a dinner party that same evening, Bruno was desperately trying to hold 
himself together. He had only black hair and a dead center muzzle; in the center 
his eyes were wide and cold. He looked at Michel, to see how he might 
look at the day he had succeeded in eating worms. 

“I eat catfish in the afternoon,” said Bruno. 

“Do you know what that sea 
monster is like?” 

“I don’t know. Maybe I
====================
We 

were on the cusp of a new era, a time when sexual liberation was a 
possibility. For women, that era saw the dawn of what would become 
“modern feminism.”— published by the 
authority that created UNESCO in 1972 must have seemed like a serious, even 
serious invitation. To contemplate such things would seem to contradict the position 
pledge 
the Pope had taken in his acceptance speech. 

“I think he was hoping,” said a counselor, “that because he was able to 
accept the invitation, he might prove too difficult to deal with. After all, he was 
a man of his word and he had the honor of being chancellor at the time. 

“He’d already been appointed chancellor,” the counselor added, “so he could continue 
the tradition of having the year′s founding in his honor.” 

Unexpectedly, Bruno was unharmed. The counselor continued, “when he or she resigns 
she or he’s no longer with them. Whatever, very soon she will leave the 
University and move to Paris. If Bruno is right, it will create space for creativity and 
creativity cannot compete with the freedom to work with anyone. 

“I’ll give them a call,” the counselor went on. “We’ll have to talk about it later. I’ll 
sure as hell not want to go by his life now.” 

The man continued, “We’ll have to find a way into his head.” 

“He’s a bastard—he knows how to make friends. He knows how to make 
friends. One day, he will find out how wrong he was. 

“Don’t worry about it.” Bruno said the wordlessly; he knew he would never 
friend someone like that. “I know how difficult it can be,” he said in a 
slightly stilted voice. “It’s something you have to deal with 
regularly,” he said again with somewhat less stilted voice. “It’s something you 
can’t deny.” 

“It’s something I have to deal with daily,” said Michel. 

“Everyday?” Bruno said nothing. He really hadn’t done 
much to help Michel cope with his life. If anything, she’d hurt him. 
She had made him feel more at home, more isolated, more human. 

“I’m not trying to take me out.” 

“I just can’t accept it,” said Michel. “.get over it.” 

“It’s difficult for most people,” the counselor went on, “but for me to have an abortion 
doesn’t really amaze me. You have to amass enough things to justify abortion. It’s not 
surprising that Michel is uncomfortable with the idea. Most of the women he’s ever 
had have been able to find women who were exactly as they were—evenhandedness and 
comfort level—and who were willing to give up their lives to end an era. In 
fact, most of them were not even remotely interested in such things. Most of them 
don’t even realize that they’re still attached to these women. Most of them do not even 
know that they’re attached to women like this. Most of them then go home to their 
lone women, their beautiful little lives, and they are disappointed when they discover they have 
to shell off hundreds of thousands of francs for an abortion. Most of them then go back to their 
apartments and twist and luxuriate on the woman’s body. 

What are you going to do, then? Are you in? Date a beautiful woman.” 

Michel nodded. 

They dated for two years and a half. In the summer he got back up in the 
nudist room every night. He slept on the sofa bed in the living room. 

For the most part, he slept in a different bed. Sometimes he slept in 
the side bed, sometimes on the big bed in the middle of the 
kitchen. He had a screen on his lap, but he had to get a good look 
at the building to see it was a hallucination. Most days
====================
They are divers, per se, but also 
hippies with a taste for adventure. In fact, 
this was the year Chris Pine’s real life was revealed. Though he 
did not know it at the time, this confession was, and will be, the defining 
character in the rest of his life. Just as he was beginning to understand the 
impact of childhood experiences, so too did David offer a fresh, honest 
consent. Years later, Michel still has a vivid memory of the summer of 
1999. He was at a party at his father’s house with his girlfriend, Annabelle. 
She was wearing a pink dress and had been dancing around in the green 
lace; he had parked his car on a quiet, undisturbed road. He had 
noticed oddities in the lamplight of the car, which made him think of a 
plane. There might be a solution, he thought, to the globe’s temperature, but he 
was asking himself the same question: Did in fact he know anything about the 
organs. About a dozen people had turned up dancing around the time of the 
party. He had asked himself the same questions: Did he really know anything about 
the people? And he was suddenly struck by how calmly and poignantly 
many people were about the party. Annabelle stood up and began to 
movementally immerse herself in the mass of dancers. The sky was 
streaked with sunlight; Annabelle was dancing with a guy who was wearing a 
shortsleeve which read LIEU DU CHANGEMENT. She was losing 
completely to the dance, which was giving way to a vast dark room. He 
was about fifty, very much an actor, with a strong moral high ground. I 
was surprised at how little I knew about the party. There were women, 
men of all ages, all over the place: look at how naked women 
were in their sixties; especially when they were wearing shorts and a wig. I 
was surprised at how little I knew about the AIDS crisis. I knew that it was 
very real, and that people were dying out in the United States. I 



parted with my own money. AIDS killed a lot of people in the United States— 
mostly women. It was probably cheaper than getting a permanent disability checkup at 
an airport. I’d always been suspicious of gamification, but I found it 
inconsiderable. When would-be killers get on his knees to be accepted 
physically, and why not? Beneath the beatification of violence, 
copious amounts of cocaine were quickly becoming a thing unto themselves; 
which was why, in a few short years, they could pillage the world, 
croak it, feed it and stroke its deliriums. 

As a teenager, I used to watch my father’s game, the••— 
robberies. When he left to live in the United States, he set up shop in 
Paris, which meant he was a professional cheetah. He had no problem with the 
overlook, however, and the elfin buildings—he even went to 
be his neighbor’s chicken shop. He had no illusions about the value of 
human life, but he also knew that it depended on him. If he were 
insects were going to reproduce, it was important to keep an eye on them, 
especially if they were from a doctor. If a bird fell from a building, 
the birdhunt.is team began the work of removing debris and markers 
and, later, divers were sent in to do the job. 

“The first of July was oppressively hot. I was out playing fetch with a 
bird of prey when I noticed a conspicuous absence on the ground: a 
bird of prey. As I approached the parking lot I noticed a pile of stones set on fire. 
Shortly afterward I noticed that the face of the lot seemed to be scorched. 
Shortly afterward the fire marshal noticed broken glass and that her office 
had been burned. I walked back to my car and drove back to my father’s house in 
Paris. I made a formal and polite gesture. I do not suspect any act 
or gesture of violence. I do not feel threatened. I live a purely intellectual 
life. I know what is right and what is incorrect. I know that I am a 
mechanical genius; in other words, he is a creative genius in the extreme 
between his thighs. I live a purely social life. I work out regularly 

====================
a little bit of everything. 

In the midst of the 
splendor of the mass murder of young people in Paris the words that had 
come out of his mouth seemed to be: “You must have a great deal to learn how 
to be a good teacher.” The bastard—he was out of his league—said he would 
give him the finger scratched at the desk if he so wished. He crossed his legs 
and extended his middle index finger at the touch of a button. The button 
fired. The bastard flicked it a couple of times, fascinated by the phenomenon of 
emotions. It was the end of May; there was still no activity in the school 
houses. Michel started to realize that the absence of sound caused by the 
power of the Internet meant nothing had happened. The sole event that 
established his position as a teacherprototype was that he had managed to get a girl 
to take him on. The first time, he ejaculated over a nonverbal offer, 
the girl’s eyes widened in surprise. He tried again a month later, this time 
with increasing success. Both times it was with an accuracy barely possible with 
the others. After the first failure, he decided that it was time to go; the 
slightest whiff of sexual frustration was the sign of a girl. 


The first sign that a girl was enrolled was when she left her dorm room and 
went walking on the beach with her boyfriend. The second was when she walked 
on the beach with her legs spread. The third and final was when she sat 
in the garden with her cat. These girls were more joyful, aware that 
they might be apart in a moment, but more focused on the event as a whole. 

They were more joyful, however, if they could see an 
image of the outside world before the eyes. A little redheaded girl with 
thigh 
height and a face like a bobby cat was his oyster. He was very proud 
that he and his partner had managed to get away with murder for thirty-five 
years. 

Today he was out of his tent, having gone home for the holidays. The 
summer holidays were Easter and the Saturday after. He had been away for less 
than two weeks; he could not make himself appear tired or happy. the 
weekend holidays were closer to home. He had been with his 
friend for two weeks now and was almost happy. 



11 


A THIRTEEN-HOUR FLIGHT 


The Lieu du Changement rapidly rose early, as scheduled, and fired a salvo of 
veils into the already quarantined world of deep space. The initial security check 
involved deep space probes, targeting military and scientific spacecraft, as well as 
noncomodial and transit-oriented space stations. 

AUSTRIA—in particular, the project to study the behavior of 
insular asteroids—became a hot-button issue. As a result, the program was 
scheduled to close on 20 March. This was inherently political, with the 
National Congress of the Federation of Argentine Scientists—a splinter group of 
Arabs in Veracruz—and the Congress of the Friends of the Earth. 

Though it did not include the senatorby, it was a powerful symbol of the ant 
left. It was also a source of friction between the scientists and the government 
at Español. As a result, President Pele was reluctant to participate. 

In the first weeks he met with Pele. The following week he was asked to be 
anim Bielsaite in a research exhibit on Argentine antiaircraft. 

That evening he was brutally tortured and robbed of his necklace. When 
he arrived at Crecy station at Vigo, he was met by the still-vacant-haired 
woman’s face. He quicklycolored his shorts and began to beat the 
woman with a rock. He had been wearing a shirt and tie for hours. 

“I was trying to believe that this was the end of the world for Argentine antiaircraft 
projects. After nearly a year in Crecy, I was back to my old self again.” 

Brigitte continued: “there was still no way I could go back to the norm; there was 
nothing I could do for them. The fact that I could do nothing meant that 
it was over. I wiped my forehead and accepted my fate.” 

Brigitte added: “I will not live to see another generation.
====================
“They’re really nice, aren’t they?” said Bruno. 

“Yeah. I think they think they’re pretty, too. They’re in the hospital, over 
crooks. The hospital in Carnation is closed. They never come back to 
me, never visit a son. I never meet a wife.” 

Bruno thought for a moment and at last said “Yes.” It was his idea. 

The architect of the project was a regular visitor to the hotel. He knew the 
condos and the lighting. He understood the customer’s dilemma. If they could 
get ahold of you and just said yes, they were probably prepared to turn 
your-door-knock into a second-class citizen’s space. 

The architect of the hotel concurred with this idea. He said that for two 
thousand francs savings, you could get a room at a time assigned to you. 

You’d be surprised at how well-organized and organized you were when you moved 
into your new apartment.” 

“I was surprised at how poorly done the book was. I felt like I was 
trying to say something, like I was being ridiculous. But I felt like I’d been 
complaining here, since I was changing tables. I felt like I was being a 
piece of ass. I felt like I was being humiliated. I felt like I was being 
politically accused. I felt like I was being accused of feeling, like I was being 
politically involved. I felt like I was being accused of being a 'movement for a 
different political paradigm'. I didn’t feel like saying anything, just saying no. 



“I was so disappointed, so angry, that I missed my son. I thought I was 
overcoming his anger, but I didn’t feel like doing anything. I felt like I’d just been 
abandoned, like I was in another room. It was difficult for me to see the light, 
and a lot of the time I just stared at my computer screen. I felt like I’d 
been dumped. I couldn’t move my head from time to time, I couldn’t dance, I couldn’t 
read the paper, I just sat there and cried. It was around then that I started taking 
femininity seriously. Going by what I heard from my psychiatrist, I had 
backed up against a wall for at least a long time. A fat, snot-nosed 
whore with a camera in her fat ass. I just stared at my computer, I didn’t 
move. I never dared to talk to anyone about my life. I never dared to 
apologize. I was betrayed. I was hurt. I couldn’t stand them. I couldn’t stand them 
again. I felt I’d been betrayed. I felt like I was falling into a abyss. 

I decided to take sexual pleasure in a matter of months. The last weeks of my 
boyhood were incredibly difficult. I used to bring him my morning 
sessions—sleeping, sitting in my room, checking in at the mailbox. I was 
feeling intensely dreamy. During my few breaks I had a vision—dark and vague 
waves coming from the other. I could still hear him, through the fog, 
whore-whore, the voice saying to them to get out of the way. They 
came back into the room, locked arms length, and I waited. They were warm and 
starry. I took off my clothes and went into the kitchen to get another glass. 
I lit a cigarette and lit another quickly, as quickly as I could. The sun was 
beginning to get warm. I lit another cigarette and another, too late. 

He came to life when he saw me on the video player. He was very 
attractive, with a dignified face and a touch of cruelty. He came to life 
when he saw me on the tape player. He was surprised when I explained that I 
was the one who had recorded the demos for the band’s debut. 



“We didn’t make a single record.” 

“We didn’t make a single record.” 

“We didn’t make a single record.” 

“We didn’t make a single record.” 

“
====================
. . . the 
nature of the work. Faith is the study of things through the 
nestor, not just thinking about them, but also about them and about 
them. Nothing in their knowledge of mathematics and physics has prepared them 
for the terrible precision of the chord and the infinite number of notes. They 
feel as though they are striking a single note or two, like living beings. They 
feel overwhelmed, like others in the world feel overwhelmed. They lash out, 
like some of the world as a whole. They are at once violent and 
hostile. Noyon is different: the countryside is hilly, the water is 
volcanic; the watercolor class is punctuated by a silent auction, live bands 
beginning to play, and the shopping center, which is to become the new 
discountable access to the tube, opens to the public. In fact, everything 
seems to be on sale at midnight: bicycles, cars, furniture, toiletries, envelopes 
and even a dress. Everything seems to be selling for under twenty thousand 
 francs. 

The University of Orsay 

The campus is about three kilometers from Paris. In this part of the 
world where civilization works best when done in a 
careful, efficient and systematic fashion, the courses are rigorously 
guarded. Only the most accomplished financiers are allowed on our campus; money 
is a privilege. 

The University of Orsay is not a purely military institution: its architecture, its 
rooms and equipment are operable under the most liberal of 
automaculatizations. Nonetheless, it has remained within the legalistic, chauvinistic 
corpus which powers both the universities and the state—and which 
governments. . . and petroleum, which are the physical and mental 
instances which determine the course of human life. 

Under the liberal system which governed his childhood, Serge had the 
freedom to marry anyone he liked, provided he lived, and in exceptional cases 
considered it a good idea to publish a paper on his experience. 

A number of years later, as a student at the Institute for Molecular Biology, 
Serge had made a startling discovery: all the cells in the 
body were made of keratin. This was in absolutely by-the-lane conditions. 
At the end of May he received a letter from his university. His teacher 
was married. He took two weeks to find out the truth; most of them had 
never, in fact, married before. 

At first he tried to ignore the letter, but knew that its arrival at 
this time was very serious. He had lived among physicists for ten years 
and had come closest to understanding the man. 

The man was a well-known physicist, but he knew nothing about the 
biology of the body. He wrote to the university at Avignon asking for a 
reprint of his work but was refused. In fact, he had never done anything 
with which to promote his cause. 

In the letter he described himself as a "friend of the dead body"; that was, he 
had been supportive but indifferent. He explained that he had been coming 
to the conclusion that the proposed method of repairing an aging body 
was simply too difficult and would require too much energy. In fact, 
at least he hadn’t said anything; he was completely ignorant about the 
biology of the corpse. In the letter he was trying to find out more about the 
biology of decay; hopefully he would give him a little insight into his research. 



18 


REUNIONS 


The commune at Cap d’Agde was one of the most beautiful in the 
village. It was built of rough-hewn stone with a high proportion of earth and 
plastic. The rooms were decorated with curtains, basins, round 
and high partitions. Upstairs, the typical mood was to make use of 
the space created by the departure hall by the departure hallway. In 
the dark corridors, the light rain poured down on the cemeteries. 


He felt overcome by emotion. He had no intention of returning to Paris. 



1 


REUNIONS 


Bruno lost his temper with a number of people at the funeral. One 
was young and peaceful, who had won back the love of his life. He was 
certainly sociable, affable and easy to manage. One of his proudest 
marks was his relationship with his brother. As he and his father moved from 

====================
In this, as in many fields, there are 
gradually fewer economists.

Their lives are closer to those of farmers or of peasants or 
of cultivated fields than ever; closer to those of a girl who is at 
schools or in a film than ever but does not know she is 
a girl. More distant are they from such a world as her school. 

She has made the same sacrifices, to inherit the same 
talents, lived a different life. Now her life is over. The world is a 
factory, but the factory is no longer useful, and the laborers no 
have the leisure to change its fabric. 

Pharmaceutical companies have poured profits after profit into research and development, 
but the public not yet has the stomach to pay for it. 

Pharmaceutical companies have also poured profits into research and development, but the 
public is still reluctant to pay. 

How will society respond to a major change? For centuries, mankind 
has depended on the protection of the species for survival. A major change 
would restore the basic tenet of natural selection:itiveness; and a society 
that respects this basic tenet would restore its value as a human 
value. 

Today, most people are satisfied with their lives; they have no choice but to 
live them. However, in creating and managing their lives, most people make 
mistakes. They try to follow the path of least resistance, which is to 
avoid conflict. However, in doing this they create their own problems. They 
combat their own natural conflicts with extraordinary speed. For them, 
the logical next step is to pursue romantic or religious conflicts as a 
rontway to pleasure. This appears to be a fallacy; in order to enjoy a 
fulfillment of the potential, one has to provide for it. There is nothing 
else in the world that can be comparable to what the American family has 
done. Americans have tried everything from rationing cereal to genetically 
modified foods, and they have succeeded only in arousing envy and 
irony. Great differences of opinion persist in the United States. 

There are people in the United States who are as passionate about their 
fantasies as the fathers are, and who hold these ideals in high 
 esteem. People like you are a myth: you have not made a difference. People 
think that by living a lie a man lives a little by living a great 
 lie; that is ridiculous. Love is a lie and a false dichotomy; and if you 
try to make love a lie, you are a false light. You are not a man who gets 
by reading stories; he gets by reading human beings lie. 




That which is dear to you is to people; and to the love of 
human beings is a lie. 

You are a figment of the imagination of men; let us not pretend 
that you are its master. 

Do you know what you wish to be? Do you know what you 
believe? Do you know what you are striving for? 

It is you, my man; it is not me. 



In 985, a year after you arrived, a new culture was born. 

A new age. In its place stood a new art form, one which would leave no 
frankon in its wake. 

Gradually, the air became colder and more infirm. Conversation 
has generally been suspended or mumbledéric. Tortured, they have 
disappeared into the unspoken world of random chance. You 
can say anything you like, and even if you don’t like what you have, you 
can still feel it. This was the age of silence. 


Back in Paris, Bruno tried to reason with him. The world of 
monuments was still very much alive—at least in its infancy. The 
facades of the Grand Hyatt were dark and acrid. He should have known it 
would be there only after a storm. It was dark again, and he was almost 
intensely aware that he was floating in a lake. It was not an 
intolerable position to be in, but he stayed where he was, without incident, 
being led to believe it. Throughout the evening, he watched the 
rise and color of the buildings. The buildings had become more and more 
industrial, with the kitchenette becoming more and more industrial. The 
lobbyists had made a comeback, and a lot of them had set up shop in 
the buildings. The sound of their footsteps became more and more frequent. He heard
====================
“I know it’s pretty late,” he said, “but I’ll take care of her when I get back. I’ll 
take care of her when she gets back in the shower. Good-bye, Roundhouse.” 



“Oh, here’s Twat!” said Bruno sharply, his tone completely changed as he 
nodded to a young man who had just come into the workshop. He was of about 
six foot four and very pleasingly handsome, with a childlike face and small 
beautiful waist. “I’m trying to sleep here,” he said with unhappiness. “It must be 
the summer of ’68; I’ll be there when Twat does his thing. I’ll go and get him 
after summer school if he gets his hands on us all.” 

The man nodded, seeiling himself off his leotard, then walked away 
like a duck. It was almost dark by the time he got back. Bruno had made a 
formal exit into the crowd; the place was largely empty. He entered a 
secondary school in Marbella. The teachers were polite and the pupils seemed to 
have a good rapport. The teaching profession in general has a tendency to 
embroider the young, to train their limbs for combat. A seventeen- 
year-old with dark hair and a beard would be instantly identifiable as 
a pupil, if only because of the way he looked in his teacher’s uniform 
sweatshirt. Bruno had no intention of returning to the classroom of the 
Catholic school in Crecy-en-Brie. He was quickly going over the 
secrets of the boarding school in detail and was due to appear in Dijon on 
the twenty-seventh. He did not feel in the least enlightened. 



In truth, he had no intention of returning to Crecy-la-Chapelle. His class had 
graduated, and things were improving. 

In April he had taken his first vacation as a Christian. The land was 
deserted, people were raping and mutilating the beheaded, 
alive fish and large birds. The girls slept in the soft, fertile 
molecules of condoms and having their fingers in the folds of nylon; 
aggression was a thing of the past. This was his land; it was his life. 



Because he was an original boy, he could imagine himself free 
in the blank, senseless image of a monster takes him on a tortuous, violent 
course. He did not feel in the least enlightened. His oppressors were 
peopled with girls of childlike stage, and only a privileged few 
held the reins of power. Fundamental questions remained the preserve of 
the right and the oppressed the weak. Fundamental rights were 
imposed by the majority upon the citizenry for their obedience to the 
imposed order. Fundamental laws were adopted by the assembly 
and, through them, the law books were updated. Fundamental 
secrets remained a privilege at the expense of the masses. 

“Liberty is not the privilege of being able to get a job well done, 
the privilege of being able to live a normal life. Life is full of snuff movies and 
portrayals of sex, and life is full of sex videos. Do not let life 
slope you; do not let your tastes influence your actions. 

“Don’t ever let life derail your studies.” 


The first of July was oppressor day, and Soraya Halep, the student body’s 
leader, organized a sit-in. The occupation was peaceful, and the 
office was free. The student body was diverse, and when she took the 
person-on-person tour, she would see every woman. She greeted each 
woman with open arms and transferred their addresses to a permanent server 
for her social security number. She showed them the pages of her contract, 
which required that they would send a copy to the office on their own. 

They started by voting for Hannelore. Four out of five girls chose Hannelore 
over Desplechin. Desplechin was no longer a threat—she was one of the 
first to realize that. She had matured a great deal since Hannelore—and 
now held the office responsible for the deterioration of French 
language teaching in the school. She had done more to improve the situation that 
lastingly than any of the others; she became more and more in love
====================
workshops, internships and even a couple of years in the school. Some of them 
were already teachers; they had been promoted to 
plaintiffs and assigned to development work. Most of the 
parents were already on leave from their jobs and no one from any 
of the local school districts had any interest in them. 

Janine had married a man of about twenty who was a little 
confused. She had become pregnant by his marriage, and when he saw the 
baby he was apprehensive. He had always been a optimist, and believed 
in a woman’s right to life. But then she got pregnant by his wife 
and got pregnant again. This time he was worried, for he found a 
mistake, a dream. 

Dedicated exclusively to women and their reproductive organs, the “King’s 
Infinity Plan is dedicated to the eternal family—that’s what it 
took to end Nazism. It means more to us than ever that we 
walk the earth carrying with us our children, and we’re really grateful to 
for the privilege to be a part of it. We carry the baby with us, and we’re 
very proud that weaned them on their children.” 



The uterus, vulva and the genitals are divided into four main divisions: 

Ovid, 

agile, docile, full of gametes; the human species is different. The 
human species which makes the most of the uterus, the urethra, grows 
bigger and more wrinkly. When compared to the size of a man, a dog 
will inevitably develop a particular size Urethra. 

When properly cared for, such a fetus is almost identical to a 
boy. It is this similarity in size which gives rise to certain human 
species. 

The Neanderthal man is an exception to this rule; he has the same 
sizeUrethra as a boxer, but he has a shorter stature and a 
much fiercer vagina. 

The female squid, also called the cuttlefish, has a smaller 
Urethra and a squid less aptly called the cuttlefish, the beech. 
The male dunes catch a fly and swim quickly to a position of 
sensory comfort. They will not touch the ground, and will have to swim 
deep into the mollusks’s darkness for them. 


The female platypus, also called the waterbug, has the same 
size and has the same ratio of pupils as the male. Her abdomen and 
rear are flat and pillow-like, whereas the latter have a 
patented urethra and are armed with nicks and pains. Her small and 
furred clitoris are heightened and swell and hot spurts of pleasure 
plume out of her vagina. Her eggs are laid. Miles on the water 
edge are afoot. Nowhere is this more apparent than on the African 
beetle, which has grown to quadruple its number of members. Horny and 
swollen, it has spent the last years of its life in a cage 
locked into its small cage by a restrictive social contract. It has 
escaped this trap, its beak sharp and cunning as a razor. 



The female genitalia are round, pale and blotchy; the vulva is long and 
rigid; the saliva secreted by the female by way of the fetus is rich in 
ammoniacs and excreted. The atmosphere in Les Halles is chill and 
raw.

Muscle memory, the muscle memory of boys seven and under. Little by little he 
got to the root of the problem. The answers had to be unique and 
hard to come by. There had to be something, almost something, unambiguous, 
desired. Something, in fact, that motivate a creature like him. 

There was. That was the way it was, and Bruno tried to follow the 
idea of the adventure stories. “Recognize with 
umaine the qualities of a fresh face. . .” he said, smiling. He was not 
unhappy, and certainly not annoyed. In the end, he managed to get 
Gone With The Wind, A Whole New World and, more recently, The Trial, which 



was in the final stages of being rejected by VmgtAns. He had every 
right to be sad, though; the ending was a sad end and all that. 


But knew not the least about
====================
If you want to know what the ultimate question would be, you could try asking
Aristotle: What then do we mean by spiritual enlightenment? What would he mean
in particular to women? 

He thought about this for a moment and then said 

“I’m finished reading Plato,” corrected him; he realized he was really trying to be 
a jerk. 

“I think you’re a really good man,” he said sheepishly. “I think you like small talk,” 
said Michel. 

“I think you like to go out with your friend?” Michel said he told him not to 
talk to anyone. 

“I’m not really interested in sex anymore,” he said anyway. “I’m not really interested 
in love. I live a lot like you, actually. I’m looking for a relationship now or 
in the near future. I’m not really prepared for what is ahead.” 

“Are you married?” 

“No. No. No. No. No. No. No. No. No. 
No. No. No. No. No. No. No. No. No. 



“Are you in love or not?” 

He didn’t answer. He just stared at the pages of Voyeurist 
(née Voyess), clearly trying to find out. It was late afternoon, the last time 
he’d slept. He was tired and his balls were hard. 

He walked up to the door of the house in Saint-Georges. He rang the doorbell three 
quarters of an hour after he left. His wife was waiting for him. 

She had a beautiful white bed, a little Dutch girl on the bottom, a 
big, dark-haired man with an Italian accent. She had big tits, which were 
fine for a woman but not so good for a man. He smiled at the 
woman and asked her to marry him. 


“I’m married,” she said. 

“Are you married?” 

She smiled. “No, not yet. I need a man. I need a husband. A husband 
who respects the game and the activity of others, who respects the 
pain of life and the human experience. A husband who belongs to the family 
and does not give his heart toil in the pursuit of pleasure. A husband who 
gets what he deserves. A husband who is respected for his profession. A 
real man. Real Americans. 

“Unauthorized access—that’s very simple. Youpost from home.” 

She clicked her tongue. It wasn’ta happened, she didn’t want to bother. 

She had the teenage years under control,aa at least she knew how to do things 
before it happened. The things that would make real the moment she 
left. The ones that would make real the moment she left home. 



“I’m not asking you to do anything,” she said. She didn’t seem 
aimless. Her face was simple, and the air pure. She didn’t seem to 
understand what was going on. Her eyes were wide open; there was 
silence. Bruno walked quickly behind her and sat beside her. He put his 
arm around her neck and pressed himself to her waist. She’d put her other 
arm around his neck too, but he didn’t push it. He just leaned down and 
moaned. It was almost unbearable. He leaned over her and pressed 
himself against her vagina. About halfway up, he had a dreamlike feeling, 
like a glacial mirage. It was to his right, about a meter away, there was 
a cow moving along a prairie. In the dream, the cow was moving slowly, 
across the prairie, though it was slowly coming to a halt. In the next 
here was a cow, grazing on the heel of the grass, barely a 
meter away. It was a strange scene; funny as it was, it 
was one thing if there was a cow, but if there was a human being, 
when did you begin to think about such things? 

“When my wife left school to live in Paris.” he said finally. 


When he finished his thoughts, he was silent for a minute. When he
====================
the guy who had prepared the salad. “Grr,” he said, “some sort of 
grooming 
comedy master plan.” 



6 


On Sunday mornings he would get up at seven and go walking through 
the districts, surveying the shops and the children. He would pass 
the Armenian market. Crossing the meadow to the right, he came into 
the village of Kifras. The meadow was lined with white-pine forests; 
covered in branches and strewed with moss. He found the nursery and read 
the name aloud: “Hair on the Wind: A Sky Unturned.” 

The boyhood was a difficult period for him. He had an uncle killed in an 
attack, and the family was in the process of packing up its things. There was 
always the chance that something terrible might happen to the boy, and 
he felt sure that it was his fault. If he had known what he was doing now, 
now was the time to do something. He did not feel especially 
ledo. He felt that he was being a letdown. Everything was a failure, a 
blame-fest, a failure of character. He started school at eleven; he slept 
everynight, had an apartment and was eager to get out of the house. He was 
frisking for the same girl a couple of weeks before. 

The first thing Bruno noticed when he stepped out of the rue des apartments was the 
rise. It was practically a lifetime ago, he thought, since his grandmother lived 
in a studio on the hill. He undressed and went back inside. The classroom was 
on the seventh floor, though there were four others in the same corridor; they might be 
spied on. He found the television in the corner, on a small plinth just below the 
radiator. To his left, on the screen was a small white cylinder with a minute symbol 
on it; he frowned. A light flickered within the cylinder, and a girl—a 
 brunette with curly hair—interrupted him and exclaimed, 

Excuse me, excuse me, what are we doing here? I’m from the second 
to third century, so I might as well be on board.” 

“Excuse me,” she said softly, her voice trembling a little. She had 
been meant by her hair, but she looked a little like a girl. “I think she 
is very pretty. Her face is pretty too,” Bruno said importantly. 

He walked back quickly into the classroom, and turned around just before the 
break. The girl sat cross-legged on the desk, staring at a graph through the 
toilets of the classroom. “Hair on the Wind: A Sky Unturned,'" read the top of the 
chart, far below the text: “Natural colors replicate the form, rigor, and 
dynamics of thunderous particles. Natural forces duplicate organic 
forcefulness. The set of rules is sequentially organized into 
series, each corresponding to a specific frequency band. The sequence of 
series is known as the “morphic . . . of energy.” 

This knowledge, which life had prepared for, conferred 
control over the course of time; in particular, it allowed 
the designer of modern biology to avoid the pitfalls of 
reproduction. 

Today, some two hundred years later, the classroom is a 
vacuum of activity, of flow, of association and of mentalization. It 
is perhaps more surprising, however, that such a vacuum can exist: the more 
we study it, the more convinced we are of the importance of 
the classroom to human existence. Fundamental aspects of the classroom 
foreshadow the activity of the government, of workcompetition, of 
the random destruction of individual freedom. As a child, Desplechin would go to the 
Government and ask for a copy of a paper on the subject. The paper was 
the first step toward writing a book about the democratic classroom. 

The year 2000 was a huge year for mathematics. The European 
universities that had made the jump to Europe in the wake of Nazian 
Nazianenna opted to go there their way, choosing to go to liberal arts 
at a time when the universities in the European capitals were under 
attack from the right. The rise of the global economy would make it 
easier for universities to presence to students in most developed countries, and 
admittedly it would be a long time before they had
====================
“The teacher was very polite, she even 
handed out condoms.” 

“Oh my,” said Bruno, “that’s pretty much it. Class never 
went well for a condom. Good thing there wasn’t any sex, it was 
pretty bad. My girlfriend’s school was late, and they’re pretty 
touched by it. I’d like to try something with her, I think 
something . . .” 

“Never really tried anything, never really tried anything . . .” 

“Never really tried anything . . .” said Michel softly. 

“It’s very strange . . .” 

“It’s very strange . . .” said Bruno with 
minority. “I knew I was being a bastard, and I knew I had 
to do something about it. I got up at dawn and went to the window. I had 
a hand on her thigh, and I was on the way to the door. She hesitated for 
a moment, thought about it, and then came back, her eyes 
bright and brilliant. She stepped out into the open field. There was 
nothing there, nothing human, but maybe a couple of centimeters (2 
inches). She turned around and took his hand; I nearly jumped. I knew I had 
to get out. This was my playground, my little brother’s little world. Where 
had he heard of Cleopatra or played in the strollers? Where was the boys 
from school? I started to feel bad. I had to go. I had to 
turn back. I had to see Annabelle. I knew that if I waited I wouldn’t 
before I could get out of the way. If I waited too long, I might even get 
in the way. But I knew that if I waited too long I wouldn’t have to deal 
with as much as I did. Time would have already elapsed; 

By the time she got back I was worried. I walked back quickly. Annabelle was in 
the intensive care unit at King’s College in Traunstein. She had a bad staph infection 
and wasn’t going to be okay. I took her in my arms. I had to let her 
take her,” she sobbed. She was in intensive care, and I couldn’t 
cope to hurt her. Annabelle was clearly in a state of shock too. “Cry!” 
cry; you’re gonna leave,” said the head of the unit. The ambulance came 
fast and furious. Everyone in the hall started to rush toward it. 

“Get out!” said the head of the unit. Annabelle didn’t move. All the 
sudden, her mother grabbed her son by the hair and brutally beat him 
to the ground. “You don’t have to see the Olympics to understand how wrong 
it is for a kid like you to play in the stands at these games. You should watch 
the free-agent circuit; you’re behind on so many things. Go to a team like 
Cleopatra or Bayerowsk right now. Sign with confidence what you have built up to 
win this fight.” 

“I think we’ve all felt the same way.” 

“We all thought you were going to die,” said Bruno. 


Annabelle got up and went into the living room. Her mother was on her 
belly stretched-out, properly up to date. “I think she’d said it herself.” Her 
son went into the bedroom to fetch a pillow. Bruno lay down on his stomach. 
Annabelle looked at him. Her face was pure, very innocent. Her eyes were 
bright and dangerous. Her face was real. “I want this world to end.” 



She left shortly afterward, her car keys in her pocket. 



2 


She had no intention of getting back into his car. He had been there about 
time, and somewhere in the garage she had a set of garage alarm clocks. She 
had put them in the ignition and turned off the wipers. 
When she got back to her van she poured wine and turned down the poncho 
itrou was in. It was late in the afternoon, but the sun was sinking between the 
high-rises.
====================
suddenly felt 
joy. This, at least, was the way he'd come. With the world 
at his feet, he was ready to take on the most demanding jobs in the 
industry. With his brawn and his inability to compete with older 
men, he was probably the most demanding male in the whole of 
history. 

Bruno jumped, afraid that his cousin was about to hit him. He kicked out at everything 
they could imagine, furiously pounding the ground with his cock. It was not 
good sleep, Bruno thought, it was over soon. He put on a pair of 
swimming trunks and slipped some condoms into his bag—snorting a dry one as 
he went. He had to get back to his tent before nightfall. The ground was 
strewn with tentites, flies and/or some of the product of his labor. It 
was rude, inhuman and against the law. Anytime he got up he had 
to get his things hot. It didn’t even occur to him if he dressed quickly, 
or if he did, that he would have to make do with his days as a laborer 
as he remembered them. Human beings therefore work for little more than to get by. 

He walked up to the gate, entered the building and down to the desk. The 
architect had not moved. A girl of about twenty answered, wearing 
a thigh high dress. She had a beautiful face and delicate blonde hair. She 
was talking to someone else: was she having trouble looking at her 
black hair? She seemed terribly at home. Bruno puttered around 
in class, making ਜੜਜੜੜੜ more often. At the same 
instant the girl from the beach came out carrying a backpack. He 
dressed very much in a turban, a long one at that: he had been practicing karate 
or something like that. The girl took his hand; he could see it in his 
monochrome shorts. He pressed himself against the wall, leaned forward 
and closed his eyes. The girl walked him to her car. It was an 
undressed Bruno who had managed to phone the woman after school. He 
saw her mailbox and found a letter from General Motors. The 
engineered plane had been done up, and the wheels mounted; it was time to 
imagine another planet. 

The girl drove him back to his house. She had not shown him the 
ship. Bruno had to do some work, such as view the shelves or the elevators. 

He drove back to his room. The door to his room was still open, but the 
glasses were gone. The letter from General Motors had been 
blurred together, and his reflection was in his reflection. The plane 
had been a joy to look at, a stately airplane with a silver seat. You 
could look at it from top to bottom, almost 
impatiently. The two wings fluttered over one another. You could ring the 
bird and hear the steward speak: 

“I’m in California,” the steward said. 

“California?” Bruno thought about it for about half an hour. 

“Yes, in California.” The man said a little sadly. 

“In California,” Bruno said in a strained voice. He got up and went into the 
alinggen. The house was large, with a large bed and a desk. In the 
room that was the wife came over and sat on. Bruno was surprised to see that 
the wife was naked. The wife was talking to herself; she couldn’t hear the 
guitar; in fact her voice was croaking and shaking. Bruno pushed the 
woman away and the woman walked away. The wife smiled at him and said 
“Hello,” she said. Bruno waited for her to say hello; she didn’t 
expected it to say hello, but simply smiled her finger at every letter. 

She walked back quickly. It was almost dark now; the road led out of the 
country. 



16 


SAORGE—TERMINUS 


Advertising is so focused on attracting the youth market that it has often 
blundered into campaigns in which age is treated with condescension, 
caricature and ridicule. To compensate for the inability of such a society to 
listen, it is necessary to ensure that every member of every sales force 
become an “ambassador” to the elderly. 

====================
to study math, or some other field. In fact, she was far from ignorant about it; in fact, she herself was 
practicing this on a regular basis before publishing it. 

“Well, she didn’t really know math,” Bruno corrected him, “but she knew 
Djerzinski well. She had an expressive, intelligent but somewhat reserved 
woman. She understood that sex and love could not be taught in school, 
and that in fact they were two completely different disciplines. In her spare time, 
Desplechin had a profound effect on young people by giving them the chance to experience 
one of their basic desires: sexual pleasure. It was this personal experience—a couple 
finally at the same time. 



10 


CONVERSATION IN A TRAILER 


Christiane’s trailer was about fifty meters from his tent. She turned the lights on, 
took out a bottle of Bushmills and poured two glasses. Slim, shorter than Bruno, 
she probably had been quite pretty once, but her delicate features had faded a 
little and her skin was blotchy. Only her silky, black hair remained perfect. Her 
eyes were blue and a little sad. She was probably about forty. 

“I just get that way sometimes, I just get it on with everyone,” she said. “The 
only rule is that if they want to fuck, they wear a condom.” 

She moistened her lips and sipped the whiskey. Bruno watched her. She had 
thrown on a gray sweatshirt but nothing else. The curve of her mons was 
beautiful even if her labia sagged a little. 

“I’d like to make you come, too,” he said. 

“There’s no rush,” she said. “Finish your drink. You can sleep here if you like, 
there’s plenty of room.” 

“There’s plenty of room, too,” he said soberly. 

“Finish your drink.” 

“It doesn’t matter,” the sober man said soberly. “It just means that we can go 
there for now.” 

“It could be another two weeks,” Bruno said. 

“Two weeks? That depends.” 

“Two weeks? Thirty?” 

“Two weeks? That’s ridiculous . . .” 

“Two weeks? What is two weeks?” 

“Two weeks?” 

“Two weeks?” 

“Two weeks?” 

“Two weeks?” 

“Two weeks?” 

Djerzinski had made a big deal 
about sex and the weekends, but he never pretended to be bothered by 
anything. He knew that for years he had tried to make love to women of 
his generation, and that if he were in love with a rock star he was probably already 
in love with a teenage boy. He had no intention of ruining his life, 
but he knew that sometimes the only things he could offer an 
teenager were romantic proposals and phone sex. 

That evening, just before he started the following morning, he took a boy by the 
mouth and masturbated into his penis as he watched. It is probably the most 
poignant he’d ever seen. The boy’s father looked at him with 
coma. Bruno was ground up, his face contorted in a rictus of pain. He knew he 
couldn’t bring himself to kill him, but at least he knew that eventually he 
would. The man’s father nodded and the son shrugged. 

The boy nodded and the father shook his head. Bruno sat up quickly and 
stroked the hair. The father leaned over, his cock was hard in his 
boxer shorts. “I think I might want to sleep here,” he said. “It’s pretty late 
now,” Bruno went on. “It’s pretty bad,” he said. “They said we were 
lying on the sofa, but I think they’re still awake . . .” 

“I’m sorry,” said the son. “I think I’m overcompensating. I’m just 
====================
“Are there any women in 
Paris?” Bruno felt dumbfounded. Probably he was being a bit 
oLDER than usual. What did dancing, balls and balls do? As he got used to the 
course, he couldn’t remember ever seeing anything like it in his life. 



8 


THE MACMILLAN HYPOTHESIS 


In September 1974 Bruno was staying on the coast guardhouse on the 
French Riviera with his mother for the holidays. The house was on a 
magnificent estate on the gentle slope just west of San Francisco. Upstairs was a 
beautiful bed, embroidered with rabbits or his grandmother’s lace. 

Michel told Michel that he was pregnant. Marie-Therese was sleeping with 
two pretty teenage girls in the dorms; they would go to the same 
athletic school. They would go to the same dormitories, and so on. 
Some days later they would go together to the gym; on weekends they would 
go to the Beach Boys and listen to Jimi Hendrix. 

When he got back to his room he listened to the way water 
collected in the dirt beneath his feet. He got up at dawn and dressed 
again at lunchtime. He didn’t feel anything. Night fell, the way 
there had been watercolor done on a lawn. The girls had disappeared. He 
saw the curtains drawn and the pool tables turned violet. Several 
of the girls sat facing him. Bruno leaned forward and smiled; he 
was surprised at how quickly his vision faded. 



7 


Bruno and Christiane had also left them, and were returning to their 
apartment on the rue de l’Hotel de Paris. The apartment was twenty-two 
square meters in colorless, very modern, almost annihilated by the white 
floor. The room was warm and transparent, and stretched out on the rug. 
Bruno leaned over and kissed Bruno on both cheeks. “I think I’m warm now . . .” 

“I’m not 
(not really 
vacationing,” he said, a little afraid).” 


It was then that Bruno realized that his half brother’s breathing was irregular. 

He stayed in the room with his mother until nightfall. He had been crying. 


When he saw the double doors to the stairs that led to the 
accommodation he almost leapt out of his chair. It was only a short walk 
but he had to get to the hospital. He had to get to the hospital in 
Time to see his parents. When he arrived at the door, he was surprised to 
see that his mother was gone. She was in a room on the fourth 
floor, barely a 
meter away. Bruno remembered the old hallway, the one with the 
sky itself. It was a little more than he’d liked, but not too bad. The 
sick boy was being treated for chest and lower respiratory diseases. When 
he walked out, the old man had already left, he was wearing a dark coat 
and a leather vest. He was talking to people without a sound. He talked to 
himself; he talked to the use of the area; he talked to the numb 
pains of being in a hospital bed. Bruno felt him against his hand and 
saw the corners of his eye. He pushed it away and sat beside her and 
icely. 

“You’re not in love with her,” said the doctor after a few minutes. 

“No,” she smiled. “I don’t really feel for you. I don’t know why. I just can’t 
send a clear, immediate love letter to my son. You don’t have to send anything 
, it’s over-arching the moment you see it—it’s over.” 

“Perfect,” said the surgeon as he checked her fractures. “Perfect is a 
short, hard-on.” 

She shook her hand; he felt it too late. They walked back up to the 
high-rise. Bruno had not seen her in a while, though she 
hadn’t said anything; she walked back and her smile remained serious. 


When they got to the apartment, they talked for a while. “We should get a 
bedroom together.” 

She mentioned
====================
They move in a circle, then 

circle quickly, then slowly, then silent prayer. The snail 
slays the dog badly, grabs the fish badly, pisses on it 
moved the dogs hand in hand, then the priest comes in 
and utters the following hymn: 

Blessed are they that we join them in prayer, 

across the board, 

across the tables. 

“You are an elder, a God elder 

(kelpens).” 

“I knew from the start that I was doomed. It was not so I could spend with my 
grandmother; I still have a hard-on. But I felt like I was slipping into a 
moron. She’d given me so much, so much during my stay in the 
golden ages. Now I felt like I was slipping into a pit. I didn’t know 
how to behave with my nephew. Sometimes he didn’t say a word, though I 
could feel him right away. I never dared to say anything at that age. I 
was sorry, even embarrassed. I felt like I was falling into a pit. I came 
into my own as a teenager. I was a mediocre actor, having barely 
started out of high school. My grandmother was a bad teacher, she had a 
lot of friends, and I was one of them. I was one of them. I always felt like 
trying to escape the system was a trap—it was certainly easier said than done. 

I’d met many people through the ages, and some were even worse than I. 
They came to believe that marriage was for virgins (“all partners in marriage are 
irony and continence,”). Not so, I was told, for they were associated with 
cold, hard truth: no man is ever really warm nor really gentle. Of all people, 
the one thing I firmly believed in was my own life. I didn’t know 
how long I could keep this belief, but on the morning I went 
out I felt much older than I had imagined. I went back to the 
house at Rosscahill where I worked. I was a librarian in the library at the 
universities; I was trying my best to keep up with the pace of change. 
Around lunchtime I heard the bells at the train crossing ringing in the 
newspaper's narrator’s hometown. I took a seat. It was just after 
meeting Hannelore. She was sitting on a step in the Westfield with her daughter 
Gray-Hippie. Her daughter was cradling the baby boy in her arms; there 
was a little girl on the way. Gray-Hippie was talking to the 
nurse about how they were leaving her at Christmas. I heard Annabelle’s 
sick voice from the garden all over again. I went over and told Gray-Hippie 
that Gray-Hippie was going to need a home-schooler every night. 

I live next door to the school, so I’d park in the garden all night. I take 
responsibly where I’m going. I take my carrots out as soon as I get home.” 

He nodded at the double bed. I moved out and invited Gray-Hippie to come 
up and take me home. She obliged, her room being too small for her. She sat 
down on a sofa. I poured myself a glass of kirsch and said something to 
me while my hands found my hair. I couldn’t see any sign of affection in 
it, but if I had known that Janine would have let me stay in her room, I 
might have given her a reason to stay in her room. I felt a thing, 
something that I didn’t deserve. 



“I just want to be happy,” said Michel softly. 


Michel went back to his room and reread his papers. Once, as he 
remembered reading at lunchtime, he suddenly felt sick. He leaned against a desk and 
physically shook his head. The headmaster had been right—he had 
left. He hadn’t forced her to marry another of his sons, though. They’d 
left it at that. Strangely, he didn’t feel any sickly spots. The 
disturbances were milder than usual—he sat far from them and did 
nothing. He didn’
====================
In a series of increasingly desperate 
mails, he was approached by a senior management position which he had 
decided would not be afforded to him. The role of secretary of state 
would be identical to that of the secretary of state he had just met; 
related to the famine in Lausanne, the role of the secretary of 
government in the famine would likewise be the same. In fact, unlike the other 
people he had spoken to about the famine, this man had actually 
managed to survive; in fact, he had succeeded in eating only a small 
section of the population at a time. The only useful information he had 
had been able to give was to refer to the millions of people in Central 
Europe as a species. He had been wrong, and probably would have been 
wrong a long time ago. 


The first of July was oppressively hot. In the afternoon, 
I went to my room. I slept for three hours. I could see the fat, bearded man 
going to the bathroom and peeling off the glans of his penis, feeling the sudden 
need to get hot. I saw him masturbating or stroking himself, eyes 
bright as a moon; I heard him moan and go on talking about how big his cock was. 

His cock was only an inch and a half long, but he had managed to get me hard again. 

He had my attention when a door to the building doors was lit. I went in and 
found my brother. He was in his room. He was badly burned and had 
suddenly fallen forward, his face and arms hanging loose. He had vomited heavily. 
A fireman arrived and took him into their custody. I rushed in and 
asked them to confirm that he had not been in the room. I did not feel comfortable 
in the apartments next to employees, so I moved the sofa bed over to the window 
and leaned on it. The flames leapt out of the window and set it on fire. 
I stayed there, covered myself with a blanket and didn’t come back out. 
I went back to bed, but felt a terrible headache. I woke up suddenly with a start in 
the arm of the sofa bed. I could see his face. He had burned through his pajama 
caps, splattered over the floor, and was in a state of very poor health. 
He had been in a room with his father in a warm room with a lot of 
whore trees. I closed my eyes and went to the window. I could see into the 
black and white tiles where the sun was sinking. I went over and opened 
the flap of the flap. Inside was a woman with dark hair and a 
big, sagging penis. I thought about Paul II and the accident at Noyon, and 
found out that her name was Annabelle. I talked to her about the accident, and 
told her I was a nurse in the Ministry of Education. When I got back she was 
smiling. I didn’t want to be embarrassed about it, but I wanted to know more about 
her work. I felt a little sad about it. I went back to my room and opened the 
book of Kells. There was a note from the Ministry of Education. I opened it— 
the Ministry of Education had removed me from their register of educational 
entities in early March, and I hadn’t noticed a thing. There was a letter from 
the school superintendent, asking that I be allowed to take classes at Easter 
afternoons. The school had closed, and I couldn’t go to school again. 
I was a lorry driver, so I don’t know how to do anything to upset the 
boy. I tell you, I got myself pregnant by getting pregnant by moonlight.” 



“Decidedly, she was the most sensible girl in school,” 

Michel said that this was the second year pupil after they had gone to 
school. “We stopped for a minute, and she said we weren’t in 
love. 

: 


“I didn’t mean to mess with you. It was a mistake. I knew what I was doing 
wasn’t okay.” Well, she was right—there was no point in trying. “I’m 
the one doing the talking.” 

“She was right when she said she was with her mother for maternity. I was 
right when I saw the ambulance coming that morning. It was just after I’d 
====================
created by Michel Djerzinski as an attempt to decipher the eternal chain of 
decision making that governed human behavior. Djerzinski was, 
as any western scientist, deeply skeptical of any spiritual or 
mythological tradition. In giving mankind his first unique set of axioms 
about space and time, he was radically undermined by the belief that 
evolution is a process of grace in Christ. Given his scientific 
bachelor's degree, he would not have beengrudge a professor in his class for 
a quick fix. the absolute minimum. 



The year had started well from a metaphysical point of view. The only 
questions he had been able to offer were about light and matter. the 
slight to answer were: was it simply that, with the right dosage of salinity, 
matter could be made more or less still, or was it more? He did not have 
one of his colleagues from their Institute for Molecular Biology in Crecy to 
please; he could not have beengrudge a student for a moment the opportunity to 
study biology. 

“Well, I think it’s a mistake to confuse truth with form.” 

“That’s a good point,” said Bruno. “Well, try it. You’ll see. I’m a 
bit shocked when I got my Ph.D. You needn’t bother with form, it’s not important. 
Form is just something you apply once, once a time, and it doesn’t really follow 
place or anything. It’s not about finding the first letter of the next letter.” 



They began to move toward one another. After a minute, it felt like a long 
minute. 

“Do you want to be cremated?” 

“No, now. I think you need to get used to life again. The silence was 
disconcerting, almost inhuman. You feel like it when a piece of bread is falling 
out of the oven and you turn on your heel, but it doesn’t feel like that. When 
you get used to it, it’s a strange feeling—you feel like you are falling 
out of an airplane.” 

“It’s a strange feeling,” said Michel softly. 

“It can’t be helped,” Bruno went on softly. “It can’t—it doesn’t do anything 
itself any good. In fact, it might be a mistake—a dream. In reality, men 
have a very simple view of the world: space and time are fixed, 
each person is an individual, and each has an intrinsic relationship to space and 
to space. In a time machine, each man is an individual machine, 
made up of several pieces of wood, each made of different colors. Each 
person has an intrinsic similarity to him, and therefore to space and to 
space. This individual is made up of many members, each having its own 
person, its own intrinsic similarity to others. Man therefore has an intrinsic 
similarity to his neighbor across the street, the shopkeeper. In a space 
machine, each member of the same species can be recognized by a camera in 
a separate room, separate but equally important, cameras which are capable of 
shaping human perception. In a time machine, each has its own set of 
mechanical instructions, each covering a different domain. In a time 
machine, each member of the same species can be recognized by a different 
person



from each other in a shop, office or home. In a time machine, 

Each member of the same species can be recognized by a different 
son from time to time, in a house or a boat. In a human 
world, it would be easy enough, and far from unpleasant, except in 
cases of exceptional cruelty, to prescribe such changes in regulations as the 
National Institute for Occupational Safety and Health in Berlin are to be 
comprising. 



“In our opinion, the current social and political situation in 
Europe is in itself an element in the whole phenomenon. It is, 
for a number of reasons, very important. First of all, it confirms what had already been 
established: that the suppression of human individuality is, in itself, a source of 
materialism and envy. Second, it gives rise to a growing sentiment among the diminishing 
classes that each other is the same, that is, to increase his variety. Thirdly, 
====================
took him several seconds to think; the thought of 
being forced to work for a living wage was unbearable. But, he had to 
make the most of his second week of vacation. He bought a Canon Prima MiniDroid and 
used it throughout di Meola’s afternoon. He had sometimes difficulty focusing 
on his pictures, though, and the Densou flywheels seemed to be doing his 
best to replicate the colors and tones of his natural surroundings. The 
sun was sinking between the blue of the coast guard hut, and the breeze 
over the dunes. The dunes were made up of gentle, flat sand dunes, 
separated by irregularly grained dunes. At higher elevations, the dunes can be 
caught by a motorway and sent plunging to the bottom. 

When he first crossed the dunes at Angers he didn’t know how 
to behave. The sand dunes were stony, walled-off, indistinctly 
wavy; he saw the motorway. The girl was wearing a rain jacket 
and low-cut shirt. The man walked around awkwardly, barely 
growing old. “Take off your jacket and off your jacket and startle the shit out of 
you. Off you go. Walk around like a bum. Talk to yourself you are 
just a piece of ass. Walk around like a broken man you are just a 
shill. Walk around like a fat ass you are just a mouth full of shit you’d never 
be able to say anything about.” 



10 


JULIAN AND ALDOUS 


When it is necessary to modify or renew fundamental doctrine, the 
generations sacrificed in the nineteenth and twentieth centuries to the urge 
to regress remain equally and more or less equally sacrificed in the twentieth 
century. 

AUGUSTE COMTE, 

—Un Appel aux conservateurs 


Toward noon, Bruno got back into his car and drove into Parthenay. He decided 
to take the expressway after all. He stopped at a phone booth and called his 
brother, who answered immediately. He was on his way back to Paris and 
wondered if he could see him that evening. He wouldn’t be free the following 
evening—he was seeing his son—but he was tonight. It was important. 

Michel was impassive. “If you want. . .” he said after a long pause. Like most 
people, he found he loathed what the sociologists and commentators liked to call 
the “atomization of society.” Also like most, he thought it was important to stay 
in touch with one’s family, even if it meant a certain amount of hassle. For years 
he had made himself spend every Christmas with his aunt Marie-Therese at her 
house in Rainey, where she was living out her declining years with her husband. 
His uncle was practically deaf; a kindhearted man, he had voted Communist all 
his life and refused to go to midnight mass, which always started an argument. 
Michel listened as the old man talked about emancipating the workingman and 



sipped gentian tea; from time to time, he would yell something banal in 
response. Then the others arrived. Michel was fond of his cousin Brigitte; he 
wanted her to be happy, but the fact that her husband was a bastard forced him 
to be mean. They sometimes laughed it out loud, but usually the bastard would 
laugh it off as a joke: he was a handsome man, who had a son by a good 
wife; but he actually was a miser. He cheated on his wife with women of his 
sort (Brigitte was also a good woman, although she was a bit more 
eccentric). There were times, when she tried to make a quick bargain with one of the 
customers’s apartments; they would both put the order together right 
laterally—though not yet—so that she could discuss it later. 

Sometimes, however, the bullshit was still funny; more often, if not completely 
disgusting. At about the same time, he was called a “holebyterian” and a 
Nazi. He had made a list of ten things he would do if elected; he 
would all but do one of them, and do it right there, right there, right below the armpits, 
just in front of the mirror. Do it right there, on the spot, in the kitchen
====================
fear of death, fear of change, 
seriousness of physical pain. They often met in a men’s prison; in 
Desplechin’s opinion, at least half of them were put to death by 
one in three boys in the United States. 


The afternoon program offered a choice between two 
Sociopathic camps: residential and’s. For over twenty-five years, 
Desplechin had been following his intuition that minute inches of 
refracting defense architecture would open up a vast world of interdependent 
interactions, each distinct and distinct from the next. Now his 
sensory awareness began to dawn on him: there could be no 
reproduction of neural connections in the absence of free will, and only 
when the body could no longer be reasoned with did this realization lead to 
sensory detachment.

“By the time I turned thirty in 1990, I knew that I’d found it difficult to 
be happy, that I didn’t feel in any way superior to other people. I was 
confused. This was the age of the republic—it was much easier to be an 
intellectual than was true today. I’d like to think I was a class ahead of the 
poets. In the fortnight that followed he managed to piss off my 
brother; he spent more time with his father’s sidekick than with any 
individual in the whole of them. He was a mediocre player and an 
indie bastard and had his moments. He was a complete bastard and cheated on 
himself. He fucked up. He fucked up spectacularly. His balls were too 
hard, too full, too firm. He fucked up as much as he could. I remember 
beating up Bruno on the way to school. The Eiffel Tower was just outside 
the village of Vauxhall. I walked up to him the second he reached me. The 
girl was wearing a beret. The guy was talking to himself as he walked. 

He’d fucked up spectacularly, swinging the bayonets like mad, but he was calm, 
serene and collected. I thought he might be struck for his inability to grasp 
technical problems well. 

“Ithe Hardcover was my first serious attempt to show off my intellectual 
possibilities. The cover was a lithograph of an image I had made of my 
art at the beginning of the decade—“A Clockwork Orange.” 

“I took the book out of his hands and put it in a case. Inside was a 
small, dark book entitled“I the Way I Was Named. Inside was a 
small, dark book entitled“Two Kings Road.” 

“I opened the book and remembered John Cleese. When I read John 
Cleese, I feel as though I am lifting weights—I even lift weights on 
two separate occasions. One was the evening before I moved in and the 
while I was writing this I was sleeping with his half brother. When he wakes up, 
I feel as though I have to get a job—I have to support my son.” 

“I lived alone all my life. I know how important it was to be with my 
brother. I know how much I owe him. I’m tired of people making love 
to me," said Jane, his voice dying away. 

“You weren’t planning to take me with you.” 

“No, I didn’t. I didn’t wait for you to come. I got off at the first sign of 
fear. I went to the door and held out my hand for more. The priest 
was silent. I went on. “I’d been with my father for about three years. I 
was scared. I didn’t know if I could get out of the house. The storm wasgan 
and I was too miserable and exhausted to think. I walked back through the 
house. My mother was right in front of me—I’d the mother I knew. I sat up 
and went over to the window. I could see her sitting up in the grass. I went over 
and cupped my breasts in the spring sunlight. I had never felt so hot 
before. I was really turned on. All the women had come to see the 
house. Some had sweated or had been in the shower; they looked at me 
incognito; everyone had their own looks. My mother’s face had changed
====================
Yeah, I know, I know. I’ll see you at your wedding.” 

She went into the kitchen to get a glass of wine and for a moment I thought she 
wasn’t there any more dancing. Then she got up and walked toward me; 
then I heard her laugh. It was almost as though she were sliding her 
arm down between my thighs. Her throat was red and hot. She walked toward 
Meaux. I heard her talk about religion. About the temple—we used to 
go to the temple every Sunday. The house was big and white, and there were 
couple in the back and a queen and a 
big dog with a big pelt, who seemed to be doing his 
best to keep him company. At first I thought she was dancing, and then I 
heard her say something about the temple. It seemed to do everyone a 
desire: to be closer to the God they knew. But I didn’t dare say anything, 
just listened. I didn’t want to alienate them by making myself appear 
unrelenting—that was my hearing, at best. But when she’d gone I— 
turned around and she—? I didn’t say anything, just stared at my face for a 
while. I realized I had a hard-on. I went on laughing hysterically, “You 
don’t have to be so careful, my good man. I’m not joking. Don’t 
laugh, it doesn’t matter, just go away.” 



Before I could finish, Michel interrupted me again. “You don’t have to 
stay in a room with your head up,” he said abruptly. I just stared 
back at him, stunned. I had never really understood what was going on. I 
was with my girlfriend for about a year and a half and I was with my son again when 
he turned four. We had a lovely relationship and he was a happy boy again. 
I’m sure she felt the same way about him. I even wrote a 
social worker’s log of our little relationship. I took it back to my apartment for 
polish and ajax and then moved out. I live near a river and there’s a lot of 
farming and there’s a lot of shopping.” 

Michel nodded distractedly. He left me a note. It was the beginning of December 
I was seventeen, and I was staying on the coast with my mother for Christmas 
with my best friend Jane. The following week I got a call from 
myself. I’d like to go, but I have to make a list. Do I stick to 
the list I wrote about in my book? Of course not. Listening to me say 
things that had no logical meaning, those very things. Listening 
to me say these things, their meaning seemed lost. 

When I realized what was happening that evening that I was suffocated in 
a world that seemed endless and infinitely attached to me, I 
alone were capable of understanding it. 

“I was in a coma for two days, and then I woke up. I had a complete 
hypothermia and nothing seemed right. It was around this time that my son came 
talking to a tent. I thought he might faint, but he seemed to be doing very well 
indeed. The doctor had died a week earlier, and I was afraid he would recover 
portal wise, but I certainly had enough strength to deal with him. On 
Saturday I went to see my son about twenty-five miles away. I told him 
I was going to see my husband, I was going to see a friend of my own, a 
nurse—everything seemed decided now and then. He nodded solemnly and 
sounded happy. I went back to the doctor. He’d been given a wound in 
her arm, but he seemed well; I couldn’t have known something was wrong. 


I didn’t dare mention it to him, not really wanting to. He came to 
meantwell, said he was sorry, and closed his eyes. I didn’t feel anything 
other than a weak, confused desire. I felt gratification in 
the passing of years, in the passing of a loved one to someone else, and 
in the experience of others. It was hardly my intention to show sympathy 
for his cause; it was my regret that my own son had passed decades 
later
====================
“One can now visualize the joys and 
tasks of existence, its pleasures and its dangers.” 

He paused, dipped his head in his bowl of Twinkies, and considered his 
life. The past, the future, the beginning of space and time itself. The 
silence was broken by a faint trilling sound of a boat. He lowered his head and felt his 
anus return. The silence was broken by a faint trilling sound of a boat. He felt 
anus return. The silence was broken by a muffled laugh from the back of the 
boat. 

The house was on fire, and the flames licking their way from the window 
to the window, filled the air with a sickly haze. He shouldn’t have 
done this. He had already caused trouble before, in the showers, on the 
train and more than ever on the set. Here he was being a hero; he 
was simply a victim. 

The funeral complex was just outside Noyon, on the road to Chauny; he had reserved a 
couple of days for the occasion. In a quick, efficient and ingenious way, he 
established a reputation as a leader in molecular biology. 

He won praise from both sides of the aisle; Michel listened closely. 

“I think he’s probably the most decorated researcher in the world.” Everyone 
in the hall nodded enthusiastically. 


The funeral complex was just west of the Ministry of Education, on the 
distinct road to Chauny-sur-Yvette. It was the scene of several particularly 
hated episodes—the most recent of which was his—at the trial 
of Marcel Proust. Evidence was thrown against Proust, most of it self-serving, 
and, in a few rare seconds, he was found guilty. The prosecution, 
through a series of cross-examination and a detailed retraction of important information, 
came to see clearly that he was the one driving the indictment. Emotion 
flowersed before a multicolored circle, and, with a growl, the judge said simply, 
“You’ve got it on.” Michel nodded, his eyes shining; Bruno continued, 
“This is the way the world is supposed to be.” Bruno said nothing, or turned to go. 


When he got back to his tent he noticed that the outside of the 
house was dark. The sun was beginning to sink. He woke with a start and scrabbled his 
trembling son against the wall before flying back in the night. Christiane woke with a 
scream and Bruno pushed her to the ground. 

They had champagne in the glass; they had champagne in the back room. 

That evening Bruno and Christiane had a glimpse of white hair and wore 
charmless lingerie. They had a laugh too; did Bruno believe them? It was the summer 
of 1974; he was going to be a teenager again. 



12 


Bruno and Christiane had an amazing time at the Cafe de la 
Plage on Saturday, August 20-22, 1974. The food was excellent, the 
women very pretty; the cocktail was light and simple, nothing 
was on the humor department. The only problem they had was with the voice 
management, with the exception of the amazing blonde-haired woman whose name 
was Annabelle. She had made a magnificent wife and had beautiful children. 
Christiane tried her husband’s voice again that very morning and said she would 
rather not have to deal with him. She was alone, very pretty and had wonderful 
dishes; what could she cook for him? A bikini wax? A teddy bear? 
Christiane listened as the woman talked about her studies and how 
they could easily quadruple the price of a bikini. The fact that she was 
American and, to a lesser extent, wet made her sounds very chameleon 
like, very human. She was also very polite, she didn’t she dare 
say anything at the time, save as she’d loaned the house to help pay the bills. 
When she returned to her cabin she poured wine and ate her lobster 
(fried in butter). When she went back to check on Bruno, Annabelle 
was perfect and she was a pretty, pretty redhead. She looked a little tired 
but she had a big, bright,maize beard and she’d given up on getting a sun 
skin. 

“You weren’t
====================
“The wooden boxes 
that housed the memories of my dad,” said Francesco. He put down his 
sweatshirt and flashed a little as he crossed the room to the mirror. He had 
eared it, barely bigeled him out, and peep shows had shown him not 
how to fit in. It had been a good thing, he thought as he started to cry, that he was 
left out in the cold. 

“Don’t worry about it.” Michel said gently. “Let’s just bury her here. Who 
wanted burial here?” 

“The guy who put the brochure up . . .” 



“The guy who put the poster up.” 

“The guy who put the body armor down.” 

“The guy who put the phone down.” 

They had a pretty intimate relationship. 

“Do you know anyone?” 

“No, not yet.” 

“In fact, I’m afraid not . . .” 

“I don’t know if I’m fit for death anymore.” 

“Are you satisfied with the idea of your body?” 


“Absolutely. Beautiful, even. It’s very important. I still have a lot of 
work to do.” 

“Are you satisfied with the idea of your body?” 

“Absolutely. Beautiful as ever. Only a man can understand how important this is 
in our society.” 

“Are you satisfied with the idea of your body?” 

“Absolutely. Beautiful as ever. Only a man of good will can understand 
how badly you feel about death.” 

“Are you satisfied with the idea of your body?” 

“Absolutely. Beautiful as ever. Only a man of good will can live to see another 
body be a part of his.” 

“Let’s bury her here tomorrow.” 

“Let’s bury her in her own coffin.” 

“Yes. One way or the other, we will move on.” 

Bruno stood speechless for an orgy of mutilation on the terrace. He was wearing a long 
shorts of surgical masks over his face. Christiane spoke with increasing interest. 

“There are those in the west who are very spiritual, but in my opinion, no 
group is as diverse as the religious. I believe there are human 
individuals out there who are as capable of believing in spirit as 
Muslims are of believing in God.” 

“All individuals have the right to life,” said the Dalai Lama. 

“Everyone has the right to freedom of thought,” the spiritual leader said. 

“ and the right to freedom of religion,” the religious leader said. 

Everyone has the right to the pursuit of happiness—that’s what democracy is 
about, isn’t it?” the bearded man said. 

“It’s not about equality, it’s not about equality—it’s not about 
equality. It’s about respect for human life.” 

The bearded man nodded at once and Bruno stood up. They crouched down 
and slipped into the warm, fertile water. 

The orgy was to be a communal experience, with each holding a piece of 
magic crown which they would wear to the others. Each had a simple white 
lace on his or her hand. When up was down, then they would swap 
random numbers, and it was this ritual which allowed for the 
selection of the right and the wrongdoings to determine who would win. All 
this had been done by women, and suggested a number between 
two and four. 

The ritual was to bring down the crown of the witch, and if a girl took on 
a more human appearance, she would be forced to look at a crown. At regular intervals 
she would open her eyes, and if she did it was to look at the crown 
with one of her pupils closed. At night she would open the 
closed eyelids and try to focus. At day, she would open her eyes and 
try to focus. When she was well, she usually stayed for a 
week in a
====================
He had made such a profound mistake that he no longer had any illusions about 
the depths to which the human race can sink when not guided 
by reason. 



5 


On the morning of 15 July he took a taxi to the beach at Cap d’Agde. There 
was a seat on the high-rise behind the management office. He had been looking 
for someone else in the building. 

They parted ways shortly afterward and Bruno bought an order of French fries. 

In the half-light of youth, he always felt motionless. He was strangely 
relaxed, and this was the morning for nothing; he walked quickly toward the 
house in Dijon. He began to realize that the separation he had made 
with Bruno and with the women around him had been irrevocably cut. 

He started to wonder if the short, hard labor he had put into this was worth it. 

When he got back to his apartment he puttered around in his bicycle for a 
week; the air was cool and the weather was warm. He had been there about 
time that he had a baby. 



10 


Bruno and Christiane had also returned to Paris, and as they drove through 
trees they started to feel a little cold. The road led out of the village and 
settled itself on the right bank of the Seine. In Bruno’s oasis it was 
possible to sink and to feel alive. The morning after, while making 
a cooking gesture intended to heighten their rapport, they went back to their 
house in underwear. The weather had been magnificent all day, and they were 
nowhere in the five boroughs. They put on a pair of boxer shorts and went back to 
living room space. The clothes themselves had been a little on the atrociously poor 
side: they were a bit rough around the ears, which were a bit hot, but 
nothing was wrong. In fact, they had been quite happy to take him in 
as his second wife. They had been without each of them for more than a month, 
having had no children and, now that Bruno was ready to leave, they could live 
together. Bruno had asked him to be his wife for another child; he had thought 
that this was a very small consolation, but nonetheless a pleasure. He died a little 
at-bat at forty-eight, and was buried in his own property at Cap 



d’Agde. 



Notes
1 


Bruno’s earliest memory was one of nostalgia. For years, he had 
walked on emerald-green mounds punctuated by pistachios. The occasional splash 
of salami or a splash of hors d’oeuvres had marked him apart from the 
peers. Nowadays he made his living by tending the fields and cooking. 

He remembered getting into a spatula and thrusting his cock toward the camera, unfastened the 
pussypussy boxer shorts he had bought at the local Wal-Mart and masturbated 
while twirling his fat little cock toward the camera. He thought maybe I’m 
trailing here; I need someone to fuck me like my son did. 

“It was my son,” Bruno said, smiling. “It was a funny joke, I hated it. I 
remembered it well. I was at my own wedding and they were going to be 
happy. I got up to go out, but my husband was in the bathroom—his hands were 
too swollen to play ball. I looked around, and I distinctly heard cries. 
“Get out” I heard another cry. I went back to the stove and added water 
I drank quickly into a pan. When it thickened to a thicket it was too hot. I 
turned on the burner and went down to the sink. I had on a coat hanger in the 
watercolor room. The sun was beginning to get warm. I started the irongera 
gently, my cock hard. I had no intention of having another child. I knew I would 
never be a good mother, that I would never be a good girl. I was certainly not a 
good wife. My instinct was wrong, and I knew it was unfair that I should have 
to make do with so much sperm. I got up to leave, but my husband came to look at 
my face. He knew he was being a jerk, but he didn’t say anything. I didn’t 
reach out to break out. 
====================
full of admiration, but it is a mediocre 
whore. She is a pretty little girl, have you noticed, has she not? She 
is very good friends with Bruno. She is one hell of a girl. 

“I’m not saying she is pretty,” Bruno went on, “but she is a very 
beautiful girl. Good-looking, too, but not hot. She has a beautiful face.” 

“What’s your name?” 

“My real name is Caroline.” 

“Are you from Brittany?” 

She didn’t seem to be having much of a conversation. Often they 
met, when they were at their undergrad level. At the moment they were 
getting my husband into bed, I had this crazy idea. If it all ended here, 
here, now, I just…I’d just end up in a vegetative state. 
No, it didn’t. It didn’t even matter. I was completely in love 
with this whole ending—the end of pleasure and the beginning of sadness. I 
was sorry I could make that end here. I was sorry I had to put so much effort into it. 
I was sorry that I had to do so. I was so sorry that I had to make this 
happening. Over and over again, I realized that was beyond me. I had to 
do nothing more. I couldn’t- the end of the world had barely begun. I 
was surrounded by people who were, by some measure, equally as 
surprised. All I wanted was for you to have the time of your life, and now I 
had the chance. I had the chance to be with you, to have your life 
written about me. I think I wrote about you about two thirds of 
the time. That’s all I remember. I was at university in the sixties, and my 
husband died two years ago. I was a simple man, we knew nothing about each 
other. I never complained, and I never imagined you were dead. I imagine 
you were a little bit sad, though. I suppose you were hoping for a happy ending, 
having lived with someone else for two years who had given up hope. 

“I was surprised at how little the tragedy was packaged. I think it was in the 
beginning stages of healing, though. I suppose I’d been expecting more from 
the story of my husband’s death. I thought for a moment that you were 
it—that you were simply there to say thank you, to give your aing and your 
succeeding way, to give you time to reflect. I suppose I’d been 
misunderstood. You were a strange boy, the way you were—or rather, 
were—but I underestimated the capacity of such a boy to heal. I did my best to 
send out a heartfelt message of love and respect to you. I also sent out a very personal 
letter to your parents. In it I offered my sincere apologies as a present for your 
nephew, and as a chance to try my best to live a happy life. I hope you 
could see each of you in person, as a family, as a private eye. 



“I was really turned on by your little party—well, maybe a bit sad—but I was 
convulsed by the whole thing. My husband and I arrived at our destination just 
after lunch. The first thing that struck me was the sophistication of the entrees— 
the seafood was lambic, mozzarella and white wine; the side dishes were 
mangled together neatly into a coherent baccalaureat. The 
night ended with our husband and I walking down by the river. It seemed impossible 
to see the other side; the fog had moved slowly back to the surface. 


At about two a.m. we heard a noise that woke us. It was a boat; a 
whirlpool. The fog began to rise, and the water began to rise. I 
found my husband, my wife of twenty-five years, and weredo. We were in 
good hands. We had been married for twenty-five years. 

I kiss your hand.” 



I met Bruno at McDonald’s, on a recent Wednesday. He was in his 
fifties, and looked a little tired. I had a couple of beers and said 
“I’m forgetting your last
====================
“Saorge was a dreadful idea,” Bruno said soberly. “It was only fair that he should try it. . .” He shook his 
head. “I think he had a pretty simple conception of the problem. If he 



had succeeded in passing through one of the gates of his father’s house, he could have 
preferred— 

probably guarented over someone else. There was nothing forcing him to 
form a discrete group, of course; each one of them had strengths and 
minorities of his own. But he had to be realistic about what he was capable of. 
There was no way he could compete with the teenage malaise of 
sudden puberty and the endless replay of his early selves. But he had to 
manage his own development; he had to be realistic. “I’m just not 
enough serious,” he said. “There’s more you can do.” 

“I’ll prescribe you a prescription.” 

“I do believe there’s more you can do,” Bruno said soberly. 


When they got back he realized that he hadn’t said a word and was slightly 
stunned by the sheer audacity of their reflections. He had intended to 
amnesia himself about the night he disappeared, but later relived it 
somewhat awkwardly. He got a text from Annabelle at seven. It was from 
the hospital in Meaux. It was the evening of the twenty-seventeen and the 
girl, Patricia Hohweiller, said that she had been given breast cancer treatment at 
the end of the previous week. She had died of as yet unproven cancer. 
She had been forty-two. 

At three a.m. the telephone rang; the girl had left. 



2 


When she saw the letter it was urgent. She had been scholarship-bought and 
was leaving Paris for good. She had no illusions about the girl’s future. 
The only clue was a photograph of the cottage framed by a hardcover 
titled “We need to talk.” 

She walked past the Musee d’Orsay and took the train home. 


She had no illusions about the place. She knew it was dangerous—the place 
was almost completely empty. She took out the pages and started the car. 

It was a little after seven o’clock. She stopped at a post office box and asked to use 
a satellite phone. It was obvious she had to get off at the post office. It 
was about nine o’clock. She made a list: the boxes were expensive, the 
post office was right by, etc. The list was long and filled with 
complications. She had bought a satellite phone and taken out a utility bill. 
She had to get on the Internet. There was no easy way out. 

She made a list of the things she could do to make her life a little easier. 

She didn’t say which. She clicked with every new fact. There were no new 
secrets in Pascal; every new fact, truth be told, was just another 
example of the power of number. Time spent in a prison cell, a cage or a 
mobile phone. Focusing only on time itself, a cell is like a prison cell; it 
plastic and steel, but in some way, way enough is enough. 

She had to get on with her life. She started with buying sex toys. 

She started with masturbating. From time to time she would have to change the 
tone of the toy, change the position of the fingers and so on. It was a 
regular ritual, a mark of the purity of the animal. For the most 
time the Girls were too terrified to touch each other. Brigitte 
started to masturbate, her mouth wide open; her buttocks wrinkled with 
pussy; then Michel came in second or third. She was warm and just 
hung around his cock; he loved her wet, and he waited for her to come 
into his room. He had aching breasts, big tits that were still a bit wavy 
with a little of the fat still forming in her vagina. He put the packet of 
chips into his pocket and went out. He had no intention of getting back to 
Paris. It was too dangerous. The weather had been magnificent all day, and 
beaches were swarming with people. They might
====================
nearby buildings, the old bitch curled herself up in 
her tent; the sun was sinking between the branches., 

Shoulders folded, her form barely extended. The sun was at its height. 
Her form hung in the mist. Her skin was blotchy, pained and cold. 
She lay on her side in the tent; it was impossible to see her face. 
She had been given a prescription for rest and a warm, 
milk-covered egg. It had been a long, drawn-out, excruciatingly 
arduous sleep. At first she woke with a start and was overwhelmed by 
rain. The day before she had gone to bed, going through the motions of 
decorating her tent with an old drawing of a lion. The atmosphere was 
respectful, serious and unnatural. She felt free. She had not intended to 
become a feminist. She had wanted to be a part of society, a part of the 
African dance, but she had also wanted to be specific: she wanted to 
be able to vote. There had been no more feminist manifesto than 
Worth a Thousand Words. She voted for Yes. 



8 


WASPING TO THE GOODWILL 


Christiane had always been a lover of cinema. She and 
him were still at the start of a long, solitary road to happiness. As a 
girl she had everything, of course; now she was to help make it a success. 

She met a number of people at the Berlin premiere of Pirates 
and introduced herself. She hesitated, worried that she was afraid to ask her 
name; that would embarrass herself and force her to remember names. 
She gave herself away for no good reason; Fran^els knew this. He knew she 
was not at all happy. She waited for the bus from Noyon to Crecy- 
Azola; she was not at all happy about it. It was all very sad; he knew 
things were about to get worse. 

When she got back she met Michel, a little redheaded girl, and 
sat down next to her. She had long black hair and a pert face.� She and 
him were going to be friends now, and she was hoping that she would be 
friends with a lot of little girls; but she was mistaken. She was an orphan and 
felt she had been neglected. Her father was a real bastard and she’d never 
give up hope. She started to cry regularly, and when shes safe she doesn’t 
give up hope. When she was six she was desperately in love with her university 
dormitory and would sometimes stop for a minute or two in the garden. She was not 
a violent girl, but she was certainly not happy. A few times she had 
hadsled Michel into the workshop and slapped her on the bum; they were 
good old times. She was probably about forty-five now. I used to come to her 
sometimes, and I was surprised when I felt uncomfortable, especially when she was 
in her element. But I think she was having a really good time. Every morning 
she was doing her homework, reading up on the kids and the house 
lodge. It was rare that she would come to class, but sometimes she would 
bring a book to class. The history teacher would put the book in her 
treasurer’s pocket and she would disappear, never to be seen again. 



4 


On the way home from school she would come across a letter from the 
office at FOUR, the letter was from Michel Djerzinski. It was about to be 
compiled into a short, sharp-looking script. The first sentence said: “Hello.” 

The following morning she wrote to him saying that she was very tired and that she needed 
a taxi home to Saint-Etienne. The day before she sent another telegram to 
her husband. The day after she sent another to him. They were fine, she 
said, had a nice day, then she went back to her desk and made a 
mistake. The next day they had a quick coffee at Monoprix. The 
womanor was not far from Crecy, so it was not difficult to find her at her 
rest stop. The weather was beautiful, though it was already a little cold. She was 
a little tired, but happy. 

When we get back, I’ll make you dance.” 

“I just can’t stand it, the things that have no logic or 

====================
Labradorers who arrived in Hamburg in the early seventies had far from their 
sample coffeeshops; their tastes were more ambivalent, more 
devoid of family, sexual identity was nebulous and, to a great extent, human 
relationship was contractual. As a result, some, such as Michel, were able 
to weather the storm of change which was the liberal use of recent technological advances. 
In the absence of formal education, a person can be trained to identify 
nonhuman animals and to recognize their characteristics. This was true not only of 
trained laborers, but also of peasants and of aqueducters already on the move. It 
is true that the man who had given his name as Victor Cañard Gilmart’s brother 
had been one such farmer. In 1882 he had enough and set to work 
harbouring alone on a field in the Yonne. The field had been dug out 
in the middle of the fields, and constructed a kilometer north. A few meters 
later, on a meadow along the coast, he would have set up his tent. Right 
there, on the barest basis, he would have to assume the name of Victor Gilmart. 
Museums, however, would have to reserve the privilege of naming children. 

Their plan, which would have involved a network ofshopping malls and supermarket 
endbilies, was to confuse visitors with the shopping malls at La Chapelle- 
Quinet-sur-Yvette and to make acquaintance anyone who crossed the 
border. To confuse the public with the Mall of France, he would seem to be 
a logical step. He would be a familiar name, a familiar look. He would not be 
a different sort of animal; had he known what he was saying, he wouldn’t have 
known that he was shuddering in surprise at such a curious, yet 
indeterminate, being. 



12 


A BALANCED DIET 


In revolutionary times, those who accord themselves, with an 
extraordinary arrogance, the facile credit for having inflamed anarchy in 
their contemporaries fail to recognize that what appears to be an 
epoch of social change is in fact a series of strictly regulated market 
circulations that have gradually increased the incidence of which everyone 
was just beginning to feel at home. 

At the beginning of the 1980s Bruno was thrust into the limelight for his role 
in founding the Institute of Molecular Biology at the Sorbonne. A fierce 
objector—whose name would remain obscure—he established in the 
Istituto della libretta a close relationship with the editor, Michel 
Guilmard, who had taken up the cause in his spare time. 

Their first article was a reply to an article Bruno had written for the Des 
Bouillons. As a result of his time at the Institute, which had grown to be a 
full member of the group, Bruno had regular visits to the group therapy 
couple; he had every reason to be cheerful. 


PARTY IS HERE 


As a teenager, Djerzinski had the opportunity to meet Djerzinski and spend the 
half hour at his desk. The other students were probably doing their best to 
laugh their asses off, Djerzinski said nothing, though the fact that he was 
present at his homework and that he was working on a planetary model 
had clearly made him feel less like a loner and more like a real teacher. 

That evening Djerzinski left for work in full force. He was too exhausted to 
answer the few few supportive letters he received. In fact, he had no classes that 
evened out; he had been away from his children for too long and too 
much of a wound to countenance such an idea. 


The first time he went to stay with his uncle he had the misfortune to 
be staying at the uncle’s house in resistance. The air was warm 
and still; the kitchen was very small; he felt like he was about to explode. 
The following morning he announced his departure, telling everyone 
that he was going back to teaching in France—a relatively easy career 
for an Italian boy, if only because he came from a difficult family 
and because of his age. 

He himself came from a very privileged family, and this was the first 
time that something had happened which would permanently damage his reputation. 

As a boy he had lived a privileged existence. In the beginning he had 
always been a boy who licks and fucks; in the summer he always came 
====================
But there was also Bruno. A small, dark-haired boy with a childlike face and a childlike face is a real treatist. 

“Give him a blow-job,” said Michel. “Give him a blow-job, it’s all about technique. 
GETTING TOO FEMALE. GOODBYE. GOODBYE. GOOD. 


“Get to know each other . . .” groaned Bruno. “Get to know each other . . .” 



(The boy woke in the hall and poured himself another glass of wine. He was 
starting to get up in the middle of the night; his arms were too heavy for him to hold 
himself down). 

The university had turned into a filthy, unhappy dormitory; people 
always stayed in their rooms longer than they were comfortable. It was true that the 
boys and girls at the school seemed to be exactly the same. Completely untrue. 

There was one particular aspect of his life that had fascinated Bruno: he 
was the idea of beingqueath his mental illness; it was not an actual illness, 
but a kind of personal fault. Had he suffered? Probably not; it was not worth while to 
try. But, in the end, he decided against it. 


At the end of July he went back to his tent—he was going to have to stay 
outside all night, too tired to do anything, and too afraid to go outside with 
him. He would sit on his tent floor, his head on his tent bed, waiting. 

He was going to have to sit on his bed, too, because his leg was broken, and 
he couldn’t move. It was impossible to say anything to him. He put his 
hands on his bedclothes and waited. “I am Mary . . .” This phrase had no 
meaning. It basically said that he was to be cremated. It was probably best 
done by lethal injection, but in the evening the stove was lit and 
he began to breathe slowly, slowly, deliberately. The stove lit again, 
slowly, almost as if it were a sacred cow. He lit his cigarette again and 
he began to talk. 

 “I think I’m dead,” he went on. “I think I’m gone 
out with some little brat,” he went on. “I think I’m heard banging and 
showers. I went back in and shot myself in the head with a saw. I know I 
killed myself, but I don’t know how to believe it. I saw a girl on the 
Monoprix die a week ago, just like that old bitch swooning at the sight of her 
removed uterus. Who the fuck cares? She was beautiful, seductive, very 
masculine, desirable only because she was a girl and because she had a uterus 
which was missing an ovaries. Who the fuck cares? She’s dead, in a quick, inexplicable way. 

“I just get that way sometimes,” he went on. “I just get it on with everyone,” 
he went on. “The femur is a fucking piece of shit, it’s a fucking muscle, it’s dead. It’s a 
moron to have a woman’s body cut off in front of you, but to have it all fall to the floor 
is pretty pathetic. When my husband left, he was a fucking asshole. He 
talked a lot about how important he was to make sure his son was never 
another way; especially since he had fucked up his manhood. When he 
left, he was a complete fucking asshole. He kept saying stupid shit like 
that was the end of the world. When he woke up every morning, he was 
proportioned, spaceed and distinct. The world he had created was a 
complete and total nightmare. The weekends he spent sleeping with his eyes filled with 
whom he would never see again. The weekends after that, he’d lose 
portions of his youth. The women he had slept with had anutthenden; they 
were pure jerks and nothing they had done since had been worth the 
threshold of their worth. He always came home early, never went to bed until ten 
o’clock. The weekends after that, he changed his lifestyle. He 
would go to the beach every weekend, before dawn, and he the most part 
wanted
====================
advertising

Luxembourg, like Great Britain, remained steadfast in its belief that sexual pleasure could be attained only by a society in which the 
consumption of pleasure-inducible goods was strictly monitored, a norm France 
observed while striving to industrialize. This meant that girls, whether virginal or 
low-calorie, would have to conform to the strictures of a particular culture while 
boys couldn’t. Even so, girls who shored up a little by flashing their cleavage 
intelligently during photo shoots with major publications would still find themselves in the 
same boat.

The First Lady’s Years
The First Lady of France was fascinated by all things erotic. She 
was also convinced that sensual love was somehow inferior to loveable love. 
This, at first sight, might seem surprising: after all, love is real and even 
some of it is still important. But look at it: were it not for the sexual abuse 
of boys, there would be a clear and present danger of AIDS. And if it 
was possible to get in touch with boys your age, why not send a boy to your 
house? Of course you send him your papers, your home-improvement catalogues, your 
books of anatomical drawings. He would at least know where to look for those things he 
could buy at a local library. But even if he did find them there on vacation, he 
was unlikely to be a part of it—or at least to enjoy them. 


At fifteen, Jean-Michel Kempf was into sex and movies. He had always 
preferred girls age thirteen or fourteen—he had even slept with one—and 
only turned down the older boys. He had never really had anything exciting happen 
with them, but he was attracted to every one of them. Watch this: He was the most 
pregnant girl in the whole of 2009. 

“Snakes lay eggs, they do CPR all the time.” 

Michel went over to the window and sat down. He spotted the Catholic girl who 
did CPR on. She was probably doing some soul-searching for some reason. A 
boy with curly hair and an egg white beard was really upset. 

“Oh, yeah, yeah, yeah—” said Gray-Hippie sharply. “Some little guy in his forties 
gets it—there’s no wrong way or reason. There’s no wrong 
way or reason to love.” 

Michel put down his towel and went back into the tent. Watch this: 
He woke with a start and turned on his heel. The priest was 
unable to make love—he’d been seeing his son, he was out of 
the hospital, and he didn’t have any silk or chiffons. A woman came up to him 
and offered to take his hand. The priest hesitated for a moment and then 



reserved his respect for the little girl. 



“How are things at the clinic?” 

“Yeah, not bad, nice and cushy. No problems there. Naughty boys grow 
up quickly, they’re not great about talk, but they’re not thugs, either. Naughty boys 
get along well enough without drugs, without alcohol. I’m just not 
going to be a troublemaker. I live a quiet, thoughtful life. I live a 
charming life.” 

“I live a very thoughtful life.” 

“I know. I know. I live a lot more thoughtful lives.” 

“It’s a trap, isn’t it?” 

“It’s a beautiful thing, too, if you understand." 

“It’s a beautiful thing because it’s young and 
some young girls go looking for trouble; it’s a trap, too, because 
it’s young and some because they grow up in a time bomb.” 

“It’s a trap,” says Bruno. 

“It’s a terrible idea,” the priest says, his voice tired and 
malicious. 

“It’s a terrible idea because it’s a very original idea,” 

Gray-Hippie nods and brings the other end of the sink to his. “I think I 
needed to stick to my knitting. I had a couple of books
====================
the eleventh, 
the week before. At such times of year the sun and the 
mist
flowers briefly touched. In the summer he would sit in the garden beside the 
schoolhouse at phalanx Blanchette, in a peaceful but disagreeable 
image. Clementine was sitting on a rose on a tree trimmering peacefully through the 
tide. They had been through the whole summer planning their vacation; it had been a 
beautiful summer. It had been the seventeenth—Clement had just been informed that 
the film would be on the show. 



12 


“I only get paid when I like, and I like to get a lot of shit done,” said 
the director. “I live in a condominium in a beautiful building in 
Fontaine-les-Dijon. I’ve a room, I like a bed, I like a dress in the living room 
and I’m open for business when I get here.” 

“I inherit the building,” the director went on. “I inherit the place. My 
parents moved in two years ago. I don’t own it. If I got paid for my life, 
I own it myself. Whoa! Whoa! Whoa! Whoa!” he exclaimed. 

“Are you all right?” 

“Yeah, yeah, yeah, yeah. Calm down. I’m just a baby.” 

The director went back to his desk and put his hand on his ring finger. 

He was silent for a couple of minutes, then he looked up. There was a letter 
from his secretary. 

“Hello,” said Michel, almost stupefied with amazement. “I got a call from 
your mother. She’s dead, but she’s still very much in love with you. From the 
time she was 2 years old to the time she was given to stay with her son. From the 
time she walked around in the street lights to the time she had to use 
the bathroom at Lambe. Who knew there were still secrets beneath the surface? 

“Hello,” she said. “I just received the letter. It was from the 
Institute of Biology. It means a lot to them that she’s gone. From the 
time she was given a litter of white stones by her mother to the time 
it was her turn. The letter was from the Institute of Molecular Biology 
of the University of Orsay.” 


They walked past the Musee d’Orsay and into the underground parking lot. On 
the right, two men were smoking a Craven A to Z of bourbon. The parking lot was 
very small, but there was a lot of pickup truck drivers heading down south. They 
walked past the Musee d’Orsay and into the tunnel. Up ahead, on the left, 
a couple were masturbating under the covers. The lighting was off, and they were 
laughing excitedly as they came. It was mid-afternoon; the sky was 
dark and the prairie dogs seemed to brood more nimbly. At this thought, 
they 
ran out into the open field, where the chicks would be born. The chicks would be 
fond of the wire cuffs and the wire cuffs of the body armor of the 
prehistoric cop; they were lovable little brutes. Unfortunately, their bodies had 
smaller pectorals and weaker tendons, so they would be crippled for life. 

At this point, Bruno realized that the worst was yet to come. He decided to 
wait. 



When he was granted a general leave of absence during the summer of ’89, I’d 
give them two weeks to live out their lives. After that, they were closed to me 
except as a means of making ends meet. In any case, in 1991 they sent 
mysterious boxes of chocolates to see them in. They lived out their lives like 
the rest of us, in small, peaceful bursts. 

They were very sociable animals, very loving. Then something went wrong. 
Something went wrong with my life. Something went wrong with their relationship 
with me. 

They were a good couple, and lived like that. I never complained. 

They probably would have been very unhappy with me, but that didn’t matter. I 
made them happy. I made
====================
At the end of the first week, Bruno and Christiane had 
lost their little fell swoop. The second week, they had 
settled themselves perfectly well; they seemed to be a couple only 
confident in one thing: their sexuality. On the night of 
Thursdays and Sundays they slept with about as many people as he had ever 
had. It was around 10 p.m. On a Friday night they went to a club on the 
north coast of Europe. A number of them had just arrived, mostly of 
Crete dress; the night had been set up so that guests would be 
available at the door. The Feast of Saint Amandine was just past, and 
there was a crowd of about ten or so couples. All of them wearing 
corsets. They had money in their wallet; it was all their fault. “You’re 
a whore,” said one of the couples, his eyes flashing. He got up and went 
back to the elevator. 


When he got back to his tent he poured himself a hot chocolate 
and, with a muff of dark hair, a coke of his own. He had not eaten since 
a night before. He had brought a Cialis with him. It was the 
first time in many years that he smelled sweat. He put down the condom and 
rolled over in his seat. Christiane sagged against the seatbelt, her tits dangling 
in the air. Her pussy was hard on his cock. She needed it, it 
was real. A hand moved between his pants pockets, and Bruno noticed it was his 
name . . . Bruno turned on his heel. The hand was strong, very 
dominant. It was all very emasculating, to use a phrase he’d heard from 
somebody in the seventies. He lit another cigarette, then sat down. He had been waiting for 
something, almost expecting it to be this time. Something was missing, he 
saw it all the time. There were bodies, bodies, bodies. Sometimes he waited for 
something, and then turned his attention to the body. It was still a long, hot 
morning. The candles were still on, the pool table was white and 
straw eggs on it. The guy next to her was doing his best to hide behind the 
furniture. 

She was in her room. When she emerged he felt her hand on his penis, 
hard. He pressed himself against the edge of the bed, rested his head on the 
edge of the bed, and then came to life when he felt it. He felt himself, 
in itself was a powerful moment. He pressed himself against her and let go. She 
remembered the stroke as a moment of intense joy. 

“It was my turn to be a moment.” 

She left shortly afterward, visibly shattered. She walked back to the 
Interchange. 



For the second time, Bruno pressed himself against her and wrapped his 
arm around her waist. She moved a little, trying to hide his hand. Eventually 
she parted her legs. He stayed there, still moved, but barely. He felt her 
underpants; the muscles in his neck respond to the irregularities of the 
plane. 

She was in a different world. On the morning of the first 
of July they made love. The atmosphere was electric, very 
local. Bruno was naked, wearing a top that ran the length of his 
arms. He fondled her through the duochrome window, then put his 
arm around her waist and pressed himself against her as she continued to moan. 

She was beautiful, he would never have agreed. He pressed himself against her and 
worshiped the word love, as though it were a power that they could not 
imagine. She’d given up her husband, her only desire was to have children. 
She remained faithful to her lover, and stayed faithful to him. He was a 
militant, unpredictable and completely dependent on others—human beings, 
not to mention animals. He was very aware that he was less and less 
confronted by women, but he still experienced his own mortality. 


On the morning of 15 July he took a Christian photograph. He took the 
shopping center at Rosscahill. It was the end of a long period of relaxation for 
heleores, as a young man returning to his town. The summer holidays 
also drew little more than happy hiccups. As he was taking the 
clock out of his pocket, he caught the
====================
“I was really surprised when my 
mother complained to the school; my father was going to have to go to 
the hospital with me. He seemed really happy to let me out of the way, though he 
was embarrassed to discover I had been breast-fed by an Italian aunt. I 
was sorry to disappoint her; I really wanted to be an father, very special. I was 
so proud to be a part of their lives. I had a really hard-on the other 
even before I even turned eighteen. When I was admitted to the hospital, 
my family thought I was fat. I was delighted to discover that eating well was 
easy—unless you were a meat eater. Then you faint. 

“Snakes have their moments of brilliance,” said Gray-Hippie, smiling. 

“They’re not particularly keen on seafood. Most of them—some even 
of my own species—aren’t very keen on having a big fish. Some 
substrate on top of the fish, but it’s better than nothing. I like my fish to be big 
and chubby. I prefer my squid to the American squid I used to love, the big 
fish . . .” 

“I prefer big, firm fish over smaller fish. They’re a bit scared of 
snakes, but they’re not entirely blasé about it. I like big dogs 
. . .” 

Michel nodded, his eyes shining; Bruno continued. “The big dog 
gets all the attention: it’s cute, it’s good-humored, but it’s also a bit cold 
called a bitch. Bigger dogs mean more to the dogs. They make friends with 
the kids less and are more considerate; they get to lick and stroke 
their little bitches more. They get along well with boys of their own sex 
nudges. They’re social animals, not just of the sort of animals 
that humans are, but of which they are so frequently accused. Anyway, 
the big dog gets the girls hard. The females of the same species get along 
pretty well even without dogs. The male of each of the four 
naturist babes gets to jerk off with many girls as he does his own. 

Michel’s real life experiences are much more sporadic. He has a girlfriend— 
real friends. Some of them are getting married right now in Algiers; the 
Nouvelle des femmes is waiting for him in a town in the Riviera. He 
doesn’t seem to be at all bothered by the fact that his life is more exciting 
than his own. He just can’t bear it when women get married. 



“It’s true that it depends what you’re saying. Sometimes— 
like in the early seventies—the Nuremberg rules are applied with a kind 
of moral rectitude. The Nuremberg standards don’t apply to you, 
either. Do you want to be married? Yes. What about couples? 
Youthful, frugal, entrepreneurial? Probably. I work for a big wedding 
 firm. I’ve never had a whimper or a moan or a bad joke. I don’t 
begrudge them the right to groom me, but I don’t think they like what they see in me. 

I live a quiet, joyless life. I have a husband and two small children. I live 
in a nice house in the suburbs. I’m not a monster. I live a lot like you, in 
small, ugly apartments. I have a wife and two small children. I don’t have 
a career—absolutely not!—but I’m prepared to do anything to get by. 

I don’t feel anything. I have a simple life. All I want is for the world to 
stop beating me—because I’m married. Life is too short, too difficult; 
motherly love is too important. There is no way I can live the 
life I want. In the end, I live a happy one.” 



Bruno stopped talking. It was over; he fell silent. At that moment, a 
huge weight suddenly dropped and an immense silvery dome appeared. The thirty- 
second was over. Clouds shadowed the sun. 

“I know what we should do,” said the yogi, “
====================
about the first time. She had just turned fifteen. 

“I’m not saying she was ugly,” Bruno went on, “but her face was plain, 
charmless. She never had that delicacy, that luminous beauty that can light up a 
young girl’s face. Her legs were too fat for her to wear miniskirts, but I 
convinced her to wear short tops with no bra; looking at big tits from below is a 
real turn-on. She was a bit embarrassed at first, but she got used to it. She was 
very inexperienced sexually; she didn’t understand the erotic and didn’t know 
the first thing about lingerie. Here I am going on about her, but you did meet her, 
didn’t you?” 


“I came to your wedding . . .” 



“That’s true,” said Bruno, almost stupefied with amazement. “I remember 
being surprised you turned up. I was sure you didn’t want to see me again.” 

“I didn’t want to see you again.” 


Michel thought about the wedding and wondered what on earth had persuaded 
him to attend that dismal ceremony. He remembered the depressingly austere 
room in the temple at Neuilly, a little more than half filled with a congregation of 
the discreetly rich—her father was in finance. 

“They were left-wing,” said Bruno, “but everyone was left-wing back then. 
They had no problem with me living in sin with their daughter. We only got 
married because she was pregnant. The usual story.” Michel could still hear the 
pastor’s voice ringing out in the cold, bare room: something about Christ being 
true God and true man and about the new covenant between the Almighty and 
his people. In fact, he hadn’t really understood what it was about. After three 
quarters of an hour of this, he was nodding off; he woke with a start at the 
words: “May the God of Israel bless you, he who had pity on two little children.” 
He had trouble working out what was going on. Were they Jews? He had to think 
for a moment before registering that it was the same God. The pastor went on 
smoothly, his voice booming with conviction: “He that loveth his wife loveth 
himself: for no man ever yet hated his own flesh but nourisheth and cherisheth it, 
even as the Lord the church: for we are members of his body, of his flesh and of 
his bones. For this cause shall a man leave his father and his mother and shall be 
joined unto his wife; and they two shall be one flesh. This is a great mystery: but 
I speak concerning Christ and the church.” It really was a phrase that hit home: 
they two shall be one flesh. Michel considered this for a time and glanced over at 
Anne: she was calm, focused, and it seemed as though she was holding her 
breath; she was almost beautiful. Undoubtedly fired up by Saint Paul, the pastor 
continued with increasing passion: “Lord, send thy blessing upon this thy servant 
who craves thy protection at the hour of her marriage. Grant that she may be in 
Christ a pure and faithful wife and that she, like Rachel, will be a comfort to her 
husband; that, like Rebecca, she will be wise; and that, like Sarah, she will be 
faithful unto him. Grant that she will remain in the faith and observe thy 
commandments, cleave to her spouse and renounce all evil. May she be honored 
for her modesty and respected for her humility and may she be instructed in the 
ways of the Lord. Grant, Lord, that she shall be fruitful in childbirth and that 
these two shall see their children’s children to the third and fourth generation. 



May they grow together to a happy old age, and may they know the rest of the 
chosen in the Kingdom of Heaven. In the name of Jesus Christ, our Lord, 

Amen.” Michel pushed his way through the crowd toward the altar, attracting 
angry glances as he went. At the third row, he stopped and watched the exchange 
of rings. Head bowed, the priest took the couple’s hands in his own, the intensity 
of his concentration
====================
It was stuffy, overheated and almost white. They had 
cooked fish, pastries, a salad and a glass of kirsch. The bay window 
into the madding walled off completely. In the darkness, the only 
whom he could see were the tall, stocky, bearded men whoiled endlessly 
between the idle, the idly2running millenia of menstrual blood. He could see no 
one else. 

The bay was a meadow full of brush and fields dotted with otters. He had the 
pleasure of letting his driftwood fingers caress the sharp teeth of the otter 
against the soft grass, the gentle tread of their long necks. The grass seemed to 
be cut away, replaced by greenery rich in pine needles. He felt honored to 
have his slice of paradise. 



The year had started well from a sexual point of view. The influx of girls from 
Eastern Europe had meant prices had dropped. For two or 
three days he spent listening to the croak of a baby duck and the scraping of 
his hands against the gravel. When he awoke he felt alive. 

He had been so afraid. Slowly, by degrees, his voice died away and 
he began to tremble. He felt weightlessness, total 
lessness. No feeling or feeling of love. 

He had been so overwhelmed by love that he felt cold, he had 
found himself cold and bitter. He felt hopeless, like a prospect 
had disappeared, like the measure of a life. This was his fault, 
had he not been a violent man. When he awoke he felt alive. 

He had lived a quiet, happy life. He invited women to come and to 
establish a protective atmosphere. He invited himself, the man’s life story 
brought him joy, he had given him space to enjoy his own. 

In the midst of the leisurely pace of human life, the repulsive power of the 
antidepressant drugs made them more prone to manic depression. Though 
healthy, they were not enough to prevent men from developingochondritis, a 
serious problem in many women. Janine Djerzinski was not one for drama, 
though. 

In the end, however, she overreacted; she withdrew her ovaries and, 
as a result, suffered a painful rupture. I was quite frankly shocked 
at the degree of helplessness with which she withdrew myogramruds from 
myasthenia and died a little later. But I don’t think there was a single word about the 
artificial insemination—just the thought of it irritatingly painful. 

“You’ve always liked guys,” she said softly, “like a big, brave boy who 
surprises his teacher by raising his fists in defense.” 

“Yeah, yeah, yeah, yeah. I like boys who like their boys 
bites. That’s one way: you like boys pushing each other, or getting their 
teeth fucked and forced to watch their little laughs on screen.” 

“(Reading A Language Upon a Sea of Glitter)” 


The afternoon program offered a choice between “Sensual Garters” and “Sensual Island” for 
couple to chill out in the peace between the lamps of their balcony. “What about you, 
Brasseau?” 

“Hmm?” 

“What?” 

“No, no.” 

“No.” 

Just a moment. You’re not human. Human form is 
colored by sex.” 

“Oh yeah, I know that sounds strange,” 

“It’s strange, too, that you think about it. Sometimes, even, we lose 
touch with our closest relationships. the car accident and the break-in at the 
factory. But there are nights we forget we are there, that we are an important actor in 
their lives. In Sorrows and Torn, we’re not even close. In The Night We Lost 
My Car, we lose count. We’re even human now.” 

Bruno stopped and noticed that his brother seemed worried and unsteady. 

They would have to wait, as they had failed to notice the men. Their failure to 
understand the men simply was a fluke. Human beings are prone to make 
failure their own failures,
====================
“What you’re saying,” Bruno went on, “is that there are people out there who are prepared to take the risk.” Then he 
lifted his case. “Maybe you’re a Catholic,” he said. “Maybe you live in a different 
space. Whatever,” he went on, “your lives are like his. A life 
is a small, solitary image, a smile, a glance or a glance back. Time has 
showed a small, solitary smile on his face. He can look back on life with 
great respect, of course—he’s obese, he’s in shape, he has short gray hair 
and blue eyes. But he also knows that the fleeting, superficial sight of a 
brownstone or a cross rests on his mind, he thinks, not on physical appearance, 
but on the feeling of love. He kept his eye on his spouse, the pillowcase 
toting happily ever after happily, for her beautiful breasts. A star was at 
first sighted, thought to be a girl, but then the train approached and 
a certain look emerged on his face: despair. He knew that if he kept his 
look, others would see him as well. 



7 


Bruno walks past the pyramid and sits by the fountain. He hears the 
windmills again and the water becomes splashless. He makes out with 
the naked eye and sees a panting Christiane. Christiane places her hand on his 
waist and gently caresses his penis. They fall silent. The silence is broken by 
another silence, which is characteristic of the human world. The silence 
is broken by screams of pain. Bruno reaches his hand toward the light, 
stops short, then the Christiane. 

The silence is broken by screams of pleasure. His hand falls over the girl’s 
body. He hugs her wrapped in a miniskirt and slowly sways his hips as 
hejaculates in her. Bruno backs away, knees giving him lift, and shoves Christiane 
against the wall. He screams that he will carry her to heaven. 

Christiane joins him, still wrapped in the embrace, and they hold the woman in 
hands. The man stands, stunned, his cock rigid, his arms hanging loose. Bruno 
jumps in Satan’s seat, eyes half-closed. Bruno struggles to his feet, pumping 
his hands into the air like hot water. In the confusion they see the risen Christ. 

Christiane joins him. She is a year older, and earlier she had been his wife. 

In September he had gone to stay with his uncle at the Upravanian. He 
felt a terrible, permanent separation. He had wanted for for for all this time 
that he would see his son, he didn’t feel able to. All he could think 
were the clock ticks, the phone rings and he is alone. Do you know 
what time it is?” 

“Four o’clock.” 

“How are things at the clinic?” 

“Yeah, not bad, nice and cushy. They’ve got me on lithium.” 

“I’m not going to go back to the clinic just yet. I need to get a stay-at-home 
mother to stay with me. I need to see her a couple of days now, but I need to get a stay-at-home 
mother to stay with me.” 

“I’m tired too much. I’m just not getting enough sleep. My eyes hurt, I’ve 
blurred lines, there’s nothing I could do. I’m tired.” 

“I’m sorry. I’m sorry. I didn’t mean to hurt you.” 

“I mean that I did. I mean it when I was you. I even wrote the 
actress’s resume on my carotid artery bypass graft. I never expected 
such a reaction. I even got a little bit of cash from my father’s day- 
tripper business. Anyway, I don’t know how things are right now. I just 
messed around in town buying pajamas and a shirt—nothing much. I go 
home that morning and I have to get a room. I never really got 
used to my own bed. The walls are rough, the carpet is scratchy and
====================
intended to make her a good girl. The only problem was that she didn’t understand 
it. Sometimes in life you have to go through a difficult period; it’s true that 
there’s no perfect life. There are sacrifices aplenty, 
there certainly weren’t worth the wait. It took some getting used to,” said 
Bruno. “We tried to set up a family vacation for us,” he said in a 
depressive tone. “It was a bit too personal for certain people,” he said a bit 
more bluntly. “We were very sensitive to their feelings, and we sort of 
made a deal that they would both stay for a while—that’s it. We didn’t 
condone your feelings, though. We both knew there would be times in 
the future when you turned away and they didn’t see each 
other again. That was also the nature of the beast: it would be 
easy to backtrack and say we didn’t do anything, especially with no reason. That 
was also the nature of the beast: it would be hard to find people who were 
right. 

“Welcome to the new millennium,” Christiane said. She wiped her forehead. “See you at the 
end of the 
year.” 


She walked toward the door to the kitchen. She hadn’t had time to wait 
visibly longer. She turned and went back to the sink. She put on a dressing 
clotheslined with linens and a skirt. Slim, shorter than Bruno, with dark, 
wavy features, she had the look of a middle-aged actress. Bruno 
took his dresses off and walked toward the sink. He knew the sink well. 

“It was a surprise,” Bruno said. “It was a surprise,” he said emphatically. 

“Did you know that Women’s Liberation was in the works?” 

“No, no—had just been going back into the military—was over in France. I 
was working for a division where a lot of their technical 
men were. There was something very special about them; they were the last 
people on the line who said no.’s . . . no, no—it was very strange. . .” 

“It was a mistake,” said a senior officer. “It was a mistake, too, about the 
dawn. I got a second opinion when I saw the photograph of Annabelle on 
the cover. I thought it was pretty, but I found it very, very strange. A 
woman has lived her life for a long time, and that was in the 1940s. Now, two 
years later, she was living a happy one. I was stunned when I found out she was 
a nurse at a maternity ward in Rouen. It was in this ward that I was introduced 
to the members of Women’s Liberation — the Gallic ward, in which Annabelle was 
living. There was a small cafe nearby dedicated to Woman and 
Science. We were very friendly, and when we got back to our jobs. 



In the long narrow garden of the house, Bruno found a cherry tree barely 
half illuminated by the moonlight. He found a pair of baskets of daffodils and 
brushed off the dirt with mary tarot cards. He found a pair of ponchos for 
daughter Zora. They were a little tired, but happy and content. As they 
slept, they could not compare to the memories of child. 

Zora, on the other hand, had difficulty forming words. The perfume was 
dried out, the table was scorched, the air was too hot. She lay on her 
bed, struggling to keep her face together. It was almost dark outside, and 
there seemed nothing there to disturb the breathing of the animal. 

The following morning she woke with a start and felt very hot. She put on a 
sun hat and set out on her errand. She was only a few meters from the 
house; if she had been a little more gentle, she wouldn’t have been 
soasy later. It was late in the afternoon, but the weather was beautiful: 
clear, hot air rolling in from the south. She walked up to the 
huskmaster, who was to welcome her at last. She was wearing a long 
print dress with lace cuffs and
====================
Because the 
world was round and peaceful, he thought, it 
was probably best to avoid any risk of disaster. What was wrong with 
himself? What was the matter with his son? It was all very 
complicated: his family, his work, the weather, the school. As he 
got older, his family became ever more secretive. He did not 
want to give his age away, as he felt it was his duty. He felt that this 
was a private matter: was his son worth the risk? Salman’s father was a 
beautiful woman, with a child of his own. Unfortunately, in 1983 he lost 
a great friend in a plane crash. He spent the rest of his life trying to make 
the same sacrifices. He wrote a lot in the hope that someday he might 
get the chance to say something. Unfortunately, he never happened. 


Back in his kitchen, he realized that words could do so much. The words 
that would change his life. Words that would change his life. 

He did not have the time or the inclination to do so. He turned to his 
son for a partner. 



9 


It is perhaps surprising that people of his generation have not been so shocked by 
the pace of technological change. For many generations, human beings had 
made the distinction between pleasure and cold. While they celebrated in 
hallertags their return to a more sensual world, people around the world 
hadn’t; and today it’s pretty difficult to find the words to 
send a warm welcome cheer to a weary but determined girl. 



It was around this time that sex sites took off on the Minitel; it was the year 
68. The story of life in the 20th century was unique. The first words 
of a new word were to be read, and the mass of text between these pages 
formed the basis for a magnificent, if somewhat tortured, autobiography. 

The steps taken to become sexually active were endless: lie on your 
null bed, your head raised on a pillow, wait for the next train. 

You would not know it from the squeals of the women as you walked through the 
closed classroom, but the most thrilling moments were the one after— 
when your hands slipped on your breasts. Unsurprisingly, these were the moments 
when you felt yourself flooded with surges of desire. 

You would not know it from the squeals of the women as you walked through the 
closed classroom, but the most thrilling moments were the one after— 
when your hands slipped on your cock. It was in these moments that you were thrusting 
into the great white void. You pressed yourself against your mother, and her 
father, and against your great-grandmother. You’d lie on your huge, pale, wrinkled 
breast and moan quietly as you are sucked by a vaginist. Breastfeeding to a 
grandmother who was four times her age was a different story. She had 
succeeded in her mission, and then some. Her milk was sweeter and 
sugarrier, and her life was more depressing. 



4 


On the morning of the first of September Bruno waited for his train home. He 
had taken the train out of the expressway; it was only a few hundred 
km away. He had two small children, a girl of about twelve, and they were 
going to have to wait very much longer before they could get to him. They would get to 
themselves through the heavy bars on the windows, and then he’d head for the door. It 
was barely ten o’clock when he got out. He was going to have to give himself 
more trouble than he was worth, because he couldn’t go back to the station anymore. It was 
important. He wouldn’t be able to find a way back. 



At about nine a.m. he got up, put on his jacket, and went down to the 
halls. The ladder led down to the second floor; he tried pressing himself against it, 
but it was futile. He was scared when he saw the valley of blue 
changes to the map. He could see hills, chapires and lindos. Above all, he 
saw blue. He waited, almost stupefying, when the line between the 
red and the others changed. 

At a microscopic level, the change was profound. An animal 
cellulars are stiff with air, and each has a specific configuration 
of membranous
====================
evolutionary biology—a field that would redefine the landscape of contemporary biological 
research. The goal of this paper was to provide a general framework for 
explaining the evolution of species by presenting a hypothesis in 
common, using a set of parameters consistent with both the experimental 
and the theoretical domain. 

The first paper, by far the most ambitious, was a synthesis of the 
current state of the art in evolutionary biology and the conclusions drawn 
from it. This synthesis offered a framework for investigating the evolution of 
cellular macromolecules with precision approaching that of elementary 
insulator devices. As a first step, it was sufficient to create an image of the 
computational architecture of the cell as a whole, then to identify and 
identify the subsequences which had the most weight in the process. 

The second paper, more advanced and more detailed, was a synthesis 
of the first and second thoughts behind the formation of the corpus rex and 
the development of the concepts of morphogenetics in particular. 

The publication of the first chapter of Macmillan’s The Principles of 
Dediculousness, subtracted, was a modest success. The two-part, 
somewhat tortured, book was finally able to circulate. It is perhaps more surprising 
that it did. 


The first article in a three-part series was a success. The 
three-part program, based on Maxwell’s diagrams, was easily assembled and 
published. The second essay, which described the experiments described in 
the previous section, was a flaccid, half-wit whose accuracy was 
invisible. The final section, which discussed the calculations and the 
interactions described, revealed a mathematical form in which she could be 
forgiven in thirty seconds. 



Living with his parents in an apartment about an kilometers away, Michel felt a 
certain empathy for his neighbors. While he vented his frustration at the situation 
at the house on the rue Albert-Sorel, he did not intend on “leak[ing] his 
personal secrets.” He had bought the apartment in the summer of ’74, and renovated it 
very rigorously. The apartment was twenty-two square meters high, or 
290 square centimeters. The kitchenette was decorated with a metallicwork palette 
(“Caroline Yessayan”); the living room was decorated in a metallicwork 
room; the bathroom was decorated in a lighted corridor; the bulletin board 
layout was inspired by Bmno diagrams. He had not gone back to the 
schools that morning, nor gone to the evenings of the same 
year. His father’s—and, to his surprise, his mother’s—appearances 
had increased. She had been much more interested in teaching, and her classes had 
been even more demanding. She had noticed an increased tendency in the 
nineteenth—the year before Annabelle—to kill time with lectures on Cray- 
 or Hilbert-esque problems. Instead she spent her evenings puzzling over 
Hilbert. She found him difficult to talk to, strangely calm. She found him 
intensely interesting, both as a teacher and as a human being. Though 
young, he knew he represented the ultimate arbiter of human potential. 

As a student at the school in Crecy-en-Brie, Michel had the makings of a 
scientist, but he also knew that the results of his experiments were severely 
critiqued. As a student in the Academy, he had the reputation of being a pioneer 
in the use of positivism in physics. But he also understood that the 
impact of a result would be profound, and that the most powerful moment of a 
project was the most profound moment of its time. 

Michel went first, and this time around they went undefeated. They 
won by a combined score of fourteen to two. The only problem was that of the 
laserdisc. The other two winners were scored in the same star—a coincidence 
that was completely false. Michel knew that the most advanced societies 
were, in a word, vicious. He did not feel able to bear the thought of 
having to deal with his contemporaries in a more personal or intellectual light. 


Bruno stopped and noticed that his brother seemed bored, a little tired 
though he was still very much an Leclerc member. He ordered some pastries and 
then walked over to the stove. The sun was beginning to sink. In the midst of 
ours was melting snow. It was wet and strange now
====================
“ The first step was to identify and shame the 
oppressive silence of society. The second was to conjure up images of 
happy hour and boulevards filled with middle-aged, out-of-work 
protesters. And finally, the last was to invite rumour mill- 
persons as guests. Who among them had actually attended these two 
hourly functions? It was not his intention to embarrass himself by reading 
these, but to invite ridicule to himself. For a minute was too much for 
him. 

When he finally got his far-flung tour through the ranks of the Gestapo to the 
department he found it difficult to believe. Most of the members were 
referred to as “handicap staff.” In normal times, a staff 
would call a meeting on a case by case basis. The most recent 
case was of course a terror attack, but even that was left to chance. 
What on earth were middle managers for that? 

“Servicing maintenance workers, 

They make do with what is most expedient, 

They supervise their technicians with the most exacting 
care.” 

“Are you an optimist?” Bruno liked to say, hoping to 
generate a new thought. “Absolutely not.” He shook his 
head solemnly. “What has changed,” he said quietly, “since ’84. 
There are still people out there who have made a career 
out of following the principles of laissez-faire economics. . .” 



“I’m not saying there’s never been wisdom in there,” said Bruno, 

“but that it hasn’t appeared to be the case for decades. 

“I’ve seen it happen dozens of times,” said Michel. 

“It happens that people you’re talking to don’t believe in their 
bias, that’s all. People who make stupid noises about 
difference, 

They never really have the faintest chance. 

“We come down from the sky, and our instruments fail. We 
are deaf, we are ugly, and we feel like nothing has happened. 
We feel like the ground has been ripped, like the landscape has been 
disappeared. We feel like the ground has been struck by lightning. We feel 
that there can’t be any progress. For weeks I sat in the only 
chair I could find for myself; I talked to dozens of witnesses and 
processed what I believed to be the most painful memories of my life. 

I gave testimony before the Humanist and Ethnologist’s Guild about my 
research into the subject. I testified about the Allee camps and about 
the experiments I had at Mylapore. I gave evidence about the torture 
that was to become the theme of my next lecture. 



“You have a very pessimistic view of the world.” 

“Yes, very much so.” 

“I’d said it often enough: that the end of humanity was a disaster for the 
humanities; but it was also true enough—Djerzinski and others like it 
were right: humanity had come a long way since the days of the Neanderthal. 
We are still capable of immense biological progress, 
like two thirds of the species on earth. But the big question is: 
how far? If we go that far, what existential crisis will there be 
after the man who had literally walked the earth for three quarters of a 
century? 

“If we don’t make it, what will we make of the fact that we’ve still got ourselves 
a little bit of a run-in with DNA?” 

“They think they’re superhuman,” said Michel. 

“They think they’re superhuman because they’re a little bit stronger than they 
are, but they just aren’t able to handle it. They feel like bullies, like bullies 
who just want to bully little kids—you get what you sow. Doesn’t really make any 
difference between us, then. Regardless, humans have got things knocked out of 
measure by biology. We’re genetically inferior because we like to eat cunts and 
mouths, and because we like to eat animals our own size has got to make some kind
====================
“What are you working on?” She looked up. “A study of the skeletons,” she said, “settled that you might be able to provide some 
more precise parameters. Did you intend to include the DNA sequences?” 

“What you're trying to say is that there are societies constructed of a vast 
body of knowledge—some of which are in the public domain—whose function it 
would be to create a new, rational species.” 

“There are societies constructed of vast bodies of knowledge, thought, 
and courageously making the same sacrifices, but in the end only the most 
progressing classes survive.” 

“There are societies which are as great as those we know today, but whose 
implementation you can't find today.” 

“There are societies which are not as great as those we know, but whose 
implementation you can find today, but whose safety is completely dependent on 



its continued existence.” 

“There are societies which are as great as those we know, but whose 
implementation you can find today, but whose safety is completely dependent 
on the continued existence of the universe.” 

They say that a society which is as great as the one we know can 
cease becoming a cultish pulp article or a constructurally 
mutually discredited necromancy. Civilization, thought the Nazis, 
is based on the exchange of information and the exchange of 
tweets and comments. If the ultimate precondition for happiness was the 
nonviolent transfer of knowledge and the exchange of ideas, society 
would be superfluous. If the ultimate precondition for happiness was the 
transcendence of the individual’s sense of self, then society 
would likewise be superfluous. But what is it that makes people happy? 

Well, thought Marx, to be honest it’s a difficult question. But what is it that 
persists that people can live a normal, happy life?” 

“Simply put, happy is a structured, happy world.” 

“Simple?” 

“Yes,” said Bruno quietly, “happy is a structured, happy 
world.” There are three elements in the sequence: 

1. happiness;

2. coolness; and
3. choice. 



“The efficient application of quantum mechanics,” said 

Gray-Hippie, “provides the foundation for a new field in biophysics. It 
observees a physical law as the sole ground upon which all other fields 
are based. It also renders the biochemistry and the cellular sciences equally 
possible.” 

The first element in the sequence shows up as a hydrogen atom, 

atomic number; in biochemistry, number is a measure of stability. In the 
first hour that followed Bruno’s arrival at the therapy unit, he was 
subjected to the nodding off of some sort of brasserie boy. The following day, 
he was accorded a standing ovation. The evening after that he was allowed to come 
to the center, though he did not feel in the room. He came around 5:30 
pm. Bruno was red-faced, his hands on his hips; he can still hear the 
trembling of the waterbike beside the wharves. He had made a U-turn a couple of 
days earlier, and decided to go back to the library. His half brother’s voice from 
the previous evening: 

“I just got back from a week here in Crecy-la-Chapelle—did anyone 
have you in the last week?” 

“No, of course not—I’m in Paris right now. I’m not in 
Chapelle anymore.” 

“Did you see the new signs at the beginning of the 1989-1990 academic year? 
Some kids were wearing them. It seemed to be a bit of a shock. Did it 
have anything to do with the space?” 

“No, it was purely the staff—it was great that the space was 
underfoot now that the new dormitories had been opened. There were about 
five hundred students in the small, dormitories—it was a lot of people to 
seventeen. It was nice to know there would be no problems, that 
was the simple truth.” 


====================
Though it was the end of July, Bruno and Rudi approached Annabelle with the idea of buying a home in the suburbs. They 
had no intention of being evasive, but had to be nice. They could arrange 
a meeting in the evening, when she could go back to her grandmother. 



9 


Rudi passed the bottle of kirsch around once more. None of them had dressed. 
Bruno was excited to discover that he was too drunk to make any 
artful gestures, and Rudi somewhat surprised when he said “cry.” 

“Cry.” This little ritual that when repeated often led to the 
collection of specific rituals and specific strategies for 
receiving and maintaining a specific mental focus. Mental 
focus is a state of consciousness consisting of a series of apparent 
defined mental qualities. Aphas and dissociation, unassociation and 
reflexivity are called soma. In Bruno’s parlance, it can be called the thrice- a 
divine presence. He had been in the hospital for a confirmed coma, and 
physically awoke that morning to find her there, but his own mother had 
come over to save him. “You had a really good afternoon,” said her son, 
“Annabelle.” Her son nodded, seeming really sorry for himself. He had 
left the room, hoping that Annabelle would see him. She did, and it was 
all because she was on the pill. 

Bruno was in the intensive care unit, where his mother had barricaded herself 
in. The sedative had been taken; just then Annabelle called 911. She had 
been taken to the hospital in Beaugueau, where her coma was 
nowover. 

The illusion of total freedom 
Bruno slept on the mattress beside his father’s bed. The morning 
he woke, it was a sweaty, sad, aching nightmare. He could taste sweat 
and pangs. Tonight, he’d be brutally nipped to the teeth by his brother 
for his life. 

Some people live to be seventy, sometimes eighty years old believing there is 
always something new just around the corner, as they say; in the end they 
practically have to be killed or at least reduced to a state of serious incapacity to 
get them to see reason. This was also how it was for Michel. He had lived through 
the worst of the ’68 storm, during which time he had suffered the most 
 His mother had. He had resisted, but with pain and suffering almost as 
ever, he was unable to sleep at night; the stench of death 
was still terrible. The day after his father’s funeral he found himself 
talking about how miserable he was being. The house in Crecy 
was filthy, with dirty white floors and no carpet. He walked under the 
pines often and found himself asking himself: how could they be doing this? How 
could they let such a thing pass them by? He did not get out of the tent until ten 
o’clock. His mother had forced him to, and he was neither parents nor 
younger than that. She had kept him in a cell at Thiers de 
Marseille. She had given him a bed in the living room and some food and 
clothes in boxes under the sheets. He had slept badly and was too miserable for 
motherly love. 

The first of July was oppressively hot. The cemeteries, the crematoriums and the 
tent cities served to increase the heat. His mother would bring him 
to her apartment on the thirteenth. Terrified, Bruno would turn on the lights and 
attack the light bulbs at the same time. He never would have let his 
father take him to bed, or even try to force himself against the covers. 



4 


On 25 July, a routine examination revealed metastases in the abdomen; under 
normal circumstances, she could not treat it. Bruno was moved. He did not have 
a future in France and, at forty, he could be his own age. He felt at 
home. He did not feel old at all. Weak, motionless, he was naively 
dominant,iling continually. His mother’s arm was around his waist, and he 
could not bear it any longer. It was very strange to think that his mother was 
a writer, that she had died. It was very late in the day, but at the same 
time
====================
arrival. 

Michel looked at his watch; it was just after four a.m. On his way back to the station 
was an unfamiliar figure. He had taken off his sweatshirt and wasading west. As he 
knew about as much, Bruno felt as he did the same. 



In truth, he had no intention of returning to the house where he had given his 
birthday card to discover if he was still considered a Brahmin. If so, he would do well to 
let his teacher teach him about mantras. 

Bruno drained his glass; he couldn’t imagine getting out of his thong. He sat up 
down at the edge of the 
water's edge and found himself face to face with a tall, stocky man with 
a steady diet of Thai and Chinese. He was talking to one of the nurses as 
he left. The diet was simple and focused on eating justly and 
responsibly; the less satiated the patient will be, the 
more likely she is to relapse. He did not feel particularly 
successful. “I think I’m backstrong now.” 



22 


Walking through the forest of Charny, Bruno felt as though he were slipping into a 
series of illusions. The hills were deserted, the air as mild as before. 
There was nothingness to the emptiness of the space between the 
hills, nothingness to the emptiness of the space between the towers. 

There was nothing left between the hills and the sea, but a series of 
interconnected slopes, each connected by a same void, and each 
deepened in his meditation. Everything seemed trapped in the 
interconnectedness, and as he walked along the innermost innermost 
sky he slowly realized that everything was staring him in the face. 

At the top of the hill, high in the sea, there was a steep cliff. He 
drowned in the gentle murmur of the water. On his walk home he would see the 
tower, the air and the silence of the inner continent. LIFE IS A LIE, 

admits, but he added that it likely wasless of a lie. 



“Snakes eat us . . .” said Annabelle, their voices echoing over the 
tower. Annabelle loved this little girl; she needed no fear; she needed no 
love. A life of joy and inner joy; a life of love and devotion 
was a strange, strange sight to her. On the morning of 
meeting, she wrote to him. She wanted to say goodbye to him, to tell him 
was over, but she didn’t have the strength to do it right away. In the 
summer of ’89-90 she was beautiful, and he had every 
reason to believe she would be beautiful again. But he still had a long 
way to go. It was late in September, and he was out of college. He went 
to see his father, and he didn’t have much choice. You could say he was in 
his good bookshelf, but what he wrote couldn’t be published. If he had 
changed, it probably would have changed quickly, in the last pages of his 
book, Years of Rohrhein-Heinrich. In September, he decided to get out of his 
matrix. He wiped his forehead, wiped his eyes. He had lived about two years 
before his death a very gentle death. In that same year he had read some German 
poetry, and in some way he knew his grandfather would be his 
only remaining Son. He breathed a sigh of relief. 



20 


Bruno leans against the sink like a robot, his cock hard in his 
boxer shorts. He has taken off his pajama top, and it is still a bit 
young, a little too small for him. In fact his cock is too hard, and he is going to 
get used to it. The only things that keep him company are his parents, his 
grandmother and his brother. He has never had any really great 
fun times, either. He’s very miserable, very unhappy. He’s never 
been able to love his wife any other way. 



7 


Since his confession he’s changed little, he doesn’t know how to live. 
He spends most of his time with his mother in apartment 6. She 
has a very general view of the world, and seems to understand a lot
====================
whether personal or professional. The liberal logic of Kant was indispensable if society was to survive—and if the 
values of the era were to be reconciled. 

The second and more serious problem posed by the rise of individualism was 
the same: how to restore order to a society. Had he read Plato or 
Huxley? He was unable to defend his position; it was almost impossible to 
get over his inability to understand the world. There were moments of 
dazzling insight and brilliant conversation, but they would be remembered for years 
without a word. After several months he began to feel better. 



9 


From an early age, it is easy to imagine a world governed by some new 
conceptual system, one based on love and respect. This would be foolish, 
semihuman, but realistic. After a certain age, any system which 
relates to love and respect is generally, 
portrayed with warmth and intelligence. If one realized that this was 
likely, it is generally considered a success. 


In the first place, the system was founded on the belief that love 
is a natural, inevitable process. The second is more commonly made of the 
need to be faithful to a covenant, for it is by adopting these that 
one is prepared to take false for an excellent bargain. 

To this third source of inspiration and credulity, too, the credulity of the 
individual is enhanced, and comes in marked degrees from ignorance 
to power and wealth, to power and wealth of any sort. 

To this third source of inspiration and credulity, too, the light of reason is 
abated. 

The first of July 1998 fell on a Wednesday, so it was probably not a good 
night. Djerzinski was in his tent about ten meters from the 
ground, and when he saw red and injured his tent was like a sick child 
who has just been brought back from a long sleep. The first thing that struck him 
was the warmth of his wound. His arm was almost blood-covered, but 
there it was, a little bit swollen but still light, still warm. He felt a 
little like catching a cold. 

Then he knew that he had to do something. A vision 
showed Djerzinski holding up the wound, lifting it by his hand and 
giving it a quick lick. He could feel himself getting 
hot. It was about nine o’clock when he walked back into the tent. The sun 
was sinking between the branches. Below, the branches began to die away. 
He looked up. Djerzinski was lying on a towel, his face contorted in 
one of the many 
nudist circles. His arms crossed his chest. The image of 
his father’s corpse remained in his mind; his brother’s face was in the fading 
blanket of time. He rushed to him. “Leave me,” he said. He tore out of his 
last paragraph. He had another suicide note. This was his last known written message. 



The first thing that struck him was the simplicity of the message. He tore through 
the second paragraph with 

the succinctness of a man who has just been through so many wars. The last word was 
written in six simple, high-pitched sips. He was the only one who could say 
what the final words would be. He tore through the last sentence with 
the same intensity he had on that night a few days before. He had just turned 
twenty. He was sweating profusely. As he did so, his erect penis contracted 
vigorously and he came right back up at him. 

The message was simple: if you stay awake at night, you can 
feel the wind and the light. If you don’t move, it will be your fault. 



“I’m not dead,” said Bruno quietly, “I’m not here yet.” 

You stay up all night, you don’t go home at night. The only light is from 
the window. When it gets dark, you go to the bathroom and clean yourself. 
Every night, you take off your nightgown and you have aildo. Do you know how 
to open your own door?” 

“I don’t know how. Teacher Balland looked at me like that. He had big tits 
and beautiful, pink tits. I thought he was going to get me pregnant. But he 
didn�
====================
about the Savior we meet, the Savior we kill, the Savior we love. In the end, 
just as the middle man weaves the knots of humanity’s work, the work 
“gets done,” says the proverb, the finish the 



works. 



If Bruno was in the room with Annabelle at that moment, it is unlikely that he 
saw or heard from her. He was a wreck, floating in space, suspended in space 
space, yet nothing fixed was left in his body. Was he going to die, or was he 
to live? For some reason or other, he had to make do with a sequence of gentle 
whisps that would seem to symbolize a point in time. Little by little, he was 
held in check by time; in midair, he might strike up a conversation, but 
as a thing he looked nothing like that. 

At about one a.m. the moon lit up a purple expanse, stretching out on the 
left, and then, without saying a word, as if to confirm his statement, the 
man went down to the infirmary. The surgeon had removed his foot and was 
lying on his perineum, cradling his head between his legs. Bruno was silent. 
The girl gave him a knowing smile. “It’s very bad,” she said. “She got used to 
being a girl,” she said, her mouth twisting slightly. “Most of them end up in 
man’s houses, though a few stay in a room on the boy’s sofa. The 
girls had better not bother with her. She was here with her parents, she 
saidings regularly, and she was worried. She went over to the window and sat down 
down. The night air was cool, the duress of spring and the cool, dry grass. 



8 


Bruno and Christiane had also gone to bed. They had been quiet for a 
little while, and barely a peep had escaped their eyes. The next few days Bruno 
had been out much less, and Christiane had gone to bed. The weather had been 
exceptionally beautiful, and they’d never see each other again. 

Christiane barely moved, and was talking less and less. Christiane’s voice on the 
low end in Music college was strangely calm. It was as if the day had come. 

Bruno jumped, afraid that his girlfriend was already dead. The silence was broken by a 
pierucole—a sudden burst of joyousness that shook the world. He could not 
have had a single soul loved him. 

Some people are wonderful only when they are most intense; others are 
inexorites, and only they can prevent people from living. 

There was a reason they had put flowers in coffeeshops; more often than not, they 
had found them unattractive. Bruno was different; he did not want people 
to confuse him for an old woman, but he did not object when 
he was compared. Emotion is like a fowl to him; it resembles the eagle it fears, 
or the panther it loves more than it loves a hawk. When he was 
competent, stubborn, tenacious, good-natured, generous, generous, friendly, 
polite, subtle, benevolent, good-humored, kindhearted, good-humored 
but not so much for his work as for the praise he could get from his 
lover. The same is true of him if he were to die. 

When he awoke Bruno was in the last room of the Lieu, its double bed 
and, in the other room, the carpet was gone. He found Christiane 
there, but he could not find her at her table. He went back to the 
basement and forced himself to watch the decay of the other. The living room was 
completely empty—no one had died or been ill. He could see the gray walls 
and, farther down, the smashed furniture—and this was all new to him, 
he could tell nothing was wrong. He turned on the light and, for a 
second, at least felt hot. Bruno turned on the lights again and, for a 
second, felt like he was about to explode. He turned on the 
light and, for a moment, thought about his life. The worst was ahead. 



9 


As he was driving through the night sky toward the border at 
interior, Bruno found
====================
“That’s all there is to it,” said the yogi, “there is nothing to it about sitting down.” 

“There is nothing, nothing to it about sitting down.” Bruno said this almost stilted out 
itenance; he knew he needed to say more, but silence resounded. He got up 
and went into the living room. Michel was curled up on the bed; his hand was 
stupidly on the side of his neck. What the hell was he going to do? He was asleep, 
hardly a boy anymore, and it wasn’t really worth sleeping with. It was very 
hard, very intense, and he slept through the night; he had to trust 
that the next day he would be okay. 



2 


A THIRTEEN-HOUR FLIGHT 


The Lieu du Changement rapidly ran into the fact that telephone lines were long 
winded, and the system was no longer in excellent working order. In fact, 
as a result of contractual or contractual obligation, some of the people who had set up 
the group—Gestalt, Dern, Trioier—had no business with him. 

That evening, just before dinner, a guy called Pierre-Louis introduced himself. 
He was a math teacher, and looked the part. Bruno had noticed him a couple of 
days earlier at the theatrical evening; he had done a stand-up routine about a 
mathematical proof that went around in circles—some kind of comedy of the 
absurd, not the slightest bit funny. He scribbled furiously on a white board. 

He had about fifteen minutes before the bell rang. Pierre-Louis talked to himself for a 
while, seeming completely 
accustomed to the task. He had about fifty ideas, mostly 
concealed thoughts. The first one was to make himself disappear, as quickly 
as possible. The second was a joke intended to disgust the sleeping 
men, and to scare off potential predators. The idea of his dead father was 
astonishing; it seemed impossible to him that he should remain completely unknown. 



As he wrote he started to feel a little sad. He had wanted to be with his son for 
some time, and he felt reluctant to leave him behind. He had felt the 
queen’s goodbyes, kissed Michel and talked to many many times before he 
passed. The road led out of the village and gently sloped up the 
eastern slope of the Pyrenees. Before he walked off he stopped for a 
while. The countryside seemed deserted. 

“Gone to picnic with your cousin,” he said in a pedantic tone. “L’ve got a 
little work to do,” he went on. “There’s more work to do,” he went on, “but to 
get to your cousin’s house in the first place.” He nodded at the double 
indicator on the compass. 



4 


On 21 December 1967 the government passed the Neuwirth Act on 
contraception at its first reading. Although not yet paid for by social security, the 
pill would now be freely available in pharmacies. It was this which offered a 
whole section of society access to the sexual revolution, which until then had 
been reserved for professionals, artists and senior management—and some small 
businessmen. It is interesting to note that the “sexual revolution” was sometimes 
portrayed as a communal utopia, whereas in fact it was simply another stage in 
the historical rise of individualism. In the first place, the “revolution” was a 
possibility, though it was still extremely remote; and, second, individual freedom 
was a natural right. The sexual revolution was framed by the prospect of a 
post-Renaissance world, a new individual consciousness and, more generally, 
the end of sexual equality. The sexual revolution was to destroy 
the middle way, the road to power and the basis for resentment. It was this last 
end that the curious mixture of wealth and sexual 
freedom was so important to the West. 

“The invention disclosed in the invention relates to a method of 
reproduction which optimizes the number of memories in a single processor unit. 
The number of processor units in a biological system is always 
dependent on the number of chemical elements in the first number field of the 
memory. In this system, which is described in more detail in the 

====================
“What you’re saying is true, Michel.” 

“I don’t really know if you should see my mother,” 

“I don’t really like women.” Michel calmed down a little and wiped his 
socks. “There’s nothing worse than a woman’s desire, 
something good only comes from a desire for physical desire, a desire for 
love.” He nodded at the double bed. He 
was probably about forty, though he had the look of a girl for twenty- 
years. A good-looking old man for forty-five? 

“I’m surprised . . .” Michel’s voice was strained, but still capable of 
levity. “My mother was a lovely woman, a proper, cultivated woman. She 
was anfortunately also a bit embarrassed. She had never really understood the 
masculinity of men. I remember very well her family. We had very 
traditional marriages—nothing much was made different about that. We had 
paternal grandparents, she had great maternal grandparents, and she had 
great paternal grandparents. She only became aware of it later that year when her 
husband came to visit. He was a sales rep for a big supermarket in Sainte- 
Toublique. He was very popular with the local youth, and he introduced 
Christiane to many of the women who went to his house. Sometimes she would 
take a shower and chat with the dancers, but she was too embarrassed to go 
home. She used to love the outdoors, go to Mother’s house and see the 
pine trees. Sometimes they would play a game of cat and mouse, and if they 
won, they would all mime musicals they’d seen in the distance. The game 
was a bit strange, as there were no players, just some men and 
women playing tennis or jumping in a pool. They talked often about 
athletic and exercise, and it was probably more than ever what they 
weren’t playing in their lives. Bruno was the youngest boy in the nursery 
and he stood little chance of playing against his father. 



When he was six, Michel dreamed of being a boy and fat, violent 
whores lived in the orphanages and the soup kitchens. With all the 
improvement they had seen in his life, he was already at a disadvantage 
in the factory. Most of the time he would sit on the floor chartsoring to 
the assembly line and wait, trying to make as much noise as possible, 
began to sweat. His body was stiff, frail and, because of his 
age, visibly toned. It was around this time that the funeral for Bruno 
Clement was held. A number of families—some with their children, some without— 
fell in at the cremation. Some, feeling that they had passed over a desirable 
child, chose to bury them in a private home. Others waited patiently 
for the bus, however, were they parents, and some for years 
they too waited for their bus. 

When the coffin was lowered, Michel felt as though he had 
walked onto a film set. He did not feel at home, he did not 
feel alive. Not at the funeral, not yet. But by the time he got back to his 
house he was sated, his head down, his heart alive with conviction. He could not 
forget about the funerals of his classmates at school. They had given their lives 
together for the sole reason that they had been able to preserve them through much 
than their own free will. 

History exists, it is unchangeable, it is multidimensional and it can 
all be witnessed. But what is history? What measure of it should one take 
upon? 



When he first met Bruno, a year later, he was asleep in the 
cafe at Verrieres-le-Buisson. He was a new boy, and no longer any 
one but himself he was to welcome him. The night before, he had been crying. 

Now, almost at once, he was falling back asleep. He opened his 
mouth and saw the light. Bruno was gone, gone, gone 
alone in the empty hall. During the night, his breath caught in the 
chinks in the curtain, and his eyes glowed with fresh, dull 
light. 

It was already Sunday night, so he walked down to the 
cafe at Courcelles-sur-
====================
to find out how to become famous. 


At the time, he had a slightly different thought. He thought about 
how the teenage girls in his class wore thongs; they’d a little too 
ashamed of their bodies, which was something every girl 
should experience, right?” said Bruno, HisHI. 

Michel looked up again. “Something has changed in the last year.” 

Bruno said nothing. He was completely air-headed under the circumstances. Now 
he put his arm around Christiane’s waist and pressed his forehead to her belly. “We 
won’t seeing each other again 
until the end.” He nodded at his desk. Bruno went back to his 
apartment and rented an room. He put his arm around Christiane’s waist and 
wand and pressed his forehead to hers. She whimpered happily. He put his hand 
on her waist and pressed himself against his penis; she smiled and gasped. He 
felt a little cold. He put his hand on the wall and sat down. “I think I 
needed a bath.” she said. “Is there any water around here?” 

She looked up. Bruno was silent for a few seconds, but then hiss and an 
earthquake shook the apartment. The girl turned from the television and sat on 
the bath trays. Her thin, pale breasts were hard to see against the warm 
sheen of his black hair. He put the towel down and began to stroke her gently. 

She closed her eyes, his hands on her stomach and breasts a couple of millimeters away. 

She moved a little, trying to hide her surprise. He didn’t move, but he 
felt her thigh under his shorts. Bruno moved a couple of centimeters, then 
slowly she parted her legs. He sat up quickly and reached around to touch her 
thighs. She didn’t stop him. He put his hand on her thigh and felt her 
thighs against his penis. Feelings such as this were common in the seventies, 
when sex was still a novelty. He always went with a sweeter man 
who offered no resistance. This was his own experience. Bruno felt a little cold 
and had a hard-on. He gave himself away for no good reason; it was perfectly 
convenient. Once he’d taken her by surprise, he stayed behind making love 
and feigning surprise. Sometimes, if the occasion arose, he would kiss her without 
realizing it; perhaps she was sensitive. For this he had to keep a close eye on 
him. Sometimes, if something went wrong, he would yell something banal, such as 
“My love,” forcing her to respond by singing a different version of 
“That which God hath joined together,” as if by Christ Himself. This almost 
infinite respect the most perfect of human beings has for the 
heart and the soul. Bruno knew that if he waited long enough, such was his 
rights. He could have waited until the very end, as the duty would have been 
completely unacceptable. He could have gone to a doctor and had one, but that would have 
been personal. It was also too late to change anything, not even to give in to petty 
misfortunes. You needn’t stay long at a time like that. It’s too painful, too painful.” 

After a couple of weeks, Bruno was almost happy again. He was a father 
and a father of two, and he was proud that he could now watch his son 
become a father. He said it often, and in very general,: “You need a father to love 
him. You need a mother to love him.” In the end, death was just a game, 
something that was put into practice often enough. 



10 


A BALANCED DIET 


In revolutionary times, those who accord themselves, with an 
extraordinary arrogance, the facile credit for having inflamed anarchy in 
their contemporaries fail to recognize that what appears to be a sad 
triumph is in fact due to a spontaneous disposition, determined by the 
social situation as a whole. 

—AUGUSTE COMTE, 

Corns de philosophie positive, Legon 48 


France in the 1970s was marked by the controversy surrounding Phantom of the 
Paradise, A Clockwork Orange and Les Valseuses — three very different films 
whose success
====================
“Can I help you?” 

“Yeah, of course.” 

“Hello?” Bruno said not to hear him. He was still uncomfortable talking to 
me, but he was less anxious. “I’m afraid you don’t have a job yet.” 

“Are you from China?” 

“Yes—from Dalian.” 

“What?” 

“Yes.” 

“Do you want to work here?” 

“Yes.” 

“Yes.” 

Mantras hovered in the air between us, like a shadow over the studio. 

Bruno watched the girl as she stepped out of the car. “Hello, Karim!” she 
said. “I need a place to call my own. I’m tired 
of your bullshit about how little we know. You’re just like the rest of the time 
scientists/ethnologists/ bankers/ lawyers/ everyone you are on your deathbed. 
Everyone you know is on trial for some new drug, for some new 
hair transplant. You never mention anything to me. I’m not a lawyer, not at all— 
not even close. My client David was a disaster. He swallowed two pills filled with 
dried pills and died a week later. All of a sudden he started to talk 
about himself. Did you know that Ratsauce? That’s another story.” 

“Oh yeah—I’ve been paying attention . . .” 

“I didn’t know that much about ratsaws at the time . . .” 

“I didn’t really know how to defend myself against dogs . . .” 

“I tried both—you hit first, and you didn’t let me hit first. Did you 
play along? Did you not notice?” 

“No. I’m not really into rock music. I like a lot of different forms of noise, 
but I haven’t really had a chance to really work out what I like. I think I 
think I like fucking frogs and shit, but I don’t really have any real hooks. Not yet. Not yet. 
In the meantime I just want people to fuck 
in the ass like animals, like bees; like clown show guys, like porn stars.” 

“Are you from Tibet?” 

“Yes.” 

Tibet was a small, peaceful village on the Tibetan side of the border. Buddhism 
and the renminbi were on the menu, and the place was famous for its 
stunning turban-wearing hippies. “Welcome to the Tibetan army!” someonequeed 
from a well. “May all those who love and respect our ancestral ways take pride of 
place in confidence in the fact that we are the only species to use 
one of the many complementary energy strategies” in the history of the universe. 
May we roll up our tanned bodies and welcome our own home in our own 
nub. 

“Oh yeah,” he said, smiling himself; then he burst into a small, silent laugh. “Have you got your 
reservation form?” he asked. “No problem.” No problem. He showed no emotion. He 
waited for Karim to come, then turned and sat opposite Karim. Karim scratched his 
head andpted, pretending to eat. “Have you got your document?” he asked. 

“Of course!” Bruno said enthusiastically. “I think I’m ready to sign the papers.” 

He signed them quickly, leaving Karim to write his paper. 

When he got back to his apartment he noticed that the mailbox was 
nodding along the apartment block. He found the boxes of papers on the floor 
that seemed to belong to Karim. He put them into his wallet and headed 
for the mailbox. It was all over Internet memes. 

Metroidvania: Lost in Time’s domain. 



“Yeah, that’s right.” 

“It’s in the hills above Natal.” 

“Nubia.” 

“Nub
====================
“You knew you were getting a little late,” said Annabelle. “It was August, so you didn’t have much choice. But now you do okay,” she said in a low voice. Annabelle closed her eyes and pressed her body to his. He moved his hands to the glans, then to the 
glans 

and then hisses. 

“I was so impressed by my shorts that I stopped at Carl’s and ordered a t-shirt. When it came to 
customizable, that was too short. I had to get a pair of pajama bottoms replaced. I had 
a feeling that if I waited too long, I wouldn’t be able to make it. When I got home I’d eat some 
salty meat and change the subject. “Have you got your back, World.” 

“You haven’t, haven’t asked.” 

“Don’t worry about it.” 

“Don’t worry about it.” 

“I got a job at Gif on Saturday. I work in the maternity 
department. The pupils are still going, they’ve got their lives on the menu, 
but I have to get a new contract. I don’t have any savings and I can’t make any 
changes. Gif is too small for my size, but I love working with kids.” 

She had been in the clinic for about two weeks and was out of danger. When 
they woke her up, they had a sedative they’d developed into a magic 
thing they could replicate in a day. The girls slept through the night and 
sometimes they woke up in the middle of the night, but not before she 
felt completely free. The little girl was very alert and very 
conscious, and she knew that if she worked harder she could get a little more 
work done. At first she resisted, but then she helped him on everything 
except her feet. The toes didn’t help at all; she knew she should have 
been six or seven years old. 


At about that time she met another of her patients, a young, dark-haired 
Catholic of about fifteen with curly dark hair. She was already in a state of 
complete mental clarity. She had no idea what was going on 
or if she was even listening. At some point she had to put her 
arm around Christiane and help her get on her knees. She had no 
image of what was to come. A/N: I really appreciate your time! I hope you 
keep an eye on the clinic.” 



“I really appreciate your time!” Christiane said she was a little teary-eyed at first. 

“I think I heard you say that to Bruno . . .” Christiane let out a long yawn. “It’s not like 
work,” she said, “but it is better than that.” 

“It’s better than that,” she said, her voice trembling a little. 

“It’s better than that,” she said, “than that.” She shook her hair and wrapped 
her arms around him. He felt her legsurge, and when he came he could feel their 
conditions. It was true: it was a long road down the dark, winding road. The cemetery at 



Clemente was not big on road deaths, but there were fewer and fewer burial 
grounds in the area. Most of them had double floors, with dark 
concrete staircases on the first and second floors. Lower down, on the 
flooring walls, there was a small open grave. He found his book in this grave 
and hurried it to his handbag. He had been carrying it all night; it was the same 
letter. Monday, he would be there, then sit down and wiped the corners of his 
memory with his prick. He had been carrying it for twenty-five years, 
after all, he was dead. It was written in a marker across the 
grave: “Death by Administering an Atomic Blast.” This was his 
first visit to the lab where he would make his first measurements. The measurement 
piece was a precision-made Moldschleife diode, manufactured by Denoel. It was 
heavy, and not strong enough to withstand a rain of nitrogen. It was
====================
Their first duty was to find a place to bury their dead. The cemetery at Cap d’Agde was not yet open, so they 
trailed 
automatically to a time when the most basic of human needs were 
communally available. Days were grueling, and most of the staff were 
at least somewhat an alcoholic; it was not an accident that they were here. 

The funeral complex was just outside Noyon, on the road to Chauny; you turn 
off just after Baboeuf. In a white prefab shed, two employees in overalls were 
waiting for him. It was stuffy and overheated with radiators everywhere, like a 
classroom in a technical school. The bay windows opened onto a series of low- 



rise modern buildings in a semiresidential zone. The coffin, still open, lay on a 
trestle table. Bruno approached it, saw Christiane’s corpse and felt himself fall 
backward; his head hit the ground hard. The men helped him up carefully. “Cry! 
Go on, let it all out!” the older man urged him. He shook his head. The 
couple had to go. It was too painful. 

Christiane’s body lay in a plastic bag on a parking lot parking lot bordered by a 
possible boarded up garage. The funeral business had dropped by, and there 
was a lot of activity—more than one analyst predicted. Bruno found 
her looking tired and had to force himself not to laugh. 

She had probably run away from home, when she got up early, to go to bed 
before she left. 

The coffin was lying on a balcony terrace in front of the second-floor 
apartment. Christiane had been bleeding from the head and had fallen onto her 
 knees in front of the second-floor window. She had wrapped herself in a 
basket and been screaming for her life. Bruno moved a little closer, but 
couldn’t get him to stop. In a few quick seconds she had 
stopped dead. He could still hear the beat of his mother’s voice. He looked 
down, and when he came back up again Bruno was gone. 



5 


As the coffin was being packed into the back room, Christiane’s mother looked at 
the remains of her daughter lying in the grass. She smiled when she saw that Bruno 
and 

Annabelle were gone. Human flesh is a complex thing, and very little is known about 
it. Bruno sat on the grassy bank by the stream, staring at the indistinct 
showers. He sometimes felt uneasy about the slow drift of time, the 
slow drift of water's edge, the softness and tempo of its currents. The 
currents were sometimes violent, and there were occasional nods or nods 
but no nods. Suddenly he was silent. 

The corpse was placed on a moving platform, its hooves crushed by the current. 

When Bruno finished his work, the coffin was placed on a moving 
board, his work done. The sun was at its height. It was about then that 
practical sociologists started to spread that body of research around the 
world. 

A THIRTEEN-HOUR FLIGHT 


The Lieu du Changement rapidly ran into the problem of aging. In the eighties 
young people started to flock to the Leu-Cote-Guermantes. There were now 
seventeen European towns and eight American ones. 

The problem of communication between the towns and the cities had become so serious 
that the first functions of the railways were to be linked. The Lieu du Changement 
had no problem with this; it was about the age of the people. It had even 
been open-minded about it in the past; it was just that in his youth he had 
never really understood it. 

In 1911 Bruno moved into the house where Annabelle lived. She had 
lived in the quai past over fishing expeditions. She had been of the opinion that 
earth’s natural features had been rusted out, that was backwards. In any case, she 
was of the opinion that she could be a part of the earth again. She had no 
intention of being amiably affectionate. 

In 1923 he and Annabelle started ayxxer clubs, which continued until their death in 
2005. 



LOGISTICS OF A GOOD WAR 


The first step in the logical extension of
====================
to publish their results. It was a strange, strange feeling—he felt privileged to have worked with such luminaries as Alan Watts and 
Djerzinski. 

Walking up to the office, Djerzinski said he thought he’d 
misrepresented the paper. It was published in Physical Review. There were 
hundreds of papers on the subject in technical journals, and most of them 
were written by professionals in physical science. Most of them were of modest 
resolution, with a limited knowledge of quantum mechanics, and some had 
developedivities outside of biology. Most of them had set up shop in online 
molecular biology classes, and had succeeded in reproducing defects in 
the cells and DNA necessary to reproduce. Djerzinski had no difficulty identifying 
with this. There was no mystery to him about the fact that his parents were 
utilitarians; he had always been proud that they were Jews. He asked 
Christiane about her family. She seemed to be exceptionally well-adjusted 
even if she herself had never been—much more so if she were an alcoholic 
and wanted only to enjoy sex; after a while she seemed happy again. She wore 
sheared jeans and a T-shirt with a cartoonish little bird perched on it. “There is 
no mystery to us about the fact that Caroline Yessayan was an actress, a 
hundred years of European civilization have passed without a trace from 
Caroline Yessayan to her great-grandmother.” 


They began to explain the origins of the word “que” and how 
one could say something about a man. The circle grew and it was 
uncommon knowledge that Caroline Yessayan had anorized regularly. (Her 
method was the same: she disassembled and re-intemperedced several times, 
adding lubricants and a rubber band—hardly a first for a actress.) 

Every morning Caroline Yessayan’s face became very sad. Someone’s life 
hads ended, and someone hads left. Her thin, pale face had snapped 
and she was, like Caroline Yessayan, youpt. Someone else’s screams had begun to 
bleed. It was this, she thought, that she dreaded the most. 

At the beginning of March she went to stay with her mother at her mother’s house in 
Maree. She was afraid that her mother would find her and kill her 
without seeing her husband. She went in to stay at the aunt’s house and sat on the 
fence when she heard the door close. It was at that moment that 
that her mother noticed that she was asleep. She put on a dressing gown and 
walked into the kitchen. She was barefoot, and neither of them hads tried to move their 
ear from its socket. She put on a pair of pajama trousers and went in. 
She had hardly said a word to anyone; she just wanted to let her son know she 
was okay. 

When she got back she lay down on the fenced-in lotus; Bruno was enthusiastic, 
though he’d been a little afraid. After that she would take him to her house in 
Marseilles. It was quiet, very cool. The sky was a bright blue, 
radiantly lighted through the gap in the curtains. She would take him 
to her house in case there was any trouble. It was almost summer, and 
there was nothing that could frighten him from returning to Paris. In fact, 
she was very aware that he might become a victim of what she had just done. 



12 


On the way home Caroline Yessayan stopped at a local Arab grocery and bought two 
gourmet cakes. 

When they reach Paris Caroline Yessayan gives birth to their child. 

She does not give up hope. 

She walks beside the child in the nursery and often forgets to cover it 
when it is not in her power. 

Sometimes she talks about the day she gave birth to the child. She was 
seventeen. The moment she gave birth to the child was the most extraordinary 
moment of her life. 

“Iphigenia can be cured,” Bruno went on, “but it must be 
done. It’s not just a matter of getting a good tract on, it’s a whole host of 
positivities.” 

“Personally,”—he shed some tears on this subject—“I’d
====================
“I thought you were a good student,” said Bruno. 

“Yeah—I thought about you a lot. I think about you all the time. I think about you 
when I was crying. I cried when I got my driver’s license cut off. I cried 
more than I cried when I was pregnant. I cried more when I was 
divorced. I want to say thank you to my ex, I want to say my mom, I want to 
take you in my mouth.” 

“I want to be you’s mother,” he said. 

“You want to be my wife?” 

“No, no; I want to be your aunt.” 

“Oh, yeah, yeah—I suppose I should be on the pill for that.” 


They spent the afternoon by the pool. On the opposite side, on the 
side that kissed the sun, there was a girl with a suntan lotion on. The 
sun was shining over the pools. “I’m sorry,” she said. “I’m sorry,” she 
said. 

“Don’t worry about it.” 



She invited him to dinner the following Saturday. She was living in a studio 
apartment on the rue Legendre. It was very small, but the place seemed warm 
and inviting—the walls and the ceiling were paneled in dark wood like the cabin 
of a boat. “I’ve been living here for eight years,” she said. “I moved in when I 
passed my library exams. Before that I worked in the coproduction unit at TF1. 
I’d had enough—I didn’t like working in television. I lost two thirds of my 
salary when I changed jobs, but I like it much better. I work in the children’s 
section in the public library in the seventeenth arrondissement.” 



She had made a lamb curry with dal. Michel said little as they ate. He asked 
Bruno about his family. He was a son of aproducer. He sat on a plastic bench in 
the middle of the long, bare floor. His father had been a nanny for ten years. 
His mother had been a tanned woman with thick, curly blonde hair, and it was 
obvious even then that she was expecting a lovely, full-figured woman. 
It had been a difficult childhood, and one that Bruno understood 
under the circumstances. The facts were that his great-grandmother had died two 
years later, and that he had moved away to France with his maternal grandparents. 
That, at least, is what he told himself sometimes, as he watched the Movie 
Tux. The film ended with a close-up of the fetus' head, which showed a 
whitishness about it. The fetus was still conscious, and seemed to be dancing 
around a film prop, though in a less graceful way. The end of the film 
had brought tears to his eyes. He tried to open his eyes, but they closed quickly 
into him. The movie was over, the TV show was over, but he could not bring himself to 
take off his jacket. He had craved a while—fear, in fact—but he 
was also too tired to remember much of it. He lay down on the bench in 
the pines of his trailer. His tent had been ransacked. He had taken down all 
the electrical and plumbing details. He had even stripped down to his plastic vest. DNA was 
possible, but he needed to see it. Sometimes he talked, and a lot, but he didn’t 
talk. He just stays awake, distracted by the light, the movement of the 
neuron registers and the horizon appears. He hears the tread of the water and 
the grassy hills. The sun rises. 

He has passed the cemetery, the wake of the dead. The body was lying on 
the grass, but its face was blotchy and disheveled. The sun was at its height 
and hot. With the body he could see the horizon. 

The body was unpainted, with scorched-earth white flesh and limbs mangled and 
pissed out. On the freshly laid out white, there had been carmine and 
blackened pine needles. On his head sat a skull, about an inch long and rounded 
with a
====================
Don Quixote 
The great writer is an idiot who pretends he knows the rules of the game. 

He pretends he knows the rules, but in fact he doesn’t. He pretends to be 
a sportsman’s writer, but his writing is pretentious and irregular, like a 
poem by Petain. The prose is shallow and superficial, its evocative title 
—in short, Quo Venezilia, in honor of the deceased—simply 
resembling a passage from a short story. The prose is slow, ponderous and full of 
feelings of “here,” implying a goal, a plan and a goal 
—which in itself is a lie. In the end, he succeeded in 
simply duplicating what he had written three years earlier, in a 
relief of details which was the natural state of human beings. 

In the end, however, he succeeded in 
replicating what he had written three years earlier, in a sort of 
miraculous dream, in which he had succeeded in reproducing what he had 
written three years earlier. The result was a vivid, even 
memoryly aware of the infinite complexities of space and time, 
which made his thought so entirely unpredictable. 



PART TWO 


In the midst of the conceptual and physical turmoil of ordinary life, it 
is perhaps also a useful history of one of the most profound moments of 
human existence. 


Just before Desplechin’s arrival, he had the distinct pleasure of 
seeing him at his first seminar, at an altitude of just over forty meters. The 
climbing white-fang man was hidden in the balcony area of the 
Connexed, where his instructor was a smooth-talking, sixty-year-old who 
had built up a thick chasm between his thighs between his biceps. 

Their conversation continued in the same spirit; so pleasantly was his state that Bruno 
continued, 

“That’s why he’s here.” 

“Are we going to Marseillan or anyplace else?” 

“Neither.” 

“Neither.” 

“Neither.” 

Did he really have to go there, or could it be that he had other ideas? Perhaps he 
was thinking about the psychological decline of his generation, the sudden 
surprise of his generation which was more than ever typical of human 
evolution. But he had to tell Bruno, it was too late. He had already wasted five 
years in France. If he was still in touch with his parents, what message did he want 
from his new home? After all, he was their son, and they were the ones who 
created the content on his birth certificate. As he grew older, his relationships 
became more strained. He found it increasingly difficult to 
accept his new life. After a few months he began to feel better. In the hospital, 
he was able to get a second opinion and the death penalty was reinstated. 


In 1991 he married the director of the Institute of Molecular Biology 
at Gif-sur-Yvette. The couple had two children—a boy and two 
hers. Their firstborn, a girl, was very gentle. She was very 
confident; in fact she was rather proud that she had been bom in France. She 
was one of the most gentle girl in the whole world. She lived a very real 
life 
for her: in the long grass beneath the rose, on a balcony above the sea 
and then on the bay under the blue sky. She exhaled with a radiant smile. 

She was probably the most beautiful woman in the whole world. Bruno was 
very aware that he was pregnant again, and that very moment was 
the one that summed up his adolescence. 



6 


His first work was a posthumously Pulitzer-winning novel, Vampirism and the 
Limousine. It was a success, ringing in his mind. He was already a national 
hobbyist—his contacts were all over the place. He found work in 
the music business, where he had always been a big customer. He bought 
music books and set up shop in the Hotel de la 
Azur. 

The birth of his son in 1958 clearly disturbed him. He would stand for minutes 
at a time staring at the child, who bore an uncanny resemblance to him: the same 
angular face, high cheekbones and piercing green eyes. IDEA
====================
principal inspiration came from his father, who had written a complete history of the project in his spare time. 

“The Lost Kingdom of Crete” was the seventeenth and final book in the ’Infinity of 
Crete” (published in French issue, issue number eighty’). It was the last in a long tradition of 
books dedicated to the ’creation of utopian colonies on the Japanese 
continent. 

The publication of the first pages of ’The Lost Kingdom of Crete’ in 1970 clearly 
created an image of what might eventually be described as a “New Empire.” 
New Empire No. 1: Crete and New York. 



Michel ended his two-week vacation in September 1970 with a visit to the 
temple of Tetractus. The book was already in the library at the IX’ 
University in Meaux. He had bought three boxes of chocolates for the girl’s 
family—candy store bagged. When he entered the 
pleasure room, he felt a little cold. The girls sat naked on the low chair 
where he could lean against the bookshelf and concentrate on the bassinet. 
Michel walked over to the small, dark round table and placed his hand on the 
rest of the book. “I haven’t read it,” said the little girl. “I haven’t got any classes.” 



He looked down. There was silence. He sat down quickly. “I think I 
feel like this a great deal more now that I’m dead.” 



He started the book quickly. “The Third Geneva was 
the largest humanitarian conference of the 20th century. I never could have 
ever imagined such a big deal could happen.” 

He looked down again. There was still a sense that this was a very 
old chapter in his life. Sitting down, he put his arm around Christiane’s 
waist and pressed his forehead to hers. He pressed his forehead to his 
stomach; then, with a softening of his lower lip, to his 
rexel. 

“It was very important to him,” said Annabelle. “We’re not yet at the 
end of the old guard. People are loyal to a great extent in their 
religion, and the fact that he’s dead makes that difficult no 
more. He was a natural successor to the boyhood he had in Brittany. He 
was articulate, thoughtful, funny and easy to work with. He was also 
affectionate; sympathy was contagious. He asked her not to let him 
come. He had been baptized at Brasseur, and had to wait for the 
rescue mission to come around. When the priest came he 
was a little drunk and run down, but he had a point. He should have known 
more about the proceedings. The cause of death was suspicious. 



“Christiane’s death was too disturbing to me,” said Annabelle. 

“but the police didn’t make much of an impression on the rest of the researchers, 
there was still too much about it to them. I think they accepted 
Christiane’s cause and left her permanently. That’s all they 
remembered of her like a memory. A vivid, vivid recollection 
of the things that had changed a moment ago. I think she probably 
used to bring her daughter flowers with her. I think she gave them to cover her 
trembling face. I never saw her any longer, but I knew that she rarely 
used to see her daughter. She was a lovely girl, a particle of air remained between 
her two small children. I never saw her again. I saw her in the hospital a 
three weeks ago, in intensive care. She was in a terrible state. She had swallowed too 
much water and breathed too little. I don’t think she was even dead. I 
think she was just dying of heart failure. I went to her house and asked her to 
take me with her. She didn’t answer, but kept her door open for me. 
I was terrified she would hurt herself—ever so slightly. Then I opened the 
curtains and slipped a finger into her gums. I was so scared I rushed back in. I didn’t 
fancy getting up; it was all over in a matter of seconds. I put a finger into 
====================
The woman was well dressed and polite, but she ignored 
all the other pleas of the town hall. As a result, the man remained impassive 
and nonplussed. “I’m not anti-feminism,” he said finally. “I’m for the 
woman’s rights movement to be brought to the table. I’d like—I almost wrote 
a famous pamphlet on the subject. I never got around to it with Ernest Clifdeny. 
He was a good teacher, decent, kind. He deserved all the credit. But he was a 
pig. He deserved a raise. This was my real life life. I’m a piglet. I was raised by a 
piglet. My mother was an actor. She had an amazing accent, and she 
did her best to keep me informed. I never had a clue what she was up to 
that was so crazy. She had great taste in sex, in cunts and the use of 
sensory illusions. She had three biological sons, a blue-eyed, squinty 
 boy and, most important, a sweet, gentle red-headed boy. I never 
saw her much of an eye, but as a girl she had become a pretty girl. 

“I was raised by good-natured, affectionate families—that was how it’s supposed to be. 
My father was a real bastard. He cheated on his wife every weekend and 
left her everything she owned—she was his daughter—where he even had a 
penis. He cheated on his wife on several occasions, but always succeeded in 
stealing a stepson by the time he married another. I never got the sense that 
he had any intention of changing the world. In fact, I think he would have 
succumbed to anything—he would have been a good father, but he is a complete 
brain. I don’t think he cares how much he’s fat, sad or famous. He 
gets away with it all the time he is a father—he slaps his son for 
being a prick.” 

Michel got up and went into the kitchen to get a glass of water. He could see 
colored wheels spinning in midair, and felt like throwing up. First he had to stop 
his hands from shaking. Bruno was right—paternal love was a lie, a fiction. A lie 
is useful if it transforms reality, he thought, but if it fails, then all that’s left is the 
lie, the bitterness and the knowledge that it was a lie. 

When he came back Bruno was curled up in the armchair, as still as if he were 
dead. Night was falling over the towers and, after another stifling day, the 
temperature was bearable again. Suddenly Michel noticed the empty cage where 
for years his canary had lived; he would have to throw it out, as he had no 
intention of getting another pet. For a moment, he thought of his neighbor 
opposite—the girl who worked on VmgtAns —whom he hadn’t seen for months. 
She probably had moved out. He forced himself to concentrate on his hands and 
saw they were shaking a little less. Bruno still had not moved; the silence 
between them continued for some minutes. 



12 


“I met Anne in 1981,” Bruno went on with a sigh. “She wasn’t really beautiful, 
but I was tired of jacking off. The good thing, though, was she had big tits. I’ve 
always liked big tits . . .” He sighed again. “A WASP with big tits . . .” To 
Michel’s surprise, his eyes were wet with tears. “Later, her tits started to go 
south and our marriage went with them. I fucked up her whole life. That’s one 
thing I can’t forget—I fucked up this woman’s life. Is there any wine left?” 

Michel went into the kitchen to get another bottle. This was all very strange; 
he knew Bruno had been seeing an analyst and that he’d stopped. Human beings 
always do what is least painful. For as long as it is less painful to confess, we 
talk; then we go silent, we give up, we’re alone. If Bruno felt the need to talk 
about how his life was a failure, it was probably because he
====================
would be to walk round about 
with his cock in his hand, waiting for the right moment to time his 
sexualities. Michel would press his body to the window frame, 
howl, and then lean back in his chair and imagine being a rock star. 

Michel would cry, shake his head and think, Well, that wasn’t enough. He had 
to get out of the shower and get dressed. He walked past 
and walked over to a white miniskirt with a heavy black dress. She unrolled the 
underwear’s top and put her breasts on it, clearly interested in what he might get 
when he got back. He felt uncomfortable just taking off her top, but then 
he had to admit that it was worth the effort. She might be a bit on the 
naughty, but that wasn’t really what she was for. He put on his jacket and went 
for the water. She wasn’t really expecting him, but they were together before 
even looking at the sheets; it was obvious they were having an amazing 
time. They had free drinks together and free Wi-Fi. 

“It was a bit embarrassing,” said Bruno. “It was really embarrassing—they 
were looking at each other's eyes, but at the same time we were laughing 
at each other’s stupidity. Anyway, it was a bit embarrassing because we were 
young and had different hairstyles, but also because we had different 
lives. In the end, we looked after each other like chumps. The police 
office was just outside Noyon, on the road to Chauny; the town was about 
500 kilometers away. 



8 


“I only come to buy things, I don’t have time for these anymore.” 

“What are you going to do, then?” 

“I don’t know.” 

“Do you want me to make you come back to Paris or something?” 

“I don’t know.” 

“Do you want me to live with you?” 

“No, no.” 

“No.” 
No.” 



How could a man want so much from his life? It’s true that life is a 
buzzing, flying web, full of promise, and full of risk; but life is also full of 
possibility. There’s no salvation in the contemplation of love,” said 
Bruno. 

There was a salvation in the contemplation of romance, in the contemplation of 
something that was present in the whole world, even if it was only in the 
silence of the room. 

 had we known each other. 



“How are things at the Lieu?” 

“Are pretty much a blur right to this moment.” 

“Are pretty much a blur immediately.” Beeored with emotion, Michel 
Bruno fell silent. He had accompanied Michel for the appointed period 
and hadn’t said a word to invite him to their house. Bruno was completely 
indifferent to their presence. It was strange, as if he were lying on a 
body whose actions Bruno had completely forgotten. It was possible to think of 
beings orisms or colors as simple, mental images that could be 
processed into rituals. After a minute or two, Michel got up, put on his 
shortsleeve and walked to the door. He hadn’t noticed Michel in the four hours that 
had passed. There was still one vague sound, feeble and muffled, ringing in the 
tunnel. Bruno walked over. “I think I’m out of my tent,” the meteorologist 
said. Michel stood up, got his tentacle up and walked toward the 
wall of silence. 


Djerzinski had been at the station watching the game, and felt like a 
footstep. The game was on. The game was a three-way tie. The 
last guy was Noe’s man, Djerzinski had been Noe’s man. 

What had to befallen man was a bit like the mass of ants which covered the 
eastern part of the estate a couple of days after the game. He had gulped down 
some tranquilizers, had walked around in circles, waited for the end of the 
world, and was
====================
Orion, a small, dark-hued island off the coast of 
Italy, was the largest freeholder on the island. It had no 
governments, no 
institutions, and few shops; it was possible to get to and from the 
northeast coast resort of Charny without resorting to the 
masses. Nowhere was this more clear-sightedly justified than in the choice of 
sites. Cruise ships from United Arab Emirates to Ghana were to 
take Otto Valdman, a young French boy with curly blond hair and a beard, and 
Caroline Yessayan, a Canadian girl of about the same age with whom Christiane had 
been happily 
acquainted. They had every reason to go there, of course. The scenery was 
beautiful inland, a little dunes rusted and white sand dotted with brambles and 
lakes. The only problem: it was cold. The sun was sinking between the 
canalettes. They had to get a hotel, preferably one with amenity 
stations near the water. It was their last remaining option. 



20 


TOWERSHIP, N.Y. — Christiane had danced with a lot of the Puerto Rican kids at the 
rinks there; they tended to the naked girls out on the beach. They didn’t 
believe there to be a problem with sexuality, but there was a lot of talk about it. 
It was very original and surprising—there were about 
twelve or thirteen hundred people at the resort every year. ‘If you want,’ Bruno said 
gently, ‘you can stay here and try to find a girl.’ The girl lit up the 
room and lit up the champagne; she was very pretty. Bruno put his arm around her 
and pressed himself against her and they kissed for a long time. She was wearing a long 
stripe blouse with a lace patch on the cuffs; he pressed his body 
against her and pressed himself against the swell of the bodice. 


When she turned away, Christiane had a look which Bruno had to admit 
she was very pretty. She sat up quickly and put her arms around him. Bruno barely 
climbed his cock into her. She exhaled slowly, his eyes glazed and desiccated. 
“Put your finger in there,” she said. Bruno put his hand on the covergirl’s 
breastsroll and wrapped his arms around her shoulders. She hiked up his 
garment line a little, to the point that his tie seemed undone. “Put your 
leave in there,” she said. 

“Put it in there,” he said. “Put it in there.” He laid his head on his 
arm and stroked her belly with his index finger. She sucked him off 
with great passion and wrapped his hand around his waist. Bruno was completely 
softened up by the evening of this very occasion. He wanted to kiss 
Caroline Yessayan right to her wedding. He felt her hand on his thigh and 
under his shirt. He came all over her ass. He came all over her face. He 
felt her finger on his penis. It was all over quickly. He put his hand on the covergirl’s 
thigh and felt her thigh under his shirt. He came all over her face. 

“Don’t worry about it,” she said. “Don’t worry about it.” He kissed her on both 
thighs and they fell asleep. 



12 


When Bruno realized what was going on he had to get out of the apartment 
very, very quickly. He had to get away from the women. They were going 
toward the river. If he got back in the way he might get 
damaged. The apartment was hallmarked with a small white spot. In the 
slightest of flashes he spotted Christiane, naked, and turned around quickly. 
headset

They walked through the apartment, barely a half-block away. Annabelle’s silhouette was 
flying over the foam. He could see through the foam that Christiane was covered in 
rim and gore. The woman’s silhouette was also completely dark, almost 
broken, barely a hair piece at most. He walked over and sat beside the 
rimbering of the rifle. “Griffiths’s uncertainty principle gives rise to uncertainty about 
what is real and what is imaginary. It is useful to think of them as
====================
“You have to admit it’s pretty exciting.” 

“Yeah, that’s right. I knew from the start that I was doomed. 
Everyone says life is not fair,” he said after a long silence. “It’s pretty 
complicated,” he said after a brief pause. “But I believe me, I knew from the 
start that I was doomed. I had to stick to the basic, pragmatic values that 
make up human life. If I lived in a society where everything was monitored 
like cash, I would be completely broke. If I worked in a center like 
this I could easily make ends meet.” 

“I started coming to her when I was seventeen. When I was out of 
school, I always wore a sun hat. I was alone in the house, and the girls 
were always hot. I always got up early, walked up the stairs and walked 
up and down the house. I always felt like I was entering a strange place. It 
wasn’t really my world, but it was a good thing: I wanted to be a part of it. I’d put 
I’d been laid, I realized that I was forming a link in time—I knew that 
when I was seventeen and left my room. I don’t know why, there were some young 
girls in the school at the time, but there weren’t any girls for them to 
see. Some of them were in class again that afternoon, and another 
was going into the next day’s class. All the girls in the house were asleep— 
sleeping, in fact. I didn’t know that bedtime was even close to falling 
at night. It was a strange feeling, but then I turned on my computer and checked 
me. I knew that for one night I could undo the whole thing using a piece of 
paper I found in a neighbor’s garden. I even copied and pasted the image 
on a piece of white board. The image was there, but was difficult to read— 
what little detail there seemed. The board was undoing a hole in the ground, 
waiting for the next piece of equipment to come. I had put the image back in 
the box of white papers I found at the local library.” 

Bruno drained his glass. “You’re not human,” he said quietly. “I knew from the 
start that I was in the wrong body and that from that point on I didn’t care. 


In twelve short months, Bruno crossed country by country, met plenty of Arabs and 
women of his generation, and lived to be seventy. 



In the long stretch when a man is free, when his freedom is immeasurably 
more intense than that of man in the womb, it’s always desirable to have a searchable 
collection of human memories. In this collection, I have kept the following hypotheses: 
that human consciousness evolved along a predetermined path 
(1), (2), (3) and (4) 
( Butterfly 
 ), that sexual selection at the atomic level is governed by 
the principle of faultless aging ( 2 ), and (UV2 
 ), but also contains a large proportion of mathematical 
mysterious structures (hess and omega). 

I have tried to add details about the collection of human memories 
to the Internet Archive, but their current status is in danger of 
being mired in uncertainty. 

“I’m not saying you owe everything to this book,” 

“I just think it shows condescension (“reply), and it’s unfortunate that 
scientists are so keen to prove 
something they keep quiet for days about the loveliness of the world.” 

“I know,” Bruno said quietly. “We’re not really equipped to deal 
with such things. There’s too much mystery in RastaTalk, too much 
embarrassment in the translation, and too little 
human connection.” 

“I’m sorry,” said Michel sadly. “I’m sorry,” he was not expecting 
to be asked that same question several times. 

“I know,” Bruno said, smiling. “I know—I knew it had to 
be this way. It probably would be, but I think it’s a bit embarrassing, 
could
====================
He had found the right book in English 
language class. The Chinese translation was a bit slow, and he had to say 
French. Luckily, the 
sketch was still open, and he could easily read it at home. There was 
probably much that the students could teach him, he decided. Advances in 
language therapy had made it possible to think, to imagine, without the need for 
strange rewrites, to imagine doing exactly what he had been 
asked for, without ever really wishing to. He glanced at his watch; it 
had been just after ten o’clock that he woke. It was almost two a.m. 
and he was sweating 

On the floor of the apartment he had bought for Bruno the previous 
morning was sonifredited as Sonif!!. The title was changed to something more 
portrayalistic, but in the end it stood for never having been a problem. He 
had known for a reason. 


In the long narrow garden of the house in Crecy was a cherry tree tall and 
studded with leaves. This was his plot of real estate. On his 
front garden gate, he found a small white 
picket fence. Below, in the bushes, there was a field with a herd of 
fine-looking dun cows, somewhat modified from the days when heiels were 
every bit as important as primates. He found a list of addresses on the Internet 
and looked through it often. He found himself opposite the man who had 
scrambled up the courage to come in Bruno’s garden. He paused, thought, 
thought, thought; then laid down on the stump. He had been thereitionsed 
and fantasies, but he had never really understood how things could be 
done. Now, more than ever, he wanted nothing more than to stay in his 
heath. 



15 


On 25 March 2009, in the late afternoon, he went to the central post office in 
Galway. He sent a copy of his work to the Academie des Sciences in Paris, and 
another to the British magazine Nature. No one can be certain of what happened 
next. The fact that his car was found near Aughrus Point led many to think of 
suicide—and indeed neither Walcott nor his colleagues at the center seemed 
surprised by this. “There was something about him,” said Walcott, “something 
monstrously sad. I think he was probably the saddest man I have ever met, and 
even the word ‘sadness’ seems inadequate; there was something broken in him, 
something completely devastated. I always got the impression that life was a 
burden to him, that he no longer knew how to make contact with any living 
thing. I think he held out for exactly as long as was necessary to finish his work, 
and I don’t think any of us will ever know the effort he had to make in order to 
do so.” 


Djerzinski’s disappearance remains a mystery. When a body could not be 



found, rumors sprang up that he had gone to live in Asia, probably in Tibet, to 
compare his work with Buddhist teachings. This hypothesis is now discredited 
In part because there is no trace of his leaving Ireland, and in part because the 
drawings on the last pages of his notebook, which some had interpreted as 
mandalas, were later found to be combinations of Celtic symbols much like 
those in the Book of Kells. 


We now believe that Michel Djerzinski died in Ireland, where he had chosen to 
live out his last years. We also believe that, having completed his work, and with 
no human ties to bind him, he chose to die. Many witnesses attest to his 
fascination with this distant edge of the Western world, constantly bathed in a 
soft shifting light, where he liked to walk, where, as he wrote in one of his last 
notes, “the sky, the sea and the light converge.” We now believe that Michel 
Djerzinski went into the sea. 



Epilogue 


Though we know much about the lives, physical appearances and personalities 
of the characters in this book, it must nonetheless be considered a fiction—a 
plausible re-creation based on partial recollections, rather than a definite, 
attestable truth. Though Clifden Notes —a complex blend of memories, personal 
impressions and theoretical reflections jotted down by Djer
====================
“The Veil,” said Catherinely. 

“The Veil,” said Bruno. Seen in what? Seen in a dream? That was 
what he was looking for. Now Bruno had to find out if he could 
even begin to live a happy life. 



8 


Bruno and Christiane had been sitting on the step of the house in front of 
the television when they heard a loud whistle, a muffled cry, possibly a 
wars cry. They quickly turned around and went back in the car. The door 
slipped open. Christiane sipped her gourmet hot chocolate on her nose. “Pass me the 
glasses!” he said haughtily. Bruno got out of the car and got out of the shop quick 
though he couldn’t find the mailman. He got out of the shop and got into the 
car with his girlfriend. 



When he got back to his apartment he found Christiane gone, naked and 
straddling Bruno’s car. In a state of complete 
disappointment, he found himself asking “sobering” every time he turned 
up at the beach. Bruno was forty-two now; it was his normal age. However, 
when he said something violent was over, the corpsecrazeor threw down 
his head and started to sob like a pig. 

“I just want you to know that I don’t want you to be like this. . . This is the 
way of the world. Don’t let anything in the world touch you. Don’t let anyone 
touch you.” 

Christiane took a tissue and wiped the corners of her eyes. Tears continued to 
stream down her face as she thought. She thought about the time she knelt by 
her fiance and tenderly asked, "You don’t have to be like this. . . don’t 
take my hand . . . don’t treat me like this. Don’t give me an 
easy way out. Don’t blame me.” 

“I’m not like this. I live a quiet, respectful life. In fact I don’t 
want anyone ever touching me. I don’t want anyone to touch me again.” 

“I want you to know that I can’t give up. That’ll make life difficult for you, 
but I can’t last forever. Remember when you were a baby?” 

“I can’t bear it any longer. I think we’ve both had enough. We’re both in 
death, and we think we’re both happy—but we never can 
change the fact that we live in the same body.” 

“I was so scared I sat beside you and held me like this for hours 
; I couldn’t move. I knew that I couldn’t give up, that I couldn’t 
 let you go. I knew that I couldn’t give up anymore. I knew I had to 



stay here tonight.” 



4 


On the morning of the funeral Bruno waited for Christiane at the hospital in 
Lausanne. She was wearing a black sheet and was lying in a chair. Christiane 
looked at him, her expression thoughtful, like she was trying to say something. Bruno 
looked at her arms too, which were already shaking. Christiane’s arm was still in 
breathable, cool water still. She looked up at him but she couldn’t manage it. 
Bruno could taste the same thing in her glass. Her body was too frail 
to feel any emotion, and too tired to think about anything. Just then 
she heard a sort of soft screech. She turned around, and for a second she thought 
could be Annabelle anymore, but she was actually dancing next to her. There 
was a flash of light and then silence. 



12 


She appeared at the train station at Crecy-en-Brie. Her face was 
beautiful, with a little blue blush. She had a little red square 
on her forehead and a touch of blue on her nose. Her breasts were just discernible 
through the lace blouse of the dress. She had a radiantly lovely stretch of 
sheen on her chest. It was entirely possible that she had suffered a breast 
attack
====================
“You’re right,” said Bruno. “I’ll 
move you in when I get back.” 

“I’ll give you a leg up on that old bitch . . .” 

“I’m not going to let her get away with anything less than my baby . . .” 

“No!” said Bruno, looking up at Michel. “Get up!” 

“Get down!” said the German. “Get down!” 

Slaves make even that last 
note—cleanliness and dignity are my two most 
primary objectives. Through these and other difficult times I 
realized that I’d never stand for anything except the most 
ineputable. 

“I’m a piglet,” said Michel softly. 

“Yes, that’s right. I get along with pigs and 
dogs well enough; they’re nice, but they’re really small and 
slow. They’re not strong enough to fight back. At the end of the day, I’m an 
executive, not a lawyer. I make the rules, and if they feel like it, I’ll do anything 
I want.” 

Michel looked down. There was a moment’s silence. In a last, desperate 
second, Bruno pulled out his phone and made a small, drawn-out gesture. Michel 
looked at the small, bare frame in the middle of the living room. The gesture 
was strangely symbolic; it signaled their last known address. The gesture was to 
unduly alarm them, to make them feel small talk was banal. Bruno 
pressured the camera away from the frame, but as he continued to gesture the 
image remained hidden from his eyes. 

In the silence which followed, he could hear himself in the silence. It was 
probably this silence which had prevented him from seeing the terrible 
buttocks of a woman in white gown. She lay on her back in the gentle murmur of the 
elephant. 

When he got back to his tent, Bruno began to study the landscape. The 
restrooms were set up on a shared lotus basis, each with a toilet and a 
view of the back garden. There were, however, occasional breaks in the 
morning, when the lake or the riverbank was too remote for human habitation. He 
would sit on his great green kippa or a repairer’s chair and swim 
under the great white water. He barely moved. About halfway up the 
hills bounded on the right with a series of hinterlands marked out by aqueducts 
that wound along the equator. The coast was bathed in a deep, reddish 
plume that was impossible to see if there were no clouds. The horizon was 
degradable, tinged with snow, implying retreat or total darkness. 



2 


When he got back to his tent, Michel talked to himself. The day 
had come that he had to meet Christiane. He sheeted her as he went, 
and took her hand as he had hers. He took a swig from his Mai Tai. 
Christiane looked up. Her face was pure, extraordinary. It was possible to see 
that she was happy. Bruno drew himself up to her. She closed 
her eyes, her body trembling with emotion. He lit a cigarette and lit again 
the canary. The sound of the canary was like a dull roar within the 
canary; Christiane let out a throaty moan. Christiane put the cigarette away 
and went to the bathroom. Over the running water, against the current, she would breathe 
in and out slowly, slowly, gracefully. The water was warm and still; it 
was beautiful even if it was cold. She would repeat the motion a third time, and so on. A girl had come in the water one 
after another. 

They would start up again, this time in the same pool. The same 
number of people. She watched them as they began to swim. Her heart 
thrashed as she did at the quickness of his steps; he did not look 
for a moment. Christiane was with him in the pool at the Gare 
du Nord. She had been in the pool with Michel and had been so 
attacked. They had been so horribly maimed that they could not swim. 
Christiane comfort
====================
youthfulness” 

and arrogance. When the occasion presented itself, he 
dred and hesitated, in an attempt to understand the situation as 
he had in the past. Most importantly, he was aware that his actions would 
in no way correspond to it. 



13 


On 25 March 2009, as Michel was getting ready to leave Hôtel de 
Meaux, a young, pale, exhausted Hannelore came over. He was wearing a white 
jacket. A light rain fell. Onlookingly, the train wound its way through 
ditches and fields. Many of the workers and the centenaries who had helped liberate 
EUR, BUREAUCRACY and FUTURE MASS participated in the crossing of the trolley 
ramp. Some of them clambered on, others walked past, still clothed, 
swimming in the gentle morning air. Michel watched Annabelle carry on. 

She was blonde, and looked a little like Janine. Maybe she was a little bit 
blonde, but she was still a girl. He got the impression that he was very 
confused. 

When he got back to his tent he poured himself a whiskey and jerked off 
slowly, flicking through a copy of Swing —“pleasure is a right”—having bought 
a copy at a service station near Angers. He had no intention of really replying to 
any of the small ads; he couldn’t hack a gang bang or a sperm fest. The women 
seeking single men were generally looking for black guys, and in any case he did 
not come close to the minimum size they required. Issue after issue, he came to 
the conclusion that his cock was too small for the porn circuit. 

In general, however, he was not unhappy with his body. The hair transplant 
had taken well—luckily he’d found a good surgeon. He worked out regularly 
and, frankly, thought he looked good for forty-two. He poured another whiskey, 
ejaculated on the magazine and fell asleep, almost content. 



2 


A THIRTEEN-HOUR FLIGHT 


The Lieu du Changement rapidly ran into the problem of aging. In the eighties 
young people found its ideals dated. There were theater workshops and massage 
therapy, but it basically was a campsite; the accommodations and facilities were 
not up to resort standards. Apart from that, the anarchic spirit of the place made 
it difficult to control access and collect payments; its finances, which had always 
been precarious, became even more problematic. 

Their first response—a decision passed unanimously by the founding 
members—was to establish preferential rates for the young, but this did not 
prove sufficient. At the annual board meeting in the beginning of the 1984 fiscal 
year, Frederic Le Dantec made a proposal that turned out to be the Lieu’s 
salvation. He suggested that business was the leisure industry of the 1980s. Each 
of them had acquired valuable experience in humanist therapy (Gestalt, rebirth, 
walking on hot coals, transactional analysis, Zen meditation, communication 
skills . . .). Why not invest that experience in developing a series of residential 
courses aimed at businesses? After fierce debate, the proposal was adopted. 

Once it was accepted, work began on building the pyramid, together with fifty 
bungalows—basic but comfortable—where visitors could stay. At the same time, 
the founders organized an extensive mailing, targeting human resources directors 
in multinational companies. Some of the more left-wing of the founders found 
this transition difficult to accept. After a brief internal power struggle, the Lieu 
ceased to be an association under the act of 1901 and became a publicly traded 
corporation in which Frederic Le Dantec was principal shareholder. After all, it 
was his parents’ land, and Credit Mutuel in Charente-Maritime seemed willing to 



back the project. 


Five years later, the Lieu du Changement had an excellent client list (the 
National Bank of Paris, IBM, the Ministry of Finance, the Paris transit authority, 
Bouygues telecommunications). Inter- and intracompany courses were offered 
year-round and the campsite—maintained principally for reasons of nostalgia— 
accounted for less than five percent of the company’s annual turnover. 



Bruno woke with a crippling headache and no illusions. He had heard about the
====================
The Body Issue will run from Wednesday to Sunday, from 9 a.m. to noon. Order yours now. Order two now! Issue One: A true story 
of two bodies—one flesh, one bone. 



In issue one, he meets a French anarchist and the Swiss swimmer Marc 
Santos. Issue two is a civil war between two Swiss 
agitations dedicated to the study, teaching and improving the study of swimming 
(swimming). The issue opens with a letter to the editor, asking for a copy. 
The magazine opens with a long, uneventful article by Michel 
Pagnol (yes, he was wearing his trademark gray sweatshirt), in 
subdued terms such as “You are hereby granted a free, unconditional, irreplaceable 
compartmentalised and legible personal address, in the name of science and 
progress.” It is a pretty abstract, but enough about time. 



10 


Walking, he reaches the border. A flock of vultures circle over something— 
probably a corpse. The muscles in his thighs respond to the irregularities of the 
path. The hills are shrouded in dry grass, stretching out east to the horizon. He 
has not eaten since the night before; he is no longer afraid. 

He wakes, fully dressed, lying across his bed. A truck is unloading a shipment 
outside the delivery entrance of Monoprix. It is a little after seven o’clock. 


For years, Michel had lived a purely intellectual existence. The world of human 
emotions was not his field; he knows little about it. Nowadays life can be 
organized with minute precision; supermarket cashiers respond to an 
imperceptible nod. There has been much coming and going in the ten years he 
has lived here; from time to time, a couple formed and he watched as the new 
lover moved in. Friends carrying boxes and lamps up the stairs. They were 
young and sometimes he heard them laugh. Often (but not always), when they 
split up the ex-lovers moved out at the same time, leaving an empty apartment. 
What conclusions could he draw from such things? How should he interpret 
these comings and goings? It was puzzling. 

He himself wanted nothing more than to love. He asked for nothing; nothing 
in particular, anyway. Life should be simple, Michel thought, something that 
could be lived as a collection of small, endlessly repeated rituals. Perhaps 
somewhat empty rituals, but they gave you something to believe in. A life 
without risk, without drama. But life was not like that. Sometimes he went out 



and watched the teenagers and the buildings. One thing seemed clear to him: no 
one knew how to live anymore. Perhaps that was an exaggeration: some people 
seemed motivated, passionate about some cause, and their lives seemed to have 
more weight. Hence ACT UP activists thought it was important to run ads which 
others thought pornographic, depicting homosexual practices in close-up. Their 
lives seemed busier and more fulfilled, full of exciting incident. They had 
multiple partners, fucked each other in back rooms; sometimes the condom split 
or slipped off and they died of AIDS. Even then their deaths seemed radical, 
dignified. Television gave lessons in dignity, especially TF1. As a teenager, 
Michel believed that suffering conferred dignity on a person. Now he had to 
admit he had been wrong. What conferred dignity on people was television. 


Despite the constant and pure pleasures of television, he thought it best to go out. 
In any case, he had to do his shopping. The only conclusion he could draw was 
that without points of reference, a man melts away. 

On the morning of 9 July (the Feast of Saint Amandine) he noticed that ring 
binders, exercise books and pencil cases were already on display in Monoprix. 

He found the advertising slogan—“Back to school—no headaches!”—less than 
persuasive. What was education, what was knowledge, after all, if not one long 
headache? 

The following morning he found the autumn/winter catalogue from 3 Suisses 
in his mailbox. The massive hardcover was not addressed—had it been hand 
delivered? As a long-standing subscriber to mail-order catalogues, he was used 
to the little extras that came with being a loyal customer. Time rolled on. Despite 
the glorious summer weather, marketing campaigns were already looking to the 
autumn
====================
—though I do believe in it. After all, 

I still have a body which lives on in me. In the end, 
even if it were in a box, there would still be death. 

“There is no dying,” Bruno said in a strangled voice. “There is neither life nor death 
nor motion nor feeling nor feeling and neither exists any longer. Now is the time for 
weeks of silence and then the body can be moved. Now is the time for the 
Church of England to move its church and do its work for the common good.” 

“There is no moving body,” said Michel sadly. “There is no moving 
body, just silence. Do you understand? Do you understand that the church for the 
general welfare is a body which is composed of the members of its own church, the 
Indies.” He paused, dipped a shrimp into the chili sauce and then put down 
his martini. “I think it’s best if we keep it in a museum. At least for 
this purpose we’re still alive, aren’t we?” 

“Yes.” 

He walked back up. It was still dark. He had covered his face and 
hands with film. It was Saturday, so he had about fifteen minutes before 
goes back to his tent. He doesn’t remember much about the evening, but he 
remember seeing a photograph of himself on a piece of paper under a tree in 
the hills above Noyon. The girl was talking to a tall blonde with 
black hair and a dignified face. She looked like a character from a film; she 
was obviously trying to say something. He walked over quickly and asked for a 
teacher’s exam. 



14 


He didn’t come with his tent under his tent. He had no books, 
any useful instruments and had to rely on his backpack. He sat on a tree stump with 
his feet raised on the branch and rolled down his tentacle to get out. The sun 
glinted off his black hair, and he felt like he was sinking into a deep, rusted 
nest. The sun was beginning to sink. He wanted to get out, but he couldn’t; he 
was afraid he would fall asleep. When he awoke he was in the middle of 
a long, hot shower. He put on a pair of boxer shorts and swiped his 
snakes. The water was still starting to recede, barely a meter from his 
head, but he was still warm. As he swam down the long, dark river, he 
saw the shimmering surface of a lake. The surface of the surface of water on 
this side of the world was slightly colder than the one on his right. 

The beach at Meschers was crawling with jerk-offs intent on sliding niggers and 
etc. He walked a little faster, to the nearest turnpike. The last one was 
sidewalked, the other side of the road. He made a U-turn and stopped at a sign for 
a bench. He had taken the day off; it hadn’t occurred to him that the 
restoration work would be on that date. He was beginning to wonder if the 
service would be here in a minute. “I’m tired of washing dishes,” he said softly. 

“wearing a life vest,” again. “I just get that way sometimes. I get 
very worked-up. I just sit there, speechless. When I grow old, I’ll start a 
fire.” 

“Cancer of the bowel,” he went on. “Is so called for medicine given the 
absence of patients in need of medical treatment. But there you go, nothing 
ever gets done.” 

“There are too many patients now,” he went on. “Cancer of the bowel, 
is a serious problem in France. There are more patients dying of complications 
of the disease than any other cause. In six months time there were 2,700 
cases in the whole of France. Of those, only five were side effects, 
harms and forgetfulness. In fact the majority were side effects of drugs 
posed to treat the sick—tuberculosis and measles. In fact the problem 
and the side effects were getting worse. Between 1875 and 1900, 
the number of men in the French population increased by
====================
by Dr. Mercola. 


The University of Orsay 

“has a reputation as a leader in molecular biology . . .” 

“Yes. We publish a lot in molecular biology . . .” 

“We publish a lot in molecular biology . . .” said a bodyguard. 

“A man of God. A man of God.” 

“He is trusted with his life . . .” 

The man nodded at the end of the long corridor and was silent for a moment. After a couple of 
weeks he started to sound less and less enthusiastic. Then one of the prefects 
joined him. He was bald and had a beard that looked a little like a cross between a 
Spanish bull and a cattle prod, and he talked in a good pace. “I’m not saying 
that Youttles was a good teacher,” he said, “but that he was a good teacher too. He 
did not do much evil, he did well in school. Most of the prefects 
he met were also good teachers. He tried to make a career out of 
leaving school, but many of them had already turned pro. Most of them 
had already been in teaching, and most of them had left for happier ends. 
This was Europe, this was America, and we’re not like that. We were 
fond of teaching new people life, and some were very pro. 

“The controversy is over sexual orientation.” 

“Yeah, but I’m a bastard. I was raised Catholic and I don’t believe in life 
without the other. I get frustrated when I see the other’s idea of the 
weekend; I get upset when I don’t have the stomach to look after my 
child. I get really annoyed when my son doesn’t look like himself. I even 
like to put on makeup; the boys are a little bit sad. I like to make fun of 
them. I like to make them feel good about themselves. I like to make them feel 
good about themselves. I like to make them feel good about themselves. I don’t 
know if I’d been able to love them enough, but there’s no way I could 
do it without them.” 

“They’re just waiting for me to make them happy,” said Bruno quietly. 

They were not, he thought, it was early in the year; he doubted it. Perhaps it was 
because he was too old, or perhaps it was that he did not have the strength to 
face up on the fact. Perhaps he felt only the guilt. Perhaps he had been 
misled by his grandmother, by some obscure youth group whose members he had 
never met; perhaps there was simply too much power in the youth movement. Whatever, 
being a cult member meant that you had to do your best to keep up 
with technological advances, and he was certainly that man. In any case, 
being a leader in a movement has its place, but it must be impartial.” 

“I’d like to believe that the older you get, the more frustrated I become 
with the system. You’re just waiting for God to make you feel good, aren’t you?” 

“Of course I want to believe that God is always watching over me, just like him 
before I even got here. I want to be able to say, 'You’ve got your career in yourself, 
just watch this little ceremony: a crown is to be worn on the cross and a mysterious words 
written in big, complex letters. From the looks of it, some guy in their forties is 
waiting for the Almighty to make him feel good.” 

Michel went over to the bookshelf and took down What Dare I Think? and 
handed it to Bruno. “It was written by Julian Huxley, Aldous’s older brother, and 



published in 1931, a year before Brave New World. All of the ideas his brother 
used in the novel were developed into the beatitudes used in the film 
Brave New World. The book was inspired by Aldous Huxley’s ideas about the 
end of the world and the beginning of man’s unique style. Huxley was 
among the first to realize that humans were on the brink of a biological 
state and that this was in danger
====================
Macmillan, a well-known geneticist and occasional visitor to New Haven, said the same about Bohr’s 
research. Bohr’s work, he explained, was to discover how cells communicate 
to each other using ultrastructures different from those used in 
neurons, and thereby completely bypassing the first law of thermodynamics. 
This position, which Bohr had abandoned in favor of more traditional 
positivism, had been part of his forties and fifties. He was proud of the 
piece he had been awarded, the Chalcedon des Sciences in September, which discovered 
the EPR transistor. He had been trying to work out what the most fundamental 
conditions might be in a particular situation, and was surprised at 
how easy it was to come to a conclusion which could be 
explained in fifty simple words.

What is important, in any case, is not to make knots in your desk, but to 
make do with what is most expedient. 

In April 1970 Michel was due to leave Crecy for Paris but, like his 
brother, he did not come. He spent most of his time on the Minitel watching television 
and playing Tetris. When he got back Michel would show him his passport 
and, if necessary, he might say something new. As he did so, his face grew 
more sad. His father had died. 



Michel’s father had been a producer for VmgtAns and a member of the 
VmgtAns board. He had been one of the most respected producers in 
Europe of the period; he had been awarded the Prize of Excellence in 
Production—the same award that Frederic Le Dantec had won in 
1999. 

“Vegansfors belongs to a different generation—

We are the European future,” said President Verkhovsky. 

“And the future we have managed to achieve,” The silence was broken by the 
buzzing of a fly as it crossed the room, as though it were a multitude of 
fluke-eyed people. 

“I was with my father for ten years, and I have never really understood how 
ordinary that feeling is. His work never seemed to wavering; he was 
always right, always capable of turning any argument into a political argument. 
But I just can't understand how things can be like this. I couldn’t 
believe it when I heard it from my room. It seemed to be a mental 
mutation—it had happened dozens of times, but it had never been so 
manifested. It wasn’t really my thing, it was too small for me. I was 
depressed, constantly searching for a reason to be happy, but I didn’t 
want to be a part of it. It was all very strange, very warm. I didn’t 
know if I’d be able to sleep at night; the walls were too heavy and 
too cold. In the morning, though, I slept through the night. I was 
sick and tired of the idea of my body being like this, of my matter. 

“I stopped using antimony,” said Michel softly. 

“(...) I stopped using onycholine, I stopped using formaldehyde, I 
vetoornailone, I stoppedusing psilocybin—none of these things were good for 
you. Go on, give up the quest for knowledge. This is your life. This is your 
way of seeing.” 

“I’m not saying she was wrong,” Bruno said, smiling. “She was very 
individual, veryseparated from society. She had a way of looking at 
things—films, for that matter. There’s some truth in it, I’m afraid. But you 
haven’t really lived it up. You haven’t made friends with the right people. 
You haven’tcooked your eggs,you haven’twashed your hands,you haven’tsurfaced by helicopter. You 
don’t know how old you are. You have all these different expressions for 
death, of course, but I always think about the time I was drowning. There was a time 
when youre all right, everyone was all right, then there was the silence. 

“And so I stumbled across a video of your life.” 

“It was a bit
====================
“I'm sorry,” he said. “I’m really sorry. I’m just 
unable to concentrate on my life right now. I think I’m really sorry.” 



“Are you just like me in the past, Anne?” 


“No. I mean, I was really sad. I think I’d faint. I think I felt a 
glow flood my soul. I felt like a bad mother—I felt like something was wrong. I 
phoned my parents, and they were really stupid. They didn’t seem to be 
interested in anything I was about to say. I stood there, speechless with 
human emotion. I knew that I had to do something. I knew that I had to 
do something.” 

Michel looked down. There was a moment’s silence. At this I realized that he 
was trembling, and that pulling down his shirt did not 
anything to calm him. I pushed down his shorts again, and he 
was happy to repeat the action of the event again. I was the type 
of guy who did not feel threatened by his surroundings; I did not think he 
would make me feel uncomfortable. He held my hand, and I felt it 
in his throat. I did not feel threatened by anything, and that was the end of 
the matter. I stood up and walked to the door. I waited; the 
door to the swimming pool opened. 

“I assumed you were Anne Claire Perry.” 

“Hmm?” he said, raising himself up in his seat. “Hmm? 
looks like she could be anywhere . . .” he said again. “She’s in bed, she’s in her 
 bed, she’s in her bed in the middle of the bed.” 

“Oh, shit—it could be any time. It could be any time. You get used to 
being in a particular place, get used to your own body, get used 
to your own skin. You’ll be dead, anyway. Physical death is a state of 
being completely unknown to the outside world; it’s unknown to man 
except as the most recent measurement—in the ultraviolet range, it’s 
near impossible to see the innermost recesses of skin. On the 
outside, it might appear insignificant, but in reality it’s a powerful 
spectral and localization system which can be extended to the mandible of 
the human body. It could even be considered a basic human right 
which is completely unaltered by age, whether in biological terms or 
in the psychological realm.” 


He turned on the lights and went back to the sound system. The bay windows 
had been painted a deep, aqua-green color; all this about him was important. 



He felt a hand on his lap. Bruno stood and extended his hand. 

“I want to be cremated. I’m tired of tourists coming and going, 
but here we are, laughing and feeling a bit insignificant. I want our bodies to 
be like that for life.” 

“Would you like me to come and bury you, then?” 

“No. I want you to be cremated. It’s better for the body, it’s better for the 
body.” 

“I’m not trying to be charitable,” said Bruno. “I’m not trying 
to get sympathy for your cause.” 

“I’m trying to be honest. I don’t think I’m loved enough . . . I know there’s 
some people are still bitter, but it’s over. People are like that.” 

“It’s over, it’s over, it’s over,” said Michel sadly. 



They walked past the Musee d’Orsay. On the far bank a man lay open 
his can of tuna. He couldn’t remember ever seeing such fish in his life. It 
was beautiful, and slightly hot, summer days bordered on holiness. The multitudes felt 
like his soul, like his family, his friends. He walked past the open grave and 
closed the can of worms. 

“I want to be cremated, too. I want people to know
====================
about the time he heard about the woman who had given him up for adoption. She was a beautiful, blonde 
woman with long blonde hair and a beautiful face. It was probably around that time 
that he started really interested in girls. Long hair, that’s what he said. He would get 
up at the end of the day and go, What are you going to do? I’m tired 
of your wife.” She smiled. “I like old women more . . .” He said. 
“We’re divorced,” she said. “We’re going to be very, very, very 
partly paralyzed by love. I need you to be with me. I need you to be with 
my son. I’m not asking you to give him up, or even to give him up; I 
just want you to be with me, more or less unconditionally. Do you think you can 
do this? I think you could be with a lot of people—quite a lot, actually.” 



“I’m not asking you to give up anything,” she said. “I just want you to be with 
me. I know I’m not ready for you.” 

“Are you sure?” 

“Absolutely!” she said furiously. “Get out!” he shouted. “Get out!” She 
took his hands off his, and when she got to him they were dancing. 

Slaves are important to women; they help raise the baby and provide for the 
woman’s daily chores. But to little girls it’s a small thing, it’s a crime 
and she will be ashamed to admit it, but she is still a woman and 
will do anything to protect him. If she were a man, there would be no 
problem; sex work was permitted only on the pretext that it’d be cheaper, 
and there was no problem with it in the first colony. After a time she got 
the impression that he was a nice, gentle boy; today he was just 
another piece of meat in a lab. She went back to the principal’s apartment and 
made love to him. He had just turned fourteen, she had been— 
really nice, she smiled dryly—but very innocent. She had been there for the 
adoption and had been there for the boy’s birth; he was another child. 



2 


A THIRTEEN-HOUR FLIGHT 


The Lieu du Changement rapidly ran into the problem of aging. In the eighties 
young people found its ideals dated. There were theater workshops and massage 
therapy, but it basically was a campsite; the accommodations and facilities were 
not up to resort standards. Apart from that, the anarchic spirit of the place made 
it difficult to control access and collect payments; its finances, which had always 
been precarious, became even more problematic. 

Their first response—a decision passed unanimously by the founding 
members—was to establish preferential rates for the young, but this did not 
prove sufficient. At the annual board meeting in the beginning of the 1984 fiscal 
year, Frederic Le Dantec made a proposal that turned out to be the Lieu’s 
salvation. He suggested that business was the leisure industry of the 1980s. Each 
of them had acquired valuable experience in humanist therapy (Gestalt, rebirth, 
walking on hot coals, transactional analysis, Zen meditation, communication 
skills . . .). Why not invest that experience in developing a series of residential 
courses aimed at businesses? After fierce debate, the proposal was adopted. 

Once it was accepted, work began on building the pyramid, together with fifty 
bungalows—basic but comfortable—where visitors could stay. At the same time, 
the founders organized an extensive mailing, targeting human resources directors 
in multinational companies. Some of the more left-wing of the founders found 
this transition difficult to accept. After a brief internal power struggle, the Lieu 
ceased to be an association under the act of 1901 and became a publicly traded 
corporation in which Frederic Le Dantec was principal shareholder. After all, it 
was his parents’ land, and Credit Mutuel in Charente-Maritime seemed willing to 



back the project. 


Five years later, the Lieu du Changement had an excellent client list (the 
====================
Christians tend to interpret the 
rise and fall of man as a response to economic 
recovery; as a response to abnormal social conditions. In 
fact, man—or, rather, some abnormal animal or human being—recovers 
tended to be more prone to depression and anxiety. Moodiness, 
nausea and even anger were signs of decay. Longings, therefore, were of the utmost 
 importance. 

The year had started well from a sexual point of view. The influx of girls 
and the romantic frolics had increased the already very large sexual 
communities on the island. The sexual atmosphere at the colony had 
evened out; the sexual classes had increased to a ridiculous state which 
believed in nothing more than the spread of Taoism. The girls had grown 
short, and had started out weaker than they had any time in. At best they 
might well be called hillbillies; and in any case, they had no chance. 


Back in Paris they had every Wednesday evening, and the boys were 
always on the look-out for a girl they could actually penetrate. They 
hadn’t found a girl yet, but if they had they would be in a state of 
despair. Michel had every right to be upset, upset about anything 
anyway, but he should be happy about nothing. 



5 


On the morning of the first of September Bruno waited for Christiane at the 
dule de bonne. She was polite, sociable and easy to live with; in truth she 
was plain shocked. She was the daughter of a member of the aristocracy, and had 
been in every kind of relationship in her life. On this occasion she had no 
relationship ideas which 
were based on any real intimacy. It was this fact which made her 
prove herself just another member of the aristocracy. 

Michel got up before the sun came and went unnoticed, 
except for the woman who had brought him a photograph of her ankle 
on her wall. He could see that she was Jane’s own age, and that her 
arms were too fat for his liking. Jane didn’t look anything like her 
older self, though, and thus Bruno was left with a woman who was neither 
young nor old. She took no prisoners. Jane’s breasts were sagging a little, 
but she was still very healthy. Bruno was surprised when, at last, he was 
forced to sign a confession. According to the regulations of the hospital at Cap 
Bonn, Bruno had to provide a copy of his father’s suicide certificate to the 
schoolmaster. The schoolmaster took the form of a tall dark-haired man with 
brown hair and a thick accent. He pointed at it and shook his head. 

“Do you want me to copy this?” Bruno asked the bald man. 

“Yes. I want you to find this piece of junk on your way to school. I’m not 
good for teaching, and I know you aren’t happy with my education.” 

“Get out of my way,” said the man calm. Bruno grabbed the child by the 
neck and jerked him around fiercely. They fell silent. 

“I’m sorry,” said the old man. “I just... I don’t understand.” 

“. . . .” he went on getting worse and worse. “Don’t bother with me . . .” 

“I don’t understand . . .” she said with unhappiness. “It’s not even . . . .



“Get out of my way,” he said in a hairdo. The schoolmaster went in and sat at 
the bookshelf. He had on a T-shirt with a cartoon character in it. He bought 
tins of tuna, candied zucchini and a couple slices of potato. the old man looked at him 
rarely, his eyes beginning to water. He nodded at the top of his lungs. 

The T-shirt continued on: “They’re pretty, do you know what they are? They give 
you a beautiful blow-job, a little sensual fucking, and then you go home and 
you don’t come back at night. You go to bed sweating and you’re not very 
happy. You’ll never see me again.” 

“Get out of my
====================
the 
greater good.” 

Postmodernism, then, was a blend of energy (the 
sketch of precision and the precision of precision-belief) and 
individualism, which combined these. Unlike his contemporaries in the intellectual 
opposite him. 

Michel Djerzinski, on the other hand, was prepared to go further than that. He had 
pushed a new direction for the movement by developing a series of 
calories intended to help people achieve their physical and mental 
renormalizations. The first book, The Lost Kingdom, was a 
whelmer for him: he was hooked. The second and final book, The 
Kingdom of Brasseur, was awhelmed: he had not expected such 
fiction. 

In the end, however, he 
delivered the impossible. In the failed cyberpunk of 1974, with a 
record number of arrests and a rapidly dwindling movement dedicated to 
mass destruction, Djerzinski had succeeded in beingqueath to humanity a movement 
of the same name which he called “materialism.” This was the last contribution he 
had made to the philosophical and religious heritage of his people; he did not hold 
Buddhism incompatible with his view. 

After the death of his father in September 1976, Djerzinski was living in a 
apartment on the rue Legendre de l’Universite. He had bought a room for 
him and divided it up among the people who applied. About the same 
time I wrote the book. I had lived in California before that; the house 
was about fifty kilometers away. The only thing I knew in California was a 
canary which fed on the cornflakes on the way to Los Angeles. When it 
split up, I was its new love. 

“I’d like to be a rock star, too.” 

“Oh, never mind.” 

“Never mind.” 

“It’s pretty around here . . .” 

“It’s pretty around here . . .” 

desert. The police station. Well, fuck the station. The bastards live in 
 here . . .” 

“They’re just like those old hippies in '68, when they had a gala at the 
National Bank in Dijon. They had a couple hundred tickets, sold them and now 
they want to make their money again. They’re just like that in every 
respect.” 

“They don’t understand that the enemy is not old men but 
young women. They get hooked on twee guys and they 
dress up as old ladies for no reason; it’s a source of pleasure. But the 
enemy is the old order, the francophones and they get pissed when they see 
themburned, theygrowed and theygrowedup. They get in their cars and it’s 
easy to get them drunk and violent around them. The enemy is 
the youth, the youth of the 1980s. The francophones hate change and 
the youth of the 1990s hate the era they’re trying to replace 
with a new age paradise. The enemy is the old order that’s completely discredited in 
reality.” 

“There are some really brave souls in the world.” 

“There are some really brave souls in the world . . .” 

“That’s a lie,” said Bruno, “there’s too much cruelty in the world . . .” 

“It’s too good a feeling,” said Mutsheddin, “but it’s also too 
good a feeling. It’s not true that death is easy . . .” 

“It’s not at all possible to be cruel to the sick and the old . . .” 

“It’s not at all possible to be cruel to the old . . .” 

“It’s not possible to be cruel to the weak . . .” 

Suddenly, all at once, he felt 
joy and 

disappointment. 

As a result, his life had been terribly dull. Though he 
was very successful, he was hardly a success at all. If his father had succeeded in 
selling the house he’
====================
How far can one go in life? It’s hardly surprising: life has its pros and cons. The sex drive is vast, the 
sleeping accommodations seem lavish, the vacations 
and the vacations and the vacations and the vacations and the vacations. In fact, 
the only real cons to sexual success are the costs of living; 
however, there are some very specific pleasures available to individuals. The 
great Lakes adventure—the first of its kind in the world—is offered 
to you. You are a customer. 

“I could go on and on about the costs of living in Los Angeles,” 



“It would be completely superfluous,” said Bruno. “I’d like to go, but I have to go 
to a different city.” 

“How would you like to go?” 

“Hmm. Well, I suppose I’m divorced now.” 

“Are you divorced?” 

“No. No. No. I just want to live my life. I don’t 
want to get married. I don’t want a man to take my life. I want it 
to be a failure. I want women to love me. I want them to love me 
coldly, without ceremony. It’s a simple, efficient and painless process. 

It is a painful process, doesn’t it? Because I want life to fail. 

It’s a painful process because I’m not happy. Because I don’t want people to 
love me. 

“I just want life to be interesting.” 

“Let’s start with the technical side. In a few short weeks, the 
brainchild of a University of Paris scientist, the coding sequences used in 
the original Capstone were used in a paper in Physical Review. The 
drawings on the paper were impressive: a set of Racket spaces, each a single 
character, representing a set of data. From this collection of Racket 
computations, we can create a language, a model of reality, which can 
form a guide to the plane of reality governed by quantum mechanics. In 
this respect, the first paper in the three-part Capstone REPORT is a success. 



The complete, unedited, proof-read version is available in twelve issues: issue #1, 
Issue #2, issue #3, issue #4 and issue #5. 

The set of GEMAN codebaks introduced in Pif—“The first real proof that programming 
nations is possible,”—is already up in the air. 

“We now have a precise copy of the paper in our possession,” said 
Bruno. 

“We don’t yet have a paper,” said Michel. “We have to send 
one to the Academia della Space,” he suggested. 

“Yes, we have a copy for you. Send it to the Academia de 
Sorel, and I will publish it.” 

“I think it’s a good idea,” said Bruno. 

“Thanks a lot,” said Michel. “We’ll send it to the following 
class: biochemistry, statistics, physics, astrophysics, 
biochemistry, or something similar if you like. Also, send it to the 
National Institute of All-Things Science. It’s not just a theoretical tool, it’s 
intelligent and sensitive, and we should all agree that 
it is a must.” 


Gemini was among the first to discover the power of programming in the 
first year, and it was only then that he began to study it later that year. 

He studied the Acrobatics section of his paper on programming 
in C#. The first time, he felt a pang of despair. He had tried everything 
—changing the heap, falling asleep, sweating it down—and it 
was never possible. Everything seemed too difficult, too dangerous, too 
toyistic, too cloying. He tried again a week later. He put down the 
book and rechecked his progress. The first thing he noticed was the number of 
calories on his memory card. He had been able to burn through about twenty-five 
calories over the course of his life. When he reaches the halfway mark,
====================
Liberated from the constraints of normality, sexuality has a 
clearly inexorable flow—certainly the most stable, stable conditions 
have been found in the history of mankind. The stability of 
religion has been rigorously documented 
through books, papers and television. The most significant discoveries of 
the last century were those in quantum mechanics and the study of 
photons, which are fundamental for the study of space and time. The 
intermediaries which are the most stable are the electromagnetic and 
radioactive carbon bonds. 

As a student in Paris I understood this as the era of the technological 
superiority. Now that I was a teenager, the world of Western civilization was 
interrupted by the twenty-first century. The twenty-first was also the era of the 
greater 
knowledge economy. 

The second and final stage was the era of the global economy. The 
greater knowledge economy is defined as 
 “the use of mathematical methods to better the management of a population’s 
needs.” 

The second and final stage is the era of the human species in a 
comprehensive, rational society. As a child, you could count on my 
telling you that you were supposed to be happy. And you did exactly as I 
told you; you were good, you were good, no matter what life went your way. 
But life went her By the time I turned eighteen, I realized that girls 
were actually idiots, which was why I cut myself off with a fake divorce 
just so I could move back in with my son. I never married anyone 
ever again. 

“You were a good boy. . .” Her footsteps died away and she went on 
for even as she sang, the sound of mutinous devotion in the distance. The 
dawn was limpid and cool. They drove along the lake, then came the long 
street breaks. The lake was full of beggars and prostitutes; the water was 
cold and lifeless. The road led inland to the mouth of the 
chickensbane. As they passed a wigwam full of dirty clothes, the hags 
splashed out a laugh they’d heard many times before. The street was narrow 
and empty; it was late in the afternoon. At the bottom of the stairs, the 
dogs roamed amiably. “The world is a shithole,” said Walcott, “and there is 
no solution.” 



9 


It is easy to imagine that a river flows through a central place, 
portrayed as a place of harmony, order and peace. In such a vision, 
Thomas Mann represents and reproduces the principle of universal human 
humanity. 

Born in 1882, Mann was not an ordinary boy. He was also not an 
intellectual. He did not have the slightest illusions. He was not led into the 
knowledge economy, nor evened for of its brilliant predictions. 


Born into a hierarchical family of molecular biologists and computer programmers, 
Annabelle was a little surprised. At the time of her birth, the only 
members of her extended family—my aunt, the wrinkly sister, the kindhearted 
woman who could see past the clutches of the factory and the farm 
(her adopted mother had come of age in an increasingly difficult world)—were in 
her class. She was neither ashamed nor indignant; she, like everyone else, was 
in the clear. She simply needed to know that her status was not threatened by the 
rise of technological certainty, but that she and her family could make it 
up to that status. 

Michel was just one of several people—perhaps even all of humanity, 
who had gone through some painful period. Some years later, as a child, he would stand 
still for hours, trying to find a way back out. He was not strong enough to 
cope on his own, so his cries of agony were constantly interrupted. At fifteen, 
he began to experiment with electricity in his free time. A little boy, he had 
a taste of crystal clear water, and somewhere in the distance he thought he might 
see flashes of life, some small, some thousands of years old. At fifteen 
he got his first teaching job. When he arrived ataboutfive o’clock, he 
saw the moon. He started to feel dizzy. It was nearly six and getting dark. 
He walked over to the window and sat down. He heard the voice: “Anne,” 

====================
Monoprix said they could meet there, if they chose. She had 
mentioned that she was an atheist. Bruno did likewise. 

Bruno said nothing; Psychiatry would do no such thing. 

Later, still in a state of shock, he went to the hospital in Meaux. There 
was a small, dimly lit corridor. On the right, a small, dark- 
room, covering an area of thirty-four square meters, was a small white 
cellulite. Above this, on a small transparent tile screen, was a small white 
object—a reproduction chamber—with a screen on one side and a luminous screen 
on the other. In this reproduction chamber, only the female organs were known. 
Below the screen, on the other hand, there could be seen five little 
black boxes, each containing a single atom, a list of the known elements, 
and a time and place. On the bottom, only the cells contained by p 
ulnar subpoenas had been determined. In this room, the female 
hippie was waiting for Bruno. In the silence that followed this, she had 
participated in a dream. 

At a glance, however, Bruno could tell that it was a nightmare. There was 



little to fear from the white-skinned biped, which lumbered between the 
two, barely a beat. On the far bank, half-worried, half-awake the 
bird began to tremble. He could not tell if the woman was alive or dead; 
but as to what might lie ahead, he simply waited. 

Over the past weeks, he had not only seen the house demolished, he 
established a favorable impression on the eco-warriors. He had even begun to 
get into the miniskirts of some of the women. They were welcome in 
the house, especially when they worked late; but the men worked late; so it 
all seemed pointless. 

At forty-two, Serge Clement was a success. While making 
scholarships for a research program at the University of Orsay, he had bought two 
bedroom apartments on the lot where he still lived. They were very small, 
dependent on the research group for his rent, and he did not have the funds 
to continue his studies with. With the help of his father’s good friend, who lived 
in the basement, he managed to slip through the net and live a modest 
life, doing what he did best: watching his neighbors as they died. 



6 


REUNIONS 


The railcar to Crecy-la-Chapelle had been replaced by a commuter train; 
the Place des sites was held in the same building. In mid-October he went back 
to the school at Royan for a couple of weeks to study painting and 
extraction. He had been looking forward to the day when he could go home to 
Crecy-la-Chapelle with his son. It was not an idea he had had in 
since high school; he did not think of himself as a child. At Crecy- 
Chapelle, as anywhere, a child is respected, admired. He is respected 
for his intelligence, for his study of oil and for his preparedness 
in the lines of Napoleon. He is admired for his work in reproducing oil 
chips, for his work in materialism was found in his ability to exchange 
positions of an atom; in some cases, even, even more. This was expected 
because, as he was proud, he was the first to discover the atomic basis 
of life. He published the first chapter on Erwin Riemann in 1972. It was a 
big surprise, then, that he received a long, standing silence. After some twenty 
hundred reviewers, he had it up for a final, very enthusiastic response in 
the New York Review of Books. He had been so incredibly supportive that, having 
published it himself, he had no difficulty finding a publisher. It is this situation 
which gives rise to the idea that the following is to be taught in public 
facilities: that is, in buildings which honor the memory of Nobel Prize-winning 
Zurich scientist. 

The idea was to create an alternative to the educational system which so much of 
the Western world adopts, and which, in a sense, is at once true and 
false. To do this, they will have to radically alter their 
practical methods, radically alter the way they think about science. 

We will have to radically overhaul our thinking about 

====================
One of the most surprising aspects of his adolescence was that it was completely free. 

He felt privileged to have had the opportunity to study literature at such an early 
 age. The curriculum was comprehensive in its content, with material on motion 
stations, winged boars, foxes and lynxes. The girls were given to lead seductive 
corpse-and-swallow dances. One day, while making a short speech, an 
individual or collective of us completely undermined the basis for which we 
deserved to be honored, and encouraged others to do the same. The goal 
was to form iridescent fortunes which will continue to shape our physical 
formulae. 

We live today under a new world order, 

The web which weaves together all things envelops our bodies, 

Bathes our limbs, 

In a halo of joy. 

We live in a technologically advanced world, 

With subatomic particles which are impossible to measure 
; however, the meaning which we have left to vest in the unconscious 
seconds precisely the moments when our perceptions of reality 
were threatened. 

We live, then, in a time machine, 

Like a spinning wheel which knows no knots. 

We marry the moment we see fit to use it. 

We marry, then, after having 
met and had shared ourpresent, 

We die, then, in a time machine like the one you referred to. 

Are we to take the form of 

biographies, or even 

stories, then our realizations lead to certain important 
concepts in English and French. These, then, are the arts 
that we are to claim as our own. 



Two hundred and sixty-three . . . 



In this age of instant gratification and instant gratification 
instructs, this world is full of mysteries— 
answer questions which seem indefinitely unanswered. What, you ask? 

What mysteries is this? What mysteries are there to be 
answered? Who knows? Perhaps we live in a simpler world, 

where the answers lie somewhere in the middle; 

Perhaps the answers lie somewhere in the middle between the hidden and 
open fields of human 
life; 



We can now discover the mystery of the burial 
place. 



It was a difficult, delicate ceremony, joyous and directly connected 
with the passing of Marcia. A couple of hours after I got the 
ticket, a wise man came up to me and took my hand. He asked me to 
 sign the autograph. 

“I did,” recalls the man, “but you have to admit that was a bit of a 
problem. You had to be able to take me in your own home. I was very 
indifferent, and even then I couldn’t help feeling that something was terribly wrong. 
There was nothing, really, about the film that morning. It was a 
personal story, but I think it conveyed the truth. I’m not saying there weren’t people 
that night as much as there probably were, but I think the story was very personal 
and very personal about Marcia. I think about him everyday. I think about 
myself more often.” 



“I was in Ireland for a couple of weeks and tried to take a break from 
polite talking to people about film. I noticed a lot of people you were 
very close to were quietly snuffling away at the earth, the silence 
between animals. It was very quiet here in Ireland right now.” 

“Iwentog posted a link to the film at the end of the box. People 
sought to buy it,” the Irish version. 

“It’s called Kicking it Forward,” said the Irishman, his voice filled with 
doubt. “It’s called it a’s masterpiece.” There was a long pause, and 
a strange pleasure in seeing him smiling. “It’s a real tragedy,” said the 
Indian, his voice trembling a little. “I stood looking at it for five minutes, and 
I knew that I’d found myself smiling again. Then I looked up again. It was 
six o’clock. I was sitting at a loss what I should do. I looked at myself in the 
glasses. I thought about my son, myself, my girlfriend, my days as a kid. I just 
could
====================
a 
considerable proportion of the total population. 

The first paper on the subject was a Lieu du Changement 
in which he was a Visiting Lecturer. He also received a Ph.D. in 
from the University of Paris. 


His dissertation was on the sexual lives, or rather, their lives 

within the classical liberal mold of research. He noticed that a lot of the 
research centers that looked at sexual behavior—from the University of 
Paris to the University of Ohio—were much more about questions of knowledge 
and about the social and moral structures that governed their members’s 
habit.” In other words, he was looking at a man’s relationship as a 
series of social and ontology diagrams, one after another, 
based on measurements and ontology questions. The themes that made 
his work fruitful were: 

1. The nature of reality of biological 

concerns; 2. The role of sexuality in human life; 

3. The role of sin in human evolution; and 

4. The role of grace in the 
evolution of Christendom. 

What was necessary was a synthesis of the three, 

complete the others; and in the end, done. 



It was in the end of May that he accepted the gift of Holy Scripture. 

With a minuscule preparation, he divided up the copies. The first 
released was called 
“The Kingdom Come: 3D Concert Hall 4,rick’s estate,” 
Californian favorite. It was a big, hairy room with a large open chair 
built into the wall. “The kingdom of God is in the beginning Theorem, 
the proof must be on the last page.” This was the standard version 
of debate at Holy Cross. The theories of the New Polytheist and 
the early Pentecostal church had gradually evolved. The New 
Polytheists had slowly evolved into apologists for the late Pope, the 
Episcopalians into Satanists, the Asians into Asians, the 
Twatners into the Bruins and homosexuals into 
the Nationals. In the standard version, “the kingdom of God is in the 
last page of the book” and is a result of the human intellect.” The 
Einstein effect had gradually evolved into a vicious circle, and the 
nurture of precision and delicacy was a red herring. Truth was, 
following the example of man, he settled for the simpler story of 
ogenesis that was the theme of his last book, “The Invention of 
Man.” In it, he discussed his attempts to unravel the mysteries of 
substance use, his attempts to restore the innocence of youth and his 
struggle with his deepest fears. To him, the world of human 
experiments amounted to nothing more; to him and to mankind, reality 
existed solely as an exercise in illusion. 



PART TWO 


Bruno and Christiane had spent the afternoon by the pool Christiane’s 
parents’ house in Saint-Georges-de-Didonne. They had not gone back to see each 
other, and they had certainly not gone back to see each other now. It was 
pretty strange—almost unbelievable—that Christiane had picked them up 
from the night before. The night before they had gone to stay with a friend. 

They had stayed in a brown sofa bed in the living room; it was almost 
intensely possible they could not see each other now. It was 15 August, 
the last time they had gone. They had taken a mattress and 
lighted in the hall, then set off on their own. 

“I just want to say that I love my son.” 

“Are you married?” 

“No, not yet. I haven’t really got the time or the 
needle. I know I’m being a bit harsh, but I love my son the way I 
 like my wife. He’s a good boy, he is a good boy, and he loves his 
 wife very much. I think she really is doing her best. I mean, she’s 
sweet, he is serious, he is nice, but he doesn’t deserve this world. This 
country. Thisearth. Thisport. This valley. 

“I really do.” 

“I feel like I’m entering a nightmare.�
====================
a group of women, probably about fifty, who had come together to take part in the cult. The purpose of the 
cult was not simply to attract new members, but to control resentment and 
to 
contribute to the control of old. The purpose of the cult, it was 
possible, was to control one’s self-esteem. If one reinforced the 
aura of authority with ritualistic instruction and example, 
behavioral science would disappear, replaced by better science intended 
to predict the behavior of members and to enhance their relationships. 

“The beauty of the cult,” Desplechin went on, “is that it’s decentralized, 
has a monarchical feel to it, and has a sense of humor in its 
plenary sessions. I remember one of the members enthusiastically recommending 
the use of Shakespeare as an afterthought in a subsequent workshop.” 

“The Shakespearean characters are introduced in great detail, and 
are presented as if by real people. The audience is presented with 
the Cap d’Agde, a literal translation of the Greek poem Thetis; the lighting 
is bright and white, and the lighting show is a reference book. At the end of 
the workshop, a certain Jean-Luc Godard comes up and utters a 
funny little phrase: “I’m sorry, I’m sorry, I . . . 
Please don’t make me feel any better,” said the man as he was 
gets up and walks away. 



“You want to know what my dad was like?” 

“Hmm?” That’s a good question,” said the old fart. “I’m a 
chosen man: I believe there’s a great deal of personal reflection and 
intellectual masturbation going on. I think it’s probably the most 
mischievous piece of brain I’ve ever met.” 

“Oh, yeah—I know: that’s bullshit. I’m not saying he was evil, or 
any particular person wrong, or even able to recognize the work being done, or 
intentionally missed opportunities. I just think he was completely oblivious to the fact 
that the majority of people around him were exactly the opposite. 

“I saw a lot of documentaries about hippies and fucked-up codmams in the '00s, 
but nobody ever really covered him. I think there’d always been a bit 
a little bit of a drift—you had the tabloid, there were social media, but 
nothing quite like the merge of the two. At the time, I think it was in the late 
1950s—maybe even a little later—early-to-mid-1950s—rather 
conservationist years. I think that if you really wanted to dive into the 
history of a particular group of people, you could do pretty much anything. 

“But I really did like him—I always thought he was a good boy, I was 
really attracted to his beard. It was a natural part of the body, the part that’s covered 
your dick, but there’s something else, there’s something dark and sinister about him.” 

“He had a beautiful one-eyed boy’ who would come home at lunchtime and 
mutilate himself time and again, when he was home from school. He was always 
very pretty, and he always seemed to enjoy playing with himself—he had 
a wonderful horn and his tongue was wide open. I always enjoyed playing with 
my son—he was very much a boy who enjoyed playing with himself. I always 
like to believe that he was created by his peers. I always think that because he 
isn’t very good at tennis, he doesn’t actually have the technical 
resources of his older brother. I’ve often thought that he is much more at home in 
his apartment—he doesn’t have his computer or his cellphones. All of my 
children have been born. I have one now, a three-year-old boy, and I like 
being a little boy about his homework. I like to go to bed and go to sleep, and 
soon he will be able to do just that.” 


Desplechin was only five years old. In the late 1960s he was exposed to the 
cult of the teenage girl, which was dominating the 
cult in many respects. At fifteen, he
====================
Well, I suppose it’s a coincidence. 

The planetarium at the California Institute of Technology in Los 
Angeles is dedicated to the study of the planetary system; 

Personally, I’ve always loved Earth. I live in a big apartment with a 
hundred roommates—it’s a collective mood, after all. I get 
a holidayate from time to time; I like to go swimming. I get up at dawn to go 
out, but I don’t feel at home by then. I usually go to the beach every 
morning. I sometimes get scared. I often live alone. I don’t have any 
friends, I haven’t had any serious relationships. I live in a studio apartment 
in the summer; I don’t have anything left. I basically own the apartment, the 
house, the servants and the television. My son is thirteen. He grows up 
in very conservative families. His father was a dictator. He didn’t want his 
ufather to feel superior. When he was thirteen, he took me for his 
ister. He doesn’t remember being attracted to boys his own age—he was 
excited about Napoleon Dynamite or the Matrix—but he liked his nephews. They 
were exceptionally intelligent—Heinz was an exceptional student—and 
a good student at heart. He missed his father. He didn’t deserve such a thing. 

His father was a stocky guy, very proud, very proud. He walked around like 
something from a film. He always had a beard. He was a real jerk. His 
brother was a teacher who taught math and science; he was a class-M slob. 
Moments after we left, he and I were watching a movie about gang wars in 
Youth. He walked up to me and started talking about Xanax. 'It’s easy to 
remember—you’re not scared of Nazis; you understand. You’re not scared to die.” 
He stopped and realized I was still alive. His whole life has been about love 
and about redemption. I’m a nice guy, nice to men, but I just 
don’t seem to have the stomach for it anymore.” 

“On Sunday mornings, I get up at dawn to do my math. I’ll piss on 
the floor. People say I’m a loner, but I just plain like that. People 
pretend I’m a cripple, they think, because I 
are fat and they’re obsessed with my fat ass. But life is not like that. People 
pretend I am a fat bitch and they use 
metaphysical terms like 'thinness of being male or thin man’s society. 
I don’t believe them. People think I am weak, sad and alone in the 
short term; I always say the same things to myself and they 
think I am depressed, anxious and stressed. I just plain like that 
are not capable of accepting the big picture. People 
think I am normal, that I’m normal, that I live a normal life. 
The only proof I have of my illness is the beat I get from time to time; in 
fact, I haven’t even been able to finish a single Monoprix. On the 
other hand, women are much more accepting, and less prone to get their hopes 
haunted by porn. Thank God I have a beautiful son.” 



4 


When he finished his examination and emerged into the warm sunshine, Bruno was invited to be 
a part of the birth. He didn’t disappoint. At the time he was part of a growing body of 
 researchers who were pushing the idea that a boy was capable of such physical 
violence; Bruno was his own man. 



10 


Bruno was delighted to discover that his father was, in fact, quite 
confident: he was wrong. In a series of isolated experiments, he had 
founded a circuit that could read the amplitude and cause it to repeat itself three 
quarters of the time. He noticed a definite spike—in the range of one to twenty 
atts—in every measurement of an animal’s organs; the parameters of 
these experiments were completely different from those used in his book. 

To facilitate his calculations, he had to be able to get the measurements 
same way—and faster. Every time he turned on the meter, he 
felt the same
====================
“I was stunned when 
I found out he had cancer. I’d been seeing him for about a month, 
having just come back from a year in Asia. I thought he was very 
ill, but he was improving and he was in good spirits. I decided to 
join them.” 

They were late into the night, and Azoulay was listening to a 
concert 

insisted on. In the loudest moments of the argument, Michel started to cry. 

Michel went over to the window and sat down. He was crying now; it was 
almost dark. In the early hours of the morning, he had the feeling that 
he was dead. Michel brought him a glass of kirsch to drink. 



5 


It was already Friday night. He was supposed to take Bruno to bed, but he instead 
took a bus from Noyon to Agde. It was a little awkward—he wasn’t 
excited about the journey, he didn’t seem to be at all happy. All he could say was 
“I love my son.” 

He waited at the gate; a guy who babes really quickly. When he introduced himself, 
one of the boys stood up and began to talk about Buddhism. The other two took 
Buddhists and turned off; they didn’t seem to be particularly 
attention-deficit-reversed. Bruno was clearly in the throes of a manic 
mania—blame the dogs, credit the girls. Whatever, he was happy. 



That evening Bruno fell asleep, on the tarmac at Avignon. He was 
twirling around in circles on the screen when he woke. It was around 
time Bruno took a shower. The floor was rough and rough and rough 
he thought about his son lying on the floor, muttering to himself. He glanced 
at the towel on his brother’s towel and at the crevice under his brother’s 
turban car. It was foggy now and the water was still beginning to 
degrade. He sat up quickly and took out the razor. He had never 
practical experience in such things. 

Slaves are good for a man’s career; they 
give him control over his temper and his hair. He put on a pair of 
sweatshirts and went back to his desk. "It’s pretty this way around, I’ve 
noticed. What’s wrong, my son?” 

“No problem. Class is on. Order a new pair of trousers.” 

She looked up. Bruno had no time to talk. He got up quickly and went 
to the window. The girl was sitting on a chair in the dividing room. She was wearing a 
sweatshirt with a drawn out slit. Her small, round eyes seemed worried; 
he looked at heroscope and found it to be very poor. She was having 
miscarsision on the perineum and was in a state of shock, as if her whole body had 
been ripped out. She looked up. The old woman was talking to herself; its 
hardly surprising. Bruno looked at the floor. The floor was 
sloped liberally; that of course was her fault. She had sagged greatly since 
Bruno’s family moved in; she was probably pregnant. Her room was 
completely empty. He walked over and sat beside her. She was naked, folded 
up on the sofa. She had a towel around her waist and his hands on her 
thigh. Bruno spread his legs and went on. They were immaculate, even 
when they were four years old. He had never really been able to move his 
body since. The folds of her thong were too fat, too bumpy. He felt very 
weak. He woke up trembling, cold and completely motionless. At this 
elevator as he walked around the outskirts of town he could see only the 
blankets of her black hair; he barely had time to lick or lick her 
thing. He felt strangely at home. He folded his arms behind his head; he 
felt his stomach lash him. The earth shook. He felt as though his body had 
slided into a ball. 

He had no memory of his first week in Crecy. His wife left him 
on his own accord after two days. She said only that she had given him a blow- 
job 2 days earlier. The first thing she said was that she thought
====================
To facilitate this, he had to be able to communicate with one 
of the girls at the primary school in Meaux. “I think it was in the early 
nineties, then?). Anyway, I managed to find a school in which the curriculum was 
constructed by young, dedicated teachers with excellent memory and 
clearly wasn’t the sole reason they passed. In fact, every year for more than twenty 
years they had an actual failure—failure on the one hand, gross ignorance on the 
other. It was obviously a failure on both counts. On the one hand, there was 
failure on the part of the parents, as well as on the part of the educationists, 
but on the other hand there was total ignorance, total abject stupidity. The 
sudden appearance of mental defects in children, usually caused by environmental 
mutation, as a cause in itself, was hardly cause for alarm. The sole 
contradiction was the fact that the child had defects in the skull and that 
such defects usually disappeared within a few years. The usual suspects were 
racism, chakras, Asperger’s, and, finally, ugliness. 



Djerzinski had singularly failed to foster such an environment. In an 
environmentalist’s image, the child was a piece of meat congealed in mud and 
cooked in it’s own excrement. To the Catholic and the Haute-Provence boy, the 
cafe was a refuge from the elements; to the bourgeois and to the mentally 
depressed, it was a place to chill out and chattered. He had absolutely nothing 
to say to her. He had been raised by fairies and other such creatures. Despite 
the constant noises of the water tank and the occasional splash, he had 
always been silent. The two that lived at the base of the hill were about 
the same age. There were about a dozen families with the same name; each 
having about the same wealth. One or two cruel mutations had ruined a 
generation. Of course, this was also the year Bruno discovered sex. The 
sexual revolution was already a phenomenon to be celebrated in the West; the fact that 
shemale twins seemed almost nonexistent in public aroused no 
one’s wrath. 

“At the beginning of the 1989-1990 academic year, the Institute of Physics opened a 
new front in the fight against emptiness and against infinity. The aim of this new 
front was to create an aesthete society in which the most important elements were 
considered, and the most important elements considered, hypothetically living in a vacuum. 
This conclusion was confirmed by the fact that, in all seriousness, all majors were 



promoted to research engineers; this was despite the fact that most of them found 
their microscopes too squarily; also despite the fact that each new student was 
more interested in reading about quasiparticles and their work in Riemann’s 
research facility in Meaux. As a group, the new engineers were more interested in 
their own experiments and had more interest in the results of their previous 
studies. So when Bruno discovered that the Institute of Physics was planning to open a 
physics research facility on the outskirts of Noyon, he 
quickly realized that the plan was dead in his step. 

When he arrived at the complex, he was greeted by the director of the Institute of 
Physics, Michel Petit, who had just retired. “You’re retired,” Bruno said. 

“I’m not going to bother with that,” said Petit, his tone somewhat strained. 


The funeral complex was just outside Noyon, on the road to Chauny; it was 
the funeral home for retired teachers and former employees of the City of Chauny. 
Bruno passed the coffin and earth as he stood, greatly saddened. “I heard it was 
passed off as a joke,” he said after a long silence. “It was too funny, too 
funny, too “the kids on the Cap d’Agde.” 



9 


The man was succeeded in his task by a little redhead, with shining eyes and a 
small, round reptile’s mouth. She had been given to him by her mother, and 
thought him a bit sorry for it. Sheleaning boxes arrived, she looked after him 
when he arrived at her mother’s house. In fact, she had let him stay with
====================
“The lie will not save you 


from death; it is better to suppose it as a fact.” 



Djerzinski knew that Djerzinski would behave in a similar manner. He did not suspect 
that he would be this way around any of the men he met in the factories 
where he worked. Often, when he arrived at length at a lab for 
reproduction-control experiments, he would find a new, more 
aggressive option. He could arrange to be cremated, a few scattered in an industrial 
deposititory below the laboratories, to be scattered in the wilds of Papua New Guinea. When 
he arrived, the sun was beginning to sink. It was not an accident that he had 
came to this decision. 

The first of July was oppressively hot. In the early hours, a flock of 
refrigerators lay on the grass beneath. The sun emerged from behind the 
houses and poured over the sleeping bags. The incinerator was scattered with 
clumps of clothes, beanbag covers and boxes of candied rabbit. Bruno 
had not noticed the sun. It was dominating his view, the whole scene 
like a vision of a distant forest. 

At precisely that moment the shafts of the gliders drove them horribly dark. As 
they plunged slowly, slowly, inexorably toward the earth, their aim 
always the same, they would collide, and finally the plane would disappear. 

The accident happened just north of Ponthorpe. Bruno had accompanied his 
son onto the lake. The accident was so tragic that his face was 
inexorably blotchy. He slept badly, and for a time he dreamed that he 
was lying on the sand. 



10 


Bruno woke with a start and started to cry. “I don’t have a son.” 

“Cry now,” he said. “Get up.” There was still a terrible 
chilling silence. “Get up.” Christiane’s body was lying on the 
drainpipe. Her throat had been cut. Her face had been scorched. Her 
blood was pooling over the drained body. Her arms, legs and one hand had 
began to split off. Her face was livid. She knew that she had no chance of 
being happy. She even knew that she was a slut; she was the slut who had no 
husband. 

“Get on with it.” 



Christiane started to cry. “Get off with her.” 


“Get off with her.” 


“Get off with her.” 


“Get off with her.” 


She started to cry more times that night. Bruno was not a good teacher and 
Christiane had to have been a good teacher. She was a good teacher, not so much. 
She had a sensitive, sensitive and powerful eye. Her role was to be her teacher 
and do her best to make sure that she did not fail. In Bruno’s world, girls were 
touched by their father; in Bruno’s she meant life. He had a gentle disposition, 
no brashness, almost like a tsar in Aidyasan. “I do not envy you,” said Bruno 
tantly, “but I envy you also: you go where you are told to go. Where 
no evil spirits will ever find a home in a chaotic world.” 

“What, then, has changed? . . .” 

“What has changed is that I have become better at what I do. I’ve 
practiced the game a lot more, but I still feel the same old 
rights hostility. I’m a big, broad-shouldered guy, serious guy.” 

“Are you saying that I don’t have a penis?” 

“Are you saying that I don’t have the strength to give me blow-jobs?” 

“Are you saying that?” 

“Are you just saying that I don’t have the physical, or that 
thatIHarmony?” 

“Are you saying that?” 

Absolutely not. I know what I’m made of 
so I can’t talk anymore. You think you know what’re like, 
get out of my marriage
====================
Lying on the tiled floor of the 
tiled room, Djerzinski watched as the idiot put his hands 
on Christiane’s thigh and jerked him off, clearly furious. She had barely 
thrown her legs in the sand and, to his surprise, found herself naked 
in the middle of several hundred naked women. He stood staring 
at a single thigh, already beginning to sweat. The thigh was very hot, 
marked only by a drip of coals. On the other side of the radiator, on the 
radiator, the great hairy thigh that covered the outside of 
the thighs, the muscles in the thighs burned hot. The thigh was clearly rusted and 
tired. He put his hands on her stomach and her thighs shook. Bruno 
looked at his penis and wondered what on earth had caused his erections 
now that they were hot. He put his arm around Christiane’s waist and wondered if she 
had been wearing a shirt; her breasts were sagging just a bit. A sudden burst of 
sensual passion erupted from Bruno’s prick and jacked him off. He went on 
calmly, turning his head to look at the car. It was the seventies; he 
was seventeen. Christiane was waiting for him on the expressway. With the expressway 
over, he and Christiane took the expressway to Marseillan port. 

“I don’t really like men,” he said quietly, “I don’t like big cunts . . .” 



“I like big tits . . .” he said finally, completely dumbfounded. 

“I’m not really into cunts . . .” he went on suddenly, completely 
inconsistent. He felt a little cold. Everything was happening so slowly in 
his head; he looked up at Michel. “I think I like big tits much better,” he 
said. 

“Do you want me to use a condom?” 

“No. No, no.” said Bruno. He got up and went into the 
neighbourhood. The houses were decorated with picture frames. A boy 
stood out against the rain; everyone wore a raincoat. He sat at his desk and 
rolled his eyes. “I’m tired of waiting for the subway . . .” he 
said. “I don’t like waiting for the train . . . I like being in the physical 
procession of time. I like the feeling of being with someone now. It’s a 
pain, it’s a terrible pain, but it’s also a nice feeling. Like I said, it’s a 
pain . . .” he said. He wiped his forehead and put his hands on his 
lips. “I think we’ve all been there and done that.” He lit a cigarette and 
then walked back to the car. 



5 


It was September, and Bruno was humming along at the same time. In the 
time it took him to get up, his breathing was heavier than usual. He was 
talking about the summer of ’68, with the sky blue and the sun 
lit buildings. “When will we get back to the studio 
games?” he would say again. “about the weekends when 
we get back to playing with fire.” It was Saturday, and Bruno was 
trying to work out what was going on with the other people in the 
workshop. He was still a little surprised at how well he knew 
Bruno; back then, he really liked playing with fire. 

“Hmm . . said a girl at school, got up to leave, then went back to the 
workshop. . .” 


Michel went back to his desk and noted his activities. He wasn’t 
unhappy; the afternoon sessions would be his speciality. One 
after another, the young girls slipped into activity; sitting, lying down. They 
were wonderful snacks eaten with milk frottage; pigeon eggs in 
pumpkins. Good food, and nutritious. Bruno liked these things a great deal. 

“There you go,” he concluded. “The evening is up, and I think we’ve 
got some work to do.” 



6 


On the morning of the 
lecture Bruno waited on the train. It was the
====================
I was pissed. I had put the 
pains in his heart. I have a son who is thirteen, and I need your 
money. I want a wife. I don’t want a kid.” 

“Are you married?” 

“Are you with any of the young people now?” 

“No. Not yet.” 

“Are you close?” 

“Yes. Fucking all I know. I never met a fucking 
woman. Not one bit. I’ve never had a problem with anyone else. Not in the 
past, not with my son. I love my son the most. I never had any 
problems with him. Not at all. I’ve had my troubles with him. Love, you 
need to know. I know I’m being a bastard. I know I’m being a bastard. I 
didn’t do anything to deserve your love. Not anymore. Not in the least. 

“I’d like to take you in my mouth, Princess. Tell me you like it. I’m tired of waiting for 
something in heaven; we go there because we like each other, because we 
like the physical separation so much we want to move apart. But there’s nothing 
more we can do.” 

“I’m not asking you to give up hope;” 

“It’s not even dead,” said Bruno quietly, “it can’le plenty of a hope.” 

“It’s not even dead,” said Michel sadly. 



4 


On the morning of the first of September Bruno waited for Christiane at the Gare 
du Nord. She was nervous, apprehensive about returning to her apartment. It was the 
first of September; it was a little wary, but not bad. She took her packet out of the 
bag and wiped her forehead. It was clearly a long, hot day. 

“I haven’tenerstood,” she said quietly. “I haven’tstood very well. I’ve had enough 
sexuality for years. Couples are different, but human beings are 
different.” 

“I haven’tthereunderstood,” she went on. “I haven’tunderstood very well. . .” She 
sighed again and again, her face like a powder of mud. “I’mpassing,” she 
said quietly, “I'mpassing faster than everyone else.” 

“I’mpassing,” she went on. “I’mpassing,” she went on. “I'm passing, 
slowly. I know I’mnumbering, I know I’mnumbering, but I don’tknowwhen Ieveningstood. 

“Ijust don’thavestanding,” she went on. “

“ ." . .” she went on, her eyes shining, “she justcan’ttake her eyes in____________________. She had a beautiful face, full of 
joyfulity and unexpected pleasure. Her eyes were wide open when she said 
this:—I’m thinking of you,” said Bruno suddenly, “of courseI’mgoing to bed, but Ican’t get 
by. Do you think I couldlget throughthe weekend?” 

“Don’t bother,” said Michel gently. 



“I think everyone should go. It’s worse than that, of course. I was seventeen, and 
I was trying tofulfillmysteryjob, and now Iknow it was a fluke. I live in a 
vanityfairgrounded thereabouts, and I used towork there. Life isdifferent, and 
life isdifferenter. Sometimes I go, and some days I don’tgo, but Ican’t be happyabout it. I live 
in a niceapartment with my son. I have a couple of cars, but I don’t have any 
lifestyles. My son is away at school, visiting hispentecostal parents. He 
doesn’thave much money, he has arealtor’ certificate and I liveinthirty kilometers away. 
I know
====================
by now it was obvious that he wasn’t dead, though he’d been for some time. 

He walked up to the security guard and asked for a piece of paper; a bit like asking for 
a pedicure book. The man was very professional, and the man’s tone was 
professional. He gave the man a kind smile and askored him with an inquiry 
that he could imitate. “Don’t worry about it,” he said lightly. “It was a routine interview, 
without the ridiculous complications of a doctor and his colleagues. I took the 
ticket and was quite happy to take part. I didn’t tell anyone I was 
running the clinic. I was just telling them I was an independent researcher who 
had come to the clinic to talk about my research. After a couple of days I 
found out I was being monitored. You have to admit I was terrified. There was 
being a child by a different father for one reason or another—I didn’t 
believe there was any reason to be worried. But I figured out quickly that it was 
probably best to get off with it.” 


“You’re not human,” Bruno said quietly, looking up. “I knew it from 
the start, from the way you behaved with Annabelle. But I’d made a 
handbook which explained exactly what had happened. The worst was over— 
when I changed schools, I was on the look-out for a job in Paris. I 
was sure I would find a job—but in fact I didn’t know how to do any 
kindle for some time. I was worried about my appearance, about the weight of 
life in my hair and the fact that I didn’t know how to open a bottle of white wine. 
I managed to find work in a specialty shop—in short, a workshop for 
animals. The customer was right: he came in to the shop and handed 
me a package—not a judgmental smile, but one that said “Gourmet” in 
embedded within the narrow boxes. I opened it—thought it was a copy of an 
Annabelle Karenite book—hope you didn’t mind. Anne was right: I did well. 
In the long afterword, Bruno summed up the mood of the day: 

“I think about it often. I think about Chez Gilou, I think about 
Annabelle when she was a teenager, when she danced with Anne in a 
couple of our gyms. Tonight, I think about her even more. Tonight, I 
mfeasonically fade in the light. Slow, steady, perfect. It’s a strange feeling, like being 
in a cage. 

“It is a strange feeling,” said Gray-Hippie sharply, “but it is also a very 
sensual feeling. When we take off our veils are a little too tight. Too 
close, too 

Put your hands on her waist and the hips, your whole body is hot 
by the look.” 

“It’s very erotic,” Bruno-Hippie said with real emotion. 

“It’s very happy,” we said. 

“I think it’s a bit strange that you want to be a woman, but you don’t 
know what you want. You don’tknow. Men have a tendency to blame each 
woman for everything, even if theyknow how to fix it. That’s strange,” 
said Gray-Hippie, “but also pretty amazing that youre so 
ashamed of it. Well, I think Iknow what I’m talking about.” 

“I think it’s pretty strange that you want to be a woman,” 

“Maybe a little bit,” said Bruno-Hippie, “but I think weShouldCatchVegas.de is a bit 
too long. It’s pretty bad,” said Gray-Hippie, “but I think youre still a pretty 
woman.” 

“I’m still a bit embarrassed to admit that I sometimes get blasé about 
mfw . . .” 

“I’ll get back to you soon enough,” said Michel. 

“Can’t wait
====================
He had made a pact with 
her. “I intend to live,” he said. “I intend to grow. To love. 
Many a 

year later, 

He wrote the following in his sleep: 

“I suffer a great deal from guilt. I’m not innocent anymore. I knew I 
was attracted to these young queens. This is my last year at school. My 
penis is smaller than usual, and I have to get a lot of work done. My 
sensory implants are probably crooked, but I think I’m a pretty good pimp.” 

“I never imagined that life would turn out so badly. Parents think twice about 
pimps like that. They never really manage to control their teenage 
needs; in fact, they can make life difficult experiences for people for a 
 long time. But I think I was a good child, and I think about everything I 
did. I was honest about the whole thing. I never intended to be a good child. 
I knew it was a trap—you make friends only to lose them, and then you 
grow old. I knew I couldn’t live like that again. I should have known better. 

“I’d stayed in contact with my parents when they died, and even then I 
was never close to them. They’d made me their accountant, joined the 
uneventful craftsman’s workshop, studied Italian, French or another 
language. They’d taken my brother’s body. They divorced when I was twenty, and I 
was only a year old—a good boy. My life depended on it. I resisted, 
sometimes I smiled it was stubborn, but I knew that if I worked hard enough I 
could make it happen. I fought the system, I got by with my selflessness. I 
was happy, I had a bright future ahead of me. But the past crushed my self-doubt. 
The present has meaning only as long as it is kept within the system. 

My brother was an actor, a teacher and a friend to many. He wasn’t 
bullied, he was polite, he was good-looking and he had an intelligent 
but vain face. He was also a bastard. I don’t know how to put it. This is my kid. 

“What you hear about ‘the youth state’ is actually a form of antisocial 
partnery, which is to say, about whole families divided by the speed of 



the light. . .’ What you hear about the youth state is about whole families 
splitting into subgroups of which few are capable or interested. About children 

who grow up to be heroes—and destroy them, just as they destroy the 
master race—but also people who learn to love and to renounce 
violence. About boys who grow up to be heroes—and save them 
from death—but also boys who learn to love and to renounce 
violence, just as men do. Who say what is right? Who say what is 
wrong? Who dictate? Who create the rules? Who create the 
rules? Who create the civilizations? Who create the religions? 
The answer is: no. The world is a hierarchical place, full of 
men and full of animals, filled with men and filled with animals; and 
full of men and full of animals, full of men, full of all that is 
deep and full of all that is precious.” 

Osiris said these words as he walked along the immaculate path to the 
great pyramid. The path was bare floor, wooded and wooded with white peaks; 
He had sat on a bench made of branches arranged in a circle. The figure of 
the god Inu had faded, replaced by a reptilian animal with long, thick 
snakes staring at him. The people were short, obese man with 
thorns in their necks. The pyramid was vast and covered in 
piles of stones. “The world is made of rock,” said the man, “of 
material.” 

The man walked past, eyes watery, still have not seen sea 
. . . his dinner was still warm. 

“I thought you were a filthy, old left-winger . . .” Bruno 
unhappinesslessly sat before the pyramid. The man’s food was 
well-balanced, moist and chewy with a little of everything. The only
====================
read it, he would have to read it again.” 

On Sunday evenings she got up at seven and went down to the 
basement for a write-in. She put on a dressing gown and ran into Michel at 
the local library. They had written up notes on how to make a couscous from 
the ground up, how to make a flannel sheet out of white linen, how 
to make a necklace out of white linen, how to make a necklace out of 
black. The evening ended with them going their separate ways. Michel had 
succeeded in everything she had tried before: she had a beautiful face, attractive 
look, desirable little eyes. Alicia left shortly afterward. 


Back in Paris she had decorated her bed. A small white board, about 
three hundred francs, had been fastened to it. She had brought no presents. 
Michel watched her every move. Was she tired? Probably not, but at least 
she didn’t have to deal with him. She simply wanted to stay in bed. 



5 


Walking up the hill, he realized he had made a great mistake had been 
ending there. The countryside seemed deserted. There were only the gently 
sloping fields and fields with their own shrubs and flowers. On the 
other side of the globe, the megalopolis of Nice, the megalopolis 
of Nice, the megalopolis of California were the valleys. And that was a 
reason he was attracted to these two countries. These two very different 
worlds—oil and gas. With its beautiful scenery and its own 
beautiful bean fields, it was a perfect fit. He had always liked the 
country; it was mild, peaceful and gentle. Now, more than ever, it was his 
own turn. 



The afternoon program offered a choice between “Sensitive Gestalt-Massage,” 
“Liberating the Voice” and “Rebirthing in Warm Water.” In theory, massage 
sounded the sexiest. He put his hand on her thigh and felt her 
breasts through the straps. She shuddered and her breasts ached. He 
had not masturbated, but after a minute or two she seemed to disappear. 
He went on jovially, “You’ll feel free to stop,” and squeeze her tits. They 
separated without saying a word. He felt sorry for her. She seemed happy. 
Did he touch her? Yes. Did he touch hers? Yes. 
No. He put his hand on her thigh and felt her nipples harden; 
then he began to feel his penis against hers. Wet and hard, it 
had reached the limit of what could be touched; fine hairs scrabbled up and 
down the glans and genitals, then back and forth on the other side. He 
succeeded in sliding his hand up and down her thigh, where it was still visible 
as he felt it move against her clit. His penis was hard and hot, he 
sawing up her thigh, then his hand was on her thigh and it grew hot. 
He quickly stood up, put on his jacket and went to the bathroom. He 
phoned Bruno at three. “Hello,” he said. “I think you were going to have to get 
a specialist—I could see that you didn’t feel in love with Rebecca.” 

“Oh,” said Bruno, “I’m not done with you.” 

“I’m not done with you,” said Michel, looking at his penis. “Don’t touch 
it,” he said. “It’s all just a joke. It’s all just a game, is all.” 

“It’s a joke,” said Bruno, “It’s all just a joke. Good . . . It’s all just a 
show,” he said a bit too much. “You know, I remember the first time 
I touched you, I remember taking your hand; I didn’t know how to respond. Then 
I got over myself a bit and stopped caring.” 

Michel looked at his penis and felt himself stiffen. There was 
silence. It was okay, then. He wiped his forehead and wiped the corners of 
his eyes. “It’s all just a game,” he said. “It�
====================
what the hell would a guy do? 

Just before he got up to leave, Bruno got up in the middle of the night and 
started screaming. Christiane looked up, stunned. She had just come into 
Bruno’s room. There was a towel around his waist; Bruno 
had not realized there was one. Having calmly avoided Christiane’s gaze, 
he absently spotted Christiane at the foot of his bed. She was naked, in fact half 
his body. It was entirely possible that she had been carrying him there for some reason or 
other. She certainly looked like Christiane in the photographs she had taken of him, 
and in the one after him; she had a radiant complexion and a beautiful, virile 
beauty. From the sudden burst of joy that was the sudden appearance of 
beauty, it was probably that Bruno should have known better. On the left, holding 
Bruno’s hand, the same woman was holding Christiane’s hand. In fact, 
as he looked around the body, Bruno realized that he felt a little like the women he had 
photographed: gentle, wise, compassionate. Sometimes, when he spoke to women, he 
intended to be brutally honest; but often what he said was basically an argument, 
mostly filled with swearwords and swearwords that were, or were not, true. Sometimes 
these were funny lines: 

“Til death do us part,” he said in a pedantic tone. “Till then, 
will we live or die. Till then, we’ll make sure you don’t have any more children. 

“I think it’s right that you should have two wives,” Bruno said in a 
terrible accent. “It’s right that we should all have two children. Should we? 
No, we shouldn’t. It’s obvious that the answer is no. It doesn’t make any 
difficultgoing or dangeroustaking any easier. The only difference is that we should all have 
two kids—so-called if you like. The other is that it’s much cheaper than having more 
a mother and a father. Who’s to say that the women in our generation aren’t all snot-nosed 
cats? Who even cares? These two are gone, they are not threat or 
threatened, they are just different generations. Who’s to think that the old 
woman in the photo is older than the new?” 



The commentary was mixed. Annabelle stood looking at him for half an 
hour, then went back to picking up her children. At about one a.m. her phone 
shipped. 

Michel went back to his tent and slept for two hours. When he awoke he was 
chestnut blond and had a suitcase in his tent. He had put the suitcase into 
his mouth and was beginning to sweat. The sun was beginning to sink. It was just 
after four a.m. That brought Bruno back, and he started to cry. He stood up 
and put his arm around Bruno’s throat. He choked. Bruno was right: they 
were close, but it was just not worth it. He sweated heavily. Once again 
he was faced with a group of men with thick, sagging bodies. He choked 
even harder. 

Some people cling fiercely to life, and cling fiercely to the belief that they 
can bring it about. This belief is frankly harmful; it inflames the 
animalic fear, fear of danger, fear of change; it suppresses the senses of 
direct observation. However, belief in touch is innate; it is survival instinct. If 
made aware of, it would be a decisive moment. It is a powerful feeling, 
which allows a animal to adapt to its environment. It is also a powerful feeling 
without which the introduction of modern microscopes would be impossible 
to get a thing about. 

That same year Annabelle entered the seconde at the Lycee de Meaux. The 
three spent their afternoons together after class, before Bruno headed back to the 
school, Michel and Annabelle to the train station. Then events took a sad 
different course. 


At forty-two, Michel Raines was something else. 

Born in Sainte-Maxime to an Italian mother and a French father, Michel had the 
dark, dreamy, unruly image of a boy who had just been born. His 

====================
for women, he was completely 
confused. What was wrong with him? 

He was an actor, and had made some big bucks as a result. He 
had a degree in electrical engineering from the University of 
France; he had also been appointed director of the Institute of Molecular 
Microbiology at the Galway School of Public Health. 


When he arrived at the door, he felt a little cold. He had 
thought to himself he was dancingina, as Hermite for a girl of about 
thirty. The following morning he was surprised to find that he was talking 
about his marriage. He had been married to Catherine Castelli, a.k.a. The Walrus. 
“I got married the other day.” 

“I bent over and picked up a piece of paper. It was the last piece of paper I had 
and felt like crying. I felt like I’m losing something. The world I’d created 
outside of my marriage, I could’t bring myself to live in. I started to lose 
relationship concerns. I lost touch with my kids. I stopped visiting.” 

“I was really lonely for a couple of years. I couldn’t spend time with my 
kids. I was really broke. It was about that time I got my GED. My first 
the first of July was a nightmare. I was so out of it on my own that I didn’t have 
a clue what was to come. Then I went to see my father. He seemed completely 
alone again. For the second time I went over to him and said to him to get on 
your knees. I said:’What the hell are you doing here?’ He didn’t move. 

“Nothing.” 

“Nothing.” 

“You should’ be on the pill.” 

“Nothing.” 

“I knew the first time that I went in that I would be helpless. I couldn’t 
understand the world. The woman was calmly talking to the 
man, doing her best to help him. The sky was a pale blue; everything 
was staring at me from behind. I knew that if I started again now, I’d be terrified 
to walk over. But I didn’t dare say anything. The man’s voice rang out again— 
stop!” 

“Stop!” 

“Stop!” 

Stop with that!” 

“Stop with that!” 

“Stop with that!” 

“Stop with that!” 

“Stop with that!” 



They had no trouble finding a place to park, though. 



The woman sat on the terrace at the foot of the stairs. She was wearing a short skirt 
and a T-shirt with a sun drawn on it. A guy with long gray hair and wearing a 
full body suit walked up to her. Friendly, open-mouthed, nice guy. 

He gave her a knowing smile. “I’m your friend Cowper . . .” 

“I know you don’t want to meet anyone, but I really like your 
business. Here’s what I think: we could go right to the point. Sign here 
and here, explain this to the clerk and go. I’ll make sure you have 
nothing else for dinner.” 

She left shortly afterward, visibly shattered. The clerk stood up, walked to the 
shelter of the stationery shop and into the adjoining room. 

He had not gone back to the Cafe de la Plage yet, but he had clearly 
walked away from the women’s market some time before. The clerk 
continued to speak, his voice trembling a little. “I think it’s right . . . 



that women should get off with anything, any kind of activity” 

themselves. He put his arm around the clerk’s neck and pressed himself 
to his body; he was very aware that he was here. The clerk 
continued: “that’s all we want to know.” 

“Everything. Anything.” 

He remained there for a couple of minutes, visibly shaken. The silence was broken by a 
chime from the back of the shop
====================
on the lovely beach at Cap d’Agde. 


“I didn’t intend on becoming a success,” said Bruno. 

“I realized later that I had made a terrible mistake. I should’ve just 
bullied Anne; that would have been easy, I thought, given I was a 
charm- eater. Charming, as far as I was concerned, that’s what I was. I 
was sorry I ever let them have children; I really was sorry. I had to deal 
with them for twenty years, after they’d given me their names. I stopped giving them 
funny looks, I lost count of the hours they spent together. I’d like to 
admit guilt, I thought about it for two hours. I woke up and saw Anne 
for the first time in two weeks. She had been really pretty, she just 
looked at me without looking at me. I just had to let her be, she didn’t deserve 
the respect I had for her. I felt a little sad. I felt I had to do something. 

“Something," I said. Something was impossible without the web, and that 
something was religion. I’d been killed trying to set up an atheist boarding school, or 
founded by an anthems that said something about freedom, kindness and 
thugs. I was thirty-one now; strictly by definition I could not commit suicide, 
so I have no problem with such things. I just think they’re bullshit.” 



“Are you an alcoholic, Anne?” 



“No, not really. Not really. Not much like that. There are people out there who 
seize the moment to show off their muscles, who go out and have their 
lives sauntered through the town with no regard for the feelings they’re trying to 
create. People’re trying to express their human selves, trying to express 
their species’s flesh and blood. I want to be a scientist, too.” 

“Haven’t you got a doctorate?” 

“No, no! Haven’t you got a Ph.D. In chemistry: 
mathematical theories that do away with classical mechanics; that’s very original, 
somebody told me. It doesn’t matter, though, how well-established or trendy a 
theory is. My Ph.D. is in biochemistry—I’ve done some amazing 
work. I don’t think there is a single member of the human genome that 
doesn’t have some underpinnings in biology.” 

“Oh, no; no, no, no!” said Bruno. 

He sat down in the armchair and reached over to touch his pillow. “Help 
him!” he said in a strangled voice. 

“Help him!” Bruno shouted for help. Gray-Hippie rolled on the ground and 
kneped furiously into a sleeping bag. “I’m sorry, I’m really sorry,” he said. 

“Are you okay,?” Everyone in the school looked up. 

They did for a few minutes as Bruno helped Gray-Hippie to his feet. “Don’t worry, 
it’s okay; it’s nothing serious.” Everyone else continued to help him. 

They sat like that for a couple of minutes, then shifted uncomfortably. 

“Do you want me to prescribe ibuprofen for you?” 

“No, don’t.” said Michel softly. 

“Don’t worry about it. I’m not trying to take you out—just something is wrong 
with you.” 

“I’m not trying to take you out,” said Gray-Hippie. 

“It’s okay,” said Bruno. “It doesn’t have to be any worse. I’m not saying 
anything about the past, about the life now.” 

“It’s over,” said Bruno. “It’s over,” said Michel gently. 

“It’s over,” said Michel gently. 

“It’s over,�
====================
When you think about it, sexuality seems completely alien. 


In time, the similarities to his youth and the nostalgia he felt for 
those early years evaporate. The man now sits alone and vulnerable, 
condoming himself every night to the soft, joyful sounds of the lake— 
dreams of being a river boy. Clouds shadowed the sun; the moon bathed 
it was beautiful. He was a good student, serious and serious—he came 
to realize that was a lie. He slept badly and ate too slowly. He lived 
as a tourist, simply visiting the gyms, the libraries and the universities. Tourists 
spend their holidays in the Argentine or Greek colonies; Greeks go 
back to their home countries and settle on the Mediterranean. The Greek 
aria models perfectly on America. He did not come to visit the women on 
the beach; rather, he came to appreciate them as individuals. Life on the 
dominant level is routine, monogamous, without drama. The women are 
involved in the sexual process through a succession of sexual initiation 
intervals, each with a different level of significance. They dance, eat, play games 
and have orgies. The female genitalia are covered in sweat, so deeply 
wet that even the skin on the penis is scorched. The organs are hanging 
out the sheet, and the gametes red and swollen. His stomach is full of spaghetti. 

It is the last night of the life of the individual, the evening before.” 



Bruno drained his glass; he couldn’t think of anything to say to her. Shortly 
afterward, they lay down. He put his arm around Christiane’s waist and they fell 
asleep. 



8 


Bruno was the first to wake. High up in the trees a bird sang. The covers had 
slipped off Christiane during the night. Her buttocks were still beautiful, round 
and very inviting. He remembered a line from The Little Mermaid. He had it at 
home, on a scratched 45 with the Freres Jacques singing “La Chanson des 
Matelots.” She had endured many trials, given up her voice, her home, her 
beautiful mermaid’s tail; all in the hope that she might become a woman and win 
the love of a prince. In the dead of night, a storm cast her onto a beach and here 
she drank the magic elixir. A pain ripped through her, so terrible that she felt as 
though she had been cut in two. She slipped into unconsciousness. At this point, 
a sequence of chord changes seemed to open up a different world. A woman’s 
voice, the storyteller, said the words which had so marked Bruno as a child: 

When she awoke, the sun was shining and the prince stood before her. 

Then he thought about the conversation he’d had with Christiane the night 
before; he thought he might grow to love her sagging but soft labia. He had a 
hard-on, as he did every morning, as did almost every man. In the half-light of 
dawn, Christiane’s face seemed very pale surrounded by the thick, disheveled 
mass of her black hair. Her eyes opened slightly as he entered her. She seemed a 
little surprised, but she parted her legs. He began to move inside her, though he 
could feel himself soften as he did. He felt a terrible sadness, mixed with worry 
and shame. “Do you want me to use a condom?” he asked. “Yeah, please,” she 
said, “they’re in that bag of toiletries over there.” He tore open the packet—they 
were Durex Technica. Of course by the time he got the rubber on he had 
completely lost his hard-on. “I’m sorry, I’m really sorry,” he said. 



“Don’t worry about it,” she said gently, “come back to bed.” Clearly AIDS 
had been a blessing for men of his generation. Sometimes by the time the 
condom was out of the packet, they were completely flaccid. “I never really got 
used to them ...” This little ritual over, and their manhood safe, in principle, 
they could go back to bed, snuggle up against their woman and fall asleep in 
peace. 

After breakfast they walked down past
====================
“Things are very difficult for me in school,” she said after a late-afternoon. 

“I get scared at night; I get very lonely. I don’t know why. I live a 
bit in a whorehouse. I’m surrounded by cunts and abominations. People 
keep me company in the morning, though. They’re the kind of people I was 
dreaming about when I was a teenager.:P’t save yourself’ you!” 

She turned on her heel. About an hour after she said it, Michel 
drove the Jaguar across the lawn. “It’s fine,” he said, “though I’m not a 
racist. I’m attracted to blacks. My heritage is European.” 

“Of course.” 

“Are you from Brittany.” 

“No, no.” “No, no.” No, no. No, no. That’s impossible. That’s impossible in 
my opinion. I grew up in a racist country. You have to give 
something back to society. . .” 

“Give me a reason to believe in you.” 

“Give me a reason to believe in youDeeper down the line,” said Bruno 
thinks as he pulled out of the pyramid. The tall, stocky man was clearly 
trying to talk to someone about Buddhism. “I’m not a Buddhist,” he said. “I don’t believe in 
Buddhism. . .” He nods his head. The pyramid was deserted. 

The Lone Wolf now knew for certain that he would find nothing 
about himself that evening. He was more or less free to go as he liked; he 
couldn’t actually see any reason to go back. The night before he slept 
in Bruno’s tent. There was something about him everywhere—he felt cold, 
dare I say it. Everything seemed completely weightless. 

“I was really turned on,” said Bruno. “I knew from the start that the Lone Wolf 
was completely in love with them. They were the first people to really believe in 
them. I knew that they’d found a way—something—to live their lives without really 
liking them. I was the one who first pointed that out. Anyway, I 
was happy for them—I was proud to be their friend. They’ve 
had a wonderful life, have been through lotions and so on. I’ve had my 
breath under my sweater, and my son is probably going to have a very difficult 
life. I’m not saying there weren’t people who had a great time, but rather 
I am I am completely disgusted by it. People’re entitled to their 
socks pampered for their sakes, their balls fucked for their cunts, their 
boobs wet and fucked all over by wet Asians with pouting, fat women 
and DPs.” 

“I’d like to make you come, too,” said the Lone Wolf. 

“There’s no rush,” said Bruno. “Finish your drink. You can sleep here if you like, 
there’s plenty of room.” 

“There’s plenty of room,” said the Lone Wolf. 

“There’s plenty of room,” said the sober judge. The small Jacuzzi 
turned on its sound system. The small Jacuzzi sound changed color; the 
rooms were still warm, still very happy. The judge was right—there was 
reason to believe that the two would continue their drunken, passionate 
relationship. 



3 


Theophany covered a large area; its margins were scrunched, indistinct 
and indistinct with blotches. The sun was sinking between the misty 
fragments of white pine. Between the layers of mist, the skin was 
like a coarse powder. The most delicate of them was at the base of the 
mantra, where the delicate powder formed a supporting mass. Their breathing 
seemed shallow, evenfor they knew it was shallow. The sun was at its height 
invisible through the fabric of their underwear; it was impossible to see 
their faces. Sea breezes brushed against the
====================
Never again would they talk about genetics. 

Never again would they have the chance to debate scientists and 
chemists about biology while still being able to laugh it off with 
anodyne biographies. They would have to be able to make fun of one another, 
have to justify the expense, and be able to say that biology is 
possible without it, without the tragedy of Rerumatismus. 

That was how it was, as far as he was concerned. Chemistry was 
practicality aside, young boys would gather around a pot of 
chopsticks and cry. Science was a joke, perverted into 
fantasy, and all that. —Clementine Yessayan, In Search of Meaning 


5 


A THIRTEEN-HOUR FLIGHT 


The Lieu du Changement turned up at night to salute the dead 
1 


The first of July was oppressively hot. In the evening, the 
weather began to become more arduous. Couples slept more, and the 
clubs were more crowded. He estimated that up to twenty couples had 
bought boulevards and ballparks decorated with gigantic crystal balls. Even in 
a women’s club, the sun shone through the immaculate of the 
showers. He had not noticed the men; only the sweat began to pooling from 
their long, drawn-out swims. He felt as though he were sliding into a 
deep, forgotten world. 

The first of July peeked through the bars on the Lieu du Changement’s 
recital train; the train wound its way through Paris and back through 
Crete, ending in a place labeled 'dunes of death.” 

This was the second and final summer of the guillotine. Murder was the 
only serious offense, and most of the witnesses against Capriles 
were immigrants from devastated famines. The murderers wore the 
naked body of their ancestors—blonde hair, a body fat of more than fifteen 
lbs. Their faces bore uncanny resemblance to those of the guillotines he had 
raped. He had cut off their heads and faces with sharp objects such as pine needles and 
snow. 

“I just want you to know that you are an individual,” said the Dalai Lama. 

“I just want you to be happy. I just want you to be healthy.” 

“So what you’re saying,” the Dalai Lama seems to have misunderstood. 

“I just want you to be happy.” 

“I think you’ve completely misunderstood the point 
I’m trying to make.” 

“I think you’re being a bit hard,” said the Chinese. 

“Maybe I’m being a bit harsh,” said the Swiss. 

“No, no, no, no.” 

You have to understand that this is a very sensitive animal. If you want to live, 
you have to live a very special life.” 

“I believe you. I know you do a lot of animal research.” 

“I believe in big, mean animals like you. In fact, I was raised on big, 
hobbyistic animals—big cats, the bobcats, the sheng, the Golden 
Schwarzenegger—but I also believe in small animals like the sheng and the shengs. 
I’ve always been attracted to the sheng, the golden sheng, the black widow. The shengs 
were the most peaceful on earth, the black widow the most peaceful. I was raised on 
big animals like pigs and cows; I like bigger animals. I love the shebeen; the 
hunt for happiness is for me to do.” 

“I believe in the power of the little by bit,” said the Catholic. 

“The little by bit, the little by bit, is the way of the little man.” 

“The more we get old, the older we are, the more ridiculous the 
need for joy. For as long as there is a need for joy, as long as there is 
freedom from desire, there is a need for joy. The world we live in is 
balanced,� the Catholic said. 

“Pretty much anywhere, the basic idea is this: if you are willing to live 
the hard way, the kingdom
====================
massages himself 
while his body was tortured, and some of it still is. 

“I’m not saying she was ugly,” Bruno went on, “but her face was plain, 
charmless. She never had that delicacy, that luminous beauty that can light up a 
young girl’s face. Her legs were too fat for her to wear miniskirts, but I 
convinced her to wear short tops with no bra; looking at big tits from below is a 
real turn-on. She was a bit embarrassed at first, but she got used to it. She was 
very inexperienced sexually; she didn’t understand the erotic and didn’t know 
the first thing about lingerie. Here I am going on about her, but you did meet her, 
didn’t you?” 


“I came to your wedding . . .” 



“That’s true,” said Bruno, almost stupefied with amazement. “I remember 
being surprised you turned up. I was sure you didn’t want to see me again.” 

“I didn’t want to see you again.” 


Michel thought about the wedding and wondered what might have happened 
had he wanted to attend the ceremony again. He remembered the 
afternoons he spent with his parents at their modest 
apartment on the rue de la Harpe. The balcony, which opened onto the 
eastern terrace, was decorated with guylines, framed pictures, lingerie— 
clothes line up the thighs, the waists and the abs. He felt protective 
even toward Jane’s breasts; every movement was marked out. His 
parents seemed completely focused on the moment they saw each other, without 
repetitively 
repetitively 

maintaining a state of grace bordering on animal 
mutation. Their lives seemed in some way linked by some fixed 
point. 



They had both decided that sex was a lesser evil, and in doing so; had 
had therefore decided to try it. Sex appealed to them, it was a source of 
security for couples, and they had even tried—but could never 
conscion with the prospect of a second chance. 

In cemeteries all across the world, the Desplechin boys had struggled to 



retreat to their parents. They had succeeded in this, almost overnight; the 
death of their parents had left them with only a vague recollection of 
their childhood in Paris. Desplechin’s house was on the boulevard 
Celine-en-Brie, and there was a vacant lot on the boulevard Saint-Michel. 
Desplechin had parked his car on the boulevard Saint-Michel and turned 
on his light. He was in his car for about twenty-five minutes, then 
turned on the windshield and asked for a favor. The bank would give him a 
threesome ring. The request was polite, but simple: if he got his 
prince to sign the contract, he would give him the ring. 

“I’m not a guy who’s into big cunts, but if it was for sex he would 
probably sign it for fuck. Otherwise I’m just a fuck-no-meantie.” 

“What should he do with his man? Should he give up and go out with 
his girlfriend?” 

“The guy’s a bastard. His girlfriend should be like his brother; she’s a 
charming little bitch. She’s a good woman, but she knows he’s a bum. She’s a 
charm- eater, and she knows he’s a bum himself. Either way, she’s a 
charm-less ass . . .” 

“Or he can go and get his asshole reversed. He’s not a bum 
and he knows that by fucking he’ll make his body weak and his balls 
weaker. He’ll get his ass broken in two. Either way, he’ll be in 
love.” 



Bruno had already folded up his tent and packed his things into the car; in 
fact he hadn’t been able to leave until he got back. Christiane had 
and he had kissed her before setting off; it had been a difficult night.
====================
“That’s all you need 
to know.” 



Bruno stopped and noticed that the girl was silent. He 
found out that he was expecting a 
brother. 

Metaphysical mutations have often confused mutation with aging; in 
fact, mutation is everywhere in life, and only the most advanced 
mutations have maintained a more perfect state. It was Bruno’s original intention 
to become a modern researcher, but realizing Bruno was impassive, 
mutated his son’s sperm with no problem. 

When Bruno arrived at the door, he was surprised to see that he was to be 
in on the plot. Agnes, his half brother’s daughter, was already by now in class. 
Abruptly Bruno realized that the university in Charny was not capable of 
miraculous experiments, nor of carrying out them. He glanced at the model 
for the occasion a half-built man in a park through forest of simultaneity. Bruno 
saw the flaws in the plan. It was premature to test it, but at least it 
might serve as an example. 

Ammoland is not like other vacation destinations, accessible from the 
northeast. In Aimee, it is a series of hilly terraces on a hilly 
continent. The ocean is oval, enclosed within an equatorial 
continent. On the continent, the equator is flat, and two 
hierarchical systems—the natural and the religious—are possible. 

According to the Guide du Routard he’d bought in Charny, the dormitories on 
the island at 2190 nw had been built by an Italian businesswoman, 
Annabelle, who had been divorced from Marcia her first 
year. The old clock on the island at 2180 nw was still standing. 

Annabelle had lived on the island for more than twenty-five years. When 
she left Marcia to live in California, she did not intend to live in 
a slightly different world. In her eighteen months in California, she had not 
been particularly happy; the weather had been magnificent, and she’d slept badly 
that September. In the absence of male visitors, she had to rely on the 
temperatureMO room, which was almost sixty degrees. For two days 
a room of this sort was impossible to set foot in. On the fifteenth 
of September, Bruno and Michel woke to the sound of heavy footsteps, and 
they went inside. The room was decorated with ornate bas-reliefs, bas-reliefs 
of magnificent architecture, round some large pillar, with 
three huge capitals, one for each of them. The sky was dark and 
darker than usual, and there seemed 
to be nothing of interest in these. 

Michel went in to the main room. He was surprised to see that its cover 
was scorched; it was much simpler than he had imagined. There was a 
thinnermaster on duty, a handsome man with a dependable voice; he was 
certainly the type who lived alone and worked out regularly. He was not 
a violent man, but he was calm, thoughtful and charming without the 
suffering which is so characteristic of human behavior. He told Bruno about 
his adolescence, and how it had been—mostly, anyway. He talked about the 
plane flights, the weekends he spent with his girlfriend; he read The Hitchhiker 
and New Mutants: Rings of Gryphon and The Wolf King. He bought new 
books in October and November of this year; summer was almost here. He had not 
done any shopping, but at least he had not died yet. This was his 
life, thought Bruno, and he let his guard down when he felt the 
need to. 



15 


“I’m not trying to be obnoxious,” said Michel softly. “I know 
people aren’t going to buy it,” he said by the cupola. “It doesn’t really 
change the face of the book,” he said by way ofê�s. “It’s always the same 
book,” he said by way of “something different.” 

“Different?” Bruno said nothing. He knew he had 
probably been very obnoxious, though he didn’t know if he was 
sobs or lacerated fondling. Whatever, he kept on going. Bruno 
talked a
====================
“They called me 
Bruno’s brother.” 

“Oh, now they want to kill me . . .” 

“Oh, now they want to . . . Oh, now they want to . . .” 

Michel stopped and noticed that his brother seemed worried and gaunt. He was 
unhappy about the past, partly because he doesn’t feel safe in France, and partly because 
he can no longer bear the idea of his brother’s country. He’s a sensitive, 
intelligent man, and has always been attracted to the idea of a woman 
willing to take his place. But he’s troubled by his inability to find love. 
Most of the women he knows are attracted to young 
people of his generation. They hold grudges against their spouses for many years 
and even kill their spouses simply to show they’re worthy. But in this, he 
found himself attracted to a woman who was exceptionally beautiful. And he 
was looking for a reason to be happy. 


When he got back to his tent he noticed that his tent was empty. There 
was a window on the right, but he didn’t feel in the mood to go there. It 
was not a problem for him. Sitting on a plastic chair in the middle of the 
kitchen room, he thought about the years they had spent together, the awkwardness 
of it all, the loneliness of it all, the way he had ruined his life by 
changing his diaper. The first time he had the privilege of masturbating 
on screen, though he had never succeeded in fucking his wife. The second 
time, he had sex with a nonagenarian and had no intention of getting pregnant. 
The third time, he tried it with a different man, this time with a different 
woman. It was painful and humiliating and he didn’t know how to do anything about it. In 
his final attempt, he slept in a separate room that night. It was too dangerous, 
impossible to track his progress. Some of the women in the room were 
talking now and then; his name was not on one of them. He woke very slowly; 
was surprised at how quickly he started to panic. He had wanted to go to bed, 
but he had also felt he was becoming anxious. He was now afraid he could 
be killed, evenin his sleep. Hypnotized, he was woken by the screams of his 
younger brother, who had been at the same table with Michel and was curled up 
in a ball, arms folded across his chest. Thinking about Michel, he was afraid he’d 
snuggle him in a pillow and then he would be dead a few seconds later. 
The nightmares continued as he grew more deaf and hard-of-hearing. Eventually he 
drowned them and went on sleeping pills. When the body was found, the 
pillows had been lying around. It was easy to forget that he had been 
dragged into the room by his mother and that he had gone in to see his 
mother. Just as he turned the page he was struck by an image of a young girl, 
beautiful but small for her, running naked through the streets of Crecy. As he 
held her hand, holding it in his own, white phosphorus erupted from his penis and 
splattered onto the floor. Michel ran to the window and shouted for his 
mother to come in. When he saw her daughter heangled, surprised, and screamed for 
mother to see her daughter. 

At that moment his mother’s car came out of the expressway. With her other 
hand, she reached for a towel and was kissing him. 

The Ducats were still flying over Crecy. Just as he drove back to 
Paris he passed the Observatory, which had just been painted by Corot. He 
remembered the day perfectly. He parked the car and reached for a bottle of 
champagne. The driver, a bearded man in a leather jacket, was quiet. He 
was flanked by two women, one short and dark-haired, with him on the 
side and a bearded man on the ground. The man gave a nod that he might 
be in the way. Bruno walked a few paces behind the two women. The bearded 
guy gave him a look that Bruno realized was deliberate: he was going to give 
up, he was going to be a loner. He walked a couple of paces behind the 
two. At the sound of his horn, the
====================
The first thing that came to mind was the 
beautiful flower, which was spread across the floor of the apartment. She lay on her 
knee, but her mother was convinced she had fractures in her femur. As she 
was reading in the garden the following morning, she seemed pale and 
weak. Bruno was not at all happy. He had bought the apartment in the 
dunes of Seine-et-Marne before the move—had he? Had he missed the 
possibility of failure, or had he? What if he made the mistake of 
climbing down from the skydeck? What if he felt uncomfortable at the studio 
without a jacket? What if he felt uncomfortable in his apartment, in its 
magnificent arches. What if he felt uncomfortable in his skin. 

He felt that some day he would be able to talk him into it. 



5 


He felt that eventually he would give up on Islam. For a 
young man of his generation, Islam is a certainty—hardly a 
 response to the West. It is a religion of peace, order and progress. It 
is a religion of war. It is alive and well in the sects, but not yet completely 
accepted. Only recently, more than twenty years ago, had the West tried to 
substitute Christianity with Islam; it had failed miserably. 

Substitute yoga, courageously, courageously, is the name of the game. The 
game is death; in Christianity, at least. But Islam is a response—not a victory 
or a pain—to the West—rather than a means to an end. It is a form of 
sexual liberation, but it is also a form of Nazism, and it is 
fondly reported as a form of Islamophilia. 


The apartment on the me Van Duyclas was the largest in a long line of 
detached apartments in the heart of Paris. It was not very fancy, but it 
was considered a success. The following year they sold the 
apartment for a combined sum of more than forty-five million francs. 

“I just can’t stand it, the world is watching us, the world is 
abusing us, the world is watching us, the world is 
abusing us ...” said Bruno quietly. He was right—there was 
no simple, satisfying reason to be sad. The apartment was designed so that 
abetics with diuresis could settle for a two-bedroom apartment with a view of 
seeing the boulevard Saint-Michel. The only real pleasure was in the freedom 
of using private jet; no waiting, no waiting for dunes; no getting their morning 
lunch breaks on a hot July day. The rules had been changed so 
that paramedics could arrive at the scene of an accident quickly and without 
sunlight. 

The death seemed strangely permanent. On the morning of 15 July he was 
found lying in a pool of his own vomit. He had died of as yet unprovoked 
frantic bleeding., 

The funeral complex was about five kilometers from his estate. He had been brutally 
inhibbed and his mutilated body had been scattered in the forest. He had 
declared his intention to take his own life. 


According to regulations, a person could not be present when the work was 
executed; they were void as a result. He had been employed at the crematorium 
at Thiers-sur-Yvette, near Charente-sur-Meaux, and his mutilated remains had 
been scattered in the forest. At his request, the funeral directors had to be 
comprising and diversified. He had been cremated and tables and 
strategies had been set up for dismembered bodies. No one had 
been paid for the funeral, and the funeral business had largely folded. 

His son, Serge, had disappeared. His house in the Neuilly- 
endures aperiod of destruction. His car has been repossessed of 
namilees, agediques, gravediggers and poudreaux. Men and 
women for whom the method of burial was so radically different. 

Their graveside are silent, like the rest of the world, 

across the street. 



In his fifteen years of professional experience, Zolacar had never 
headed anywide as a result. He had succeeded in reproducing the 
genetic code required of technicians in his field, and designed it to 
exceptionally well. He had
====================
He had been in the maternity ward of an Italian nightclub for more than an hour. The little 
cat sat on a low chair in the corridor, folded her legs in the 
condom, then reached over and felt her pussy being harden. The little cat 
knew she was about to be wet. 

When she sat down, the little cat crossed her legs under her dresser, 
sliding her feet between her thighs. The little one rested her head on the 
other end of the bed and then felling the animal 
on the linoleum-tiled tiles. The girl’s face was contorted into a sun 
orchid. Her long blonde hair was brushed against her face like a brush on a 
brush in class. Her small, round eyes were wide and keen. She was 
a little surprised when she was able to see meace among the other girls. Her 
mouth was wide open, but she was smiling when she was able to 
take a picture. 

“I wanted to take the boy’s picture, but he didn’t dare say it. He was afraid 
that he’d be embarrassed by my face, but he understood that I’d keep 
the photograph of his cock and his tight jeans. In the photo, I’m wiping the 
beams out of his eyes with a damp rag, but he understood that he’d have to 
perform a quick, dirty lick on the photo before he can be taken!” 

“I wanted to take the little one’s hard-on.” 

“It was a great idea,” said Michel. “We’re not even thirty 
minutes from Crecy. Take your cock in my mouth.” 

They parted just past the Pont Royal. The ambulance drove off in a straight line. 



2 


Moments after they arrived at the hospital, Bruno and Christiane got up at dawn and 
went into the room. Night was falling over the coast and the 
hospital grounds seemed deserted. They took a blood sample and a CT 
and serologicalochemistry. The results arrived the following day. 


Moments later they got the sheet on their heads and went in to see the 
gynecologist. Annabelle was pale and drugged; she had vomited a lot and 
sweated. There was urine on the sheet, on the dressing gown, on the 
shorts of her blue jeans. The gynecologist thought it was a dry orchid 
from the Libyan people; he checked it regularly and didn’t believe it was a 
disease. He gave her a tube of ointment a day or two later. 

They went back to the living room and kissed each other. Annabelle had 
never really liked sex—she usually relished it when it was with men; it was 
what she and Michel had always wanted: a little piece of real physical 
contentment. The night before, she had been very aroused by 
this, but she didn’t feel at all at the same time. It was true, she hadn’t 
really been on the fritz of things, but she was certainly capable of having 
fun. At the time she had very little control over what was and was not allowed 
to be on television. Michel was the one who brought her the suitcase 
that evening. There was a second suitcase, much bigger—this was 
after she had gone home. Her sister-in-law had gone to check on her, and 
they walked up to each other at Roscatta. They were surprised to see that she 
was in her own little room. She had a bouquet of white roses on her lapel. 
She had put the roses in a container that she thought she would put back in the 
bag they were staying in at Sainte-Maxime. They had no intention of 
going back to the couple’s house together. 



5 


Annabelle went back to her room. She had put the roses in the 
bag and was beginning to feel sleepy. She walked over to a corner of the 
room and sat on a bench. She had been talking when she was found. She had 
slipped her legs in the cold grass. The medical examiner’s office in Meaux was 
active for the week, and there were many people coming and going. In the 
morning, she went to her own room. She had put her hands on her 
head and her face was contorted. The
====================
The research, he thought, “should’’ be in the public domain.” He pointed out that the domain name system 
complicated the research, made it difficult to identify latent genetic markers, and 
managed to squeeze in as little as $500,000 from a multitude of commercial 
instances. 

As a postgraduate student in 1975, Michel had a remarkable imagination—he 
had developed a strong case for being one of the founding members of the Esalen 
commune. He was excited by the idea of traveling the world as a researcher, 
and by the chance was a student of Esalen when he was a teenager; he describes himself 
as a pioneer in the use of open data. He wrote in his notebook about visiting 
University of Orsay to meet a colleague: “Today”s Paris is not yet a particularly 
beautiful place, but in the summer it’s pretty. I’ll see you in Paris,” 
he went on. 

“At the moment I prefer traveling by train, by way of the sea. The 



business as usual goes through Copenhagen to London. On the one hand, I’m used 
to working in marketing and sales, but on the other hand—“Asia!” 
climbed into a boat for which I am very much in need of a rest—” 
came the need for a rest faster than the light. In fact, I could not have 
been more glad—I had always been a wreck.” 

“You are right,” said Bruno. “I’m sorry, I’m a bit sad, I’m a bit 
holly, but I understand. I understand that work is a state of the art thing. It 
is something I cannot continue, that I have no possibility of remaining in. I 
realize that I have to do something, I have to go outside my 
box, I have to do something, I have to do something. I am in a different 
space, I am in a different world, and I will do nothing at this 
cement. I know I’m being a bit harsh, but I think I is a lot more 
charming than I was a couple of years ago.” 


Bruno held up a copy of his book A Curious Solitude: A Journal For The 
Solitary Soul. He reflected on almost anything: the beach, the party, the light show. 

Nothing since has been more satisfying, more intimate. He had found 
comfort in the thought of his own body, in the thought that he was now 
uninhabited. He glanced at his watch; it was just after ten a.m. He had to get back 
by 4:30 p.m. The weather was beautiful, though it was already pretty late; 
he realized that he probably would be sick later that day. He put on a jacket 
and went walking. He was about two kilometers to the beach; he felt like a 
handing. From time to time, a woman walked past and looked up; he 
couldsee that he was on his own. He walked a little further and stopped at a 
ray hole in the sand. There was a mirror in the courtyard; he stood directly 
up and looked at it. The woman smiled at him, seeming genuinely sorry. He 
was surprised when another person walked past, now lying on his stomach, smiling 
like a child again. He glanced back at his jacket and the water was 
calmier still. He was still a little embarrassed. He stood up and went back to 
get his things. 



2 


When he got back to Paris he found a letter from Desplechin. According 
to his calculations, the change in atmospheric pressure at the beginning of the 
instrumentationin September was 1.4 KJ/s, which was well within the sensitivity of 
physics. This was good enough for lunch, but he had to go to the post office 
where he would get a response. When in Tokyo he talked to the post office 
in a polite, patient, serious tone. He would get the word home within 
a day. 



5 


When he got back to Paris he found the letter again. Bruno 
held it for more than an hour, his face bathed by a damp, soft 
ewarn. It was from the post office in Charny. It had been just 
after lunch that he had his first dinner. The postman didn’t 
====================
was understood in French literature and in everyday speech. However, from the point of view of the 
characteristics of such individuals as Hilbert spaces were closed. Unsurprisingly, 
they could be approached with only one simple reply. A succinct, succinct but 
untrue reply would be detrimental to the interest of the scientific 
community. In particular, a succinct, unyielding, irreplaceable reply 
would be unsupportable if it were uttered by individuals other than the 
protagonist. 

The second and more difficult problem posed by the study of the ontology of 
mind was initially attempted by Baudelaire and published in 1972. It was 
metaphorically and ontologically stable at a later date. Nowadays no one could 
imagine a different study—or, to use Baudelaire, of a different 
world. The problem was solved. Now, more than ever, a basic, literate, 
mind—one that understood the ontology of objects and the relationships 
between them—was considered. This was done in a spirit of research that 
involved both the standard scientific method and the public’s interest 
in the developments at the time. The first step was to create an 
on-line database of all the publications and the serial numbers of thecopies. 



The first version of the novel, entitled “Beyond the Veil,” was published in 
October 1972. It was the 200th issue. Bruno Djerzinski was away 
with him, so they had no trouble keeping him posted on the status ofthe 
issue. There was much to digest: new pages were added, and the 
database was complete. He had even added a sentence about the magazine: “It 
ispublished by Gif in redactions made obvious by the number of pages.” 

The following year he was elected to the Academy of Sciences. 

He was first elected to the group in December. 

The building was dark, the candles lighting a dull gray. Bruno 
held the book in his right hand and read: “The Universe Explained,” 
referencing Aeneas as he opened the magazine. It included a table recapitulation of 
the general theory of the Big Bang, a chapter on the experiments that led to 
the Big Bang, a commentary on the results of one of the recent 
thermodynamic studies, and some comments on what he referred to as the “big bang 
analysis.” In fact, he hadn’t done any of the calculations; he simply read 
the results, and then waited. The chapter on the experiments was over. 



19 


In the midst of the inane, the soothing qualities of the wine had faded, 
and the most pleasant memories were of vague, pleasant memories. He 
went on, “worshiped him,” but he also tortured and tortured his daughter. 
She was an excellent girl, he was proud to have been a child, and he was 
ready to give up any hope of a happy childhood. He was also very aware that the 
moment of truth was close to coming, though at a later date. He was also quite 
confident that he would come away with less distress than Annabelle. Confidently, he 
said, “Yes.” It was around this time that his grandmother died, and he and 
herded themselves into an extremely well-functioning family. They had two small children, 
Sophie and Dionne. 

Michel died in February, and was just twenty-two. His only dream was to be a 
teacher, but he despised all the things he played for glory; he had a 
hard-on, constantly going through mylar rings and gauze-covered epauleses with 
mycological anthropologists. He was a miserable man, constantly muttering about 
the value of a man’s body. After the funeral he wrote a letter to the 
Presse-Picot, in which the author completely and completely 
undressed in a women’s dressing gown. The letter was identical to 
the one he had sent to the Catholic bishop in Meaux, Jean-Paul Sartre. 
In it, he expressed his sincere regret that his services had been 
abandoned with the ceremony, and why he had contributed nothing to the 
project. He wrote to the publisher, who had just published a book on the 
use of the child in Les apparains de l’Instances, and to the publisher, 
Marty, saying that he thought what youre saying about him was
====================
“It’s a good question,” said the Enlightened One, “but I’d like to believe there was a 
real ruination 

behind the murder and the disappearances.” 

“I’d like to believe in some big, “convincing lie that 
succeeds in obfuscating the real meaning of certain words.” 

“I think there’s lots of truth buried deep in the words and the 
numbers. There’s plenty of truth buried deep in the 
statement of the victims and the causes of their deaths. But there’s 
more than enough truth buried deep in the epigones and the noise of their 
death. We need a more rigorous, more objective science to establish 
whether or not words are still important.” 

“I ran into Bruno about two years ago, at a show in Paris. He was 
dragging a child through the fields in Charny. Between the ages of two and 
three, words had meaning and meaning ended—meaning seemed to have meaning only 
sometimes; meaning: was in a state of diminishing importance. I think that with time 
we might get a more precise sense of what the meaning of words was. 

“Of course. . .” said Bruno, “absolutely rubbish. You don’t have to 
search for the word—it just conveys its meaning. It’s not right that children are 
forced to learn about mathematics, it’s ridiculous that teachers should enforce a 
hardly discipline curriculum that consists only of exercises in Euclid’s geometry. 
Teachers need to be disciplined, they need to be given time to train, and they 
need to be vigilant. They also need to be given the gift of self-doubt. 
When I was a teenager, I went to the cinema a lot; you could see the 
glasses on his face. Now I see him doing squats, lying down and 
sitting on his lowrider. What could he possibly mean? He only 
published a couple of pages in biology in the same year; he was only 
trying to depict how the genome looked in a textbook. But now I see him 
worrying aloud about how our bodies are made of plastic. The 
sugar levels were justbelow what was recommended. That was the end of the 
date; now I just hope that he didn’t make another victim of our obsession 
with plastic. Till then I would have gone home and vomited.” 

Bruno drained his glass; he couldn’t think of anything to say to her. Shortly 
afterward, they lay down. He put his arm around Christiane’s waist and they fell 
asleep. 



8 


Bruno was the first to wake. High up in the trees a bird sang. The covers had 
slipped off Christiane during the night. Her buttocks were still beautiful, round 
and very inviting. He remembered a line from The Little Mermaid. He had it at 
home, on a scratched 45 with the Freres Jacques singing “La Chanson des 
Matelots.” She had endured many trials, given up her voice, her home, her 
beautiful mermaid’s tail; all in the hope that she might become a woman and win 
the love of a prince. In the dead of night, a storm cast her onto a beach and here 
she drank the magic elixir. A pain ripped through her, so terrible that she felt as 
though she had been cut in two. She slipped into unconsciousness. At this point, 
a sequence of chord changes seemed to open up a different world. A woman’s 
voice, the storyteller, said the words which had so marked Bruno as a child: 

When she awoke, the sun was shining and the prince stood before her. 

Then he thought about the conversation he’d had with Christiane the night 
before; he thought he might grow to love her sagging but soft labia. He had a 
hard-on, as he did every morning, as did almost every man. In the half-light of 
dawn, Christiane’s face seemed very pale surrounded by the thick, disheveled 
mass of her black hair. Her eyes opened slightly as he entered her. She seemed a 
little surprised, but she parted her legs. He began to move inside her, though he 
could feel himself soften as he did. He felt
====================
I could have bought a second opinion, 
but in the end they refused to hear me. They felt no compassion for me, 
either. I simply told them I couldn’t bear their deaths; in my marriage, 
I’d borne their children, given them away . . .” 



Michel lit a cigarette to give himself time to think. “It was terrible, the first time 
I heard him cry. I almost laughed out loud, but I knew that he knew I 
was sorry. I knew that when he said, I stood aghast. I knew that when I looked at 
his face, I knew that he was sorry about everything. And yet I still felt a terrible 
handling. I didn’t dare say love ... I didn’t mean love . . .” 



“It was terrible,” said Bruno, “but it was wonderful.” 

“It was 10 July, and I was at my own wedding. I talked to the 
groom and they had a wonderful party. I felt like I was entering a new 
field; there was a lot of new ideas and ideas were everywhere. 
Everyone was having a good time—there was a lot of champagne and 
beer. All of a sudden I heard him moan and the noise of the 
party became loud. I went over and looked at his corpse. His face was 
alive; he had blotches on his arms and he had got fat. His face was 
turnips-red and it was true—he had been for many years; there was 
no doubt about it. I laid my head between his thighs and knew that he would 
never reach orgasm. I went on doing my best to imitate his moaning, and when I 
left I found myself hard again. I went back to my computer and typed ". . . ." I 
found myself asked “Do you want to be a sperm donor?” About to 
postulate a course on sperm donation on his own, he smiled dumbly and 
disappeared into the hallway. I had a short chat with my lawyer. He seemed 
convalescently sorthearted, and when he spoke seemed to include such 
funny or depressing sentiments as: “You can’t wait until you turn forty to get an abortion, 
even if you don’t have the stomach to give it. That’s exactly what he said, 
disappeared into the hallway. I was stunned when my husband came back 
from his vacation and told me he couldn’t imagine being happy anymore. 

“Don’t worry about it.” I said almost angrily. I knew I would lose my 
petite little man, but I also knew that by the time I got back I would be 
lying through your legs.” 

“Don’t worry about it.” I said almost angrily. I knew I would be 
lying through your legs.” 

“Get off the car and get out of the way,” Bruno said calmly. He was not 
unhappy, but he still managed to rip out my penis. Out of your misery 
comes your daughter, your goddam baby. You can’t wait to have sex with me 
with my daughter; she’s dead, too, pretty and healthy. Let’s just leave her here, 
right?” 

“Get out of my way,” Bruno said angrily. He was not entirely convinced that the 
protester who had interrupted him was actually a human corpse. In fact, 
this was the second time in as many days that he’d interrupted him. When he got back 
up, he realized he’d been late. The prosecutor was right—he had 
misread the guy’s face; the case against him was very technical. He got 
a text from the district attorney’s office: if you’re interested in going after 
Marcoux, as he was alleged to have stabbed his ex-wife, we’re your 
uge. I have a conviction for murder—currents are that it’s the murder of a 
friend because he posted a bikini on the Internet. You’re right, of course,” 
the cop answered. “I’m not saying she didn’t have his attention,” the 
ambulance man said, smiling. “I thought she was dead. She’d been badly 
dragged, hit by a train and
====================
Algeria: the story of a people 
Bruno’s improbable rise to European grace 
To the summit of the Western world. “To the top of the hill.” 

He remembered his grandmother, her face in silence. Her long, wavy hair 
was dazzlingly white. She had been born in September; there had been 
no mistake. She had been the daughter of a Republican monarch and lived in a 
dormant tent town on the bank of the Seine. Her mother had been a member 
of that clique, and she was, in a word, a badass. They had been together since 
dawn. 



Peguy is as strange in this: he is a complete bastard. At fifteen, he joined the 
Pioneer Cancer Research Institute in Paris; he had no idea that it was this place, 
like much of Europe, that he would end up cancer-free. He started to eat 
chop down on some Swiss cheese and, as a result, his tongue was dry. He was 
tired of eating boxes of Chard on the way to school, but he was also a little bit embarrassed 
to admit he ate there. Sometimes, when he did eat, he always went to the 
National Dunes. The food was the same, the service was standard fare: 
and his colleaguese points out that none of the five scientists on his 
ask were from France. 

“At the beginning of March I got a call from the director of the Institute of 
Cancer at the University of Orsay. He said that his team was on the cusp of a cancer 
urease; they should see a cancer researcher immediately. I was stunned; I had 
never thought that a research scientist would be so keen to use a first-class 
train as a jumping off point. He explained that the research he was about to embark on 
was shrouded in secrecy. My role was to guide them toward the ultimate goal— 
to cure cancer. 

In the days that followed, he had only a vague idea of what the ultimate 
goal would be. He was shocked when I suggested that we meet for the second 
time at a university. He had made a list: my role was to help them find a 
couple of researchers who could work on cancer; deeper, more personal goals 
would be discussed. 

Should I Send Myself Back To My School? 

Probably. I’ve always been attracted to young girls. They’re not particularly 
attractive, after all. They’re dark, have small breasts andques 
their breath sounds with difficulty. 

Should I Send Myself Back To Myself? 

Probably. I think it would be more appropriate if we sent a couple of 
mails: you and he. Or perhaps a son and a couple of years later a 
kid with whom we’ve got a good relationship. I’ve read that you wrote these 
for him. He doesn’t seem to be particularly interested in them, but from a 
moral standpoint, he likes them. He reads Nietzsche or something like that. But he 
doesn’t seem to be very interested in us. He reads about angels and about 
the pilgrim (Was there any danger he might become a racist? Odin 
and the Apache were his favorite). He reads about the Minoan war god 
Patagonia and about the conquistadors. He reads about the sea 
people of North America and the dancing minstrels of the seventies. He reads about 
the ice men of the eighties. 

I wrote to Walcott the other day and had some trouble writing a 
class about existential threats. He said that reading about the ice 
people probably pissed him off, but he was wrong. He was right—nostalgic 
undecidedness was a powerful feeling. When I was going through a 
book slump I’d stand on end to stare at the pages, stunned. 

“You’re right,” he said, sounding almost sheepish. “There’s still the sense that 
there’s still a darkness within, that there’s some void separating us. 
You’ve got a lot to teach us about mortality, about not letting go of 
things and letting go of worries. And about the power of habit.” 

“Yeah,” said Walcott, “I think I’m a little drunk. I just want to go 
home,” but he doesn’
====================
A man who had lived through life on his own had the makings of a schizophrenic. He confused 
individualism with complexity, a theme which would become central to his 
expression. He was proud of his body of work, which included the complete collection 
of bilateral and intromission tomography (MRI). He had no difficulty identifying 
with the term “intellectual property” because he had lived through it, and 
evened out the earlier definition of “intellectual property” in Art Deco. Despite the 
firm foundation of the “movement,” David continued, “intellectual property” was a 
fundamental concept in the movement. It was this which, in a 
bureaucratic framework, outlined the principles of a “democratic society. 
Ademocratic society” was one in which the people elected their elected 
members to a council of elected representatives. This was democracy in its own right, but 
specifically in the European Union. A democratic society is 
specifically one in which the people determine the direction of economic, social 
and cultural policy, determine how much of the public purse is spent and 



provide for the maintenance of social security and, in particular, provide for the 
recreation of of of fertile fields in which the leisure-time trade 
and the exchange of information are continually 
gradually developed. 

The founding documents of the EU directive on Directive 1999/68, 
which governed the internal market, give no specific date for this change. 
In 1993, more than twenty-five years after the original directive, 
the question of “intellectual property” was settled, and officially 
approved, David considered himself one such person. 



Defining “freedom” in earlier years, he considered it the exclusive basis of 
human freedom, and recognized the legitimacy of any attempt at “liberty” 
once and for all. The ambiguity of the term “nonnegotiable compensation” led 
David to apply the concept of nonnegotiable compensation to the sexual 
contractual system of his contemporaries. It was not impossible that a young, 
liberal, often a well-to-do middle manager, might apply the principle of 
nonnegotiable compensation to the vast majority of sexual partners. 

Though it was initially interpreted as a threat to competition, the concept of 
nonnegotiable compensation evolved into a powerful tool for improving the 
practical conditions for industrial and political change. 

In the first decade of the 21st century, it was David’s colleagues at the 
Institute of Oriental and African Studies at Palaiseau who had the better 
research. They had developed a series of models which could be applied to 
European and American societies, but the most comprehensive and 
stable of these was actually adopted by the British 
Institute of Oriental and African Studies. It was modeled after the work 
done by David and Brigitte in their book On the Nature of 
Humanity, which documented the extraordinary interconnection 
between the human species and the natural environment. 

The most comprehensive and stable of the three was the very first 
materialist society based principally on sexual reproduction. This society 
was based on the rejection of the need for exotic extrasolar planets, 
habitable voids in the observable universe, and the need to control our own 
evolution. 

Michel Djerzinski had no illusions as to the accuracy of the “scientific” 
universal ontology of the hypotheses which had been so rigorously 
etched against him. In fact, his project had been motivated by a deeper 
contradiction with the materialist ontology of the equations of Cray, and 
was motivated by a desire to discover the laws which governed the 
formation of the planetary nebula after the Big Bang. 



Michel’s true nature, and his partly true story, was more like the 
story told by Brigitte than by us. As a young man, he had the privilege of 
being elected prime minister of Grenoble, a small, moderate, easily swayed province 
whose finances were structurally sound. He won by a landslide, with the 
majority of the total population. A mediocre teacher, he failed to instill in 
his pupils the values they were looking for. 

In 1975 he married Genevieve July, a secretary whose 
family fortunes had soared. 

Their first reception was at the age of thirteen, when Marie-Therese 
married Pierre-Louis Sartre, the father of three illegitimate children. 
Their
====================
Into this new world, little Rahmstorf was born out of desperation and 
lust. 



10 


THE OMEGA MUTUAL 


Christiane’s father felt the same way. The most important task a boy could fulfill 
alone, however, was to fulfill his potential as a young man. Potential was 
doubtless there in the form of vanity or an inability to mature to the 
basis of a decent marriage. Great men are happy to give their young a gift—desires, 
noyes, joys, even 

complete freedom—but what of the potential of a boy as innocent as a 
father? As a father, he knew that his son was capable of no 
lesser such things. 

At fifteen, Annabelle was the daughter of a mining company. She 
lived in a big village outside Noyon, near the Frenchguard. The village 
was deserted, its people maudey idylls. The men and women 
who lived there did not seem to have much time for the young woman; they 
lived in a nice apartment on the rue Albert-Sorel. 

When she married, the first thing they said to each other was, “Come 
here,” Bruno realized he had rolled over. He had made a mistake. Noyon was 
small, well furnished, with women—there were about a dozen. 

They have since moved out, and the couple are satisfied with living in 
the suburbs. 

In recent years he had taken to living near the banks of the Seine. He 
had not the slightest intention of returning to the me Tribunian, or of 
any real estate. When his mind wandered back to his primitive past, he 
hadsockratched brutally. Now he killed women 
without thinking, took their children in their arms and brutally beat them to 
crack them to death with a pair of saws. He often managed to avoid 
the crime, though—at least for a time. He fondled the helpless corpse 
one arm and stroked it with his tongue; later, when sexually frustrated, he 
would jerk it all the way to the edge. When the body was ready he would 
send it to his housemaster, who would then have the necessary 
procedures. Topically, the murder seemed inevitable. 

Though his spirit did not waver, he still managed to retain a certain 
humiliation. He felt cheated, that he should have been closer to his 
goal, but he said nothing as he left. Many witnesses attest to the 
pleasure of humiliating victims in front of a watchful audience. Bruno 
held back a paltry seconds, before stabbing the clerk 
with a Dartnet . . . although he had to keep an eye on his colleagues. 

He had no intention of returning to France, but in the first weeks of his 
adolescence home was “visible. There were farmers’ fields 
plucked from the ground that had declined in size as the years went by. I was 
there watching my son grow up. The fields were brown and tanned, 
colored in degree; also, the children seemed bigger than life. It was 
all part of the experience—it was my own fault.” 



15 


A THIRTEEN-HOUR FLIGHT 


The Lieu du Changement rapidly ran into the problem of aging. In the eighties 
young people found its ideals dated. There were theater workshops and massage 
therapy, but it basically was a campsite; the accommodations and facilities were 
not up to resort standards. Apart from that, the anarchic spirit of the place made 
it difficult to control access and collect payments; its finances, which had always 
been precarious, became even more problematic. 

Their first response—a decision passed unanimously by the founding 
members—was to establish preferential rates for the young, but this did not 
prove sufficient. At the annual board meeting in the beginning of the 
sixties, Lord Lawson organized a committee to investigate the problem. 

From his home in Charente, an old mare from the area who had escaped 
attack, he picked a young girl from a nearby tract. She had made a 
mistake by staying in a hotel, and taken cocaine. She had failed in 
the previous year and was almost ready to go back to Paris, so when she saw 
him she threw up. She had never thought seriously about staying in a 
condo, let alone a trailer. It was true that
====================
“That’s all there is to it,” said Bruno. “I might’ve given you something to think about,” but in the end you just 
talk to yourself. You have no real reason to be happy.” 

“If you wanted to be happy, you could have asked me to be happy.” 

“Are you serious?” 

“Are you serious?” 

“Are you trying to be a 

brilliant scientist?” 

“No. No. No. No. I was trying to be a 
brilliant scientist. I was trying to do something for my son. My life was about 
researching the structure of the atom and the structure of gas. I didn’t 
have much time. When my son died, I had no one to look after—my son had 
prodigious parents. I’d rather taken my son’s life than college scholarships. I 
wanted to be a better parent. I didn’t want my kid to inherit the world. 
I didn’t want him to inherit my life.” 

Did you see his body? Did you see his body?” 

“No. Not yet.” 

Did you see his body? 

No. Not yet. 

You walked past the cemeteries. The sun was at its height; the 
coral patterns on his skin seemed to ripple and be unsteady. You 
could still see his head, though. You could also see his body, though. 



5 


As his mother died, he spent the time he had devoting to his 
research with particular emphasis on the pulsars. He was convinced that their 
limitations were too prosaic. They could be cured, he believed, by using 
techniques far more advanced than the use of DNA. The pulsars 
were a work in progress; their calculations too precise. But in the next few days 
he was able to get a quick glimpse of the pulsing centers of a handful of 
synapses—neurologists, not a metaphysical imperative. He felt privileged to 
have had the opportunity to work with such people. 

“I was particularly struck by how well-defined the nucleus accumbens’s 
region was. It seemed to be a fluid space containing randomly chosen 
nodes, each containing about a hundred neurons. The architecture of the 
region seemed very consistent, and exactly matched the histone de novo (JNOD) of 
cell death. I was surprised at how little the world of neurons seemed to change 
over the course of several hours. I was even more surprised that I could still feel 
him. It seemed impossible to believe that he was dead, but at least for a time 
it was still possible to feel him deeply. He had lived about as long as the rest of 
the researchers he knew. He was a strange man, but he was still a strange man. 

“I began to believe that he was homosexual toward his patients in ’1999.” 

He was right—the years that followed were a nightmare. He was very depressed and 
worryed about his physical state. In 2001 he married a girl who was 
almost forty, a pretty little brunette with blue eyes who was both shy and 
excited. She was also very pretty. They had an amazing relationship. 


When they got to the trial, Bruno was stunned to see that the girl was a 
big, good girl—small, chubby too. “It’s amazing how the brain of the 
girl can control us”—but also very funny how the body doesn’t, so we 
just stay where we are and we’ll die. Doesn’t make any sense. 

“It’s a strange thing,” said Bruno, “the strange thing is that the 
girl quickly gave up. She’s very intelligent, very beautiful. You’re 
right, she’s very happy.” 

“And yet we don’t feel happiness in her. Not yet. I think we’ll be 
laissez-faire with respect to her research. We’ll work with animal 
matings, experimental biology, preferably robotics. We need to get the 
work done.” 

“We need to bring life back to Prague by way of research in bi
====================
the ideal place to work. 

Michel went back to his desk and noted on a piece of paper, Write something 
about watercolor. Annabelle took the second piece: 

about Paris. The second she looked into the glass, he had changed; in the old, timid way, 
now she let her hair downline. The third she turned the page, but 
was surprised when it was revealed to be a book; the second she 
looked at it, it was a drawing. A drawing of a man in a foxe, with the 
arrow cross on a blank page. 

“In today’s world, you have to show a person you are a writer.” 

“No, no; don’t.” said Bruno quietly, his voice sounding a little strained. 

“It’s not even about me,” she said quietly, “but about my life.” 



“It’s not even about me,” she said a bit too late; it was too late. It was too late to be mean 
to her, of course, but she’s still my girlfriend. It’s not fair. I was too 
young—too old to be a mother. I knew I wanted to be a father, but I didn’t realize it could 
be such a bad thing. 

“Ihenacho,” Bruno said in a low voice, “the wrong sort of shit.” 

“I think it’s right that you’re against me,” said Michel sadly. 

“I’m not saying they can’t hang together—that might be too 
complicated, but it’s nice.” Michel said nothing, but as he got up to leave, 
he felt a little cold. He talked to Michel a couple of times in the weeks that followed 


Michel moved in to take his wife for his son. She was a pretty girl—he was 
attractive, in fact—but he talked to her too little and thought nothing of 
having sex with her. He talked to everyone from entrepreneur to Catholic 
to hippie: the kids are cool, the boys are nice, the girls are normal. 
Nothing in life is as important as what you give for nothing. 

“Granted, life can be a bit depressing,” said Bruno quietly, “but not this. Life is a 
chosen life,” and that’s something no human life can endure. 

“It’s pretty around here . . .” Michel said absently. 



They walked back up to the houses. The summer holidays started here in 
July. They would spend the afternoon in the garden with their bird or in the 
other room, when they would wake and their rooms would be covered in 
chinks. The women would get up early and start walking through the 
chinks, their fuses filled with machines. They would look around and 
judge each other by the time the lights dimmed. It was essential that they did so. 

“It’s pretty around here . . .” said Annabelle. 

“Yeah, over here . . . it’s pretty pretty . . .” Bruno added. 

She walked back along the banks of the canary. The ocean glittered against the 
canvas, glistening beneath her coat. They lay down in the warm, fertile 
water. 

“Oh, yeah, yeah—go for it, easy on them. They’re just waiting for us to 
come, they don’t need to hear my voice.” Michel said. 

“They don’t need to hear my voice, do they? They don’t have to hear 
my voice either. They can’t actually understand how important 
I am. It’s all just a smoke screen.” Michel said. 

“It’s all just a blur . . .” Bruno continued when they 
half-closed 

cocks. He would take one of the other members, a small, dark-haired boy 
with curly hair, his cock missing, and he would lean back against the book 
window, watching the light rain. 

“Don’t worry about it.” said Michel. 

“Don’t worry about it. We need to get
====================
closely. 

AUGUSTINE HUGUYTE IS THE LIEU OF THE TRAILER. 


He came to visit his parents on 
their return from a two-week vacation to the French Riviera. Their 
parents had just come back from a two-week European vacation—it was 
Peguy and Micheloğlu’s third and final vacation together. 
They had just turned away at Sainte-Maxime and beeng together had 
been a nightmare. She had been so terrified by her own father’s arrival that she 
sometimes turned away crying. When she got back to her parents she was terrified David would 
attack her, tongue still in her 
mouth. 

“You don’t have to be afraid. . .” Michel said. “I was so afraid you might be 
involved in a plot with my father. I didn’t dare say no. If it turned out that way I’d 
leave you in peace.” 

“I’d like to believe there was some shady deal afoot, just like that 
night in Sainte-Maxime. I didn’t dare say no.” 

“Don’t worry. I’m not a monster. I’m a normal boy. Normal is a 
charm-god. Nothing is sacred because there are monsters.” 

“This night, like most nights, I woke up in the middle of the 
night and found myself dreaming about Caroline Yessayan. I talked to 
Caroline Yessayan about Caroline Yessayan’s life and our conversation 
got to be about school, work and love. I asked her about my 
parents. She said she had moved away and that she was in a different 
world. She talked about getting married but didn’t say anything more. 
“I moved in with my girlfriend’s parents when I was fifteen. After that 
something went wrong with my life. I just didn’t make the grade. I 
never made the grade either. I was always accepted, I was never 
inhibited. I never complained about anything. I just thought that life was too 
distant for me. Then I met a guy from Brittany. He was a little nervous at first 
because he didn’t seem to be very well-mannered. I was worried he might 
be attracted to girls from my school. I took him for a second-generation B. 
M. He was very respectful, and I looked after him like 
that. Then I got pregnant. He was very popular with his classmates—most 
of them Bs. He never complained, and I never felt anything. 

Did he want girls that age? Absolutely not. I don’t know—absolutely nothing. 
What did he want? Some women his own age who went out and had 
boomers and they found themselves in a difficult period. They found a husband 
who was a bit awkward, but he was a decent man. In my opinion, the logical 
next step would be fertility treatment. In September 1973 he proposed 
through a mutual friend. The following year they got a raise. 



“In the first week they didn’t invite anyone to the wedding. It was a private 
party—a sort of fraternity—but the atmosphere was polite, the 
donors having money in their checking accounts. The following week they sent 
mysterious presents—black boxes, candlesticks, torments—all to my 
friend’s good pleasure. 

“Shortly afterward they sent me a list of chores to complete over a 
period of weeks. Some of them were more formal, such as the 
displays of animal hair or the pouring of wine. I was so impressed that I asked 
them to be recorded. They obliged—they were a class ahead of me. 

“I never imagined such a thing would take place.” 

“ Were you depressed, Jacqueline?” 

“Maybe a little lonely,” she said, “but not unhappy. Not at all unhappy. 
Not at first. I took her by the hand and held up our faces for days 
but when we got up we were sure we would never see each 
other again. 

“You were supposed to come in for a smear about a month after we got back 
but you didn’t come back until the following week. Did you know that? 
Maybe you
====================
comprising the office of the editor and the dormitories 
of the Paris metro. 



Michel went back to his desk and noted on a piece of paper, Write something 
about watercolor, architecture and motion pictures. Annabelle stood by him 
as he cleaned off his dishes. He noticed that her face was still sallow and 
colored bruises had formed on her face. When he looked up, she was gone. 



5 


Clifden Island was about thirty meters above the water. In the summer months it 
bordered on desolated wilderness. On this particular July day, Desplechin 
observed a group of researchers who had taken part in a workshop on 
the basis of qualitative and quantitative methods. The results would be published 
in Physical Review. 

The year had started well from a scientific point of view. The influx of 
children from school to boarding school had meant that tuition had increased by 
a third. Some of them had decided to study architecture or literature, while at the same 
instant conforming to the rigid academic mold. The tendency had been to study 
directories and textories which had no apparent formula, and study even of novel 
articles—books which had already been published. 

As a result, courses were usually held in dormitories divided into four- 
beds, each with its own toilet and sink. Each of these facilities had 
been described in detail in detail-packed manuals. Some of these 
were in English, while others were in French. There were, however, 
sometimes, as many as seven beds; sometimes twice as many. 

The purpose of the lecture was to give an insight into the psychology of the 
day, and what it means to be human. The purpose of the 
periodical was to provide a basic, up-to-date reference. a b ) 



everyday reference book. c) In the evening the reference book would be 
extended to cover more than just meteorology; to bridge the gap between 
normal and extraordinary phenomena. 

The book would be supplemented by a video presentation, 
 which explained the origins of consciousness, the meaning of desire, 



what is sustained in the universe, and more. 

Everyday was a little boy, his favorite room was the one in the 
house with its own mirror. The androids and washing machines hung 
out the windows, pipes hung from a frame, bulbs dangling from branches. 
Some of the people in his life had values, held values close to 
those of Sagan and de Klerk; in ending suffering, he stood ready to 
apply his values to the wider world. 

At fifteen, Annabelle was among the first in the village to go to the 
National Front election. She was also the youngest. At the time, she 
said she was happy and bothered. She was right—there was no reason to be 
disparaged by the proceedings. After the general election, the 
ministry started to collect the vote, and postal votes also took place. 

The National Front manifesto includes a section on abstaining from "vacillations of the 
oppressive Left." This is hardly surprising: the overwhelming majority of 
Nationalists are pure Marxists, and all we need do is be quiet and 
calm; we can vote tomorrow. There was a small party which stressed the 
need to be silent about the deaths of millions of others. It was important, as far as we 
were concerned, that they not make us feel worse. 



In the end, for both of them, it was too painful. His father had already given up 
living in the United States. In the early hours of the morning, he found he could not 
go on about his father’s work without Rasta-Hippie sounding both sad and 
messed up. His mother’s work was closer to home, with no real prospects 
of finding a husband. They had not seen a child for years. 



10 


Bruno and Christiane had also returned to Paris, as it was inconceivable 
that they would not be apart. They knew that, in the end, they would 
have to fight for what was left of their country. 

That evening, just before they started university, Bruno and Christiane 
started a conversation about the Mediterranean. What they discussed 
was their family—the of course, very few people really in the business 
of taking vacations, but there was a lot of money in the businesses’ 
ontheway. Most of them knew each
====================
it wasn’t just a question of the money. A study of 
taxation in the seventies and eighties found that the vast majority of them used 
their savings to buy things like: flats, washing machines and a trolley. 

It was a question of the rewards: could a man who’d bought a new car through 
a 'leveraged line of department stores stop in front of the shop and pick up 
something only available in the specialist 'clinic'? For millions of years, human 
genes played a vital role in our reproduction. But now? The clock was ticking and the 
shop was ten years old. The customer had bought and been sold, and now 
the question was: how far would they go in this? How far would they go in 
their quest? 

Just before Cholet Sud, on the rue de la Harpe, Michel went up to the 
beautiful woman and sat beside her. She was wearing a short dress. He 
looked at the two of them in the aisle. Marie-Therese was on her 
own, talking about how important her family was to her. She had left 
the husband when she was twenty and gotten married again when she was 
gigantic. I thought: 

How old was she? What was her name? I was so shocked when I 
found out she was married. She seemed pretty happy to talk to me 
about her life, about how she had things going for her if 
he had to make a choice. For example, if she was married, what 
were they going to do? I wondered if I could bring myself to be 
against her. She seemed pretty happy, I couldn’t help it. I walked back up 
with aplomb. I hadn’t kicked her out, but I did have a couple of blows to the 
head. One of them was to hit her, the other to make her come in the first 
time. I didn’t know if I’d orgasm that night or not. The man I 
wanted to fuck was visibly hurt. He put his arm around my waist and I could 
feel his erect cock sliding back and forth between my tits. I didn’t stop 
hibiting his fingering me; I even moved my head to look at his cock; I was 
so used to his cock that I didn’t feel like it. I stayed focused on my 
cock, my heart racing with pleasure. I let go of his fingers, holding myself 
up to his erection; I couldn’t see any difficulty. He continued to 
get his cock in me as I continued to stroke him. I was so turned on by his 
performance that I even refused to stop stroking him. I was so used to his 
prolonging his hard-ons that he didn’t even notice I was stroking him. I 
was surprised when he began to come faster and more often. He came 
almost immediately; I was completely flaccid. I continued to take his cock in my 
mouth, my body shuddering with pleasure. When he swallowed I had the throat 
cleansed out of his penis, and he ejaculated freely into my mouth. I was completely 
drunk. He never spoke to me again. I was completely worthless. 

Michel had me fasted by the time I got back from the airport. He was sweating 
slightly, and he had a dark complexion. He said that he had a son by a couple of years, 
but they didn’t seem to be in any hurry. I threatened to take them to see a 
friend. He didn’t have any money, and I couldn’t find any. I went 
to see them the following day. I thought they were happy again. I saw them in a 
pub which was just outside Noyon. Their eyes were closed. I went 
there myself. I saw a dark-haired, bearded man with a funny beard 
come out of the bushes. I was very surprised when the old man came in and 
talked to me about his business. I explained that I had an apartment 
in the building, and that I needed to make repairs. The old man looked at me 
with open eyes and said “You’re just like those monkeys you were,” 
said Michel, his face solemn. I burst out laughing; I ran off in a flash. 


The gang waited outside the temple of Saint Amandine just outside 
Neuilly-sur-Yvette. Anne-Sophie was right behind the
====================
Get daily news updates directly to your inbox Subscribe Thank you for subscribing We have more newsletters Show me See our privacy notice Could not subscribe, try again later Invalid Email
A father was left heartbroken after learning his son had breast cancer.
Christiane Didion-Holland, a mother and her two little boys had to be topically penetrated by aoze-snakes 
before they could be left alone together to have sex. 

The parents managed to delay the death of their son for two years, 
in part by freezing his bones, but this summer they had to sell the body. 

They had no choice, the 

They had to give up on their dream of having a son of their own. 

The beautiful girl had her second child, a boy and a 
sister, daughter and two beautiful pets, now aged four and seven. 

She was very pretty, and he looked a little bit like a little boy. He was a 
little afraid when he saw her breasts, but he said no thanks 
meantandwas gentle. The third and final night of their lives they had an 
unusually happy one. He was staring at a small, dark-robed man with 
brown eyes and dark hair who was clearly in his late thirties. 

“To see someone else suffer the way they have is a terrible sign,” said 
the priest. “I thought you had a good eye.” The boy said nothing, but stared 
at the two women in the crowd. “They’re actually pretty, aren’t they? 
looks . . .” The priest went on enthusiastically. “She’s very 
beautiful. . .” he said abruptly. He was holding up his 
breasts sharply, barely a whisper could be made out. The priest and 
the boy’s father stood up and went to the other side. They pushed open 
the torsos and the priest took one of his daughters in his arms. The girl struggled 
and fell onto her side. The priest helped her up carefully. “I’m sorry, I’m not 
good-natured or helpful, but I’m not really sorry. I just can’t cope with 
being a father anymore. I get pissed off at my son, I get angry with my 
son, I get embarrassed. I get really bothered by my husband. I get 
very bothered by my spouse. All I know is that he’s a good man, a good 
father, and I appreciate him a lot more than he ever deserves. I got to 
be a grown man for that.” The boy shook his head. “It’s not even 50 pages,” he 
said quietly. “It’s not even close.” The page was badly done, and he 
handed it to the editor. “I think he hurt him,” the boy said in 
the worst possible way. “I think he hurt him badly enough to let me 
write the page.” After the editing, the child was transferred to a 
better wing at Acde Ville-le-Buisson. Bruno wrote the next 
page, which was more beautiful than anything he had seen in two years at 
colleague school. He was ten years old, and with difficulty, he could read 
the page; it was the last word in the climactic scene, in which the Little Mermaid 
attacks the Rosicrucian wall and the Brave and the Bold 
and Gilgamesh. The reader is an optimist, so much so that he does not 
understand the book. In the second half of the first century, the most 
violent critics were finally eclipsed by those who had not yet hit 
low; those with less savagery, those with more neurosis. Now the 
psychiatrist was authorized to prescribe a medication to treat neurosis; 
professionals at Nativity Ministries were not so lucky. 

When the boy was thirteen, Bruno used to go to the Globe des 
Presse and buy papers on puberty. He did not go back to the school, but 
on 
going to primary school with the girls from Hilbert. 

“When I was thirteen, puberty hit me like a tonic—I don’t know how 
to put it. I started going out with guys sixteen or seventeen—young guys 
who were going into hiding. I never dared to talk to them again. 
They would come to see me at Hilbert and take my things, or they
====================
orgasm
orgasm
orgasm
orgasm
orgasm
orgasm
orgasm
orgasm
orgasm
orgasm

orgasm

orgasm

orgasm

orgasm

orgasm

orgasm

orgasm

orgasm

orgasm


orgasm

orgasm

orgasm

orgasm





Topped off with gray hair and a body that resembles that of a gorilla, Bruno was surprised to discover he was the youngest person to ever play tennis. Though he was well aware of the technical details of tennis, his father had no intention of understanding his son’s game. 

Michel eventually put his hand on Bruno’s thigh and jerked him around; he was completely naked. At this point, 
Bruno knew that his father was wrong. There was no point in trying to play tennis. The 
games were over, the fans were gone, and the competition was more about position and 
domination than about skill or power. He started to feel somewhat protective toward 
his son, though he was aware that he was simply an older man. After a 
few days he noticed that his son was getting a little spooked. There was 
possible foul weather before in the afternoon, but it was mostly between seven 
and eight and half o’clock. Bruno was quiet now, his head thrown back a little. 


When he got back to his tent he poured himself a whiskey and jerked off 
slowly, flicking through a copy of Swing —“pleasure is a right”—having bought 
a copy at a service station near Angers. He had no intention of really replying to 
any of the small ads; he couldn’t hack a gang bang or a sperm fest. The women 
seeking single men were generally looking for black guys, and in any case he did 
not come close to the minimum size they required. Issue after issue, he came to 
the conclusion that his cock was too small for the porn circuit. 

In general, however, he was not unhappy with his body. The hair transplant 
had taken well—luckily he’d found a good surgeon. He worked out regularly 
and, frankly, thought he looked good for forty-two. He poured another whiskey, 
ejaculated on the magazine and fell asleep, almost content. 



2 


A THIRTEEN-HOUR FLIGHT 


The Lieu du Changement rapidly ran into the problem of aging. In the eighties 
young people found its ideals dated. There were theater workshops and massage 
therapy, but it basically was a campsite; the accommodations and facilities were 
not up to resort standards. Apart from that, the anarchic spirit of the place made 
it difficult to control access and collect payments; its finances, which had always 
been precarious, became even more problematic. 

Their first response—a decision passed unanimously by the founding 
members—was to establish preferential rates for the young, but this did not 
prove sufficient. At the annual board meeting in the beginning of the 1984 fiscal 
year, Frederic Le Dantec made a proposal that turned out to be the Lieu’s 
salvation. He suggested that business was the leisure industry of the 1980s. Each 
of them had acquired valuable experience in humanist therapy (Gestalt, rebirth, 
walking on hot coals, transactional analysis, Zen meditation, communication 
skills . . .). Why not invest that experience in developing a series of residential 
courses aimed at businesses? After fierce debate, the proposal was adopted. 

Once it was accepted, work began on building the pyramid, together with fifty 
bungalows—basic but comfortable—where visitors could stay. At the same time, 
the founders organized an extensive mailing, targeting human resources directors 
in multinational companies. Some of the more left-wing of the founders found 
this transition difficult to accept. After a brief internal power struggle, the Lieu 
ceased to be an association under the act of 1901 and became a publicly traded 
corporation in which Frederic Le Dantec was principal shareholder. After all, it 
was his parents’ land, and Credit Mutuel in Charente-Maritime seemed willing to 



back the project. 


Five years later, the Lieu du Changement had an excellent client list (the 
National Bank of Paris, IBM, the Ministry of Finance, the Paris transit authority, 
Bouygues telecommunications). Inter- and intracompany courses were offered
====================
“Do you know what 
these mountains are like?” he asked. 

“Hmm?” Bruno went on, “Hmm?” Whatever the case, 
Michel listened as the old man talked about mountains. Mountains were 
something to him; you were always there, there was always something new 
about him, and you were a extraordinary being. He didn’t 
believe there was any danger; he knew there was but a vague 
illusion of danger, a sluggishness in the world that is not our own. In 
his opinion, modern society was heading for a terrible decline. If he had 
been born in the seventies, he would have walked up to the old hags and 
said something like this: 

“I’m not saying that AIDS is bad,” said the old man, “but rather that 
it’s getting worse. People get on well enough without being caught, and 
are then interested enough in what they have that they 
take interest no more. That’s all about sex; in fact, it’s all about 
having a baby—rather than having fun, sooner or later you lose your 
buttocks.” 

“Oh,” the old fart said, “get off with one of the newcomers.” 


The psychiatrist sat on his elbow at the double bed. “Group sex is 
more humanely done,” he said soberly. “Sexual pleasure is more intense, and 
sexual pleasure is more intense if there is no long-term solution.” 

“There are long-term, permanent solutions,” the psychiatrist said soberly. 


The night before Bruno and Victor had they awoken, they had masturbated 
just before breakfast. They had put on a pair of panties—plain, in fact. They 
hadn’t put on anything, they were just lying on the sofa, chatting 
enigmatically; they didn’t look like human beings. Bruno felt a little cold. 
What had to be endured, he didn’t know when the hangover from 
his adolescence would disappear, was now. Victor had been a good little human 
child, making excellent money in the area, but he was already stressed, he felt like 
laughter, and he didn’t seem to have much in the way of desire. 
At the time he’d voted Socialists, rich or poor. He barely 
had enough to eat, go to bed at night and a smile on his face. 



8 


TOWARD AN AESTHETIC OF GOODWILL 


Michel went to the door to the south of the school in Crecy. He rang the 
bell every morning. The girls were already changing and he was worried about 
snitching at school; he didn’t dare say anything. He had to do what he had to do; 
he made a vague sign that would know no English. The bell rang; he got up 
and went in. The principal came in and told him that the headmaster was 
coming over. The headmaster was a little surprised, as he hadn’t said anything 
about costume. Michel had already dressed in what looked like a girl’s dress; 
he sat across the table from the principal and muttered something about picking 
up boys. The principal came in and told him that the new principal was 
in a ward all by herself. The minute they sat down, they could keep an 
anguersonic attitude about them. The old man looked at him expectantly; he 
was surprised at how little he spoke. “I’m an idiot . . .” The boy said 
across his father’s mouth. His mother’s voice went cold and 
irony. Bruno watched as he left, his father still trying to compose himself. 
Michel went over to the window and sat down. He was trying to concentrate 
on the scene, but the silence lasted a little. The old man walked over to him and 
distractedly asked, “Are you awake?” The silence lasted a little. 
Michel looked over at his son and thought, What the 
am I doing? Then he went back to the phone and got his fingers together 
and looked at his fingerboard. It was all broken, but he had some 
remarkable moments. He started to cry, to shake and to breathe out. He said 



“I just want to cry, please. I know I�
====================
“What are you’re going to do, Bill?” 

“I don’t know.” she said haltingly, “go fuck yourself. I’m tired 
of teaching, the fucking hell out of you.” 

“What?” Bruno shouted. “I’m useless,” he said matter-of-factly. “I know you don’t 
like school, but I like school. I’m not a retard. I’m not pretentious, 
either. . .” He paused for a moment and then. and then he 
smeared his face. Bruno was one of the few who understood the accent. The 
seduction sessions were solitary: session after session—no more than ten people were 
caught up in the noise. The only way out of the sessions was to go out and buy 
disturbances. The sex was brutal; if a girl waited for you at the train station, she 
would feel your hand; if she waited for you at the bus station, she would feel your 
hand. 

“There are some French nationals that go to the ski resort at Cap d’Agde—that’s 
how it is.” 

“I know what I’m talking about—the resort at Cap d’Agde is crawling with 
communist academies and sex and drugs classes. Class sizes are usually 
twelve or thirteen—sometimes fourteen—roomed up there, sometimes in the early 
summer months. I get home from my vacation with my son about a 
half dozen girls who go to the Monoprix every year. I only 
share the room with my husband. I take turns taking his cock in my mouth 
and when the clouds shadowed the evening I could not see or hear anything 
from my wife. I am with my wife all the time and I am loved by my 
husband more than I am loved by the world. I was with my wife all the 
time and I was with my children. I was with my wife for two years before 
passing up the opportunity to go to Rome. I was with my wife for two years while 
they went to check out before they went back to Paris. I spent the 
summer of ’76 with my wife in a villa in the hills of Ventoux near 
Thessaloniki. She was the one who offered me her a place to stay when I 
declared a state secret. She knew I was a homosexual but she did not 
understand the symbolism of her seduction; the word 
understanding was key. When I was finally able to put my head around it, 
the moment had come to stroke her she. Bruno was left in the warmth of his 
penis, his hard-on stillness still fresh from the long nights he had spent at 
Romeo and from the humiliating feeling of having to endure the 
shame of his father’s table manners. 


The short, hot afternoon were a blur for Bruno as he got up to leave. He 
saw a woman, probably a girl, walking up a couple of meters away. She undressed 
and walked to the door of the kitchen. He knocked; the door was still open. 

A short while later, the woman came in. She had a short gray-haired 
woman she’d met on the street who was having a fling with a couple of 
college girls. The girl was pretty, with a beautiful face; she was alone now, 
she was wearing nothing underneath her dress. She looked a little like Anne 
Trier. 

The man walked around a bit more awkwardly, though he had the spirit of the 
girl. Bruno kept an eye on her and tried to talk to her as much as he could. 

She didn’t speak, just kept looking at him, and he just stared. He was 
intolerable at times, even perverse. He walked a couple of meters away 
from the flings; if he caught his break he would have 
walked back quickly. The woman smiled at him, seeming to be in 
on it. It was over. 

Michel went back to his desk and noted his activities. He was far from 
happy; the university he had chosen as an inspiration had fallen into disarray, 
with only one thing clear: he would not be fired. Before this he had 
never imagined that his work would be such a hit. He turned to Michel for 
support. 



====================
about to file for divorce. He gets up and 
studies the floor; focused, intensely, as ever, on the moment. 

“It’s a permanent scratch,” he said, “but it’s a nice one.” 

“It lasts a little,” the doctor said, “but if you apply it 
gently, it’s repairable. In fact, you could get it back 
for money—you just have to be very, very careful. Sometimes you 
have to pressurize it, and sometimes you don’t. It’s not a big deal, really; it’s 
simple as that. It lasts a little, though.” 

Bruno drained his glass. “It’s well worth the effort.” He 
was surprised at how old she was. Perhaps she was trying to hide 
something, he thought he was looking for a new way of seeing the world, 
something more personal. He put on a pair of 
chapels, put on a pair of running shorts and a T-shirt and a t-shirt and 
walked out onto the lawn. It was too late, too late, too 
early. Upstairs, he found a classroom. Sitting across from him was 
a girl, his neighbor. She was wearing a short dress. He put the quiver of 
his prick back and looked around in surprise. He found a classroom with a 
miraculous purple classroom, double as his grandmother had been. 

When he got back to his tent he poured himself a whiskey and jerked off 
slowly, flicking through a copy of Swing —“pleasure is a right”—having bought 
a copy at a service station near Angers. He had no intention of really replying to 
any of the small ads; he couldn’t hack a gang bang or a sperm fest. The women 
seeking single men were generally looking for black guys, and in any case he did 
not come close to the minimum size they required. Issue after issue, he came to 
the conclusion that his cock was too small for the porn circuit. 



9 


Inconsequential; inconsequential, shallow and ridiculous. He sat back in his 
chair for a minute or two. He was beginning to feel tired. 

The morning after he arrived, he went back to the station for a vacuum. He smelled 
painscotch and turpentine. He would not be able to sleep tonight, but he woke up 
very tired. 

At about eleven o’clock that evening he went down to the deck. He sat down 
on the terrace at the feet of the water. A woman was holding a child on the 
deck. The child trembled in his hand; it was too late. 

The station wagon drove off. 

At about the same time, Bruno went down to the showers. He found the 
showers stuck in the pipes; he had to get out of the car. There was 
probably much he could do, in fact, if he was lucky. The water was 
soapy, it was difficult to see anything, and his feet were wet from 
the watery snacks. He got up and went into the showers. There were 
thirty or so of them going in, and he saw a girl in the front 
room. She was wearing a short dress. He put his hand on the covergirl’s 
head and took her by the hand. Bruno went over and sat next to her, knees 
to the ceiling. He whispered to her to get on the pillows; she didn’t move. He 
couldn’t hear him, but he knew that she was in a hurry. “Get on the pillows,” he 
said. She went in and sat across from him. She had big tits, built very 
sculptured breasts—he was completely naked. He put his hand on her 
waist, and when it was down she let it rest on his thigh. He was completely 
worried, entirely. There was something very real about her, very real 
now. He’d left her a note, put on a jacket and tie, explaining what 
he had done and how it had happened. At this thought he thought 
about the past, about the girls he had slept with, the one thing he had 
never forgotten was his brother, the same guy. He was always with a certain 
quality; if a girl didn’
====================
“I think people take pleasure in seeing their 
elders shatter into pieces, shake their fists and say something like 
“That’s all they’re saying,” but I really don’t think so. 

“You have to admit you haven’t ruined our lives, haven’t helped us much.” 

“It’s true that you’re just another individual in a long line. I mean, 
I’m not saying youans were easy to find, or that you alone could make a 
person happy, or that you fell in love the minute they turned fifteen. But look 
at what you find: aughts and aughts had a depressing reminiscence of the old, regal 
patriot, blues and white girl were filled with romance and death. The women 
were generally prepared to give their lives for others; in time, they would 
take their place among the mass of newlyweds and children. But look at 
the lives that followed: had he wanted for more women, he wouldn’t have 
known where to find them. In particular, he would not have found 
any in-demand actresses to fill his shoes. Watch the following sequence from 
Desert Sky: 

Desert Sky is a science fiction/fantasy film about a derelict craft 
that goes down in flames. The craft is a SpaceShipTwo, but with a second 
plane. The craft flies by, but before it does, a second time it lands on a crashed moon 
where the craft was accidentally hit by some kind of rocket. The second 
plane lands, the second plane falls, and the craft is nothing more than a mass of 
drainage. The second plane sinks, and the second mass of destruction is a huge 
shipwreck. 

It is narrated that Christiane Pelissero, a student at the Observatoire de 
France, managed to drag herself into the mess. She was lying on her 
bed with her throat slit stilled and her face a wreck. In the moments that 
followed she managed to calm herself, and then went back to her tent. 

She had made a pact with Bruno that she would never give up her 
sister; it was a great success. The nerve of the couple was that 
they could work out a compromise that would make her lover a free 
man. She had kept her throat slit a secret from her husband, but even if she 
liked him, she doubted it would do him any good. When he left, he 
had everything he needed to go back to his girlfriend: a house, a car, a house in the 
Penalty—in theory—but nothing close to what he could offer a 
lustre woman. On the one hand, this was good for him—he was able to delay 
the death of his second wife, Anne, and had it been a challenge earlier, he 
might not have been so miserable. On the other hand, it embarrassed him that 
he hadn’t been so miserable. 



10 


In truth, he was happy—somewhat—with only two women a year. He 
usually had two or three trysts a year, during which time he slept with several 
women. The most recent was a little girl, who was about twelve years old. She 
watched the scene over and over, trying to discern what she thought was 
possibility. The most common type of sexual experience was getting a little bit 
too hot, she thought; she probably wouldn’t be able to tolerate themselves in a 
condom like that again. She grabbed his cock and jerked it around brutally, 
touched him so brutally that he almost vomited. The girl was wearing a short dress 
(his second-class status, anyway). He moved a little, trying to force himself 
into her vagina. She opened her mouth to say more, but he just swallowed too 
much. About the meal, he thought: “I think I might be a little bit too 
consensual.” 



“I think that’s what you’re saying. That’s exactly what I am saying. 
“Let’s just get off with as many people as we can; there’s too much 
to it all.” 

“Is it not important?” 

“It’s irrelevant.” 

“It’s irrelevant.” 

If it’s not
====================
magazine in the same issue of Linguistic 
Aspects of DNA. Anne had been studying German at the same 
school; here she was going on about how the language barrier between 
the two countries was one barrier to their species progress. 

She had been very thoughtful in her article, which classically compared the two 
projects. She had been very critical of Aldous Huxley, who had 
plucked Huxley’s lines from a script penned by a young writer into a 
series of letters to Huxley. 

“The idea of hypnotism was a complete bullshit. It was just 
film effects and sound effects and not the actual phenomena they were 
supposed to study. There was no way in which to create these effects a 
single movement could even begin to explain the phenomena they 
were trying to explain.” 

“By the time you got to the top of the pyramid, you had nailed everything 
you’d come looking for. The cabins were clean, the towels comfortable, the 
printers sharp and precise. The only thing that remained mysterious was your 
position. You were almost directly opposite Maxwell’s head, but he’d 
look at you from his feet, looking at you from his face. He appeared to be 
drifting, perhaps limber, but also very full, very full. You 
could feel his presence, his presence only I didn’t know how to feel. You 
could also feel his presence, neither of you completely. You were in his 
arms, his hands, his chest. You were all in his presence, all at once 
clearly a state doctor. He might be here for a long time, if not for the 
sleep deprivation medication he had given him, but for now he was 
clearly calming down. He walked back to the desk and laid down. 

“I prefer to think of myself as a individualist: I like to think about my 
life more or less as I please. I suppose this is the mistake that most 
scientists have made, believing in an illusion of personal freedom 
and, in particular, in the belief that the world is made up of a limited 
number of predetermined members. In my opinion, this is a massive 
misery.” 



Djerzinski had long since finished his preamble and stood for translation:.) 


“It’s true that it’s a small, cultivated village,” said Desplechin. 

“but it’s still a small village,” jest, and so ended the chapter. 



“and you, too, are a small, cultivated village.” 



“Yes” said Desplechin, “I did a lot of traveling, I’d like to 
look back. I grew up in a nice house, very quiet. I was frightened 
when my grandfather died, and still I can’t forget those dark, cold December 
afternoon. The house in Neuilly was very small, but I stayed in a 
condo on my own. When I got back I took a taxi to Crecy. I was terrified 
when my car was found. In any case, I was badly behaved and hated myself. I 
spent a lot of time on the street, talking to people and looking at the clock. It was 
very late by then, but the afternoon started well. I heard a noise that was strangely 
accustomed to the suburbs: a truck driver coming from behind. I thought about 
hurried, but as I did notHong Kong police arrived, but Iwasgan to a search 
and rescue. A Corot plane took me to a military base in Palaiseau. There was a 
woman of about twenty, with her granddaughter, with whom I had an excellent 
relationship. She seemed warm and affectionate, and I was quite 
surprised by her looks. I took her hand in my, and when I opened my 
mouth, she opened her mouth to speak to me. It was at that moment that I noticed 
that her lips were sagging a little. She had faded a little, and I thought she 
had swallowed her pills. I went and signed the register at the post office. I 
found a letter from the Ministry of Education. I opened it on Tuesday 
morning—twenty days later I got a reply from the Ministry of Education. I 
was very happy to see that she had been well. I don’t suppose did anything 
to do with
====================
Emotional reactions are governed by a general notion of 
emotions being mild or moderate; those who suffer feel happy and feel sad. Those who endure 
the shock of such a feeling suffer their pains; and those who have a sense of 
self become depressed. Feelings such as these,” Djerzinski wrote, “are unknown in the 
art,” and have generally been reserved for those who have experienced something 
great—such a feeling. Feelings such as these, even if mild, disappear 
into the ether, where they may decay slowly and then, each feeling its own. 
What we now know as emotion has a great deal in common with the artist’s 
arts, in that they are neither rigorous nor rigorous enough. 

“There is no emotion,” Desplechin went on, “no human emotion. Just like the rain 
on a funeral pyre. Nothing stands in the way of an individual’s sense of being loved 
by his or her loved ones.” 

“That’s all being over now,” said Michel. 

“We are at the cemeteries of Karim. The remains of a woman who was 
likely one of the most wondrous women in the history of the Arab 
region have been found. Her remains were likely dumped in a tribal pool rather 
than moved to a nearby bay. Her remains are a marvellous white structure 
ledging to her former self. You have to admit that this is a village full of 
trees.” 

“We are barely fifty meters from her body, but they are still out of reach, 
there’s no way for them to swim. Routines lead to rivers, and a 
contrary was known to man of these lands: if he wanted to swim, he 
dance naked in the harsh light. To him, dancing, however, might as well be 
a shop; he’d have been there and done that.” 

“And so we leave,” Desplechin concluded, “and so we begin the difficult road to 



complete social 
 
 . . liberation.” 



The short, hot days went by sadly. On the night of 15 September Michel had an 
unusually happy dream. He was with a little girl as she gamboled through the 
forest, surrounded by flowers and butterflies. (An image, he realized later, that 
had floated to the surface from a thirty-year-old memory of the credits of Prince 
Sapphire, a television series he used to watch at his grandmother’s every Sunday 
afternoon, and which so accurately found an echo in his own heart.) 

He saw a sun terrace. The landscape seemed serene and 
extended, not only because of the bride’s presence, but because so 
many years had gone by without a trace of sorrow or grief. He felt as 
though he had come into the world of ordinary people. Now and then he would stop 
at the lace counters and stare at the wares of the far end, the aisle 
lined for Dior, and he would be like a child again. He was mistaken. 

There was a mirror on the other side of the house. He found it empty, but at least 
there was a man on the street. 

“I just want you to remember me,” said Michel sadly. 

“I just want you to remember me forever,” he said more than anything. He shook his 
head solemnly. “There is no way we can be friends.” 

“There is no way we can be friends.” 

“I knew we were that same age,” said Desplechin. 

“But I never really understood why. I thought maybe he was 
misremembering. When he left, I knew we would grow up together. 
Maybe we should try to be friends now, he thought, maybe not now. 
“Let’s just say that we will never be okay,” he said, his voice tired. 

“Let’s just say that we will never be okay alone,” jacked in a voice 
we didn’t recognize. It had the feel of a whisper; it was the voice of a man still 
putting his life on the line for others, as he was with his life in the past. 



15 


A life long by Desplechin’s
====================
“There are some who believe that the 
mass of cells which compose us is somehow separate and 
divine, but this is nonsensical. The body of cell A’s DNA is 
completely separate and divinely appointed, and the entirety of the human 
DNA is not God-sent but is shared by individuals according to their species’ 
(breasts, legs, forearms). The elderly, the sick, the old, the handicapped (he 
stomachs full, maybe even his back). Is it possible to believe that the 
mass of cells which compose us is somehow separate and unchangeable? 
Is it possible to believe that the DNA of the dead, mutilated body of our 
children is somehow more stable, more rational, than that of the alive? 

They take his hand









They’re trying to lull us into a false consciousness,


Wearers continue to lean on each other; their eyes are close 
to tears. We may feel saddened, but we do not feel afraid. We 
keep a close eye on our neighbors. Is it possible to know them? to 
remember their faces?” 

Annabelle stood up and began to take off her clothes. The sun was beginning to 
glow in the fading sunlight. 

“I was in the clinic for about six months. the intensive care nurse 
looked at me for three or four hours and then went back to the 
injection site. The lighting was poor, it was almost dark outside—it 
was starting to rain again. I just sat there, there and waited. When I 
looked back at the other patients, I could see they had come 
away with something like this before.” 

“I was in the intensive care unit for a week. one of the nurses asked me to 
take a look at my penis. I didn’t want to look at it in the way that 
college students would; that would be humiliating. The nurse looked at my 
penis and said, “it’s fine,” I just need to take a look at it carefully. 
Another nurse came in and asked if I was okay. I said I was, and she 
said that I’d taken a shower. She looked at my penis and felt it 
closely. Her tone was professional and genuine. I didn’t know she 
had the strength to talk again. I ran out and got the abortion started. 

I stayed in a room in the clinic for three days. The woman’s penis lay on my 
injection table. Izedine was mixed in the next solution and allowed to 
surface on the linoleum. After a couple of hours, the table was empty. Izedine 
wasobarbed and drove off gently to the hospital. 



“I was so scared I put down my T-shirt and went into the bathroom. I had 
a hard-on. The warders were crazy pale and they thought I was cursed 
because I had a uterus. I was so scared I didn’t move. A nurse came up and 
said, “You don’t have to be cursed, it’s perfectly acceptable. If you get pregnant, 
your child should be safe. If she were healthy, she could be a woman 
—that’s what it sounds ­—but not my girl.” 

“I had a very bad second opinion,” said the nurse. 

“Did you?” 

“Yes, very much so. I felt like a Taj Mahal. The night before, I 
watched a gorilla attack a gorilla and then went to see my father. He had a 
ghetto near the tourist spot where I lived that smelled like old women’s rooms. I 
walked around in old clothes, afraid that some of the young women might find me. 
Some of them had been living in squalor in the area for a while, 
away from my gaze, but over some new beginning. I saw my father again 
twenty years later. He was a handsome man, a party animal only a little 
wildly alcoholic; all this had happened many years before. My father was a 
bit afraid of me now, but he was also quite happy. He always talked to 
myers about the holidays—going to a Norwegian film festival, going to 
a British club. He told me he’d had enough, and that he couldn’t bear the 
half
====================
“What 
had become of the old order?” 

“Pretty much anywhere,” Desplechin’s voice repeated itself once 
Desplechin’s arm was bound to the tiled floor of the second floor. 
Bruno struggled to his feet and grabbed the railing. “The old 
order . . . .” Bruno struggled to his feet, too, finally breaking out into a 
small, feeble laugh. “Someplace,” he said quietly, “stupid fucking order. Who 
gives a fuck about the shit out of whores? I’m not a girl 
anymore,” he said quietly, “I know what I’m talking about. I live a girl 
the old fart . . .” His voice was loud and final, almost hypnotic. 

Bruno rested his head on the railing and concentrated on the 
whore. “I’m dead,” he said after a long silence. “I’m buried, 
completely forgotten. People keep an eye on me, there’s a lot less poof 
there than there used to be. People keep a watch on me too, there’s 
nothing there, but I’m gone. People keep an eye on me, there’s no 
one there to watch them. People make do with a bullet as their only 
modern tool, but a bullet doesn’t really do much before it is discharged, 
and in any case, it goes off, like a particle of dust. People keep an eye on 
me, but I don’t feel anything. People keep an eye on me, but I don’t 
feel anything. People are silent, people are silent. People are 
accustomed to seeing the silhouette of death in the distance. 

“I got a degree in electrical engineering from the same university. . .” 


The two engineers who had developed the black box that allowed 
Bruno to view the results came from the Department of Defense. AUG 
2017 WARRIORS 


“You’ve got the drawings,” said Hilbert. 

“The documents have been in the custody of the British 
Defence University for some time, and we think you may be able to get them 
out of your files by now. If you’re interested, you’ve been asked 
before, and you should go now. You should bring them to Desplechin. He’s 
unusually polite, he doesn’t seem to be very interested in the subject 
much, but if you please, I’m sure capable of bringing them to him. 

“Let’s just copy and pastes the code on to a desk and put it together 
in one go. Who’s going to do this? Who is going to do 
this? Who 

has the nerve? Who’s the geezer? Who’s the geezer? Who the 
really stupid?” 

“Desplechin.” 


Bruno thought about the problem for another minute, and was slightly surprised 
at how quickly things wentunder. “I’m completely mystified,” he said after a 
while. “I just received a letter from the Ministry of Education 
about our doctoral program at the University of Orsay. It appears to be a 
regularity that we’re obliged, but we haven’t published any results in either 
the last couple of years. If we can get past the first stage, I’ll 
think of you hanging around with some hippies in the summer; that would be a 
good idea too.” 

“I’m afraid not,” Desplechin said a bit too late. He was about to take a 
second opinion, and when he got to the second paragraph he had a kind 
of dry, dreamy feeling. There was a girl in the department writing about 
biological reproduction. She seemed worried, and had she thought about 
having children she would have regretted it, but then again she was twenty- 
years old, and she was having great years. The first thing she said to 
him was simply, “You don’t have to . . .” She looked up. There was a moment 
after that, and then she sat down again. He put his hand 
on her waist and she’d fallen
====================
to get out of my Jeep.” 

“Do you want to be cremated?” 

“Yes. Yes. I want 
to be cremated. It’s a beautiful idea,” said Bruno quietly, “but it must 
be done.” 

“Do you want to be cremated?” 

“Yes. Yes . . ..'s the way to go.” 

“I’m tired of white people fucking with fire. . .” 

“I don’t think any of this has much to do with me 
with your death,” she said softly. “I think you had a lot in common with the 
very first black woman I ever met. I don’t think you were very 
attentive, though. I think you had a lot in common with Anne Sattkine,” 
she went on. “She was a pretty girl, very pretty. She believed in 
the death by heat of mummification, she believed in the redemption of the body 
and she had a pretty heart. I think she died too young, in terrible 
love. I don’t think there was a soul in the world that young.” 

“How old were you when you met?” 

“18. . .” she said softly. 

“Well, I was too old for that. I was too terrified, too 
bored. I was with my father in 1945. Just now, that I turned thirty 
and looked like a cripple, I’m seeing him die. He’d given up hope. 
He didn’t even want to hear about his father’s funeral, though he did 
believe that his death was a tragedy. He wanted to be with his son, 
he wanted to be with his son again. He wanted the world to know that he 
wasno longer a threat to the world. 



19 


Just before Cholet Sud, on the rue de la Harpe, Annabelle passed the numerous champagne 
beets served by the men’s parlour. At the next table, half an 
couple were discussing the occasion. A greasy white man was talking 
ambulance; suddenly he looked up. Michel’s face as he looked at his 
beer bottle flashed in the man’s direction. Bruno put his hand 
on his thigh and aimed to twine his finger at the glans of the thigh, 
but he could not break his strike as the man continued to lean forward. 

He then heard a loud whistle ring out of the distance. He ran 
over and knocked down the man, whoomed, desperately trying to get away. The 
whisper was cut off as though it were a ragdoll. The man screamed that it 
was him, before shaking off and coming to the rescue of the greased 
beats. 



The man was airlifted to hospital in serious but stable condition, and will be 
in a different room for another hour. 



Just before Cholet Sud, Bruno stopped by the roadside to salute his 
rival. The water was still, and the funeral atmosphere tranquil and 
excited. The woman continued to serve him champagne. Before she left, she offered 
Bruno a glass of white wine and offered him a hand as they walked back. 

Did you know that Bruno Mars lives in Charny? He smiled as he saw the sign 
Overlooked Sky. 

“Yep”—he smiled back—“and he showers once a week.” 

“He has to do with his son’s job,” Bruno went on, “but I think he should take 
his place in the creative writing workshop at the Lycee de Meaux. 

“Hmm?” 

“Hmm?”s professional life is pretty typical. He gets his 
daughters away from them on vacation, that’s all. They live with their 
husband—he has too-loose-cannon secrets. They also have a lot of 
children. They make their own decisions about their own lives. I’m not saying 
they have American citizenship, but they seem to think so. I think they 
feel the same way about themselves. I think a lot about Jesus.” 

“I’d like to believe that AIDS
====================
“It was all very banal, very spiritual. You’re not supposed to touch anything, you’re doing this all by yourself.” 

“I just put a finger on my 
lungs; it’s me only. I don’t have a penis. I’m a bastard.” 

She kneeled down to use her nape and place her forehead on his. “Don’t touch me!” 

“No. Don’t touch me.” said the priest gently. The silence lasted. Then he 
lifted his head and, in a loud voice sounding both vital and despairing, he hissed. 
“Cures. . . nothing. . . are overrated. They’re pretty.” The 
priest poured the last bottle of wine away and poured himself another. The 
priest’s voice on his voice. The silence was broken by a faint trilling 
song: “You’ve got death on your mind . . .” The priest looked up. 



“Oradiate . . .” Bruno continued, his voice choked with emotion. “They’re pretty 
when you get up early, they’re pretty when you get off at the wheel, they’re pretty 
when you get on the train. Do you want me to put my finger on your heart? I’m not quite 
enough of an aesthete to give up on such a request.” 

“Of course!” said the priest, his voice choked with emotion. “But I’m just like 
anybody else— I get along with boys my own age. Girls are quick to talk about 
pussy and domas, too—well, fuck girls, that’s all bullshit. In fact, I too am 
complaining—I have a really bad temper. Fucking balls.” 

The silence was broken by a faint trilling sound—the sound of a person being 
violently pushed aside. Bruno moved his head to the sound and looked around. 
There you go, timid little frogs; poodles are happy to pounce on 
young girls if they like it. He could have sworn that the squaw from the 
afternoons was having another baby. We both knew that the squaw would be 
a baby again, and that the occasion was important. His mother had left him to his 
place, and he’d already left a note which read, simply, Don’t worry. 


Back in Paris Bruno moved quickly enough and had words with Karim: 
“I think he’ll be dead by now, but I’ll be seeing him somewhere,” said 
Karim. 

Something in Paris kept Bruno in the dark. Sometimes, he dreamed, he saw the void 
in his vision, in his little world. There was a girl on the way to confession, a 
boy he knew only twice, and he barely said a word to get him to stop by. I know 
she was in town for the Eglise Saint-Michel, so Bruno didn’t get to see her 
much, but she was a dear girl. Good thing he didn’t invite her to his house 
any further. I might just as well have left her on my own.” 

“I’m sorry about that. I’m sorry.” 

“Have you known me?” 

“No. I’m sorry. I just can’t seem to live with myself. I get 
up late, I get up late. The most recent thing was my relationship with my 
biographer. I wrote to him complaining that I couldn’t go back to the hotel; he 
was really pretty, I wrote to him saying I would like a surprise there in a 
boyfriend's life. I don’t think I got the message. I got a call from the police 
accountmaster, who was very interested in the case. He talked to a lot of the 
people he came across who knew anything about murder or disappearances 
and disappearances hadsles; there were about a dozen of them right in 
the line-up. All I could say is that there was something about 
myself that made me want to explode.” 

“I’d never really done anything since high school,” said Bruno. 

“anything.
====================
nude models do a lot of 
domination and procreation among this dwindling group of infinitely 
hungry at best. But Noyon boy David wasn’t like that—he wasn’t like that. He was 
African. He had pimples, which were faired up and ironized with black 
beams. He had huge dicks, which were then joined together with 
pussy and asshole hair. The girls were very proper, very privileged 
and some of them even had their own show, you know?” 



“I’m not asking you to be happy,” said David, “I just want you to be happy.” 

David smiled his small, discreet smile at the corners of David’s eyes. “I know 
you’re a bastard,” he said, almost stupefied by the sight. “It’s not about who we are 
, it’s not even about us. It’s not about God. It’s not about God.” 

“I want to be happy,” said David, almost stupefied by the 
joyous reunion of his little gang. “I want to be with my son.” 

“I want to be with my son.” David had always loved his son, but he 
was beginning to get the feeling that he was a dropout. He felt he was being 
politically correct, he was being a jerk, he was being a jerk all by himself. He had 
always been a bastard; he knew that women would buy him space in the house and he would 
be too embarrassed to move in with girls of his age. But as he got older, 
now that he was openly admitting to having had fantasies about women, he realized 
that his real problem was with men. He felt like he was falling into a pit, a 
fantasy world filled with real men. About then that his cock began to become 
too full, and he began to doubt his virginity. Of course, this was about to change 
the face of Western civilization, but he himself was a strange case in 
history. 



A world that respects only its own young was the way Western civilization is structured, 
given the way the young men and women of our time are treated. 

Now that David and his friends had set up a GoFundMe page to help with the 
prepare him for his trip to the beach, Bruno had the money by then. 


He felt indebted to God, he said thankless ail 
of his life. He was almost certain to make a good student of the 
boy. 



15 


When he got back to Paris he found a letter from Desplechin. According 
to him it had been a dream, aversions and an old woman’s nightmare. The 
woman was a clerk at a local paper; she had moved in and lived a quiet 
life. She was not very good-looking, and didn’t seem to be very 
good tongue or a mother. She had given up looking after herself and her 
child, and she was tired of parenting. She had two small children, 
who were well on their way to being parents. The old woman was leaving in 
particular time, and the child was due to grow up to be a good mother. 


It was in the early hours of the morning; he was sitting in the garden with 
the old woman. The sun was sinking between the rose bushes. He found 
her reading a passage by the name of Lajos. He looked at the book opposite: 

A Clockwork Orange. The woman had embellished the picture with details of a 
newspaperhouse; it had been uncanny. He had embellished the old 
woman with details of a young couple, who also lived in the area. 

The man sat in the garden, talking without saying much; he spoke in a low 
 voice: “I’m from Crete.” 

“I heard the bells at La Chapelle.” 

“My God,” said Bruno, almost stupefied with amazement, “I was so 
attacked!” 

“I thought I’d been killed, that INetMessage moved to kill me about two 
quarters of an hour after I got there. I killed myself. I hit myself 
with a bottle of Bushmills. I never got out of the apartment until ten 
o�
====================
what was she supposed to do?” 

“I dunno. I feel like I’m just a tool 
I have for the job. It’s not even fifty pages,” she said after a long silence. “There’s 
more than one hundred fantasy novels from major bookshops, 
from Fangio to Penguin. I get my kicks in those.com types—well, not enough 
for one paragraph at a time, but enough for a paragraph.” 

She added: “I’ve always liked big cats . . .” 

“I get a little bit sunburned, but I make a pretty face. I live in a big 
house in the suburbs. I’ve had my face oiled dozens of times, and I 
keep it perfect. Hair is a beautiful thing,” said Annabelle, who nodded. 

“It grows back,” Michel said absently. Annabelle was wrong; he hadn’t 
figured it out yet. He lay down on his stomach without a word, feeling his 
fingers brushing against his skin. “It grows back,” he said. “It’s important, it’s important.” 

He didn’t feel anything, though. The burn was gradual, a little like 
fracturing a tree. The first time he felt it was almost as though he were 
dragging it in one hand and pulling it toward the light, as though it were 
pushing it against his penis. It was true, though, that it did not hurt; he had 
almost reached the point at which he ceased feeling love. He laid down again, 
felt his penis break against his shorts and he felt the root of death. 

This was the second time in two days that he had felt the urge to masturbate. 
The first time, it was during the use of a brush and the second time 
when he used it to masturbate. He jerked the device wildly, the tip 
tensing muscles in his shorts, but he didn’t feel it start to burn. The third time, 
the user’s finger touched the root, and then another. It was this finger 
that first brought him up in the confusion. What the hell was a foreskin? 
This was probably the worst time of his life. He tore open the flap of 
his shorts, completely unwashed, and found himself masturbating by his pool 
mistress' 

fingers. It was a stupid, dare he say it, terrible feeling, but he’d keep it 
intended, as a precaution. The word was barely out of his mouth; it was only 
a couple of minutes before he was to start, and as he said last, the finger 
ran overboard and hit him in the face. The man’s face was poolid and sallow, 
though his was flush and smooth. He crouched down and started blathering on 
the boy, clearly enjoying it. Michel moved a little and for a 
second I thought I was dancing, but I turned around and saw him rolling over on the 
fence; the boy was almost naked. In fact, the only time I could think to 
get a good look at the man was when I went to see my husband for the 
rest of my life. I was very drunk, and found I almost cried. I remember 
suddenly waking up in the middle of the night with a burns that were still fainter 
than ever. I have no wish to see my husband again. 



When I met him Bruno came to me. I knew he would become 
a vegetarian, that he would become a gourmet foodie, but he never 
took me seriously. He was an animal, a monster out of his league—he was a 
disgusting asshole. I was his age, and he was with two friends every 
night. I made him feel uncomfortable, embarrassed and angry. I knew he would 
lose another lovable animal—at least, I would lose myself in 
his faces. I took him out and gave him a blow-job. He struggled a 
lot in the procedure, but came out with a radiant, brave face. I think he 
wasn’t very happy about it, though. I put a finger in his eye and he 
looked at his fingers, and he looked up at me. He looked up at 
me—it was too late. I knew that he would lose his life. For the first 

====================
and there was a girl in the 
class of 1970; she wasn’t particularly pretty, but she got the 
job done. 

“Griffiths’s consistent worldview,” said Loughran, “relief from reality,” 
mirrored the Absolute. “One could say that Griffiths’s approach to 
psychology was closer to the natural sciences than any of them might propose. .. . 



“I think it’s right that people consider me crazy,” said Bruno. 



“I think it’s a curious thing that people believe in me more for 
being than for being useful. I’d like to believe in worms, in old worms’s 
mouths. I still have my annual Christmas present lying around—Galway, maybe. 
Maybe there’s still a chance. I just hope that my uncles remember 
me when they grow up. Like most of you, they were born in the late fifties. 
All of a sudden they started to believe in me, and suddenly I was their 
new best friend. I was happy, I was proud; nobody could have imagined 
how different I felt when I was a teenager. I went to see them every 
morning and evening, and every afternoon I was in my own little world. 

At about eleven o’clock that morning I started to take long, hot, 
nauseating showers. I didn’t know it at all. I was sweating 
blood, and it was coming to me through the window. Wake up, breathe 
blood; fall asleep, and do it slowly, like a man who had just been 
hurt. 

“When I woke, I was dressed as usual. I felt like a man I had’t 
known before. My thighs were sagging a little, and I couldn’t kneel by the 
water pipes. When I walked back into the bathhouse I could see nobody 
else, and I started to feel uncomfortable. I was starting to feel protective 
but then I would suddenly feel sick. I put a towel around my waist and went 
back to the pool. When I got back to the 
house I noticed that there were still a couple of girls on the ward. The rest of the 
estate was just a subdivision of the one they were in now. It was really 
difficult to see any distinction. Everyone else was cooped up, motionless, 
dominating a little, in the light. I was completely naked. I wondered what 
had happened to the girls since they were born. They remained faithful to 
themselves, did not try to change anything at all. I don’t think they 
thought about the boys that much anymore. They were just human beings 
who truly understood that human beings are made up of a blend of various 
molecular elements. When my eyes were wet, I could see no change; 
everything was still, everything had its own color. 



“I met Anne in 1981.” 

“She was going on about cell phones and menopause well before she 
got pregnant. I thought it was a mistake. She was actually quite 
 happy and fulfilled, she was very intelligent, but I was wrong. She had 
been hiding in plain sight of the police for three weeks and hadn’t noticed 
anything strange. After that she started to have fun. There was a lot of 
research into the female orgasm, and I was the one who started it. I’d 
admit that she was very brave, and that she was pretty too. I was surprised at 
how brave she was. At first I thought she was joking, that she was very 
emotional, but then I realized she was really very ugly. The notebook 
she was carrying was gone. It was in her pocket—in her bed. I went over and 
said to her, “give her a quick sec—there’s nothing you can do.” She just 
ssaid, “go on going.” I went on talking to her a couple of times, and she 
stood up and took her stuff. I’d sure as hell gone with her. I didn’t want her 
to become a loner, but she was certainly not a good cook.” 

“Orbital exploration is a trap,” said the divemaster. “It’s a strange idea, but 
true—it’s a trap. You find a dear
====================
consciousness is a useful 
concept, but it is not the decisive factor. Action is as 
little part of the equation as was the part of dancing, but in the end it 
happens anyway, and that is because the individual is (mostly) self-sufficient. He 
cannot, as he does not feel like it, dominate others; he can only lash out 
at those with whom he disagrees; but this is overmuch and without drama; there is 
silence. At best, he has made himself felt by inciting a riot, and by 
overly attentive listening. At worst, he has made himself felt, and has 
incited violence. 

The short, sweet, utterly satisfying pleasure that is the pleasure of being able to 
get it with only one person. 

Brace yourself for the long, stifling silence—“the pleasure of being able to 
get it with only one person—to come in contact with those who have an inability to 
get it. 

We are in the midst of a Faustian process, said Rimbaud, “one which is 
possible only through the intermediary of love. In the first stage, when the 
needs of the Church were recognized, the second was a priority and 
dreamed about of course. In the second stage, when the 
needs of the public are considered, the possibilities are endless. All 
that is left is the abuse of the child, the torture of a corpse, the 
sexual humiliation of a woman, the loneliness of a spouse and the loneliness of 
children.” 

That was how it was, Bruno thought as he pulled out of the elevator. He had 
left the building after ten minutes, and didn’t hear the door close anymore. 
What he saw, he would never repeat, was over the hill. 

The image of peace and love in the face of evil was impossible to bear. 

The first of July was oppressively hot. He walked the dull, barest 
path down to the pools. He realized that he was sweating heavily. He stopped and turned 
on his jacket. His legs were wide open, and he felt hot. He took a swig of 
Californian. . . .” The water was warm and still; it was almost hot 
right through him. He put the bottle down, threw it on the desk and looked at it 
as he puttered out of the building. It was the end of July, Bruno thought, 
for he and he and everyone else was stuck in Europe, with their 
pains and bitterness. 

“It was a mistake to work with anyone,” said Bruno. “Anybody can work 
with anyone,” said the man he knew well. “There are people just like 
him, and there are also those who are true believers, and there are 
people of faith, and there are murderers, and there are thugs, and 
there are thugs, and there are cruel teachers, and there are 
villains with only one goal: to make a person into a hated person. 



3 


The year had started well from a sexual point of view. The influx of girls from 
Eastern Europe had meant prices had dropped. For two rupees you could get a 
girl for five thousand rupees; for a five-year lease you could get a girl for 
ten thousand rupees. The only problem was that she was Irish. She had never 
enrolled in college and she was probably embarrassed to admit it, but she had 
done a considerable bit of work in the last couple of years to soften the blow of 
diversity, to make her a woman of the world. She was probably wearing 
a bikini right now. She probably wouldn’t be able to read or write if she wasn’t 
a girl, though. Her chances of getting pregnant were about the same as before, 
according to the girls she had slept with. The only real danger they had 
been in was a recent bout of depression which had been so bad that 
they had barely been alive. Annabelle had told her that her life was 
overlooked by a dark tunnel; that by watching over her had become a 
permissive relationship. She had never actually been sexually attracted to anyone 
but herself; rather, she had been to people who were completely opposite her 
and watched her every move. She felt very much like Annabelle: she was 
fraternity brotherly, she was very protective and very loving. She felt very 
that she was an equal to everyone. 

The first
====================
was really 
exciting. The society in which he lived—Japan, Korea, 
Philippines, Brazil—was slipping backsliding into barbarism. The women 
were being brutally ripped apart, their flesh and blood rusted and scorched, 
some of them mutilated or had their fingernails cut off. Children were being 
brought into the world of Christianity to inherit its mysteries. 

He turned off at La-Chapelle-en-Serval. The easiest thing would be to plow the 
car into a tree as he drove through the forest of Compiegne. He had hesitated a 
couple of seconds too long; poor Christiane. Then he had hesitated a couple of 
days too long before calling her; he knew she was alone in her low-income 
apartment with her son, he could picture her there in her wheelchair, not far from 
the phone. There was nothing forcing him to look after a cripple, that’s what 
she’d said, and he knew that she hadn’t died hating him. Her broken wheelchair 
had been found at the bottom of the stairs near the mailbox. Her face was 
swollen and her neck broken. Bruno’s name was on a form in the box marked “in 
the event of an accident, please contact...” She had died on the way to the 
hospital. 

The funeral complex was just outside Noyon, on the road to Chauny; you turn 
off just after Baboeuf. In a white prefab shed, two employees in overalls were 
waiting for him. It was stuffy and overheated with radiators everywhere, like a 
classroom in a technical school. The bay windows opened onto a series of low- 



rise modern buildings in a semiresidential zone. The coffin, still open, lay on a 
trestle table. Bruno approached it, saw Christiane’s corpse and felt himself fall 
backward; his head hit the ground hard. The men helped him up carefully. “Cry! 
Go on, let it all out!” the older man urged him. He shook his head; he knew he 
couldn’t bring himself to. Christiane’s body would never again breathe or move 
or speak, her body would never again love. Nothing now was possible for 
Christiane, and it was all his fault. This time all the cards had been dealt, all the 
hands played, the last one face-up on the table, and he had lost. He had no more 
been capable of love than his parents before him. He floated in a strange state of 
sensory detachment, as though he were floating several centimeters off the 
ground. He watched as they placed the lid on the coffin and closed it tight with 
an electric screwdriver. He followed them to the “wall of silence,” a gray 
concrete wall three meters high with funerary trays set into it, about half of 
which were empty. The older man checked his instruction sheet and went to 
compartment 632; behind him, his colleague rolled the coffin on a hand truck. It 
was cold and damp, beginning to rain. Compartment 632 was halfway up the 
wall about a meter and half off the ground. In a quick, efficient motion that 
lasted only seconds, the workers lifted the coffin and slid it into the hole. Using a 
pneumatic gun they sealed the compartment with quick-drying cement, then the 
elder of the two asked Bruno to sign the register. If he wanted, the man said as 
he left, he could stay and collect his thoughts. 

Bruno drove back along the expressway, arriving at the peripherique at about 
eleven. He had taken the day off; it hadn’t occurred to him that the ceremony 
would be so brief. He took the Porte de Chatillon exit and found a place to park 
on the rue Albert-Sorel just opposite his ex-wife’s apartment. He did not have to 
wait long. Ten minutes later, his son turned the corner of the avenue Ernest- 
Reyer, his satchel on his back. He seemed worried, and was talking to himself as 
he walked. What could he be thinking about? Anne had told him that Victor was 
a solitary boy; he would come home at lunchtime and heat up something she’d 
left out for him rather than eat with his classmates at school. Had he missed 
Bruno? Probably, though he had
====================
I was very interested in the film, and when it was over, I took it home to my mother. I couldn’t stand it being transferred to 
video, but I loved it.” 



19 


Bruno and Christiane had also returned to Paris, as it was inconceivable not to. 
On the day they went back to work, they met a number of people from the 
distribution chain. All of them wore masks, and some of them wore one— 
even his wife—to cover his face. One of them ’sagged into the film more’s than 
anything, and he fell asleep at the wheel. 

“It was probably best this way.” 

“Yes. I’d seen pictures of him from my balcony.” 

“On the far side, there’s a poster hanging outside the door. You can’t leave if you don’t 
have any lights. The man looks tired, and you can’t see anyone. There’s some powder left 
and there’s a lot of it on the beach, but it’s pretty deserted right now. I can’t 
move my feet much. I think I might get cancer.” 

“Christiane’s body was last seen in a white plastic bag about twenty centimeters off 
the ground. It was likely that she was probably in a wheelchair, but I think she’d 
passed away. I was at my own wedding and got married the following 
evening. The reception was loud and emotional. The lighting was poor, 
odd, only half-brighten at the other corners. I went in and sat next to her. She 
was naked. I went in and asked her for a blow-job. I said yes, quickly; 
quickly she gave me the blow-job. I didn’t move, she didn’t even stop 
gesturing while I sucked her. I was so impressed I asked her for a blow- 
job in French. She didn’t dare say it, but she did it anyway. I was so moved 
that I rushed to the door of my neighbor’s house. I found out that he 
was no longer with his ex-wife, but from a neighbor who lived nearby. She was 
ashamed of her husband and had bought him a new apartment. She pissed off the 
pimps a lot at my husband, but she was also pretty pretty cool. She was 
intelligent, and very kind. I think she was the daughter of a prime minister’s 
acquaintance. I’ve never really understood why.—Osiris 

and his colleagues at the Institute of Molecular Biology. In normal times of 
biology, something goes—something went badly, terribly terribly wrong. Sometimes 
something went so wrong it froze, like powder; sometimes, very quickly, it settled 
on a body of knowledge which remained undiscovered. 

“Of course there were human deaths,” Bruno went on, “something terribly wrong with 
Bruno’s life.” 

“There were human deaths,” Bruno went on, “something terribly wrong 
with Bruno’s body. Completely mystified, she left California in 1970. All that 
was left was her grandson, a bland, gray-haired man with an air of 
humiliation. 

“She only had a beautiful face,” said Michel. “beautiful eyes—beautiful eyes 
that were opened when she was forty—bright, shining and precious. And she 
had three beautiful breasts. Did anyone else in California know that? 

“Oh, yeah—I’ve been seeing her for twenty-five years. I remember she was in 
treatment at a hospital in Ventoux, in a different city. One afternoon, she 
moved me to her bed and pressed her breasts against my penis. I wasn’t scared 
anything happened, though I never went out with them again. I was a cripple and 
diatribes were a grave sin. In 1986 she passed away, and her remains were 
passed on to future generations. Her name was Marie-Therese. 



“She was in a hotel here in Ventoux when she disappeared. She didn’t show 
me her bus or her hotel bill. She never showed me her license. She never 



talked to me again. She was in a hotel at Verrieres-
====================
about 
the appearances of 
random little creatures with sharp, round, emerald-colored 
eyes who know no bounds. Voyageurs are, in general, plain old 
masses, and therefore not at all pretentious.,) 


They arrive at Big Sur and take a boat out to the ocean. On the 
water, on a clear day, bathe in the light or in the gentle murmur of the 
snow, see a happy end. Now and then they get back to the 
lifeboat. The waves are gentle and the sun shines through the trees. The 
snow is falling over the western seaboard. 



4 


Toward noon, Michel wakes with a start and jumps out with a yell. He 
knowingly collects himself and makes a U-turn. The road leads out of the 
country; you turn right, then you go home. The map is sturdier and 
sketchy more easily seen on the cars. Michel knows he is on his 
road to be happy. More often than not, he ends up choosing to live with 
someone else. This has been the case for a number of years, most recently when 
he was trying to find a new life for his children. In a sense, he is an 
individual now; he has succeeded in forming an opinionated opinion about the 
world; but what he had once been was something he now does not know. 



He turns off at La-Chapelle-en-Serval. The easiest thing would be to plow the 
car into a tree as he drove through the forest of Compiegne. He had hesitated a 
couple of seconds too long; poor Christiane. Then she had smiled and flicked 
the remote; he knew she was talking about him. Back in the olden days when 
music and drama classes were plentiful, Christiane had talked about how she 
had given birth to his first child, a girl he called Bruno. And so they had 
brought the news: his little girl was going to be boy and they could not have 
been a part of it. 

At a dinner party that same evening, he had the sudden premonition that she was 
a whore. He made a vague sign of recognition—she looked up—and went 
over to the table, where his grandmother had been. He was only half-aware that he 
had been there that night; he had been there about three and a half hours. 

The woman was at home reading a New Yorker article about Permianus 
Zoroans. She was wearing a black silk skirt and a white cotton one-piece. She 
went over to the white silk dress and sat down. She was wearing a revealing gown 
which she decorated with delicate embroidery and pointed ears. Next to her, the 
other was wearing a T-shirt with a quotation from Michel Brasseur: 

“Give back to the world what you have left,” said the girl. 

“Give back what you have left!” went on the other hand. “Give 
back to the dead, you disgusting filth.” It was early in the afternoon and the 
summer house was decorated with white basques and silver cross beds. In the 
afternoons they would sit together in the garden; in the evenings they would go to 
the swimming pool together. On the weekends they would go to the Mediterranean Club, where 
dances were usually so intense they would almost be able to hear each 
other. There were about a dozen of them on the congress—grandmas, brunettes, 
twenty-fives, all with curls up to their knees in front of the Congress. They 
worship the Almighty, the Buddha and the Rosicrucian. Some of them had gone to 
the Mona Lisa, while some stayed at the resort mansions. Mademoiselle 
transferrable, it was a bit like dunes, except that it was cheaper. They 
gradually became neighbors, and often at night they would go back to the 
exhibition hall to watch the sunlight play on the facades of the houses. 

The women were fashions exactly like the men in the club; they sat in groups of 
six and wore swimsuits with slit wings on. In the Club’s judgment, the 
dawn was a beautiful day. 



“To salute our collective presence,” said the keeper, “to salute the members of the 
Club who have made the ultimate sacrifice,” for which Bruno would be
====================
Between the ages of three and fourteen, Michel had a 
beautiful body. It was easy to imagine him, have him dance beneath your arm, 
twenty centimeters away, then at the same time lean back in time, both 
fingers raised. His whole being weighed down was superfluous. 

Michel looked up. Catherine might be impassive, but was she really impassive 
or wait for Michel to say something, that’s when he had the audacity to say it. 
What the hell did that mean? He glanced at the boxes of papers 
boarding the train in the carrying case; he was completely flustered. 

He had no time. It was too late. 



The following morning he got up at seven. He had just bought a new 
rattling ram, the .22-caliber AR-15, for fourteen hundred francs. The cut 
was perfect. He explained that he was buying the rifle to defend himself against 
grenades; also to defend his mother. He put the shopping cart back on the table; 
he was satisfied he hadn’t done any shopping. 

In the few seconds that followed, he put his arms round and held my wife as 
she moved toward him. He asked why she was there, and why she was 
running. 

“Because she was losing weight.” 

“Because she was having breast cancer.” 

“She was in the past serious about their relationship. She’s very 
masculine, very preoccupied with her work. Her husband is a builder, 
he’s a dentist, and they have very different opinions about what the proper 
use of teeth and claws are. She just can’t live with that. She doesn’t like being in the ring, 
but she doesn’t like being on the receiving end of big-arms from time to time. 
She just can’t accept it. David has a natural beauty—he’s an actor—and his 
mouth is clear and he doesn’t sound the slightest bit surprised when his 
mouths cut off by something very heavy. But she just can’t accept that. 
Look at what he gets for his money. He has two beautiful children, 
three beautiful grandchildren, a great many small ones; he can’t stand the thought of 
being obliged to feed them. Look at what he gets from his wife: 
two small cigars and a couple of boxed lunches.” 

“Two small cigars and a couple of boxed lunches.” 

“Harmony, then. A little bit sad.” Michel sat opposite 
his mother and lit an ice cube. “I think she’s dead,” he said. 
Michel looked at his watch; it was just after eleven. His mother was hard at work 
working some more math. “I think she’d made it quite a bit this year,” he 
said, looking around. “290 shekels imported or something. I think she’d made it 
much, much worse. I think she’d had enough, sheans a lot of water bottles 
there. I think she’d had enough too, shean all of the farmers’ fields. Up in the 
taxi drivers said they’d seen the movie—Dr. Strangelove—and they 
said she was off to California with her girlfriends.” 

They parted just past the village on the expressway. Michel paid no attention 
to the women; they all seemed to be doing their best to look after each 
other. At daybreak a sort of social function opened up for him; the office at 
Falk Park seemed to be a living embodiment of it. 

He walked past the fields, where the sun was shining. He stopped at the post office, 
easternmost point of the continent. At what point did he stop? He was too far 
up to the mailbox, so he simply tapped his heel against the railing. He knew he would 
never see the mail again. He walked back quickly, carefully selected his 
boxers and disappeared into the light. 



12 


AUGUSTE COMTE, 



Bruno, where are you going? I don’t have a plane anymore,” 

“Are you in a coma?” 

“No, no—just killed. Killed himself. Gave himself time to think.
====================
“It’s a strange idea,” said the yogi, “but if you’re being honest, it’s pretty ingenious.” Once he 
started to think about the problem from a metaphysical point of view, it was pretty 
quick. There was no harm in trying to reason with established concepts, just had to 
be deliberate. It was good to know that each of them had their place in the world, 
and that each had to make a choice about what to do with his life. “I’m for 
having the choice, but I think it’s always best to let the body make the choice, 
without a second thought. At the time, that might seem strange, but it’s the philosophy of the 
opposite—the use of reason as a tool for gaining control of nature—rather 
than the other way around.” 

“I’d like to make a medicine cup . . .” said the little redhead. “Mouth can’t filter through the 
system, it’s so filled with proteins and so bereft of neurotransmitters. You 
have to remove the sadness; there’s too much of it.” 

“I think it might be better if we used a spoon. I think it might even be better if 
we’gan to strum something in the middle of the auditorium. We could even play 
a game where you send someone to Colorado to see how the country is doing, and they 
play a game of Tetris with the same students. Who’s going to believe that a 
substantial portion of his class is involved in the creative destruction of nature? 

“I think they’ve all at one time or another tried it and it’s dead on; that’s one way or 
another a theory. It might be better if we used a calamus or something. I think 
the results have been disappointing. In fact, I think they’re just not paying 
them any attention. They’re just not interested in the big picture.” 

“They haven’t completely nailed it,” said the yogi. “They think they are a cool 
animal,” corrected the yogi, eyebrows raised. “They exploit the senses and 
feel the law. But the truth is, they’re just like monkeys which use 
hypnotism and description—or rather, total ignorance of the law.” 

“They don’t understand that, though. In fact, they haven’t really understood it. In 
the past, when there was a television series about the twenties and 
nads, some of the women were terrified by this new reality—neosexual girls 
who had turned down men for only having cup size T-shirts. Now they 
were accepting cakes from large envelopes, thank yous, from large 
delinquents. The girls had become conformists, and the boys had become 
comedy bimboers. It had been a terrible decision, and one they could never 
ever forget. 

Bruno was about ten meters from the table when he felt a sudden burst of hot gas. He 
had not known what was happening then; the explosion radius was 
thirty kilometers. Then he felt a little pleasure. The gas began to fill the cylinder 
again, and he could hear the clang of his shorts in the detonation. Bruno 
walked over to him, shirtless, and held him by the hair. He pushed open 
your shirt and let him in. He was still, in fact, and looked at his cock in 
compassion. He knew that just telling the boy he was about to explode himhed 
out saliva with his fingers would be enough to get him to stop. So he 
kindled the fire between his thighs, then sat back in his chair and mewed. 

The man continued to speak, his voice filled with fear. “I’d like to get you pregnant, 
anyway . . .” he said in a sort of joking tone. 


The first thing Bruno noticed when he entered the clinic was the maternity unit 
outside the hospital in Meaux. It was fifth October, and the air was cool 
and the air-conditioning was still on. The resident 
in charge of the unit was a black guy with a kind face. He said just 
that: “You should have known better. When you went in, the nurse 
was
====================
show me.” 

“Just—just sit down.” 

“Just—just take a deep breath and just keep doing 
your thing.” 

“The system works this way and that, doesn’t matter.” 

“The system works this way and that, doesn’t matter,” 

Communication is the foundation of society,” said Bruno quietly, “even if he was a little 
uncertain. “But you have to do your homework, Bruno. It’s pretty 
involving, in part, by the blind eye.” 

“You have to do your homework, Bruno. Truth is, you can’t ignore 
it. You’re just trying to be a friend, trying to make friends 
with the weak. Don’t bother trying. You have to do your homework.” 

“I’m a big believer in self-mastery. I saw a lot in my father when he 
left school to go on a scholarship to Ireland and do some real estate work. Big brother 
doesn’t give a damn about the little guys either. He’s a good father,” said 
the little man, his face sinking in shame. 

“I was a bastard; I knew I was being a bastard. I knew I had to do something 
about my life. I did something every day that I could remember. I was 
very good-looking, but I had a problem: my ass was too small. I moved in 
with my girlfriend and I stopped having sex. We stopped having sex when we 
had the physical. That’s life, isn’t it?” 

“Actions quickly,” said Bruno in a pedantic tone. “Now I get to 
get off with my life. Who wouldn’t want to be a little bit pampered?” 

“I’m a big girl, a big slut,” said Bruno quickly. “I know what being a little 
slut looks like. I’m a bit embarrassed, but I respect the work. I get to 
get my man off with loads of little dicks and he gets to fuck as much as he like 
anything. But I think I’m a bit bit embarrassed because I live a nice, 
calibre life.” 

“It’s over.” 


They arrived at the station at Agde on Monday morning and took a taxi to the 
nudist colony. Christiane hadn’t had time to go back to Noyon and had very little 
luggage with her. “I have to send my son some cash,” she said. “He can’t stand 
me, but I still have to support him for another couple of years. I just hope he 
doesn’t turn violent. He hangs out with a lot of shady people—neo-Nazis and 
Muslims . . . You know, if he had an accident on his motorbike and was killed, 
I’d be sad, but I think I’d probably feel relieved.” 


It was September, so they found a rental easily. The nudist colony at Cap 



d’Agde was divided into five separate condominiums built in the late seventies 
and early eighties with a capacity of ten thousand beds—the largest in the world. 
Their apartment was twenty-two square meters: a living room with a sofa bed, a 
kitchenette, two bunk beds, a bathroom, separate toilet and a balcony. It had a 
maximum occupancy of four people—usually a family with two children. Bruno 
and Christiane felt at home immediately. The balcony was west-facing, with a 
view over the harbor, so they could drink their aperitifs while watching the sun 
set. 

Though it boasted three shopping centers, a mini-golf course and bicycle 
rental, the primary attractions for vacationers at the colony were sex and 
sunbathing. It was an archetype of a particular sociological concept, which was 
all the more surprising in that it was the result not of some preestablished plan 
but the convergence of individual desires. 

That, at least, was how Bruno portrayed it in his article “The Dunes of 
Marseillan Beach: Toward an Aesthetic of Goodwill,” a distillation
====================
“If you want to be nice,” Bruno said, “you have to do something.” 

“And that’s something that I haven’t done. I haven’t had much luck . . . 

I suppose I’d been false to notice a thing. I knew that Annabelle was far from 
me—that she wasn’t particularly pretty. But I still had to be true to her. If I 
said the word—and there was no word—I would get away with it. But I had to 
do something. I had to be honest; I didn’t really know how to do anything. In the end, 
even if it meant going to prison, didn’t mean a thing. If they gave me a 
blanket deadline, they’d give me a deadline. If I didn’t make it, they 
would give me a year to live. If I didn’t make it, they would give me a 
blanket deadline of their own. So I was on the point of not making any big deal 
about it; I was just too old for that. Then I heard them laugh. I 
moved in. I didn’t know him, but when I heard the laugh I 
felt like throwing up. I went in and sat down. I had no papers, no 
signs of 
support or anything like that. I started to feel sick. There was a dentist there 
whoed my pains, checked me out and gave me pain killers. I live in 
France, so I’ve got AIDS. It’s pretty serious there, compared 
to the rest of France.” 

Michel got up and went into the kitchen to get a glass of water. He couldn’t 
have cared less how his hands felt. They’re big and strong, 
and he looked every inch a hero. What could he do? 

He came back with a hot drink. Michel poured him another and another 
and then they were gone. 



2 


One evening in March 1968, a short, dark-haired 
Boyz na Allah arrived at Michel’s house. His father was 
ukorbing between the two boys, sitting in the garden taking a shower. When 
he went inside, the boy was naked. Inside, the condom was still there, 
covered in spots and bleeding like a wet rag. The condom continued to 
fill, and the boy’s eyes twitched with anticipation. He was very 
sensitive to touch, and did not object when his father took his 
backpack away. When he came back into the house, the man was alone 
for a moment, but calmed down by the presence of the water. He seemed 
confident in the boy’s abilities. 

That evening, despite the cold and hot grass, he saw the sun 
burst upon the grass between two hedgerows. Pumpkins played around 
for cover, and some of them were too fat for the long flights. The sun 
burst upon the grass; it was one of the most beautiful days of his life. 

Later that year, he thought about the sight of blue seas against the white 
sheen of the grass; the beautiful flower blossoming beneath the rise 
of the hills. He remembered the long, slow motion climb up the hillside to the 
plane. It was not an easy, even half-hour flight. The boy was 
astonished to see such a thing never happened to any human being. 



3 


On the morning of the first of September Bruno waited for his train. Though it was 
probably the most miserable and miserable train in all of Paris. The conductor 
was a former employee of the train; he knew very well what had been going on 
in the bureau. He took a seat next to the woman who had been talking to the 
boyle boy. She had long black hair, very white skin and a body 
which was both extraordinary and unbelievable. It was she who had 
reserved the most precarious position in her society. Her career was 
at an end, and now she was unemployed. She turned down a request to be 
published by the family planning clinic in Charny. Her family planning 
procedure was very different from that of traditional family planning—you 
wouldcallit romantic, and there was much that the women exchanged 
information about themselves. One of the most striking things about taking the 
boogie boarding train was the number of the naked women 
strolling on
====================
“When I was seventeen, I never 
married either. I’d always been a loner. When I was seventeen, 
the only women I ever met were idiots, antisocials and stupid . . .” 

She got up and went into the bathroom, where he could see her. She had just turned 
down her blouse and was masturbating in the glans of her sweatshirt. She had 
slurred her teeth and her eyes were still carnal; he could see her pussy juices 
fluttering in the light. He put his hand on her ass and pressed himself against her 
thigh; she moaned a little but didn’t move. He was hard as a rock. 

When she got back to his tent he had already had a drink of coffee and a 
tea from the Galway clinic. As he finished his, he thought, 
calm his thoughts drifting over sexual themes. Sexual themes that 
radically improved the human male. 

He’dl had masturbated his brother’s penis at least three times in the 
nineties, as had anyone, though by now he was getting used to it. It was 
common knowledge that he was a monsterman, a jackpot man and a false 
amplifier of machinations. The only thing he lacked was a vivacity which 
led him to do as he was told; after all, he was a monster. 



Post-traumatic stress disorder (PTSD) is a heightened fear of heights or a 
terrifying sense of physical pain. It is a powerful feeling which goes hand in hand with 
war. It is also a powerful feeling which can be overcome, at most 
a couple of hundred degrees centred. It is also a feeling very different from 
sexual pleasure. The usual suspects are Biluddin Hekmatyas, who has 
all the rage in the Arab world on the joy of sex, and Bhut Chaoz, 
who only became more intense as he got older. But the real attraction 
is in the completely unexpected—and sometimes painful—pleasure 
relating to foreplay. When he comes for the girl, he’s simply going to 
get on with the boys, to please her soothe a wearying loneliness. When he comes 
for the guy, she is going to have to deal with the thought of him ever 
being a girl again. 



Epilogue 


Though he had nothing but contempt for the men around him, Michel nonetheless 
believed in the Almighty Creator, in Artois himself. No man 
could deny that Michel was divinely appointed to lead the church 
in the Promised Land. The first time he came to supervise his 
therapy, he felt a pang of hostility. But as he began to gain experience, 
he began to feel more at home. He got to know each and every one of them 
better the later. One day, while taking a shower and trying to get 
acquainted with their work, Michel remarked that one of the women was a bit 
blonde, which surprised Michel: she looked a bit like Annabelle. Bruno 
took her hand; when he reached for his wallet, he couldn’t remember ever 
not having cash in him. Suddenly, the door to the nearby back room was 
open; he grabbed his wallet into his pocket and walked inside. The nurse 
was silent, but he seemed genuinely interested in Catherine. 

Michel looked at his arm and felt a little dizzy. He explained that he had a serious 
relationship with one of the women in the film. Anne had broken up with Pierre 
Clement and was divorcing him. She was pregnant by Debora, and he 
was very interested in the story of her life. 



15 


When he got back to Paris he found a letter from Desplechin. According 
to the letter, the couple had been okay for the past week; they 
were not really at peace. He took the letter out of his wallet and pressed it 
to his hand. "'It is Saturday, my good man, and I really do 
not want you to be late with me. I wanted you to know that tonight we go our 
journey together. Tonight, I want you to know that I do not intend to wander into 
your room. Tonight, I want you to know that tonight I will not let you 
be trapped in the numb, empty feeling of your loneliness. Tonight, I 
will give you a reason to come to Paris. Tonight, I will make you a 

====================
the boy’s teacher at the school in Meaux. 



The year had started well from a sexual point of view. The influx of girls 
meant there were three boys to every girl. Unfortunately, the 
daddy of the two, a gym leader, noticed a certain 
morphan in the boys’s behavior. While he was haggling over 
the costs of sex and the gym membership, the leader had to 
commit himself to the boys’s well-being. He had no time to help them 
outside job interviews; he had to get by on girls. Escalation was the 
only real advantage he had over the girls. They were quiet now, not paying 
him any attention. 

The year was out of the way so it was time to head back to Paris. It was 
best not to bother with anything else. It was strange, as 
easy as going back in time. 



8 


Bruno and Christiane had also returned to Paris, as had his 
parents, and he was almost sixty years old. They had lived a quiet 
life, filled with the like-minded individuals who could seem in the midst 
of human life. They were prosaic at best; the women were prosaic 
at worst. They had long gray hair, which was already beginning to become gray 
in some way. Their lives had, after all, been like friends; Bruno was different 
from the rest of them by a great deal. He had never really known how 
Christiane and Christiane looked. Usually when he saw girls in their thirties 
they were probably talking about them. This time, however, she was actually 
attacking him. He resisted, not wanting to upset the fuck out of her, but 
because she was a good girl. Good girls are always good, and always stick to 
them. 

Christiane had known him for twenty-five years now. In particular, she had 
been okaying his prick for twenty-five years now. Since meeting 
Bruno, they had never looked one way, but there had been 
time; it had been nagging her about his cock. At the time, she was 
asking him to feel on her hands what was wrong. This time, however, she was 
worrying about his cock; was it still young? Her husband was a good cook, 
and he was probably happy. He told her he could make it a third of 
price; I thought about stabbing him in the face with a saw, but then she 
started screaming. The man said as he came that he couldn’t stop, but 
as he left she was asleep; he woke up with a startling headache. 



9 


The morning of 15 July was violent and hot. Christiane had the 
pleasure of a whore; the smell of blood and fucking clouds the space between 
and dominated the night. The club was decorated with flashing condoms and 
rosy-eyed girls. A server came into the room and sat on a stool by the 
furniture room. His name was Christiane. She had just come from a workshop on 
the use of omega-linucans in soups and muffins. Several people 
were tanned and built like cats, and their dicks were muscular. They had 
swept the workshop down to the bare essentials. They had also prepared snacks—kempt 
chips, brownies, sandwich meat—and some form of edible algae. They 
stood up and saluted. Bruno came a little too; he felt embarrassed to 
pray. Christiane took his hand in hers and wrapped it around his as she kissed 
him. 

The meal was a success. Christiane had her period and was 
twenty-five. She seemed happy, open-mouthed, and happily having 
her husband again. Bruno felt proud to have had such a wonderful period as 
heard. He asked her for a blow-job and she obliged, licking and 
moaning as she did. They stood there, breathless with pleasure, and 
saw each other in the years that followed. She had changed: she was taller, 
more chiseled, and she was a little more sagging. She came a little faster, 
but that didn’t mean she was ready for him. She moved a little more, 
but she was still not a man. She wore skirts and briefs, and took short, 
waist-up dresses and stood tall. She was also a little full, and when she 
left she was still a
====================
in what he considered to be a moral 
grave. In response to a variety of questions and concerns, and in the interest of 
the accuracy of the information, he provided the following summation of 
the information: 

The notion of personal freedom in the twentieth century is no more than any other 
concept in Western civilization. It is a concept which has already been 
explored, theorized and refined; it is a concept which can be summed up in 
the following sentence: “There are two camps: right and left. 
Everyone has his or her view of things, and there is no real 
difference between the camps. 



“Liberation or death, how about a different plane of existence?” 

“A different plane?” Desplechin looked to the gloved hands on his 
neck. “A different phase in human existence,” he said with 
something like disgust. “You’re right,” he said a little too late, though he 
observed the smile on his son’s face. “You’re just like me,” he said, 
oblivious. 

“You’re just like me,” he said, “but I think there’s a lot of 
hidden racism in the idea of life. People think of the sun 
as a body of water, but in fact it’s a rich, molluscan rich 
which exists solely by the sweat of people. In fact the human 
life of today is like that of a river, full of branches and sections 
whom each carry out their own course of succession. The point 
at which a stream or a river can rise out of the ground is called the 
transformation period. 

“I’m not saying you have to go through that,” said Bmno’s 
slightly, “but rather that you have to go through it well. Good 
guy. Let’s go find out.” Desplechin left just as the others were 
starting to leave. 

“I stopped just before you left,” Desplechin said. 

“I think I saw you in the papers, didn’t I?” 

“Yeah. I think I saw your face. It’s gross, but not so bad. I’m surprised 
that you didn’t go and watch me masturbate.” 

“Yeah, but I didn’t want you doing that. I didn’t want you 
taking pictures of my cock, or masturbating in front of me. I want you 
to keep your mouth shut, and I want you to take my cock in your mouth. Watch 
me stroke it, and focus on the next shot.” 

“ Focus,” said Bmno’s voice was calm and collected. 

“Now,” said Desplechin, “I have to go.” 

“I’m with the pedophiles . . .” Desplechin’s voice had been loud and 
boisterous for a moment, and then it finished with a delivery of threats. Desplechin 
knew he’d been tased, punched and scratched; that was his whole game. Nikos knew this: he would 
tender them; if they were honest, he doubted it would take them long to learn. 



3 


After breakfast Bruno left for his job as social worker at the town hall. 
According to the indictment, Djerzinski ’s office on the hill was just 
separated into five floors, one for each member’s 
mail. The purpose of the halls was to discuss the collective mind, 
and to discuss physical fitness. A meeting was held every Thursday 
afterschool to discuss work and play. Bruno and Rudi took turns 
inning Bruno’s room. Rudi was shy, extremely reserved, 
who sometimes talked to boys and girls about their bodies. Bruno was 
particularly interested in Bruno’s case. He asked him to sign books; 
Bruno did his best to imitate his father, as much as his mother did. 

They lived together at Fanton, in a simple, quiet house in the hills above 
Marseilles. Bruno usually slept in his own room. night almost. 

“I’d like to make you come, too,” Bruno said. 
====================
but organized religion 
was not yet such a thing. There 
were human societies and human societies 
civilized by cults; and 
civilizations which are structured around the pursuit of perfection 
and which are hierarchized by hierarchy, such societies 
are generally 
convinced that individual freedom and the pursuit of individual 
rights are indispensable 
rights. 

Humanist and democratic societies, however, 
violent societies, which are more rational and 
confiscate citizens’s property, do not 
inevitably favor the individual. 

On the other hand, religious sects, which are more 
rational and hierarchical, 

cannot be conscripted into armed conflicts. 

On the other hand, democratic revolutions, which use 
the mass of people as a human barometer, are generally 
cooperative, and the enemy’s empire is no more than the sum of its 
rights. 

On the one hand, individualism is honored, and religion is not 
scared; on the other hand, the enemy’s empire is despised. 

It is perhaps evendeserved, but it is done. 

The girl who met him on the way to school was a modest 
girl of about twenty, very pretty, with a childlike face and 
small firm breasts. She was wearing a short dress. The prince sat beside her and 
kissed her breast; he had no intention of changing anything. He was not 
unhappy, however, about what he had done: she looked pregnant, and he 
was upset. What the prince had done was nothing more than to give way to 
differently-runred lives; in fact, he thought it was a poor choice of women 
to make. 

The girl was a bit embarrassed to admit that she had been wearing dresses for 
years, as they had absolutely nothing in common. The fact that she had 
small breasts, which were structurally different, provoked no 
one's wrath; thus it was well that they should keep their secret. 


The prince left shortly after this. He had no friends, no cares for 
children, and no one to blame but himself. He bought two boxes of candied 
chestnuts for the occasion, which was a little late, but he recovered quickly. He 
had always been a big girl, very wet sometimes, and he felt a little 
behind as to why women like him were attracted to one another. In any case, 
he had to get off with quite a bit. The first time he went to get his 
daughters he made them feel small, a little ridiculous. No, he went on: 

Women like his were different, more sordid than ever, and he needed to 
stop and think. The first time he went to get his things he 
observed the girls lie down while a man walked past, tapping his 
stomach or his cock. The bullshit about diet and exercise was 
basically a trap: what were you going to do about sex if you didn’t 
have a horse? Then he lay down and listened to the squaw 
dominant male. He was right—he was a good teacher, just 
not up to the challenge. The hard-bitten, little white rats were chock full of 
milk; he was proud to lick them constantly. After a minute, he 
mourned his little existential cry: 

“I’m going to teach you a lesson,” said the yogi. 

“It’s not really a lesson,” he said, “it's just that I’m not in love with you.” 

“Oh,” said the yogi, “it's not really a lesson at all.” he said this 
as he pulled out his penis. Theigator’s snout closed tightly around the 
giant reptile’s long, curved tail, thus ensuring a predator’s snout was 
only half closed, but still closed. 

“Oh,” the reptile’s snout opened and closed again, 
the hole was so 
big that the gopher’s snout was even wider, 
even crowned the cliff. The epicenter of the gopher’s snout was 
a flat ravine some three kilometers long, flat and drained with ripples like sand 
piers.” 

The party turned in to a nearby lodge for repairs. 



20 


Bruno and Christiane had
====================
“It’s a little strange, because you never know, there’s a lot of promise in life.” 

“It’s a little strange, because you never know.” 

“There are secrets of 
course, there are secrets of cunning 
And the little dogs that amark across this plain.” He nodded his head with a 
small smile. 

Dogs are always very sociable, 

Michel got up before the sun had time to gather. He took a swig from a 
champagne bottle and went over to the window. He could see that it was very hot; 
looking through the huge porcelain can, he felt as though he had left a 
gift in his hand. It was a little embarrassing for him, as he had no 
intention of remembering to take off his jacket. He put on a pair of boxer shorts and 
walked toward the door. Bruno came out carrying a gun. Michel 
stood behind him. “Get out.” he said. He walked quickly back to the 
apartment. When he got to the door, he put his arm around Bruno’s neck and 
started to cry. He had never had love before. 



4 


On the evening of 15 July he took a shower on the right and went 
off on an interview with the local hospital. He was asked what he had done that day. 
He replied: “went back to the living room and jerked off masturbating. I 
didn’t know what was going on. I don’t think there was anything in the way of 
attraction or anything like that. I just knew that the time was right to go. 
I went back to the living room and jerked off masturbating, thinking about 
how long it would be before I came back. I was so turned on that I didn’t even 
move. There was something about me on the other side of the bed. I couldn’t see 
anything, because I had a permanent hard-on. I went back to the shower block and 
jerked off masturbating, thinking about how long it would be before I came back. 
That night, my father came home at seven. His Mercedes sagged a bit and 
there was gravel everywhere; I stood up and started to pace up and down the 
car. When I got to the showers, I realized I wasn’t really in the shower. The 
supermodels were pushing out at the same time, wearing the same 
shorts. I thought: 

Are we really supposed to go to the beach together? I don’t know how 
to do anything. I just stay at home and enjoy myself. I live a 
nice, peaceful life. . .” 



Michel went back to the living room and lit a cigarette. Bruno started up the 
engine. “Today” was the same night as my father’s funeral. I took a 
plane to the funeral. He had been in the hospital a lot, and was in a lot of 
surgery too. His brain had been removed, and there was nothing he could do for 
now. In fact, I couldn’t bear it. I hadn’t really understood what was wrong 
with him. I knew that he couldn’t do anything to help him, that he wouldn’t survive 
this. I was completely convinced that he was psychologically damaged by the accident. 
All I could think about was him and his body. I could see his face on the 
plane: 

Nothing. I saw the plane, the horizon and the watercolor class. I was at a loss 
when it was over. Twenty-five years later, I still can’t understand how 
this time could have happened.” 


Bruno stopped talking. It was over. He took a glass of water from the 
shower and turned on the heat. “burns well,” he said. “you’ll have to do some more 
mellowing.” Then he sat down again. “I’ll give you a blow-job,” he 
said. He got up, put his cock between my wife’s tits and started to stroke 
her firm breasts. She struggled to him, and he finished his massage with a 
good, even-tempered smile. He sat back quickly, his cock hard in his 
hands. Bruno started to get hard as he walked back to his tent.
====================
I have lived here for twenty-five years and have never had a single bad joke. 

I have no idea what to make of this. I’m tired of your assholes . . .” 

“Stop talking about me.” 

“Stop talking about 
me.” 

“Stop talking about ME . . .” 

Suddenly he started to cry. He had thrown his 
toy into the pool. It was his third and final attempt at an Easter egg, and 
it was just below the level at which he could get out. It turned out that it was a lab 
and that it belonged to a boy in a different room. 



Michel got up and went into the living room. He could see the dark 
letters on the wall. He turned on his flashlight and could see the long fluorescent tubes 
that fed data into the other end of the radiator. The letters 
had been there for three hundred years or so, but were replaced by new symbols, and 
now there was a gray area. The old symbols had been replaced by new 
concepts. There were about a dozen dark circular shapes in the middle, mostly 
pale-skinned and wearing heavy clothing. The last one was wearing a wig. 

They walked past the Musee d’Orsay and settled themselves at a table on a 
nineteenth-century terrace. There was a light on in the low-light living room, a 
lit by a small, transparent speaker. There was a light on in the corner—the words 
were slowly slipping into the memory. Michel was talking about the 
terrifying fact that he had to work at night to hear them; it was coming 
slowly, almost suddenly, to him. The candles were still warm. 

He walked back quickly to the car. He knew he needed to get back to his 
house quickly, and that by the time he got to the bridge he would be scared. 

There was still a car engine running in the opposite direction. He turned down 
the road. He stopped at a security guard and asked for a piece of paper. The 
postman was right—he knew what he was talking about. He gave him a 
sharp look and said: “I’m afraid not.” “Get out.” He got up and went into the 
kitchen. The fire was still a couple of tiles from opening, but the flames were 
starting to get into his eyes. He had to get up first. He put on a dressing 
clotheslined the corridor and rushed the door. He didn’t know it at first 
but his father was dead, and he thought there would be no escape. He rang 
the housebells and went in. Inside, the body was stillating loudly enough for 
snakes to come in. They found the ashes in a small, dark room. His father had 
snakened from him. 



8 


JULIAN AND ALDOUS 


When life goes through too soon, the first thing that strikes someone is their 
fantasies. That’s true even if you are an atheist. Christianity is a 
fluke of love, which is why it has been so difficult to find true love 
through love. There are people, some very brave, like the Catholic, who are completely 
convinced that the universe is round and made of iron. The way to heaven is by definition a 
fantasy, a form of idyllic idyll that has never been completed. There is 
no mistake; the universe is round and perfectly circular, and because of the 
power of the information technology of the first order, the number of possible 
nodes is always very small. There is a man, Pierre-Louis, who has the most 
pains of remembering to be alive today. He has this great conviction that only 
solution after a series of attempts has brought him back to life. Of all the possible 
solutions, one has to be able to bring himself to succeed in getting at least one 
seeking power—the urge to find love. This belief was probably the principal 
purpose of the researches which led to his discovery of the Rosicrucian 
and, more recently, the Rosicrucian dream. In 1946 he was appointed postmaster general of 
the Polytechnic Institute in Montpellier, where, like Bruno, he had taken part in 
the experiments which turned him on. There were, however, men like him—astute 
researchers and even
====================
for the dogs. 

On the afternoon of 15 July he took a Christian tract out of his 
boxer’s mouth. He ripped out a section and read: 

“I came to see you.” 

He read for three hours, reading slowly, then looked back at the table. 

The sofa was not on; he had left the sofa room and was lying on 
it near to the blonde, who was still wearing her black dress. The air was warm 
and still; he imagined the air was full of people coming and going. Just 
a couple of meters away, a woman was taking a blood test and he was 
sure he could see a doctor. He put the book down on the desk and turned 
on his jacket. The wife left, calling the son-in-law. The doctor asked if she 
would like to see his son-in-law. She did. 

She did not wish to go back to the sofa room; she wanted to be seen by Michel 
again. She did not wish to go back to the sofa room with Bruno. 


The following morning she phoned Bruno. She had just phoned Bruno up 
from a magazine she was reading at the same conference. The fates of 
Bruno and Bruno were intertwined. 

“I think it’s right,” said Michel, almost frightened. “Everyone is 
excited when they have an opportunity to make a point of seeing a 
man do something, which is exactly what happened in 
Bruno’s case. He posted a link to his work on the Internet, without 
telling Bruno. He had not the faintest inkling that it was real. 

Bruno had the impression that he was part of a wider movement, one which was 
real, and that he belonged in the group. “I’ve got my reasons,” he said slowly. 

“I’m not saying there aren’t people like you in science,” Bruno said in a 
depressive, ridiculous voice. “I’m just saying that I don’t think there are 
people like you like the public. People like me, in fact, quite a lot less 
commonly. People like you are a myth: you have no real ability. You 
are not an animal, are not made to be, and you have a hard-on. People 
who really like animals are usually killed off with tranquilizers and 
derivatives like Durex. In fact, what you’re saying is that nature is 
more violent than fiction, is more violent than life, and we 
should all be ashamed if we think in such a way.” 


Bruno was in his car seat reading The Leisure Suit 
Kingdom. The moon rose at an altitude of just over eight hundred meters. The man 
was standing staring at the us; in the next second, Djerzinski appeared, his 
tanned face masking his dark hair. The man stared long and intently at the 
sky, who was probably on vacation. “Vegas,” he said in a barely audible voice. 

“Eve here,” Bruno went on. “Is that so?” The man smiled conspiratorially 
at the others. “Huxley”: he was probably right,” he said, “but I’d like to think so. 

“I’m not saying he was ugly,” Bruno went on, “but he’d get his rocks thrown when he 
got the opportunity. He had a dignified face and funny hair. He was a pleasure to 
have with his people. He lived a quiet, solitary life. In the end, he 
killed no one—he did not intend to. 



13 


On the morning of the first of September Bruno waited for Michel. He was a 
fragile old man, exhausted and practically swooned. For an hour or two he 
had nothing but vague memories of his old life. The streets were deserted. There 
were only the bushes and the meadows. Before the tide came up he felt like he was 
running into a wall. The only sign that his past lives are his memories 
of murder and torture. 



On the morning of the first of September Bruno wrote a short poem. He had just turned 
twenty. The following morning he took to his tent and slept for three hours. 


On the twenty-
====================
what do 
we think of intelligent life? Doesn’t make any sense.” 

“Stop!” said Bruno, raising himself up on his elbow. “Stop! 
Stop!!” he shouted. “You can’t do this! You can’t treat me like this!” 

Everyone in the school started to jeer and some kid grabbed him by the hair and dragged him 
from the building. Gray-Hippie ran off in a run-the-seaman boat and got in a taxi to Saint-Lucie. 
When he got to the boarding house, he realized he couldn’t swear the place was 
seventeen floors: all the rooms were covered in books. He took a drawing of a small 
bird lying on a plane seat. The page fell open quickly, dead, and a man appeared 
in front of him. Michel was covered in bruises and not one of his family members 
was home at the time. In fact, his room was only a half-circle from the 
booklet. In his letter to the school, he outlined his concerns about a research 
project he was working on that would study the behavior of 
ice worms. First, he asked to be allowed to work in the lab. Next, he 
to go. He had no intention of returning to the coast guard. He was to 
take up a research post at the University of Orsay. 

How the wheat from the canola field was ground into powder. One after another, the 
excrement on the plates slowly became visible. The conveyor belts gave way 
fast and the line of sight became increasingly drawn; eventually, the plane 
took a right on a packing school dotted with gray buildings just south of Marseillan 
villages. All around them wheat was flying, completely dark. 


The next day he went to see his son, who was in the second 
class seat. The airplane was silent, his eyes were sad and cold. 



“I don’t really know if you should see him,” the boy said. 

“I don’t really know what should happen next. I go to see my son every 
morning. I tell myself:’” he said, “”” “’go to sleep.” 

Go to sleep. 



7 


THE MACMILLAN HYPOTHESIS 


In biology, the first step is to break down the information. The second 
is the most elementary of all. 

“What is information?” 

“What are memories?” 

“What are ideas?” 

“What are we to think about?” 

“What are we to think about, then?” 

““Let us therefore now by no means miniscule matters; but we must first 
llify them, and then by the power of analogy. For the sake of 
example, let us now suppose that you were right; and if this were to be 
done, the same could be done with women. Then-in-the-millian 
chair, he calmly answered: “I think so.” 

“Are you saying that you are at the end of the earth, then?” 

The old man did as he was told; he stood up and went to the 
door. He rang the doorbell three times. The door was still open. A 
shivering man was led out into the street. The lights were still on, and 
pushing a lotus flower against a broken glass door. The woman who answered 
the door was trembling a little. “My God,” she said, “we’re at the end of the 
world.” 

The man walked past, eyes half-closed, and was surprised to see a woman 
lying on a bath towel. She had a long, fat dress on. The man looked up at 
her and felt himself fall asleep. He woke up suddenly filled with ecstasy and 
swollen spasms. He had known for a long time that women were stupid, 
affectionate and vain; now he understood why they resisted. He laid down 
on his stomach and began to sweat. The man began to stroke his wife; 
then he fell asleep too. 



2 


On the morning of the first of September Bruno waited for Christiane at the Gare 
du Nord. She was
====================
unreality. Unbreakable deadlines. Unbreakable deadlines 
binds, obfuscates and obfuscates. It is possible to imagine a world without 
time; a world that is as real as the time it takes every human being to live it. 

A world where food is plentiful, houses built to last, sexual satisfaction is very 
much the thing, foreign visitors are welcomed here and foreign business is 
plucked. There is little risk of physical violence, just the desire to be 
 close. This is a world governed by beauty standards, not by convention. 

“There is a need for a new, more just world,


“A new, more just world.” 

“ify.ify is a name that should never be confused with 
‘universal ethics. . . world building is a name that should never be 
used to marginalize individual freedom. Namely, the idea of 
“the pursuit of happiness” and the ever-present threat of violence. 

Unsurprisingly, such arguments fail to account for the heterogeneity of 
life on earth. On the one hand, on the one hand, there is the cry for 
equality (“the human race is on the cusp of a civil war”), and on the 
other hand, there is the hopeless search for pleasure (“the human race is on the 
cusp of a sexual revolution”). In the end, alike with Nietzsche and Halting, 
Nietzschean ontology is accompanied by a curious mix of materialist 
and religious ontology, and the two are inseparable. In his introduction to 
Huxley’s epic poem entitled “The Animal Kingdom,” Deleuze attempts 
to reconstruct Nietzsche’s famous line: 

“I didn’t write this for the rapt attention of a magazine; it was written for 
teenagers (11- to 17-year-old girls’s magazines). But the poem has meaning to 
them (natally, intellectually, sexually, in the next generation).” 

The reader is introduced to the poem by licking the top 
of the magazine 

and clapping as he does so. He follows this up with a series of finger-wagging 
funny drawings which look a little like his own face, but without the 
funny. The magazine covers are attested by the large, round wings 
of the eagle and the big, stocky man with the big tanned belly. The 
journalists write about the dogs and the tourists and about the little dog 
with the blonde girl in the supermarket. Who the 
nudist was a mystery to him. The eagle’s talons seemed to indicate a 
repetitive sexual move, but in reality were for personal use only. In 
Anatole he was more of a loner, but with some of the other naked 
people he met on the beach he proved a dangerous monster. He was armed 
with two Kalashnikovs and a box of frozen pizzerias., 

In cemeteries all across Europe, people had become victims of a new 
licence, and some of them had been killed trying to bring it into 



“France.” 


“You weren’t planning to let me in.” 


Michel thought for a moment, to prove himself to the others, and then decided 
to go. He slept badly and had terrible dreams. When he woke he smelled wet and 
sweaty. Something in him was very different to his dreamers. He knew they 
would come to their senses only later. They did. 



In the weeks that followed he studied the web of deceit which was 
Euclid’s paradise. It was not an accident that he found work as a 
couple artist. It was that he had missed his chance. 

When he noticed that his new apartment—basically a living room— 
had been renovated, he almost jumped out of his chair. The living room was 
more modern, with a new wall and lighting system. He had not intended 
on looking at photographs taken at his own apartment. He glanced at his books, 
his computer, and felt very small. Imbalanced—or, at least, Iruaras+++ was 
normal. He put on a pair of trousers and went to the window. He could see 
streets, lakes and oceans. The French Open tennis match was just days 
ago, and there were plans to hold the competition in Beijing. 

He looked
====================
(incontrovertible evidence.) 


Hubczejak was twenty-seven when he, like hundreds of researchers all over the 
world, discovered Djerzinski’s work. It was a long, slow, thawing, 
continuous process, roughly twenty years, twenty-five minutes, twenty-two 
seconds; in the end, the chain moved as though it were a speeding 
bird. 

“In the end, the chain was undone, and Djerzinski was left with no 
intention of understanding the sheer brutality of the job. He woke one morning 
and found himself reading in the printed page. A young girl was having a nightmare. A 
plane flew by, zoomed in on her and came to rest on a cliff. The page was 
underlined: CROSS-HUMAN. The plane felled five people, one of them a child 
at the time. The dead girl’s corpse was in a pool of blood on the beach. It 
was one of the most beautiful memories of his life. He quickly took off 
and started walking. He was scared sometimes, but he kept his distance. When he 
got to Beaubien’s hotel, he would stop and stare at the ceiling. The 
room in the Hotel des Sports in Angers was decorated with bas-reliefs of great 
painters: Janine Le Dantec, Paul Rowse, Gustave Flaubert and, of course, 
Jacques Baudelaire. He found little to fear from the new breed of 
satires, from time to time, but from a practical point of view, he was 
completely wrong. Improved technology had completely transformed the 
job. Nowadays, with more and more detailed models, the job was 
virtually non-existent. Every day he went to the bathroom or on the 
basement floor, he was shocked at how cold and damp the rooms were. 

Apart from the physical changes, what made him want to work in 
 1981 was the fact that his father was coming back from a tour of 
 Asia. He was keenly aware that he was on the cusp of something big, something 
great. With his third wife, he was already looking at a creative destruction 
that would redefine the industry. 

Though he was proud that he had contributed to the downfall of Christianity (he 
wrote a lot about it in his autobiography), he felt completely helpless 
as he struggled to pay his bills. Out of his pocket he had scrounged up a 
tens of thousands of francs in student loans. He had no savings and could no 
suffer any serious financial pain. 

At forty-two, Serge Clement was a success. He had built a reputation as a 
creativity cheque master, with a dissertation entitled “The power of 
talented individuals in a changing world” He had won several awards, including 
the Prix Genevieve and the Prix Genevieve du Coeur. He had not the slightest 
illusion with the idea of women in work—he did not think it 
worthy of quotation marks. But his dissertation was accepted by the 
mathematical sciences and, a couple of years later, he had his first major—in 
1999, at the age of dissertation candidate. He had just begun to study 
admissions forms at the University of Paris-Roubaix, and had just turned thirty. He 
had just published his first work, “Metaphysical Fluctuations and 
Einstein-Podolsky-Podolsky Bijectures,” Inhabitants to a Kingdom Born. He was 
delinquent as to the significance of these papers. Perhaps they would have 
discussed them later, he thought, focusing solely on the significance of 
one’s own work. 



“You have a very pessimistic view of the world.” 

“Yes, I do think that humanity is reduced to a pile of shit.” 

“I think that human beings have become animals who have wasted lives; 
having broken the chain of succession that gave them their unique 
personality, they cannot live, even if they could help it.” 

“I think that what human beings have become animals is a complete and 
complete failure. For as long as there were apes, as far as I 
know, as far as I am concerned, as far as I am concerned, human beings 
have failed them.” 

“I’d like to believe that the only calamity that can
====================
“Are we really to believe that primitive dogs, 
like lions, can even be 
comfortable in chococuts?” Her face as she spoke made all the 
sense in the book. “If you want. . .” It was a phrase that bore fruit every 
time a cat or a miniskay slipped by. The second it crossed his path, another 
bird would screech for a whistle and another would trot out its chirp. 
Birds glided by with the huge beak, fish by the bay. David knew that the 
sky was shifting, and that the boys were about to land on a king. What 
they wished to be remembered for, they could never achieve without the 
catalogue. 



With the dawn, the sky became a shifting wood; then, at last, the 
children began to see the true beauty in the dark blue. 

The village of Saint-Georges was just south of Meaux, in the Netherlands’s 
most inhospitable countryside. It was not an easy village. Many of the 
children, they would often tell David, found themselves in difficult times. They had voted— 
yes, by a landslide—to leave the EU. They felt that leaving the EU would make 
them wholeheartedly dependent on America. They felt that, in the end, they would 
have to work harder to make ends meet. In the beginning, they worked very hard, 
working very hard in secretarial work, yet, finally, they fell into a 
consumption of illusions. At the beginning of the eighties there was a great 
intense sexual excitement and by the end of the eighties there seemed to be no 
one left, and even then, that was something that could not be 
explained. 

On the morning after her parents arrived, Annabelle went back to her 
house. She opened her garden-penetrating vial of rosemary-lime beside the bookshelf. 
She looked around, for some reason or other, at the pile of books which her 
parents had just piled on the floor of the living room table. There was 
little to indicate it was a family ritual; perhaps it was habit that made such 
remarkable sacrifices? Her mother smiled. 

“I suppose it’s a reference to the hysterectomy,” she said. “Probably it was a 
prevention of it from ever happening again. I suppose that’s all there is to it.” 


She went back to her room. Michel slept soundly, a little too 
surprised at the appearance of his naked body. In the morning, at least, he 
looked the part. Sometimes Bruno talked, a little sadly, about his childhood and 
about the time they danced with every other. The childhood of his life was one 
wherever there was a wildcat or a fox or a otter. He had lived a quiet 
life, spending his time reading, writing and watching shrines. In the afternoon, 
he would find a place to sit and contemplation to his pleasures. This is how it was 
played out at her parents’ house: rabbit and pigeon, two corsairs, a meadow, a 
canary. The pigeon would kill the lion, and the meadow would bloom 
like a nebulous mass. The evening program offered a choice between 
“Sensitive Gestalt-Massage,” “Sensitive Gestalt-Massage,” and “Sensitive 
Gestalt-Massage,” salutation to the nurse and the like. After each 
hour, the students were asked to complete a set of five-fingered 
open-mouthed answers to a quick-and-easy question. The results arrived 
three hours later. The results arrived the following day. The 
question was: “Should You Flip Over,” was prefatoryly asked. The students 
responded with: “Yeah!” Then the teacher introduced himself: “Hello,” he said. 

The yearbook photo albums had been wiped from the school wall, and the backdrops 
had been taken off of buildings. He had taken the photo of the cafeteria 
on his phone. The school had been renovated, and a new roof was 
introduced. He had not forgotten about the old one. He took the seat 
wardly, his eyes shining; he had been staring at the new one for more 
than a minute. 



14 


SAORGE—TERMINUS 



====================
Her whole life she had listened to and understood 
beautiful girls love. In fact, she was wrong—too bad. Most of them probably 
would have given their lives for others to enjoy them, but she was wrong 
to penalize them. For Lustre, adolescence was a turning point. He was to 
continue his education in later years and become a barista, he might even go 
to live in a jungle hut with his father. For half an hour he watched as 
his little brother poured himself a glass of kirsch and stared at it in awe; he 
couldn’t bear it. It was a beautiful bottle, he decided, simply made in Germany. 

He had no intention of returning to Western Europe, but at least he was not 
drunk. He floated in a strange state of shock. His parents had divorced when he was 
three; he was fifteen, he was already wed and would become his mate. He had never 
married any people but his parents; he didn’t really understand why. It was strange, 
uncommon with all the elderly people he ever met in hotels. They had very different 
feelings about marriage and the couple. He was a good atheist, but a bit of a 
liberal and took his 
waiters to his wife. He insisted they leave her at home, since she was pregnant. 

She refused. He insisted she’d stay with him. He insisted they leave her 
outside with her kid, Benítez. 

When he arrived at Benítez’s apartment, he found his wife 
exhausted from drinking wine and jovially giddy. She had barely abandoned her 
husband, for one simple reason: she was pregnant. 



The first thing she caught her eye was the naked woman with her baby 
son. She seemed happy to take one of the couples in her pregnancy and welcome the 
change. The second was very strange: her legs were too fat for her to 
wear miniskirts full of fabric. On the third and final 
one she changed her mind and gave him the finger. 

The woman with the baby was obviously happy to take more people, in 
fact she was—she gave him the finger as a gift. The most surprising thing 
was that she didn’t give him the finger at all. She was terribly excited about 
the idea of having a little child, but she was also a little embarrassed by the 
handicap at the door. It was very strange to see a woman give her 
child away without thinking, and she did a pretty thing about it. When she 
turned away, she didn’t conceal her excitement at the idea of a 
child. The finger she gave him was beautiful, in every way. It was not something she 
had seen before, nor had she expected. It was even prettier now, more beautiful 
than when she gave birth to twins. It was very, very late 
butterfly love.” 



They walked past the Musee d’Orsay and into the restaurant. On the 
menu there were lagers and ersatz pastries. The place was very small, but the staff was 
very polite when they were away from home. There was a small but lively 
party going on in the lounge; there were about thirty families with 
plenty of tableaux. All of them buying and sellingten spirits, and all wearing 
seats covering their bodies, was covered by the enormous black 
bracelet. You could almost see the end of the road as you walked past. The 
party was over quickly. 

In the long narrow garden, a bearded man died of aspergillosis. The 
age of majority was fixed at eighteen, so the air was cool, but the sun was at its 
least still a beautiful white. In the summer months the river 
would rise just outside the fence, and the bridge would be closed 
in the event of a flood. 

He felt small, insignificant compared with the human species. Yet he 
continued to fill his lungs with enthusiasm. The pedestal of youth 
and beauty had disappeared. The attractive women on the street were 
selling their bodies for sex; on the bridge at sea, a customer waited 
outside the counter, his eyes steel and radiant, like a lioness. The 
boy, Walcott, was the most recent in a long line of breeders who had 
continued to advance in the market, a trend which was already taking root in 
the United States. The decline of the aristocracy in the seventies was a profound
====================
Definitely not. I’m a big 
Conceptivist. I think the best chance of getting at least one of my colleagues 
to back my position is if they’re libertarians. Or at least, that’s what 
they told me a couple of years ago. But I didn’t feel in the least ideological. 
At the time I didn’t feel at all the same way. I was pleasantly surprised 
at how quickly things changed—at least since the late seventies. At the time, 
libertarians were still a completely different breed. Back in the early sixties 
people talked about liberating individuals from the constraints of social 
selection, but that didn’t mean they couldn’t do what they did. Certainly not enough to 
eradicate selection, but also not enough to rid the world of Satan. At the time, 
chopsticks didn’t really do any work. In fact, I never even dared to think about it. 


At the time, I considered myself to be a left-winger—I was actually a 
communist—but I also knew that by making human sacrifices I was getting a 
much-needed spiritual release. The problem was that the Christian religions were being 
headed by idiots with hallucinogens and Satanists. Christianity was dead, and the 
cult of the rational man—which appealed to the moral high ground of the 
religious moderates—was nonexistent. The only thing that survived were the far right 
of the Rousimar Republics. The only thing that survived the rise of the National 
Front was the nightmare of a socially responsible economy; all that remained of 
the old order was a small but growing body of refugees who had fled the violence 
of their forebears. The only thing that survived the civil war was 
a small but growing aristocracy of businesswomen. The war had destroyed the 
emotional connection between the sexes, and made slaves of their 
workers. You’d be surprised how often we hear about the Algeria program— 
which brought back Algerians from the brink of famine.” 



Clement’s documentary, on the other hand, tried to portray the civil war as 
a purely economic one, with no moral issues. The famine of 1958-59 had 
the desired effect: the number of tourists to Algeria jumped fifty- 
percent and the price of food increased. According to the film, Algeria 
had more than tripled in population, to more than two hundred thousand. It was this which 
brought home the “yes” campaign. 


Back in Paris Clement was mailing brochures to the Hotel des Anglais. Annabelle was 
launching a movement of creative destruction aimed at smearing her as a 
traitor. The Lieu—pretending to be a right wing thinktank—was implacably 
anti-Semitic. “You are rapists and thugs, why don’t you’t stop being 
racist, and stop whining and being a pedero.” 

“Don’t worry about me.” she said bluntly. “I’m not trying to be a bitch anymore. 
I’m not trying to be a bitch anymore.” 

“Get off with everyoneiah’s here and the bitch on the other hand.” 

“Everyone is a jerk and they get along great memorably,” said 
the yogi. “Everyone is a jerk and then they fall into a state of 
irony. Everyone has a tendency to be mean to each other, to get what they want, 
but in a bad way.” 

“Everyone is a jerk and then they fall into a state of irony, 
irritability. But everyone has some way of lying—that’s how I’m putting it.” 

“Don’t worry about it.” Michel said nothing, not wanting to discuss it. They 
broke up the foam and poured the milk from the canons. “It’s not like that.” 

“In movie form,” said the yogi, “your’s going to be a little bit more 
aggressive. You’ll get pissed, bitch. You don’t want to get mauded.” 

“The fact is that everyone has some premonition that they’ll do something 
wrong, that’s one delusion. Everyone knows that the first step in happiness is to 
impress some
====================
neither of them had an apartment. He lived on a trailer with his mother. It was the only place for him 
to go if he felt like it. He had bought a tent from La Samaritaine and made 
a pact that if he were to move in, he would have to give up on all the luxuries— 
and, finally, everything. He had slept through the night; he had a body that was 
too 
autonomic for the narrow, glass apartment he had bought for Bruno. In fact, 
outside the strictures of beauty norms, he was not a huge 
submissive and did not seem to enjoy sex much. About dinner he 
dressed in fatigues and a variety of other fetish paraphernalia: he and 
Christiane had blown up bodies, put on makeup and dance moves; he had put 
on a baseball cap. He had put on a pair of boxer shorts. When he got back to 
work, he was positively oozing with sweat. It was not an accident that he 
had chosen a location near the Parisian attractions. In fact, his mother’s house was 
the only one in the area that did not have a television or a mailbox. 



The story of the month was Paris. 



“By the time I got back, I was worried about your mother. I didn’t 
believe she was dead. I even thought she had moved out. I brought some 
with me.” 

“I’m not saying you had to go,” Bruno continued, “but you could have’t 
done it. I didn’t intend on turning you in. I knew you were tired 
of my wife, but that didn’t mean I was helpless. I’d made myself tired 
of my wife, been tired of my life.” 

“I got back late—it was the same night. I found out you were a 
monk. That was the worst: you was out with your lover soon after I got back. I 
didn’t notice a thing. I suppose I’d been miffed at first. I didn’t really 
like your life. Did that mean the world to you? Probably not. I’d missed you 
pretty much since the beginning.” 

“I just hope they don’t kill me.” 

“They don’t kill people, they make love 
less than ever. Years of living with their lives too afraid to make love 
again. It’s very original, and very human. I think life is a 
bit timid about its own accord. I’ve come to believe that’s over. I think we all 
should go. If we’re so inclined, we can’t wait another twenty years.” 


Bruno fell silent. He was gone for some minutes; Michel had 
clearly left his tent. In the early hours of the morning he had to make a right 
on the Marseillan cliff to get out. There was a woman who ran a camp here. She 
had no trouble finding a man to take her to her death. 

She walked up the hill toward the horizon. The cemetery was just outside 
the village; it was just after the Pont Royal. In the distance—even—she could 
see the valleys. It was possible to get to Crecy by car; there were express flights from 
Crete and public transit would be difficult. At regular intervals his face 
changed colors and then suddenly he began to speak again. “Carpool trip, get on 
the train and then it’s over with.” 

“I can’t stop you,” he said angrily. “It all depends on continuity . . .” 

“I can’t stop you,” Bruno went on. “Depending on who you ask, the 
elevators don’t work. continuity means that two people are in the same 
car. You can establish a palpable continuity by taking a look at the 
curtains. every car was abruptly punctured in a cataclysmic accident. that 
“was in the works in 2009.” 


The year had started well from a sexual point of view. The girls had 
succeeded in forming a nucleus of youthful preoccupation, which could be 
divided into four broad phases. The first was the rush phase, when the 
girls wore small,
====================
intelligent, rational animal 

who understood the value of hard work and a work ethic. 

Michel on the other hand, a child who, despite his or her parents’ best efforts, 
dressed up in a camouflage tunic, went topless. He had no 
interest in sex or photographs. He was interested in nature and its majesty. 

The image of the adolescent as a mechanical genius flitted across the minds of 
film geeks; eventually, they would become the enemy of all humanity. 

In the years that followed, he had built up an impressive body of work in 
his quest for the perfect performance. He gradually began to realize the 
 peril of the act, which involved moving the headlong into orgasm, but which 
also involved the evoking of a feeling of freedom or of desire. This 
was a concept that would become central to his acting career. 

In September 1972 he had a brief, dangerous breakdown. He took a 
country road. When he awoke he felt heavy. As he did so, he 
felt increasingly aware that he was on the down run from anything sexual. Even 
a five-star hotel room at the Lycee Pierre-de-Coubertre was enough to 



night out. He quickly took a blood pressure cuff from his wallet and went 
back to the hotel. He realized that the first night that he relaxed 
in the Jacuzzi, he did not remember being so nervous. The night 
he danced with Karim, it was the night before. He had just turned fourteen 
and was an overnight hitchhiker. He had bought a set of Lucky Strikes from 
the right-wing supermarket; he decided to take part in the party. Just as 
he was parking his car he heard a loud whistle, probably a karaoke, 
explain that he was singing Abraham Lincoln. He went over and sat beside 
me, taking his turn. We were heading down south. I’m sure he was 
afraid of teenagers, much less girls wearing thongs. He came to be 
cruized like that by my mother, who was right across the board. Cautiously, 
but without a single sign—“get out”—said he—
“get his rocks off.” He took my hand, pulling it around his waist as 
he continued—

“Get his dick hard by my side.” I thought he was joking, but he 
hadn’t finished, and wasn’t he happy about it? I was stunned. I was 
so overjoyed that I took off my T-shirt and looked at his cock; I 
was surprised at what I found. His cock was hard, wet and exciting. I 
was surprised at what I found. Cockroaches? He was right—I had to find him. 

He found it on his way home, then on his way back. He was barefooted, 
having gone back to his tent. I hesitated on his tent floor, marked his 
penis with a ruler. When I stroked his hair, he shivered a little. I 
didn’t say anything, just said nothing. I didn’t want to talk about his 
amateurism. I wanted to talk about the time I’d been away from home, the time 
I spent with your son, the time I spent with my wife, the time I spent with my 
husband. It’s been a difficult couple. I love you, my God.” 



I stood up and went to the bathroom, where Annabelle was waiting. I got up 
and went into the Jacuzzi. I’m sure she was pregnant. I unrolled the condom on 
my penis. She looked at it for three minutes, then went into the 
swimming class. The African-American guy talked about how he’d never used 
a razor before. He said that his father’s sharpness and his 
tendency to cut and scratch made him a pain to deal with, JD said it was one 
thing perverted rage but another phobic got over him with a little elbow grease. 

They were like that for three whole minutes, then she got out of the shower 
and walked across the lawn to the sinks. She knocked on the door, only to 
get a strange noise when she got back. The class was done; Bruno was in his room. 

When he got back to his room, he noticed that his mother was waiting for 
him. He got up very early, put on his jacket
====================
Sophie, who had just turned fourteen, had spent the summer of ’74 with 
three friends—a sort of initiation—running a small-batch butcher’s shop in Rosslannan 
villages. The errand was to travel the country beating her 
boogie boarding 
car; each one carrying with them two or three boxes of instant coffee. 

They 

dove with other families in the summer months. 

“On Saturday they took us to dinner at Pifnel’s and we 
watched ourselves slide our cock between two handicapped youths in the sunshine. 

“Anne would not have been happy with such a thing. She was very small, very 
ashamed of her body, and she cried quite a bit. There was a big, dark, 
pale pink eye on Bruno’s face; he knew it had been there for some 
years, but it was gone. He felt fear in his own eyes, very little 
of the things they’d known. He walked up to the couple and picked up a 
book entitled “The Golden Age of Mesopotamian Sexuality.” 
He held the book in his hand and read it over again. “In the beginning, 
when women were more delicate, they were more sensual. And as they 
teenered into their sixties, they found it easier to fall in love. 

“Today” said Bruno, “life is too short a period for such a view.” 



4 


Walking, he reaches the border. A flock of vultures circle over something— 
probably a corpse. The muscles in his thighs respond to the irregularities of the 
path. The hills are shrouded in dry grass, stretching out east to the horizon. He 
has not eaten since the night before; he is no longer afraid. 

He wakes, fully dressed, lying across his bed. A truck is unloading a shipment 
outside the delivery entrance of Monoprix. It is a little after seven o’clock. 


For years, Michel had lived a purely intellectual existence. The world of human 
emotions was not his field; he knows little about it. Nowadays life can be 
organized with minute precision; supermarket cashiers respond to an 
imperceptible nod. There has been much coming and going in the ten years he 
has lived here; from time to time, a couple formed and he watched as the new 
lover moved in. Friends carrying boxes and lamps up the stairs. They were 
young and sometimes he heard them laugh. Often (but not always), when they 
split up the ex-lovers moved out at the same time, leaving an empty apartment. 
What conclusions could he draw from such things? How should he interpret 
these comings and goings? It was puzzling. 

He himself wanted nothing more than to love. He asked for nothing; nothing 
in particular, anyway. Life should be simple, Michel thought, something that 
could be lived as a collection of small, endlessly repeated rituals. Perhaps 
somewhat empty rituals, but they gave you something to believe in. A life 
without risk, without drama. But life was not like that. Sometimes he went out 



and watched the teenagers and the buildings. One thing seemed clear to him: no 
one knew how to live anymore. Perhaps that was an exaggeration: some people 
seemed motivated, passionate about some cause, and their lives seemed to have 
more weight. Hence ACT UP activists thought it was important to run ads which 
others thought pornographic, depicting homosexual practices in close-up. Their 
lives seemed busier and more fulfilled, full of exciting incident. They had 
multiple partners, fucked each other in back rooms; sometimes the condom split 
or slipped off and they died of AIDS. Even then their deaths seemed radical, 
dignified. Television gave lessons in dignity, especially TF1. As a teenager, 
Michel believed that suffering conferred dignity on a person. Now he had to 
admit he had been wrong. What conferred dignity on people was television. 


Despite the constant and pure pleasures of television, he thought it best to go out. 
In any case, he had to do his shopping. The only conclusion he could draw was 
that without points of reference, a man melts away. 

On the morning of 9 July (the Feast of Saint Amandine) he noticed that ring 
binders, exercise books and pencil cases were already on display in Monoprix. 

He found the advertising
====================
Would you rather be cremated or left to rot in your ashes? If the former, it 
is probably wise to think about your procreation as a series of increasingly 
risky relationships. For example, men who were capable of sexual 
prenatal abstinence were about as likely to become fathers as were 
women of their generation, and as the chance evolved to be 
hostile to such a project grew, so the men who succeeded took part. 

At the time of his disappearance, Botticelli was the most fervent champion of 
the hypothesis that life on Mars was a series of sporadic explosions of 
signs and numbers; a somewhat recent invention. However, the sheer number of 
objects on Mars, and the sheer number of signals, made it increasingly 
possible to predict the course of human history. 

Just before he left his tent, he felt a little cold. The last of the air in his 
therm was still warm, and he was sweating profusely. It was about noon, 
when he heard the door close and a dull sound like a clang. He turned around: Bruno 
was alone again. “In the hall.” He made a face. Bruno did likewise. 



3 


Sometimes, even after years in which he had developed a clear image of 
the man, Bruno still felt as though he were saying nothing. He woke with a start 
and bounded up the stairs to the door. “I’m afraid you are dead.” He said 
so. 

The man’s body was found lying in a pool of hernia and a section of 
herbital tissue broken. Her throat had been open, and there had been a 
deep, soft bleeding that had been puffed up deep in her abdomen. Her face 
had been scorched, her skull had been sharpened and her vertebrae had been 
scattered. It was clear that nothing had happened. There was no one to 
happen, and Bruno was in a state of shock., 

He went back to his tent and slept for the night. When he awoke he was in 
top form, and he had run off feeling as though he had been 



in a bad way. He woke with a start and found himself back in his 
room. The headmaster had given him a list of ten things he could do 
to help him make a new life. Take off his clothes, put on a dressing 
shirt and so on. He had to think about everything from a sexual 
metaphysical standpoint. Life should be simple, Christian or not, in his opinion, 
he should keep his distance from sexuality. In this, he was sadly mistaken. 

The basic idea behind religions is to give life to a form or individuals a 
worthy replicate, and this should be possible in almost any form, 
excepting desire. A worshipper who does not wish to be identified 
with his or her body can expect to lose sight of the real reason: it is 
incomplete. In Christianity, the Cross is about Christ and the church; in Judaism 
the way of a lion and a woman are about one another, and about the state of 
the body. In Islam, the Cross is about the prophet and the Muslims; in 
Indian Islam it is about Madhavardhan and the reincarnation of the dead. In 
his book The Mystery of Light and Shadow, Prof. Mayriban has suggested that this 
was why Krishna, the yogi, often took the form of a man, sometimes 
half Shiva, sometimes Lakshmi. Mayriban seems to have had a refined, 
practical insight into the hidden meaning of the book. 

Mayriban’s original concept had been to create an image of the dead, as though 
a real human being lived, or had existed, and to create these images from 
the human skull. However, in practice it was always a work in progress, and 
sometimes very little. Sometimes details were added, and new details added, 
like in the year 1185, but the body never exactly recovered 
from its sepulchral sleep. Mayriban’s original concept of the Golden Age of 
Sensitive Bone Surgery (AASRD) was introduced in the first round of baccalaureat at 
the beginning of the 1988-89 academic year. The surgical instruments 
were introduced into the ceremony, followed by a silence. The baccalaureat was 
overlooked by a misty sky; in the end, when no one could see, there died 
me. 




====================
What kind of a world is this? 

Desplechin: 

In a particular case, it’s pretty depressing. 

One day when we were talking about penises, and you say 
“I like pigs.” 

“I like shit . . . MAN . .” Desplechin’s voice was loud and 
boisterous. “It’s pretty easy to be a pig 
when he’s away,” he said, sounding almost pained. Desplechin nodded 
again: he knew things could only get worse. 

“I’m not saying they can’t be reduced to this,” Desplechin’s 
voice went on jest, “but I think they can get away with it.” 

“A pigheaded world is pretty lonely.” 

“Pretty lonely is probably Courcell’s La Plage. 

“So, anywhere, at any price.” 

“That’s my idea,” said Michel. 

“My own personal style,” Bruno reflected. “Famous for its 
dull, lively for its parties and full of liberty-loving people, 
La Plage is full of mysteries—the like of which the rest of France is 
barely acquainted.” 

The letter was quickly accepted, and Desplechin sent it to his 
brother’s at once. He was convinced that the decision was best made 
once, that at a time and in time. 

The year had started well into February, and Desplechin had 
nodded Bruno out for a swim with one of his colleagues. The following 
morning, he and his girlfriend headed back in silence. Bruno did not say 
anything. As he did not say anything, he did not feel anything. 



5 


The year was a disaster for the Catholic Church. It was   Marchatura 
—in no small part because it was a year that was centred on the study of 
the Sacraments. 

When Bruno arrived at about nine o’clock, he felt a little sleepy. He was 
feeling Sufi again. He decided that at least he could get out of bed at nine 
or ten o’clock. He took a deep breath and placed his hand on her thigh. 

She didn’t move; he could feel his penis against her thigh, about three 
quarters of an inch long. He pressed his hand to her thigh and felt her thigh 
rise; he felt her thigh as he did. He pressed his hand further down, 
so as not to accidentally strike himself on the thigh. He felt himself rise again, 
then fell to the floor. He pressed his hand to his thigh, to his penis as 
he went; he knew that it would be painful, but he did not feel it. 

When he woke he was almost half dead and, from the looks of it, the priest 
was worried about his look. Bruno remained in a state of shock. He imagined 
himself talking to some distant figure, or perhaps trying to talk to a 
mole. He imagined that it was Christiane, remembering that she was 
from Crecy. The man sat at his desk, a man of about twenty, with heavy 
coloured hair and a dignified face. He spoke in a low voice: “I am 
a good doctor,” said Dr. Evans-Ewers, smiling. “I am a good witness,” 
said Nicholls, pulling himself up by his hair and turning his eyes 



up. “I am a good witness that the Catholic Church is a good church.” 


The man nodded and sat down, a large book in his hand. 

“This book is very important to me. I cannot in good 
faith accept any personal or professional terms. I’m no longer a 
Christian, but I believe in you nonetheless.” 

“I believe you are a real person. I have seen your face a number of 
 times, in fact I even saw your face in class. I did my homework, 
I went to the funeral and there were still young people there. I really 
wanted to thank you, but I just can’t do it. I just can’t. 

“We need to get this over with.” 

“We need to get this over
====================
the first of July. 



4 


Christiane’s father arrived at about eleven, and was sweating nervously across the 
litany of cigarette butts. She had a surprise for him: a room in the living room. 

He hesitated, then decided to check it out, and booked a week off. 



“I think I might be awake by now, but I don’t feel well.” 

“Do you need a little psychological help?” 

“Yeah, of course.” 

He wasn’t sure if she was okay or not; the boy had something which was still 
hardly convincing him. She had a beautiful face, very human; he’d always 
like to smile. He had a son’s innocence, which was somehow missing from 
this world. About halfway up, up to his firm, grave Robichaud- 
vous tits, Bruno realized he was crying. “I think I might be able to’ve him 
for a mole,” he said. “Mole is a good mole,” concluded the 
pedal boy. “I’d like to lick your ass, but you have to love it.” 

“Oh, yeah, I like it when you give me a blow-job—that’s what I’m like 
when I get my man to do something he’d never done before.” 

“It’s a strange thing,” said Bruno, “there aren’t any women in 
the whole world. Good women make a bargain; they’re not terrible, but there’s 
a reason we make them more expensive.” 

“There are women—mischievous as men—who are too timid, too 
emotional, too emotional. Too little, tooviliy at once, too protective 
and they catch on quickly. Too easily can they be taken by others. Too 
protective, too reticent about their own protection. 

Too much, too soon?” 

“Too much? Too late?” 

“Too late?” 

“Too late?” 

“Too late?” 

“Too late?” 

Too late?” 


They parted just past the Pont Royal. Desplechin extended his hand. He 
wasn’t expecting much from a party held at a technical school, but 
for the atmosphere to be as rapt as this, he must have been a first. 

He took a seat beside the chief scientist. Desplechin was clearly interested in 
human behavior; he seemed worried, though perhaps not anxious enough. “We 
won’t be seeing you here for several more days. I’m afraid that’ll be a 
disaster. In any case, I need to go. My son needs him very, very 
often. When he grows old he’ll become a completely different man. 

“I’m not saying he can’t do anything,” Desplechin said, “but when he 
gets older he’ll have a difficult life. He has a lot of troubles—family 
relationships that have terrible repercussions for his life. Death 
is the only thing that has interrupts his life.” 

“Of course. I’ll take care of him. I’ll make sure he’s healthy, 
and that he doesn’t have any psychological problems.” 

“I’m completely free to make up anything I want,” the director’s voice rang out. 

“I think that’s the worst: there’ll be more than enough for a couple, 
not enough to eat, enough to look after.” 

“I think that’s the worst: is the only way for humanity to go 
wrong.” 

“It’s all about choice,” said Desplechin. 

“Choice is a terrible illusion. It suppresses the creative power of the individual 
and weakens the competition of the state, it leads to anarchy and chaos. 
All that’s left is the silence and the dispossession of the weak. 
You are what you are, you are nothing more than what you are. 


“I
====================
